

'■%•■' 







V 







THE AMERICAN MIDLAND NATURALIST 



Monograph No. 2 




THE AMERICAN MIDLAND NATURALIST 

 Monograph Series 



EDITORIAL STAFF 



Theodor Just Bolanx^ 



Editor, University of Notre Dame 



Edward A. Chapin Enhmolog]) 



U. S. National Museum, Washington, D. C. 



Kenneth W. Cooper Cp/o/ogu and Cenelics 



Princeton University, Princeton, N. J. 



Carroll Lane Fenton Invertebrate Paleontology 



Rutgers University, New Brunswick, N. J. 



John Hobart Hoskins Paleobotany 



University of Cincinnati, Cincinnati, Ohio 



Remington Kellogg Mammalogy 



U. S. National Museum, Washington, D. C. 



Jean Myron Linsdale Ornithology 



Hastings Reservation, Monterey, California 



George Willard Martin Mycology 



State University of Iowa, Iowa City, Iowa 



Karl Patterson Schmidt Ichthyology and Herpetology 



Chicago Natural History Museum, Chicago, Illinois 



Harley Jones Van Cleave Invertebrate Zoology 



University of Illinois, Urbana, Illinois 










THE AMERICAN MIDLAND NATURALIST 

 Monograph No. 2 



Edited by Theodot lust 



Published by the University oi Notre Dame, 



Notre Dame, Ind. 



FLORA OF ILLINOIS 



Containing keys for identification of 

 the flowering plants and ferns 



By GEORGE NEVILLE JONES 



Assistant Professor of Botany 

 University of Illinois 



J 



The University Press 



Notre Dame, Ind. 



April, 1945 



o5\C/^ 




Copyright, 1945 



by 



The American Midland Naturalist 



University of Notre Dame 



Notre Dame, Ind. 




CONTENTS 



PAGE 

 Introduction 1 



Flora and Vegetation 



Description of the Area 2 



Vegetational Divisions 4 



Systematic Treatment 



Key to the sections 8 



Key to the families 9 



Keys to the genera and species 32 



Glossary 274 



Bibliography 284 



Taxonomic Monographs and Revisions 286 



Author Index 298 



Index of Plant Names , 301 



FIGURES 



Vegetational Map of Illinois vii 



County Map of Illinois 273 



58416 




VegetatioNAI. Map of Illinois. The boundaries of the principal geooraphical 

 divisions of the state are indicated by sohd hnes, and their subdivisions by broken lines. 

 Shading, as shown in the key, indicates approximately the areas that formerly were 

 forested. (Reproduced by permission from A. G. Vestal's map of 1930, which was 

 based on C. J. Telford's map in Illinois Nat. Hist. Surv. Bull. vol. 16. 1926). 




Fl 



ora ot Illinois 



Introduction 



The followmg synopsis of the flora of Ilhnois is based on field and 

 herbarium studies carried on during the past five years. The principal objec- 

 tives in its preparation have been to furnish a concise account of the vascular 

 plants of Illinois, and to provide a convenient means of identifying them. No 

 comprehensive treatment of the botany of this state has hitherto been pub- 

 lished, and it is hoped that the present study may serve to stimulate further 

 interest in the local flora. 



This study is based mainly upon material contained in the Herbarium of 

 the University of Illinois, which consists of nearly 300,000 specimens from 

 various parts of the earth, of which approximately one-fourth were collected 

 in Illinois. These comprise all or part of the collections of many Illinois 

 botanists, including M. S. Bebb, F. Brendel, Agnes Chase, V. H. Chase, H. 

 A. Gkason, E Hall, E. J. Hill, F. E. McDonald, W. S. Moffat, H. N. 

 Patterson, R. Ridgway, J. Schneck, and others. The writer's collections of the 

 vascular plants of Illinois consist of approximately 15.0C0 shirts. In addi- 

 tion, the herbaria of the Field Museum of Natural History, and the Missouri 

 Botanical Garden, have been consulted. Mr. V. H. Chase of Peoria has gener- 

 ously placed at the writer's disposal his rich personal collection and that of 

 the Peoria Academy of Science. Dr. G. D. Fuller, Professor of Botany, Emer- 

 itus, at the University of Chicago, and Curator of the Herbarium of the 

 State Museum at Springfield, has contributed a number of specimens and has 

 given valued help in other ways. Other specimens have been donated by 

 several former students, including Mr. Robert Evers of Quincy, and Mr. 

 Richard Schneider of Kankakee. 



During the preparation of these keys numerous sources of information 

 have been drawn upon. The standard botanical manuals,* and monographs, 

 have been of course a constant guide. Special mention should be made of 

 Deam's excellent Flora of Indiana (1940). Parts of the keys to the families 



* Including: Robinson & Fernald, Cray's New Manual of BolanXi (ed. 7) 1908; 

 Britten, Manual of the Flora of the Northern States and Canada (ed. 3) 1907; Britten 

 & Brewn. Illustrated Flora of the Northern States (ed. 2) 1913; Rydberg, Flora of 

 the Prairies and Plains, 1932; Bailey. Manual of Cultivated Plants, 1924; Small, 

 Manual of the Southeastern Flora, 1933; Hitchcock, Manual of the Grasses of the 

 United States, 1935; Rehder, Manual of Cultivated Trees and Shrubs (ed. 2) 1940. 

 The following publications of the Illinois Natural History Survey are useful: Illinois 

 Wild Flowers, by W. B. McDougall; Trees of Illinois, by R. B. Mille. & L. R. 

 Tehon ; and Shrubs of Illinois, by L. R. Tehon. Other works containing data of value 

 te the student of the flora of Illinois are: Pepoon, H. S., Annotated Flora of the 

 Chicago Area; Palmer, E. J., & Steyermark, J. A., Annotated Catalogue of the 

 Flowering Plants of Missouri, and Steyermark, J. A., Spring Flora of Missouri; Fassett, 

 N. C, Spring Flora of IVisconsin ; and Peattie, D. C, Flora of the Indiana Dunes. 



1 




2 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



have been adapted (by permission) from a similar key prepared several 

 years ago by Mr. P. C. Standley, and which appeared in volume 21 of the 

 Contributions of the United States National Herbarium. For convenience, 

 the keys to the families have been divided into sections. Trees and shrubs 

 may be usually keyed out largely on vegetative characters — a considerable 

 advantage in identifying those plants when flowering specimens are not avail- 

 able. The keys to species include, in addition to diagnostic characters, a 

 statement of habitat, time of flowering, suitable common name, and relevant 

 synonymy, the intention having been to correlate the valid name of the plant 

 with other names that may be found in the older manuals. The known distribu- 

 tion in Illinois of the indigenous species was first plotted on a series of outline 

 maps, the data in all instances having been compiled from duly visaed speci- 

 mens, but on account of the necessity for extreme brevity it has been 

 possible to include only the briefest summary of the geographical ranges of 

 the species in Illinois. An attempt has been made to indicate frequency of 

 occurrence by use of the terms common, local, infrequent, etc. For rare plants, 

 specimens are often cited by collector and number or date, although exact 

 localities, even when these are known, are for obvious reasons not mentioned. 

 All species of vascular plants known to the writer to grow spontaneously in 

 Illinois have been included. Further study, however, will probably reveal the 

 presence of additional species. With few exceptions no species has been 

 admitted unless authentic specimens from Illinois have been examined. For 

 the sake of uniformity and convenience the sequence of families is chiefly that 

 of Engler & Diels. 



Although it is now almost a century and a half since the first botanical 

 explorers visited Illinois, our knowledge of the botany of this region is far from 

 complete. In a few areas fairly adequate botanical collections have been made, 

 but more than half of the 102 counties of Illinois, according to the records at 

 present, are almost wholly unexplored botanically. The distribution of the 

 "lower plants" of Illinois is comparatively unknown, and we lack even a check- 

 list of the algae, fungi, and bryophytes. Obviously, much work remains to be 

 done on the botany of Illinois. 



Thanks are due Professor A. G. Vestal of the University of Illinois for 

 aid in writing the account of the vegetational divisions; to Florence Freenian 

 Jones, for help in preparing manuscript; to Professor Alfred Rehder, and Mr. 

 E. J. Palmer, of the Arnold Arboretum of Harvard University, for identifica- 

 tion of certain ligneous plants, and to Dr. Leon Croizat for bibliographical 

 aid. The assistance of these persons is gratefully acknowledged. 



Flora and Vegetation 



Description of the Area 



Illinois is part of the Great Central Plain of North America, and is 

 situated between 37° and 42^' N. lat., and 87' and 91'^ W. long. It is 

 bounded on the north by Wisconsin, on the east by Indiana, on the west by 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 3 



Iowa and Missouri, and on the south by Kentucky. The maximum length is 

 380 miles, and the width more than 200 miles. Its area is approximately 

 57,926 square miles. Physiographically, most of this state except the southern 

 portion lies in the Till Plains Section cf the Central Lowland Province. Bio- 

 geographically, almost all of Illinois lies in the Austral Zone. The great 

 majority of native species of plants are therefore of southern affinities, and the 

 boreal element is extremely small. The Austroriparian Province enters the 

 state only at its extreme southern end. The average elevation above sea level is 

 about 600 feet. The highest point is 1257 feet altitude at Charles Mound in 

 Jo Daviess county along the Wisconsin- Illinois boundary. Although most of 

 the area has a low elevation and comparatively level surface there is a good 

 drainage system with more than 275 streams, which may be grouped in two 

 river systems, one having the Mississippi River, and the other the Wabash 

 and Ohio rivers as its outlet. The soils of Illinois are remarkable for their 

 fertility, and agriculture is one of the important occupations. The better agricul- 

 tural districts are characterized by a black loam, and the alluvial soil of the 

 river valleys is especially fertile. On many of the river bluffs the soil is loess. 

 Nearly all the rocks of Illinois are sedimentary and belong to the Paleozoic 

 era. Igneous rocks are found only in a few places, and metamorphic rocks 

 are almost unknown. 



During the Glacial period there were four advances of the ice-sheet into 

 Illinois. The ice of the third, or Illinoian, stage covered approximately nine- 

 tenths of the state, and extended southward to the Ozark Ridge, the most 

 southerly latitude reached by the North American ice-sheet. Hence, there are 

 only three districts in Illinois that have remained untouched by the Pleistocene 

 glaciation. These are 1) the seven southernmost counties of the state, 2) an 

 area between the Mississippi and Illinois rivers in Calhoun County, and 3) 

 Jo Daviess county and a small portion of Carroll County. The second and 

 third districts are part of a much larger non-glaciated region known as the 

 Driftless Area, which occupies adjacent portions of Wisconsin, Minnesota, 

 and Iowa. 



The flora and fauna of Illinois are similar to those of adjacent states. 

 Extensive forests and grasslands formerly covered the entire region. In the 

 northern part there were large prairies with tongues of forest extending along 

 the principal watercourses. At the present time^ although the vegetation has 

 been greatly disturbed, the flora is still rich and varied, with a large number 

 of species of grasses, as well as other herbs, and ligneous plants. The more 

 extensive forested areas are chiefly in the southern counties, especially on the 

 flood plains of the principal rivers, and in the Ozark Hills. These forests are 

 composed almost entirely of hardwoods. Oak, hickory, maple, and ash are 

 among the more common kinds of trees. 



Formerly one of the most remarkable features of the state of Illinois was 

 its great stretches of prairies covered with rich growth of tall grasses and 

 several hundred species of other herbaceous flowering plants. The most exten- 

 sive of these prairies occurred in northern and central Illinois, and were inter- 

 spersed with numerous swamps and shallow ponds which have long since 




4 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



disappeared. However, the original prairie has all but vanished from the Illinois 

 landscape, and no typical area of upland prairie remains for botanical study. 

 Extensive tracts of these upland prairies were swampy, but almost all have 

 been drained and their natural vegetation has since disappeared except from 

 roadsides and along the railroads. Other areas are covered chiefly with sand 

 or sandy loam, and support a flora of psammophilous species, including Lepto- 

 loma cognatum, Tephrosia virginiana, Helianthemum canadense, Oenothera 

 rhombipetdla. Phlox bifida, Lithospermiim croceiim, and Chrysopsis rillosa. 

 The principal sand-areas are in the northern half of the state. 



Statistical summary. — The total known number of native and naturalized 

 species of vascular plants growing spontaneously in Illinois is 2124. Of this 

 number, 1786 are indigenous, and 338 have been either adventive or intro- 

 duced, and are now more or less established. Trees and shrubs belong to 49 

 families, 111 genera, and 302 species. Salix has 17 species and Quercus 19. 

 In the genus Crataegus, 14 species are recognized as occurring within the boun- 

 daries of the state. Herbaceous plants belong to 113 families, 713 genera, and 

 1822 species. Carex is the largest genus with 114 species. There are 70 genera 

 and 215 species of grasses, of which 166 species are native. Panicum is the 

 largest genus of grasses with 36 species. Twelve genera and 26 species of 

 orchids are recorded for Illinois. Compositae is the largest family, with 63 

 genera and 243 species. Aster is the largest genus in this family with 34 

 species; Solidago comes next with 22 species. For a "prairie state" there is a 

 surprisingly large number of ferns and fern-allies, and the number of species of 

 ligneous plants is remarkably high. 



Families Genera Species 



Ferns and fern-allies 10 29 63 



Gymnosperms 4 7 11 



Monocotyledons 22 154 575 



Dicotyledons 116 526 1475 



Total 152 716 2124 



Vegetational Divisions 



The spontaneous flora of Illinois comprises a vegetation thit is rather 

 sharply differentiated into prairie and forest. Each of these two types of 

 vegetation includes a number of communities or associations, reflecting the 

 transitions in tcmp'erature and minfall, ns well as the topographic and ednphic 

 conditions. On the accompanying map the eco'o:;ical divisions are based prin- 

 cipally upon the broader topographical features, including the effects of glacial 

 geology. The area affected by the recent (Wisconsin) glaciation is mostly 

 treeless, and extensive areas of upland prairie formerly occurred in the 

 western division. It will be noted that the botanical areas are correlated with 

 the various agricultural districts, and are thus intimately conn'ected with vari- 

 ous phases of human geography. Moreover, it is obvious that faunal areas 

 parallel the natural botanical divisions, and thus these divisions are useful to 

 zoologists, as well as to students of the applied branches of biology, including 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 5 



plant pathology, agriculture, etc. The biotic divisions now recognized are 

 as follows: 



Grand Prairie Division Southern Division 



Western Division Wabash Border 



Jo Daviess Hills Ozark Hills 



Mississippi Border Tertiary Division 



GRAND PRAIRIE DIVISION 



The term is applied to the eastern portion of Illinois, and includes all the 

 area of recent or Wisconsin glaciation which is for the most part treeless. This 

 area has the youngest soils of the state, in which leaching of dissolved mate- 

 rials has not progressed to any great extent. Characteristic prairie-plants, 

 including Silphmm terebinthinaceum, Eryngium yuccifolium, Sorghastruni 

 nutans, Andropogon jiircatus, and Sporobolus heterolepis, are frequent in 

 these areas of black prairie soil. The morainal country of Lake and McHenry 

 counties is hilly, and was formerly extensively forested. Small tracts of timber 

 still remain. Quercus macrocarpa is one of the conspicuous trees. Tilia ameri- 

 cana and Quercus borealis are frequent in drier habitats. Many of the lower 

 areas are occupied by marshes, bogs, and lakes, and in these places colonies of 

 Larix laricina are to be found. 



The counties near Lake Michigan contain a number of northern species, 

 including Larix laricina, Pinus banks'^ina, Scheuchzeria americana, Carex 

 aurea, Eriophorum angustijolium, Betula pumila, Ribes bhtellum, Shepherdia 

 canadensis, Cornus canadensis, Andromeda glaucophylla, and Chamaedaphne 

 calyculata. The beach area of Lake Michigan has numerous sand-ridges and 

 dunes, with intervening sand-prairies and sloughs. Several species are peculiar 

 to this area, such as: Juniperus canadensis, J. horizontalis , Ammophda brevi- 

 ligulata, Calamovdja longifolia, Salix cidenophylla, Cakde edentula, Potentilla 

 anserina, Prunus pumila, Lathyrus maritimus , Chamaesyce polygonifolia, Arc- 

 tostaphylos uva-ursi, and Artemisia caudata. 



WESTERN DIVISION 



This division includes most of the western part of Illinois. Much of the 

 area is covered by relatively old glacial drift (Illinoian) with recent deposits 

 of loess. These prairie areas contain several xerophytic western species, includ- 

 ing Bouteloua gracilis, Stylisma pickeringii, Lesquerella argentea, Amorpha 

 canescens, Opuntia rafnesquit, and Synthyris bullii. Areas of lower elevation 

 include prairie sloughs. Southwest of the Grand Prairie, and west of the Illi- 

 nois River, more than half the area is occupied by forest, and only a few flat 

 upland prairies of fair size, such as the Bucknell and Carihipe prairies occur. 

 This condition has been brought about by the extensive dissection of the 

 country near the larger rivers. 



JO DAVIESS HILLS 



The Driftless Area in Jo Daviess County has served as a refuge for pre- 

 glacial plants. At the present time there are several species of limited distribu- 




6 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



tion within the state, including Primula riiistassinica, Ranunculus rhomboideus, 

 Anemone ludoviciana, and others. Much of the terrain is maturely dissected, 

 and consists of steep, forested slopes. The tops of the plateaus are treeless 

 or only sparsely forested. Along the cliffs of the larger streams there are several 

 northern species of trees, including Pinus strobus, Taxus canadensis, and 

 Betula papyrifera, as well as a number of herbaceous plants. 



MISSISSIPPI border 



The dry western-exposed bluffs of the Mississippi River and of the lower 

 Illinois River have intermittent areas of grassland vegetation containing west- 

 ern prairie species. Sand-prairies are present in the Hancock and Oquawka 

 areas. In a few places sand has been carried by the wind from the river valley 

 to the uplands. Along the northern and central river bluffs the terrain has 

 been deeply eroded, with resultant interruptions of the mantle of loess, and 

 are thus at present not continuously forested. The American beech, Fagus 

 grandifoha, and the tulip tree, Liriodendron tidipijcra, extend northward to 

 Randolph and Jackson counties. The common trees of the northern part of the 

 river bottoms of the Mississippi River are A^er saccharinum, Ulmus americana, 

 Betula nigra, Quercus palustns, and Fraxinus americana. In the southern part 

 of this area Liquidambar styraciflua and Quercus lyrata are common. 



southern division 



The Southern Division is the area of oldest Illinoian Drift. Later deposi- 

 tions of loess with subsequent weathering have complicated the soil profiles. 

 With the exception of the bottomlands, which have a vegetation similar to 

 that of the alluvial soils of the Mississippi Border, the soils throughout the 

 Southern Division are generally poor for plant growth on account of their 

 fine texture and impervious subsoil. Thus they prevent good drainage and 

 aeration, with the result that there is too much water in spring and early 

 summer, and too little in late summer. The principal upland species of woody 

 plants are Quercus palustns, Q. imbricaria, Q. stellata, and Gleditsia triacan- 

 thos. Sassafras albidum and Diospyros virginiana are of not infrequent 

 occurrence. 



WABASH BORDER 



This division includes the bottomlands and bluffs of the Wabash and 

 Ohio rivers, as well as the adjoining upland areas. A great variety of species 

 of ligneous plants is to be found in the forested areas, including Celt is laevi- 

 gata, Acer saccharum, Tilia americana, Quercus borealis, Nyssa aquatica, and 

 Liriodendron tulipijera. Three species of oak, Quercus rubra, Q. prinus, and 

 Q. shumardii, as well as Catalpa speciosa, are characteristic species of this part 

 of the state. The sweet gum, Liquidambar styraciflua, extends northward to 

 Crawford County, and the mistletoe, Phoradcndron flarescens, parasitic prin- 

 cipally on elm and other bottomland trees, is known to occur as far north as 

 Lawrence County. This bottomland vegetation extends many miles up the 

 tributari'es of the Wabash River. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 7 



ozark hills 



The Ozark Ridge of southern IlUnois is the most conspicuous topographic 

 feature in the state. The axis of the ridge hes along an east-west line across 

 the southern part of the state from Jackson and Union counties to Gallatin 

 and Hardin counties. The highest point is Williams Hill in Pope County, 

 with an elevation of 1065 feet. The flora of the Ozark Hills has been little 

 affected by the Illinois ice-sheet, which apparently did not reach beyond the 

 northern edge of the area. There are several species of vascular plants which 

 have not extended their ranges northward in Illinois and are therefore peculiar 

 to this part of the state. Some of these plants are: PolypoSum ceteraccinum, 

 Pinus echinata, Smilax bona-nox, Ulmtis alata, Magnolia acuminata, Sedum 

 pulchellum, Rhododendron niidiflorum, Vaccinium arboreum, and Phlox 

 stellaria. 



TERTIARY DIVISION 



The Mississippi Embayment of the Coastal Plain of the south Atlantic 

 and Gulf states extends into Illinois as far as the southern base of the Ozark 

 Hills. The Tertiary deposits in the bottomlands of Alexander, Pulaski, and 

 Massac counties contain a number of austrcriparian species that have not 

 migrated northward into the glaciated areas. Some of these are: Taxodium 

 distichum, Arundinaria gigantea, Quercus phellos, Planera aquatica, Itea 

 virginica. Wisteria macrostachya, Nyssa aquatica, Bumelia lycioides, and 

 Bignonia capreolata. 




8 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



SYSTEMATIC TREATMENT 

 Key to the Sections 



Group I. Seed Plants. Plants normally reproducing by seeds containing an embryo. 

 Gymnosperms and Angiosperms. 



A. Herbaceous Plants 



1. Plants grasses, sedges, or rushes; perianth green or absent Section I, p. 9 



1. Plants not grasses, sedges, or rushes. 



2. Terrestrial plants, not floating on or submerged in water; sometimes growmg at the 

 edge of water but then usually erect. 

 3. Leaves compound, composed of few or many leaflets, or divided to the midrib 



or base Section 2, p. 9 



3. Leaves simple, sometimes lobed, but the lobes not extending to the midrib or base 



(leaves rarely absent or reduced to spines or scales). 



4. Stems not climbing or twining; tendrils absent; plants never cacti or cactus-like. 



5. Plants green, normally possessing chlorophyll, not parasitic or saprophytic 



or noticeably so. 



6. Plants without a leafy stem, or the stems underground, the flower-stalks 



leafless, or with a single leaf or a pair or whorl of leaves subtending the 



inflorescence Section 3, p. 11 



6. Plants with leafy stems, the leaves sometimes reduced to scales; stem some- 

 times with only a single leaf, but this borne far below the inflorescence. 

 7. Leaves evidently parallel-veined; mostly Monocotyledons (except 

 Er\]ngium and Tragopogon) with the floral parts, or some of them 

 in threes, not in fives; stem in cross-section showing the vascular 

 bundles irregularly distributed throughout the pith or around a central 



cavity; cotyledon 1 Section 4, p. 13 



7. Leaves not evidently parallel-veined, almost always net-veined (or 

 sometimes apparently only 1 -veined); mostly Dicotyledons (except 

 Trillium and Smilax) with the floral parts often in fives or fours, 

 only exceptionally in threes; stem in cross-section showing a central 

 pith (or, in hollow stems, a cavity) surrounded by a circle of vascu- 

 lar bundles; cotyledons 2. 

 8. Leaves, or at least some of them, opposite or whorled. 



9. Leaves entire Section 5, p. 13 



9. Leaves more or less toothed or lobed Section 6, p. 16 



8. Leaves alternate. 



10. Leaves entire Section 7, p. 17 



10. Leaves toothed (or sinuate) or lobed SECTION 8, p. 19 



5. Plants parasitic or saprophytic, without chlorophyll; leaves reduced to scales; 



fruit a capsule Section 9, p. 21 



4. Stems either twining or climbing (tendrils sometimes present) ; or else cactus 



plants with conspicuously jointed, succulent, spiny stems Section 10, p. 21 



2. Aquatic plants, floating on or submerged in water (or sometimes growing on muddy 

 or sandy shores) Section II, p. 22 



B. Trees and Shrubs (including woody climbers and trailers) 



1 1 . Gymnosperms (except Huchonia) . Leaves needle-Iike (acicular), scale-like, or subu- 

 late, evergreen (deciduous in Laiix and 1 axojiiini) SECTION 19, p. 31 



I 1 . Angiosperms. Leaves not as above; "broadleaf" trees and shrubs. 

 12. Flowers appearing with or after the leaves. 



13. Leaves opposite or whorled SECTION 12, p. 23 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 9 



1 3. Leaves alternate. 



14. Leaves compound Section 13, p. 25 



14. Leaves simple. 



15. Leaves entire SECTION 14, p. 26 



15. Leaves toothed or lobed, not entire. 



16. Leaves lobed SECTION 15, p. 27 



16. Leaves toothed, but not lobed SECTION 16, p. 28 



12. Flowers on leafless or almost leafless twigs, appearing before the leaves (or in 

 autumn when they are falling, in H amamelis) SECTION 17, p. 29 



Group II. Ferns and Fern-allies. Plants without flowers or seeds, reproducing by spores 

 borne in sporangia Section 18, p. 30 



Key to the Families 



Section \. Grasses (or Grass-like Plants), or Sedges, and Rushes 



1. Flowers enclosed by chaffy scales; perianth none, or of bristles; fruit a grain or an 

 achene. 

 2. Stem usually cylindrical, usually hollow except at the nodes; leaves in 2 rows on 

 the stem, the sheaths usually split; fruit usually a grain 22. Gramineae 



2. Stem cylindrical or triangular, solid, the nodes usually not conspicuous; leaves in 3 



rows on the stem, the sheaths not split; fruit an achene 23. Cyperaceae 



1. Flowers not enclosed by chaffy scales; perianth 6-parted; stems terete; fruit a capsule. 



3. Stem not glandular 30. Juncaceae 



3. Stem glandular Tofieldia in 3 1 . LiLIACEAE 



Section 2. Herbs with Compound (or Deeply Divided) Leaves 



I . Plants without leafy stems, the leaves all basal and the flowering stems leafless. 



2. Leaves 2-cleft; flowers white; fruit a capsule opening by a lid 



Jeffersonia in 66. Berberidaceae 



2. Leaflets 3 or more; fruit not opening by a lid. 



3. Flowers on a spadix surrounded by a spathe ; fruit a berry 



Arisaema in 24. AracEAE 



3. Flowers in racemes or umbels. 

 4. Leaflets 3. 



5. Leaflets entire; flowers regular; stamens 10 86. OXALIDACEAE 



5. Leaflets not entire. 



6. Flowers papilionaceous; stamens 10 84. Leguminosae 



6. Flowers regular; stamens numerous 83. RosACEAE 



4. Leaflets numerous; flowers irregular 70. FuMARIACEAE 



1 . Plants with stems bearing 1 or more leaves. 



7. Flowers borne in a dense head on a common receptacle surrounded or subtended by 



an involucre of bracts; fruit an achene; stipules none 152. CoMPOSITAE 



7. Flowers not borne in a dense head on a common receptacle surrounded or subtended 

 by an involucre. 



8. Flowers on a spadix surrounded by a spathe; fruit a berry 



Arisaema in 24. Araceae 



8. Flowers not borne on a spadix surrounded by a spathe. 

 9. Flowers in umbels; petals 5; stamens 5; ovary inferior. 



10. Fruit dry, composed of 2 carpels; styles 2 119. Umbelliferae 



10. Fruit a berry; styles 5. or 3, or 2 118. AraliacEAE 



9. Flowers not in umbels, or if so, the flowers not as above in all respects. 



11. Corolla papilionaceous; fruit a legume or loment; leaves alternate, usually 



stipulate 84. Leguminosae 



11. Corolla not papilionaceous. 



12. Stem bearing only a single leaf or a pair or whorl of leaves. 



13. Sepals and petals each 4; fruit a pod; leaflets 3 or 5, toothed 



Dentaria in 71. Cruciferae 




10 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



13. Sepals 5 or more; petals 5 or none. 



14. Pistils several to many, separate, simple; fruit achenes or follicles 



62. Ranunculaceae 



14. Pistil 1; fruit a succulent drupe, or the seeds berry-like; petals 



small, gland-like Caiiloph^llum in 66. Berberidaceae 



12. Stem with usually 2 or more alternate leaves, or 2 or more pairs of 

 leaves. 

 15. Leaves, or some of them, opposite. 

 16. Leaves pinnate or pinnalely lobed. 



17. Sepals 4, purple, petaloid; petals none; stamens numerous; 



plants climbing; achenes with hairy persistent styles 



Clematis in 62. Ranunculaceae 



17. Sepals not as above; corolla present; stamens few; plants 

 not climbing. 



18. Flowers blue or white; fruit a capsule. 



19. Corolla regular; stamens 5 



1 32. Hydrophyllaceae 



19. Corolla 2-lipped; stamens 4 



137. Scrophulariaceae 



18. Flowers yellow or pink. 



20. Flowers yellow; stamens 10; fruit 5-angled, spiny.... 



Trihulus in 90. ZvGOPHYLLACEAE 



20. Flowers pink; stamens 3; fruit 1 -seeded 



147. Valerian ACEAE 



16. Leaves palmately lobed, or digitate, or trifoliolate ; petals none; 

 fruit an achene. 

 21. Flowers small, green, unisexual; leaves digitately divided 



into 5-11 serrate, acuminate divisions 



45. Cannabinaceae 



21. Flowers not green; sepals petal-like 62. Ranunculaceae 



15. Leaves alternate. 



22. Stems climbing; flowers purple (or white) ; leaves ovate or has- 

 tate, often 3-lobed or 3-divided 



Solanum dulcamara in 136. SoLANACEAE 



22. Stems not climbing. 



23. Corolla of united petals, blue or white; leaves pinnate or 

 pinnately lobed; fruit a capsule. 

 24. Leaflets entire; style 1 131. POLEMONIACEAE 



24. Leaflets toothed or lobed; styles 2, or style 2-cleft 



132. Hydrophyllaceae 



23. Corolla of separate or nearly separate petals, or petals none. 



25. Corolla irregular, yellow or pink, 1 -spurred; leaflets finely 



dissected; plants glabrous 70. Fumariaceae 



25. Corolla regular, or somewhat irregular, or absent, not 

 sf)urred. 

 26. Leaflets 3, obcordate, otherwise entire; flowers yel- 

 low; fruit a capsule 86. OxALIDACEAE 



26. Leaflets not obcordate. 

 27. Leaves with stipules. 



28. Flowers small, pink; plants annual, pubescent; 



leaves pinnate, the leaflets incised 



lirodiurn in 85. GlRANIACEAE 



28. Flowers yellow, white, or purple. 



29. Lcailets entire; fruit a legume 



84. Lecuminosae 



29. Leaflets toothed or lobed; fruit not a 

 legume. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 11 



30. Stamens and petals perigynous 



- 83. ROSACEAE 



30. Stamens and petals hypogynous, or 



flowers dioecious 



62. Ranunculaceae 



27. Leaves without stipules. 



31. Petals and sepals each 3; flowers very small, 

 axillary; annual plants with pinnate leaves.. 



89. Limnanthaceae 



31. Petals and sepals 4 or more, or absent; or the 



sepals united, sometimes only 2. 



32. Sepals 2, caducous (falling as the flower 



opens) ; plants with milky or yellowish 



juice; stamens numerous, hypogynous; 



fruit a capsule 69. Papaveraceae 



32. Sepals 4 or 5 ; plants with watery juice. 

 33. Petals and sepals each 4; fruit a pod. 

 34. Leaves trifoliolate ; stamens 6 or 



more, exserted 



72. Capparidaceae 



34. Leaves not trifoliolate; stamens 6, 



four long and two short 



71. Cruciferae 



33. Petals 5 or none; sepals usually 5, 

 sometimes 4; fruit an achene or fol- 

 licle, or rarely a berry. 



35. Stamens and petals hypogynous, or 



flowers unisexual; sepals free -... 



62. Ranu.nculaceae 



35. Stamens and petals perigynous; 



sepals united at base 



83. Rosaceae 



Section 3. Herbs Without Leafy Stems; Leaves Simple 



1. Leaves either pitcher-like or covered with glandular appendages; petals 5; fruit a 

 capsule; insectivorous plants growing \n bogs. 

 2. Leaves large, pitcher-like; flower solitary, nodding 73. Sarraceniaceae 



2. Leaves small, covered with glandular appendages; flowers in a raceme 



- 74. Droseraceae 



1 . Leaves not as above; plants not insectivorous. 



3. Flowers sessile in dense heads, or in spikes. 

 4. Flowers in heads. 



5. Leaves net-veined, or apparently 1 -veined; flower-heads surrounded by an 

 involucre of bracts; stamens 5, inserted on the corolla, their anthers united 



in a tube; ovary inferior; fruit an achene 152. CoMPOSlTAE 



5. Leaves parallel-veined or somewhat translucent and showing many cross-veins. 

 6. Leaves subulate, soft, translucent, loosely cellular, round in cross-section; 



flowers whitish, monoecious; capsule 2-3-seeded 26. Eriocaulaceae 



6. Leaves grass-like, stifl", flat, linear, twisted; flowers yellow, perfect; capsule 



many-seeded 27. Xyridaceae 



4. Flowers in spikes (or on a spadix). 



7. Flowers crowded on a cylindrical apparently lateral spadix 6-8 cm. long; 

 petals 0; sepals 0; stamens 6; leaves linear; rhizomes thick, aromatic; 



plants of swampy ground Aconis in 24. Araceae 



7. Flowers not as above. 

 8. Ovary superior. 



9. Stamens 6; leaves cordate; flowers blue or white, 2-lipped; fruit 1 -seeded 

 29. Pontederiaceae 




12 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



9. Stamens 4, or rarely 2; flowers greenish; corolla 4-lobed; calyx of 4 



persistent sepals 144. Plantaginaceae 



8. Ovary inferior; flowers irregular; stamens 1 or 2 36. Orchidaceae 



3. Flowers not sessile in dense heads or spikes. 

 10. Scapes with more than 1 flower. 

 I 1. Leaves terete or nearly so. 



12. Flowers green, small, numerous, in elcngatcd, bractless, spike-like ra- 

 cemes; perianth 6-parted 19. Juncaginaceae 



12. Flowers pink, not in racemes. 



13. Flowers in umbels; perianth 6-parted; stamens 6; plants with onion 



flavor and odor Allium in 31. LlLIACEAE 



13. Flowers in cymes; petals 5; sepals 2; plants inodorous 



Talinum in 57. PoRTULACACEAE 



1 1 . Leaves not terete. 



14. Corolla irregular, 2-lipped, often spurred; stamens 2 or I ; fruit a cap- 

 sule. 



15. Ovary superior; leaves absent, or dissected and bladder-bearing 



1 38. Lentibulariaceae 



15. Ovary inferior; leaves entire, parallel-veined 36. OrchidacEAE 



14. Corolla regular. 



16. Flowers or branches of the inflorescence in several or many whorls; 



achenes numerous, flattened; petals 3, white; leaves oval, cordate, 



hastate, or sagittate 20. Alismaceae 



16. Flowers not whorled; fruit a capsule. 



17. Leaves evidently parallel-veined, narrow; petals 3, or perianth 6- 

 parted. 

 18. Leaves 2-ranked (equitant) ; flowers usually blue, sometimes 

 white, rarely reddish brown; stamens 3; ovary inferior.... 



34. Iridaceae 



18. Leaves not 2-ranked. 



19. Flowers 4 or fewer, yellow or \\hite ; leaves sometimes 



pubescent; ovary inferior 33. Amaryllidaceae 



19. Flowers numerous, or if few, orange or pink; leaves gla- 

 brous; ovary superior (or ^/i inferior) 



3 1 . LlLIACEAE 



17. Leaves nel-veined ; petals 5 or 4. 



20. Flowers in an umbel, or 1-3 on slender pedicels; petals 5; 



stamens 5; calyx 5-lobed 121. Primulaceae 



20. Flowers in cymes, panicles or racemes. 



21. Corolla of 4 petals; sepals 4; stamens 6....7I. Cruciferae 

 21. Corolla of 5 petals; sepals 5. 



22. Styles 2; anthers opening longitudinally; leaves not 



evergreen; fruit 1-loculed 77. Saxifragaceae 



22. Style 1; anthers opening by terminal pores; leaves 

 evergreen; fruit a 5-loculed capsule . . 120. ERICACEAE 

 10. Scapes 1 -flowered. 



23. Leaves toothed or lobed; petals separate, or absent. 



24. Fruit an achene ; flowers yellow, bluish or white; petals sometimes 

 absent, the sepals then petal-like; juice watery. ...62. RaNUNCUI.ACEAE 

 24. Fruit a capsule; leaves toothed or with toothed lobes; petals present. 

 25. Plants with red juice; leaves thickish; petals 4-15 (usually 8), white; 



flowers regular; capsule acute Sanguinaria in 69. Papaveraceae 



25. r^lants with colorless juice; leaves thin; petals 5; flowers irregular, 



blue, yellow, or white; capsule obtuse 108. VlOLACEAE 



23. Leaves entire. 



26. Leaves reniform, cordate, or ovate; fruit a capsule. 



27. Leaves pubescent beneath, reniform; flowers brownish purple; calyx 

 3-lobed; petals none; stamens 12; ovary inferior; woodland 

 plants Asarum in 49. Aristolochiaceae 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 13 



27. Leaves glabrous; flowers blue or wbile. 



28. Petals, sepals, stamens eacb 5; staminodia pt'esent ; stigmas 4; 



plants of bogs and springy places 76. Parnassiaceae 



28. Perianth 6-parted; staminodia none; stamens 3; stigmas 3; plants 



of muddy shores Heleranthera in 29. PoNTEDERIACEAE 



26. Leaves not as above. 



29. Flowers on a spadix surrounded by a spathe; fruit a berry 



24. Araceae 



29. Flowers not on a spadix; spathe none; fruit not a berry. 



30. Leaves orbicular, peltate; flowers 10-25 cm in diameter, pale 



yellow; petals and stamens numerous 



Nelumho in 63. Nelumbonaceae 



30. Leaves not peltate; flowers smaller. 



31. Flowers irregular; ovarry inferior; stamens I or 2 



36. Orchidaceae 



31. Flowers regular. 



32. Leaves equitant ; flowers blue or white; ovary inferior; 



stamens 3 34. Iridaceae 



32. Leaves not equitant; ovary superior; stamens 6 



3 I . LlLIACEAE 



Section 4. Mostly Monocotyledonous Herbs (Except Grasses, Sedges 

 and Rushes) with Leafy Stems 



. Flowers in dense heads or spikes. 



2. Leaves cordate; flowers blue, 2-lipped; stamens 6 



- - Pontederia in 29. PoNTEDERIACEAE 



2. Leaves not cordate. 



3. Plants growing in wet places; flowers greenish. 



4. Spikes cylindrical, the upper part staminate, the lower pistillate; plants 2-3 m. 

 tall 15. Typhaceae 



4. Heads spherical; plants not so tall ...16. SparganiacEAE 



3. Plants of dry ground; flowers not green. 



5. Leaves spiny- or bnstly-margined ; plants with watery juice 



Enngium in 119. Umbzlliferae 



5. Leaves smooth-margined; plants with milky juice 



Tragopogon in 1 52. CoMPOSlTAE 



Flowers not in dense heads. 

 5. Ovary or ovaries superior. 



6. Carpels nearly separate; stamens 3 19. JuncagiNACEAE 



6. Ovary compound. 



7. Flowers irregular, blue, enclosed or subtended by a small spathe ; petals 3. 



unequal CommcUna in 28. CoMMELINACEAE 



7. Flowers regular; stamens 6. 



8. Flowers blue or purple; filaments pubescent; juice mucilaginous 



Tradescaniia in 28. CoMMELINACEAE 



8. Flowers not blue (sometimes lavender) ; filaments glabrous or nearly so.... 



3 1 . LlLIACEAE 



5. Ovary inferior, compound. 



9. Stamens 3; flowers regular; leaves equitant 34. IridacEAE 



9. Stamens 1 or 2 ; flowers irregular; leaves not equitant 36. OrchidacEAE 



Section 5. Dicotyledonous Herbs (except Trillium) With Opposite 

 or Whorled Entire Leaves 



, Flowers sessile in dense heads on a common receptacle surrounded or subtended by an 



involucre of bracts; fruit an achene. [P\}cnanihemum (Labiatae), with flowers in 



dense head-like clusters, might also be sought here]. 



2. Stem with small prickles; chaff of the receptacle (among the flowers) with long 



rigid spine-like tips; stamens 4, distinct 148. DiPSACACEAE 




14 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



2. Stem not prickly; chaff of the receptacle not as above, sometimes absent; stamens 



5, united by their anthers (syngenesious) 152. CoMPOSITAE 



1 . Flowers not sessile in dense heads on a common receptacle surrounded or subtended 

 by an involucre of bracts. 



3. Corolla of separate petals (or apparently so), or corolla absent (the calyx sometimes 



petal-like). 

 4. Leaves with black or pellucid dots, opposite, entire; flowers yellow or pink. 

 5. Styles 2-6 106. Hypericaceae 



5. Style 1 121. Primulaceae 



4. Leaves not punctate. 



6. Leaves with stipules; petals minute or absent; stigmas 2-4. 



7. Petals 2 or 3 ; capsule several-seeded, the seeds reticulated; leaves oblanceo- 

 late or obovate ; small plants of wet ground 59. Elatinaceae 



7. Petals none; fruit a 1 -seeded utricle 55. Illecebraceae 



6. Leaves without stipules. 



8. Plants with milky juice; capsule deeply 3-lobed; upper leaves usually 



whorled; flowers small, white or greenish 94. EuPHORBIACEAE 



8. Plants with colorless juice. 



9. Flowers solitary; stamens 6; ovary superior, 3-loculed 



genera in 31. LiLlACEAE 



9. Flowers not as above. 



10. Flowers irregular, in spikes or racemes; sepals 5, three of them small, 



and two larger and colored like the 3 petals; fruit flattened 



93. POLYGALACEAE 



10. Flowers regular, not in spikes or racemes. 

 I I . Leaves in whorls. 



12. Flowers axillary; leaves in fives or sixes; petals none; sepals 

 5; fruit a small 3-valved capsule; plants annual, prostrate 

 56. AlZOACE.AE 



12. Flowers in cymes or panicles; petals 5; plants perennial. 



13. Leaves (at least the lower) in threes; flowers in cymes; 



petals entire; fruit a follicle 



Sedum in 75. Crassulaceae 



13. Leaves mostly in fours, acuminate; inflorescence paniculate; 



petals laciniate; fruit a capsule 



5i7e/ie in 58. Caryophyllaceae 



I 1 . Leaves not whorled (or if so, not thick and succulent). 



14. Calyx and corolla absent; flowers small, green, solitary, axil- 

 lary; leaves spalulate or linear; styles 2, filiform; fruit 



notched; small plants of wet soil 95. Callitrichaceae 



14. Calyx present; corolla present or absent. 

 15. Sepals separate. 



16. Petals none; flowers crowded into an interrupted spike; 

 calyx woolly; bracts scarious; leaves lanceolate, sessile 



52. Amaranthaceae 



16. Petals usually present; inflorescence not as above. 



1 7. Sepals 2; stem-leaves a single pair; petals pink or 



while; stamens 5; style 3-cleft 



Claptoitia in 57. PoRTULACACEAE 



17. Sepals 5; leaves more than I pair. 

 18. Sepals equal or nearly so. 



19. Petals white (sometimes absent) ; leaves with 

 ordinary flat blades; stems usually soft.... 



58. Caryopi iyi.i.aceae 



19. Petals yellow; leaves small, scale-like or sub- 

 ulate, appressed or nearly erect 



Sarothra in 106. Hypericaceae 



18. Sepals unequal, the 2 outer much narrower than 

 the 3 inner ones; [letals yellow, greenish, or 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 15 



purplish ; stems rigid and almost woody 



107. ClSTACEAE 



15. Sepals united at least below. 



20. Flowers surrounded by a calyx-like involucre, the calyx 

 blue or pink, corolla-like; stamens 3-5, exserted.... 



54. Nyctaginaceae 



20. Flowers not surrounded by an involucre; calyx green. 



21. Petals and stamens hypogynous 



58. Caryophyllaceae 



21. Stamens inserted on the calyx. 



22. Stigma capitate; style 1; petals present (absent 



in Peplis) ; fruit a capsule 



113. Lythraceae 



22. Stigmas 2, sessile or nearly so; petals none; fruit 



a utricle Scleranthus in 55. Illecebraceae 



3. Corolla sympetalous (petals united, at least below). 

 23. Corolla irregular (flowers zygomorphic). 



24. Fruit of 4 small nutlets; ovary 4-lobed; stem 4-angled; leaves usually gland- 

 ular-punctate; plant usually with mint odor 135. Labiatae 



24. Fruit a capsule; ovary not 4-lcbed; plants without mint odor. 



25. Seeds few, borne on hooks in the elastically dehiscent capsule 



142. Acanthaceae 



25. Seeds numerous, not borne on hooks; capsule not elastically dehiscent. 

 26. Ovary 1-loculed with 2 parietal placentae; corolla 3-5 cm. long, 

 gibbous, campanulate, 5-lobed and somewhat 2-lipped; capsule 

 10-15 cm. long, the beak longer than the body; odoriferous gland- 

 ular annuals 141. Martyniaceae 



26. Ovary 2-loculed; placentae axial 137. SCROPHULARIACEAE 



23. Corolla regular or nearly so (flowers actinomorphic). 

 27. Leaves in whorls. 



28. Flowers yellow; fruit a capsule 121. Primulaceae 



28. Flowers white or greenish. 



29. Flowers in umbels; corolla with 5 reflexed lobes; fruit a many-seeded 

 follicle; seeds with a tuft of silky hairs; plants with milky juice.... 



129. Asclepiadaceae 



29. Flowers axillary or cymose; corolla 4- (or 3-)lobed; fruit of 2 



united indehiscent 1 -seeded nutlets; sap watery 



1 45. RUBIACEAE 



27. Leaves not whorled. 



30. Leaves evergreen, opposite; stems trailing; flowers axillary; plants 

 glabrous. 

 31. Leaf-base narrowed; corolla blue, 5-lobed, 1.5-3 cm. long; calyx 



5-parted; stamens 5; stigma annular, its apex penicillate 



Vinca in 128. Apocynaceae 



31. Leaf-base rounded or cordate; corolla white or pink, usually 4-lobed, 



1-1.5 cm. long; calyx 4-toothed; stamens 4; stigmas 4; fruit a red 



or white double drupe Mitchella in 145. RuBlACEAE 



30. Leaves rarely evergreen; plants not as above in all respects . 



32. Leaves with stipules, or the petioles connected by a (sometimes bristle- 



bearing) stipular membrane or line. 

 33. Ovary inferior 145. RUBIACEAE 



33. Ovary superior 126. LoGANIACEAE 



32. Leaves without stipules. 



34. Ovaries 2, or if 1, deeply lobed; fruit usually of 2 follicles; seeds 



with a tuft of silky hairs; plants usually with milky juice. 



35. Flowers in cymes, or solitary 128. Apocynaceae 



35. Flowers in umbels 129. AscLEPIADACEAE 



34. Ovary 1 ; fruit a capsule or drupe; plants with watery juice. 




16 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



36. Corolla about as long as the calyx; fruit a 3-seeded drupe 



Triosteum in 146. Caprifoliaceae 



36. Corolla much longer than the calyx; fruit dehiscent, usually 

 more than 3-seeded. 

 37. Stamens opposite the corolla-lobes; corolla-tube short or 

 none; flowers bright yellow, or solitary in the axils.... 



121. Primulaceae 



37. Stamens alternate with the lobes of the corolla; flowers not 

 yellow. 

 38. Corolla-tube long and slender. 



39. Stamens 5; stigmas 3; pistil 3-carpellate; capsule 



3-loculed, 3-seeded 



Phlox in 131. POLEMONIACEAE 



39. Stamens 4; stigma simple or 2-lobed, the apex of 

 the style recurved; pistil 2-carpellate ; capsule 



6-20-seeded Ruellia in 142. Acanthaceae 



38. Corolla-tube short or none; capsule 1-loculed, many- 

 seeded; plants glabrous or nearly so 



126. Gentianaceae 



Section 6. Dicotyledonous Herbs With Toothed 

 or Lobed Opposite or Whorled Leaves 



1 . Flowers sessile in dense heads on a common receptacle surrounded by an involucre of 

 bracts. 

 2. Stem with small prickles; chaff of the receptacle (among the flowers) with long 

 rigid spine-like tips; stamens 4, distinct 148. DiPSACACEAE 



2. Stem not prickly; chaff of the receptacle not as above, sometimes absent; stamens 5, 



united by their anthers (syngenesious) 152. CoMPOSiTAE 



1 . Flowers not sessile in dense heads on a common receptacle surrounded or subtended 

 by an involucre of bracts. 



3. Corolla of separate petals, or sometimes absent. 

 4. Leaves deeply lobed. 



5. Plants glabrous; leaves 2, peltate; flower solitary; petals 6-9, white 



Podophyllum in 66. Berberidaceae 



5. Plants (at least the stem) pubescent; leaves 2 or more, not peltate; flowers 

 usually more than 1 . 



6. Petals present; stamens 10; styles 5; fruit of 5 carpels 85. Geraniaceae 



6. Petals none, but the sepals colored and petal-like; stamens more than 10; 



fruit of numerous achenes 62. RanunculacEAE 



4. Leaves merely toothed. 



7. Plants with milky juice (or if with watery juice, the pubescence stellate) ; the 

 fruit deeply 3-lobed; corolla none, but the flowers surrounded by an often 



corolla-like involucre 94. EuPHORBlACEAE 



7. Plants with watery juice; fruit not 3-lobed. 

 8. Mowers green, without petals; fruit 1 -seeded. 



9. Plants scurfy with minute whitish scales; stipules none 



A triplex in 51. Ciienopodiaceae 



9. Plants glabrous, or pubescent with slender, sometimes stinging hairs, never 



scurfy or scaly; leaves stipulate 46. Urticaceae 



8. Flowers with white or colored [)etals; fruit usually with more than 1 seed. 



10. Petals large (1 cm. or more in length), pink or [nirphsh; leaves 3-4- 



ribbed; plants bristly-hairy 114. Melastomaceae 



10. Petals small (less than 1 cm. in length); leaves not ribbed; plants not 

 bristly-hniry. 

 II. Ovary inferior; seeds with a tuft of soft hairs, or else the fruit with 



short, hooked hairs 115. Onagraceae 



II. Ovary superior; seeds without hairs; fruit never bristly 



77. Saxifragaceae 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 17 



3. Corolla sympetalous, the petals united, at least below. 



12. Leaves evergreen. Email, oval or obovate, crenate above the middle; stems 

 slender, trailing; flowers in pairs, nodding, pink, fragrant, about I cm. long..-. 



Liimaea in 146. Caprifoliaceae 



12. Leaves net evergreen; plants net as above. 



13. Fruit of 2 or 4 nutlets; stems usually 4-angled. 



14. Ovary not lobed, the style terminal on it; plants lacking a mint odor; 

 corolla usually nearly regular 134. VerBENACEAE 



14. Ovary deeply 4-lobed, the style arising between the lobes; plants usually 



with a mint odor; corolla usually bilabiate, rarely nearly regular 



135. Labiatae 



13. Fruit of only 1 nutlet, or else a capsule with many seeds. 



15. Flcwers reflexed and becoming appressed to the stem in fruit; fruit a 



single nutlet in the bottom of the calyx; calyx-teeth hooked at the lip; 



coiolla purplish; leaves slender-petioled 141. PhrymacEAE 



15. Flowers not reflexed and appressed to the stem; calyx-teeth not hooked. 



16. Ovary inferior; stamens 3 147. Valerianaceae 



16. Ovary superior; stamens usually 2, or 4, rarely 5 



137. SCROPHULARIACEAE 



Section 7. Dicotyledonous Herbs (except Smilax) With Alternate Leaves 



I. Flowers sessile in dense heads on a common receptacle surrounded by an involucre of 



bracts 1 52. CoMPOSlTAE 



1. Flowers not sessile in dense heads on a common receptacle surrounded or subtended 

 by an involucre of bracts. 

 2. Stem-leaves reduced to minute scales; corolla irregular, spurred; plants small, grow- 

 ing in wet soil 138. Lentibulariaceae 



2. Stem-leaves not all reduced to scales. 



3. Leaves with stipules, these sometimes united to form a sheath (sometimes fuga- 

 cious). 

 4. Stipules united and forming a membranous sheath at the nodes; fruit an achene 



50. POLYGONACEAE 



4. Stipules not sheathing; fruit a several-seeded capsule or pod. 



5. Petals none; fruit a small 3-loculed capsule 94. EuphorbiaceaE 



5. Petals present; plants pubescent; fruit a 1-loculed pod. 



6. Leaves sessile or nearly so; flowers yellow, papilionaceous 



Crolalaria in 84. Leguminosae 



6. Leaves petioled ; flowers greenish white H^banihus in 108. ViOLACEAE 



3. Leaves without stipules. 



7. Petals separate, or none; calyx sometimes petal-like. 



8. Plants with milky juics; stem umbellately branched above; upermost leaves 



whorled; involucres with white, petal-like appendages 



94. EUPHORBIACEAE 



8. Plants without milky juice; stems and leaves not as above. 



9. Calyx and corolla absent; flowers in spikes; leaves cordate, petioled 



37. Saururaceae 



9. Calyx present; corolla present or absent. 

 10. Flowers small, green. 



1 I . Flowers in umbels; perianth 6-parted; fruit a berry 



Smilax in 31. LiLIACEAE 



1 I . Flowers not in umbels; perianth not 6-parted; fruit not a berry. 

 12. Plants perennial, pubescent; fruit a capsule, with more than I 



seed; leaves small and narrow 107. CiSTACEAE 



12. Plants annual, glabrous or pubescent; fruit an achene, or a I- 

 seeded capsule. 

 13. Flowers all in loose cymose axillary clusters; style I, not 



branched; plants pubescent 



Parietaria in 46. Urticaceae 




18 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



13. Flowers all or mostly in spikes or terminal cymes or pani- 

 cles, or else all in dense, sessile, axillary clusters; styles 

 2 or 3, or I and branched. 

 14. Flowers subtended by scarious bracts, the sepals sharp- 

 pointed; leaves not linear or with spiny tips; plants 



never white-mealy 52. AmaranthacEAE 



14. Flowers not subtended by scarious bracts; sepals not 

 awn-pointed; leaves linear and with spiny tips, or the 

 plants whitish-mealy at least about the inflorescence 



or the lower surface of the leaves 



51. Chenopodiaceae 



10. Flowers not green; petals present, or the calyx colored and petal-like. 

 15. Leaves cordate, velvety-pubescent; petals yellow; carpels 12- 



15, pubescent, dehiscent at the apex 



Abutilon in 105. Malvaceae 



15. Leaves not cordate, or if so, not velvety-pubescent. 



16. Sepals 2 57. PORTULACACEAE 



16. Sepals more than 2 (rarely cohering in pairs). 



17. Flowers borne en the lower part of the stem near the 

 ground; calyx S-shaped; petals none; leaves petioled, 



cordate or halberd-shaped 



Arisiolochia in 49. Aristolochiaceae 



17. Flowers borne on the upper part of the stem; calyx never 

 curved. 

 18. Ovary inferior. 



19. Petals yellow or purplish; fruit a several-seeded 



capsule 115. Onagraceae 



19. Petals none, the sepals whitish and petal-like; fruit 

 I -seeded, indehiscent; plants glabrous, glaucous 



47. Santalaceae 



18. Ovary superior. 



20. Petals none, the 5 sepals petal-like; flowers in 



racemes; fruit a juicy dark purple berry 



53. Phytolaccaceae 



20. Petals 4-6; fruit a capsule or pod. 



21. Flowers regular; anthers opening longitud- 

 inally. 

 22. Style 1, or stigma sessile. 



23. Petals and stamens hypogynous. 



24. Sepals, petals, and stamens each 

 5; fruit a 5-loculed capsule .. 



87. LiNACEAE 



24. Sepals and petals each 4; stamens 

 6, four long and two short; 

 fruit a I- or 2-loculed capsule 



71. Cruciferae 



23. Petals and stamens inserted on the 

 calyx; branches usually more or 



less angled 113. Lythraceae 



22. Styles 2; petals 5; sepals 5, reflexed; 



stamens 10; leaves chiefly basal 



77. Saxifragaceae 



21. Flowers irregular; anthers opening by termi- 

 nal pores 93. Polygai.aceaE 



7. Petals united (the corolla sympetalous). 

 25. Corolla regular (actinomorphic). 



26. Flowers 4-5 cm. long, white; calyx enclosed or subtended by a pair of 

 broad bracts; leaves often more or less cordate at base; fruit a 

 capsule; plants with milky juice 130. CoNVOLVULACEAE 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 19 



26. Flowers smaller; calyx not enclosed by a pair of bracts. 



27. Plants with milky juice; fruit of 1 or 2 large pods, the seeds with 

 a tuft of silky hairs. 

 28. Flowers in umbels ; filaments united into a tube enclosing the 

 pistil 129. ASCLEPIADACEAE 



28. Flowers in cymes, purplish blue; stamens free 



Amsonia in 128. ApocYNACEAE 



27. Plants with watery juice; flowers not in umbels; seeds lacking a 

 tuft of hairs. 



29. Fruit of 4 (or sometimes fewer) nutlets; plants rough-hairy, often 



bristly, or glabrous and with blue flowers.... 133. BoRAGINACEAE 

 29. Fruit a capsule or berry; plants never rough-hairy. 



30. Flowers blue; styles 2; fruit a capsule 



132. Hydrophyllaceae 



30. Flowers not blue; style 1. 



31. Flowers white or pink or yellow; fruit a capsule; calyx 



not enlarged in fruit ...121. PrimulacEAE 



31. Flowers yellowish or whitish, often with a dark center; 

 fruit a berry, enclosed by the 5-lobed, 10-ribbed, often 



5-IO-angled, reticulated, inflated calyx 



Phvsalis in 136. SoLANACEAE 



25. Corolla irregular (zygomorphic). 



32. Corolla spurred; stamens 4, inserted on the corolla; plants with watery 



juice Linaria in 137. ScROPHULARIACEAE 



32. Corolla somewhat 2-lipped, the tube split along the upper side; stamens 

 5, free from the corolla, united by their anthers; plants with milky 

 juice 151. LOBELIACEAE 



Section 8. Dicotyledonous Herbs With Toothed or Lobed Alternate Leaves 



1. Flowers sessile, small, in dense heads on a common receptacle surrounded or subtended 



by an involucre of bracts; fruit an achene 152. CoMPOSITAE 



I . Flowers not as above. 



2. Fruit and ovary covered with hooked bristles; corolla minute, greenish yellow; 



leaves deeply lobed; flowers in small compact head-like umbels 



Sanicula in 1 19. Umbelliferae 



2. Fruit and ovary never with hooked prickles. 

 3. Leaves conspicuously lobed. 



4. Stems and leaves prickly; petals 5, united; fruit a berry 



Solatium in 1 36. Solanaceae 



4. Stems and leaves not prickly. 



5. Corolla of united petals; fruit a capsule. 



6. Flowers in spikes or panicles, or solitary in the axils; corolla irregular 

 137. ScROPHULARIACEAE 



6. Flowers in scorpioid cymes or racemes; corolla regular 



132. Hydrophyllaceae 



5. Corolla of separate petals, or petals absent. 



7. Calyx-lobes 3; flowers small, sessile, axillary, greenish, apetalous ; upper 



leaves toothed, the lower ones deeply pinnately lobed; plants of wet 



habitats; fruit sharply angled Proserpinaca in 116. Haloragidaceae 



7. Calyx-lobes or sepals more than 3. 

 8. Sepals and petals each 4. 



9. Ovary superior; stamens 6; capsule 2-valved 71. CrUCIFERAE 



9. Ovary inferior; stamens 8; capsule 4-valved 115. Onagraceae 



8. Sepals 5 or 6. 



10. Petals none; flowers small, green or greenish; fruit an achene or 



utricle. 



1 I . Leaves stipulate; sepals 6; stamens 6; fruit an achene 



50. POLYGONACEAE 




20 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



11. Leaves without stipules; sepals 5; stamens 5; fruit a utricle 



51. Chenopodiaceae 



10. Petals usually present. 



12. Flowers regular; leaves stipulate. 



13. Stamens 10 (rarely 5), free or nearly so; ovary 5-!obed, 



each lobe becoming a I -seeded nutlet 85. GeraniacEAE 



13. Stamens more than 10. 



14. Stamens free, perigynous; anthers 2-loculed; fruit an 



achene 83. RosACEAE 



14. Stamens monadelphous ; anthers l-loculed; fruit a cap- 

 sule, or of 5 or more carpels arranged in a ring 



1 05. Malvaceae 



12. Flowers irregular. 



I 5. Leaves with stipules; stamens 5; fruit a capsule 



108. ViOLACEAE 



15. Leaves without stipules; stamens many; fruit an achene, fol- 

 licle, or berry : 62. Ranunculaceae 



3. Leaves not lobed, merely toothed, or sinuate. 



16. Petals more or less united (corolla sympetalous) ; fruit a capsule or berry. 

 17. Ovary inferior; corolla blue or red (rarely white). 



18. Corolla split down one side, irregular; stamens united by their anthers 

 151. LOBELIACEAE 



18. Corolla not split, regular; stamens free 150. Campanulaceae 



17. Ovary superior; flowers not red or blue. 



19. Stamens 5. 



20. Calyx spurred, petal-like; flowers axillary; leaves exstipulate; 



plants smooth and succulent 88. Balsaminaceae 



20. Calyx not spurred or petal-like. 



21. Flowers in spikes or racemes; fruit a smooth capsule 



Verhascum in 137. ScrophulariaceaE 



21. Flowers axillary or in cymes; fruit a berry or a spiny capsule 



1 36. Solanaceae 



19. Stamens 4 or 2. 



22. Low branching odoriferous glandular annuals with cordate oblique 

 leaves; calyx 5-cIeft; corolla 5-lobed; capsule 8-15 cm. long, 



the curved beak longer than the body 141. Martyniaceae 



22. Erect perennials; sepals 4; corolla campanulate, 2-3-lobed; stam- 

 ens 2; capsule short, emarginate 



Spn</ipns in 137. Scrophulariaceae 



16. Petals separate or none. 

 23. Petals none. 



24. Plants with stinging hairs; leaves petioled, serrate, stipulate; flowers in 

 axillary cymes, unisexual; sepals 5; stamen 1; style I; fruit an 



achene Laportea in 46. Urticaceae 



24. Plants without stinging hairs. 



25. Styles 5 or 6; stamens twice as many as the sepals; flowers perfect, 

 in I -sided spikes or cymes; stipules none; fruit many-seeded, 



dehiscent Peitlhonim in 75. Crassulaceae 



25. Styles 1-3. 



26. I' ruit a 3-lobed capsule; stigmas fringed; leaves with small 



stipules Acalvpha in 92. EuPHORBIACEAE 



26. Fruit a I -seeded utricle; stipules none 51. CuENOPODIACEAE 



23. Petals present. 



27. Ovary inferior; stamens usually twice as many (rarely the same num- 

 ber) as the petals and calyx-lobes; fruit a capsule, rarely indehiscent 



115. Onagraceae 



27. Ovary superior. 



28. Corolla irregular. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 21 



29. One of the petals spurred. 



30. Stipules present; ovary 1-loculed 108. ViOLACEAE 



30. Stipules none; ovary 5-loculed; plants smooth and succulent 

 88. Balsaminaceae 



29. Flowers not spurred; stipules none; ovary 2-loculed 



93. POLYGALACEAE 



28. Corolla regular or nearly so, not spurred. 



31. Sepals and petals each 4; stamens 6, four long and two short; 



fruit a pod; stipules none 71. Cruciferae 



31. Sepals and petals each 5. 



32. Sepals separate; petals yellow; fruit achenes 



62. Ranunculaceae 



32. Sepals united, at least below; fruit not an achene. 



33. Leaves mostly basal, more or less hairy, the blades 

 roundish, cordate at the base; flowers paniculate.... 



Heuchera in 77. SaxifragaCEAE 



33. Leaves mostly on the stem. 



34. Stipules none; leaves thickish ; plants glabrous; 



stamens free 75. CrassULACEAE 



34. Stipules present; leaves not at all succulent; plants 

 usually more or less pubescent, often with stellate 

 hairs; stamens monadelphous 105. Malvaceae 



Section 9. Parasitic or Saprophytic Herbs; Stems not Climbing or Twining 



1 . Flowers regular. 



2. Ovary superior; stamens 6-12; plant perennial, waxy-white or reddish, drying black 

 Monotropa in 120. Ericaceae 



2. Ovary inferior; plants annual 35. BuRMANNlACEAE 



I . Flowers irregular. 



3. Ovary inferior; petals and sepals each 3, distinct 36. Orchidaceae 



3. Ovary superior; corolla 2-lipped 139. Orobanchaceae 



Section 10. Plants Twining or Climbing; or Cacti 



I . Cactus plants, with conspicuously jointed stems, the internodes flattened, succulent, 

 bristly or spiny; leaves none, or reduced to bristles; flowers perfect, regular, soli- 

 tary, showy; sepals, petals, and stamens numerous 110. Cactaceae 



I. Not cactus plants; stems twining or climbing; plants sometimes with tendrils. 

 2. Plants with tendrils. 

 3. Leaves entire. 



4. Flowers in umbels; perianth 6-parted; stamens 6; stigmas thick, almost sessile; 



fruit a berry; leaves with 3 or more principal veins from the base 



Smilax in 31. LiLlACEAE 



4. Flowers in slender axillary and terminal racemes; calyx 5-parted; stamens 8; 



styles 3; fruit an obtusely triangular achene enclosed in the indurated calyx; 



leaves with 1 main vein Brunnichia in 50. PoLYGONACEAE 



3. Leaves lobed or toothed; flowers not in umbels. 



5. Stipules present; petals separate; flowers solitary, perfect, greenish yellow.... 



109. Passifloraceae 



5. Stipules none; petals united; flowers unisexual, mostly in racemes or corymbs 



149. Cucurbitaceae 



2. Plants without tendrils. 



6. Leaves somewhat peltate, the petiole attached on the underside of the blade near 

 the margin, the blades usually angled or lobed; fruit juicy, 1 -seeded; flowers 



small, in axillary panicles 67. Menispermaceae 



6. Leaves not peltate. 



7. Leaves opposite or whorled. 

 8. Leaves entire. 



9. Plants with milky juice; petals 5, united; fruit a follicle; seeds with 

 silky hairs. 




22 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



10. Stamens distinct; flowers cymose 128. Apocynaceae 



10. Filaments united into a tube enclosing the pistil, the anthers adnate 



to the stigma, and the pollen cohering in masses 



129. ASCLEPIADACEAE 



9. Plants with watery juice; seeds without hairs. 



11. Sepals 4, petal-like; petals 0; stamens numerous; style persistent on 



the achene, often pubescent Clemaiis in 62. Ranunculus 



1 1 . Perianth 6-parted; stamens 6; flowers dioecious; fruit a 3-angled 



capsule 32. DiOSCOREACEAE 



8. Leaves toothed or lobed. 



12. Leaves triangular-hastate; flowers pink, in small heads 



MHiania in 152. CoMPOSITAE 



12. Leaves not triangular-hastate; flowers green, dioecious, in catkins or 



panicles 45. Cannabinaceae 



7. Leaves alternate, or reduced to inconspicuous scales. 



13. Plants with chlorophyll, not parasitic; leayes not reduced to scales. 



14. Leaves with sheathing stipules; corolla none; calyx 5-lobed; flowers 



perfect; fruit an achene 50. PoLYGONACEAE 



14. Leaves without sheathing stipules. 



15. Flowers dioecious; perianth 6-parted; stamens 6. 



16. Flowers in drooping racemes or panicles; styles 3, distinct; 

 fruit a 3-angled or -winged capsule 32. DiOSCOREACEAE 



16. Flowers in umbels; stigmas thick, almost sessile; fruit a small 



bluish black berry Smilax in 31. LiLIACEAE 



15. Flowers perfect; corolla sympetalous; stamens 5. 



17. Corolla funnelform; fruit a capsule; plants often with milky 



juice 130. Convolvulaceae 



17. Corolla rotate, purple or blue (or white); anthers yellow, con- 

 nivent around the style, opening by apical pores; berries red; 



juice watery Solatium dulcamara in 136. SoLANACEAE 



13. Plants bright yellow or orange, parasitic on other plants and lacking chlor- 

 ophyll; leaves reduced to scales; fruit a capsule 



Cuscuta in 1 30. CoNVOLVULACEAE 



Section H. Aquatic Plants, Floating on or Submerged in Water 



Plants very small, free-floating, thalloid, without stems and leaves 25. LemNACEAE 



, Plants larger, normally with leaves and usually with stems. 

 2. Leaves entire or finely toothed. 



3. Blades deeply cordate at the base; flowers large, solitary 64. NymphaEACEAE 



3. Blades not deeply cordate, or peltate. 



4. Floating leaves spatulate; leaves opposite, small; flowers minute, monoecious, 

 sessile, 1-3 in the axils; stamen 1; styles 2, filiform; fruit 4-lobed, notched 



at the apex 93. Callitrichaceae 



4. Leaves never spatulate. 



5. Plants acaulescent; leaves long, linear; fertile flowers on long, slender 



scapes; fruit many-seeded Vallisneria in 21. Hydrocharitaceae 



5. Plants with stems. 



6. Leaves alternate or imperfectly opposite. 



7. Flowers green, in si)ikes ; sepals 4; stamens 4; carpels usually 4; 

 stipules present, membranous; fruit 1 -seeded.. 18. PoTAMOGETONACEAE 

 7. Flowers not green. 



8. Flowers blue, white, or yellow, solitary; stipules none; fruit many- 

 seeded Heteranthera in 29. PoNTEDERIACEAE 



8. Flowers rose-pink, in spike-like racemes; stipules united to form a 



cylindrical, membranous sheath; fruit 1 -seeded species of 



Pohgomim in 50. Polygonaceae 



6. Leaves opposite or whorled. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 23 



9. Perianth 3- or 6-parted; fruit several-seeded; leaves 5-15 mm. long, 



minutely spinulose-toothed Anacharis in 21. HydrocharitACEAE 



9. Perianth none; fruit 1 -seeded. 



10. Leaves spinulose-toothed; carpel 1 1 7. NaiadacEAE 



10. Leaves entire; carpels 2-5 18. PoTAMOGETONACEAE 



2. Leaves, or most of them, deeply lobed or divided. 



II. Leaves finely dissected (or sometimes root-like), often bearing small bladders; 



flowers (in our species) yellow, bilabiate; fruit a capsule 



138. Lentibulariaceae 



II. Leaves not bladder-bearing, all or most of them finely dissected. 

 12. Flowers white or yellow, solitary. 



13. Floating leaves peltate, narrowly elliptical, 1.5-2 cm. long; submerged 

 leaves opposite or verticillate, divided; petals 3; sepals 3; carpels 3 



Cabomba in 63. Nelumbonaceae 



13. Floating leaves, if any, not peltate. 



14. Leaves alternate; petals 5; sepals 5; carpels more than 3 



Ranunculus in 62. Ranunculaceae 



14. Leaves opposite, the upper lanceolate, serrate; heads solitary, radi- 

 ate; rays 6-10, yellow; achenes 1-1.5 cm. long, with 3-6 slender 



awns Megalodonla in 152. CoMPOSlTAE 



12. Flowers small, green or whitish, not solitary. 



15. Flowers green, minute; leaves alternate or whorled. 



16. Flowers in spikes; blades of the uper leaves sometimes merely pec- 

 tinate; fruit 4-lobed 116. Haloragidaceae 



16. Flowers not in spikes; leaves all dissected into rather rigid divisions; 



fruit 1 -seeded 65. Ceratophyllaceae 



15. Flowers whitish, whorled at the nodes of the erect, hollow, inflated, 

 almost leafless flowering stem; corolla 5-lobed; sepals 5, linear; 



stamens 5, included; fruit a many-seeded capsule 



..Hotlonia in 121. PrIMULACEAE 



Section 12. Trees or Shrubs (Including Woody Climbers) 

 With Opposite or Whorled Leaves 



Leaves compound. 

 2. Leaflets 3 or 2. 



3. Stems climbing or trailing. 



4. Leaflets 2, ovate, cordate, acuminate, entire, dark green; tendrils branched; 

 cymes 2-4-flowered; corolla red, 4-5 cm. long; stamens 4; capsules linear, 

 10-20 cm. long; seeds winged, elliptical; cross-section of wood showing a 

 cross Bignonia in 1 40. BiGNONIACEAE 



4. Leaflets 3. coarsely toothed; tendrils none; flowers dioecious, white, numerous 



in panicles; stamens numerous; achenes pubescent, plumose 



Clematis in 62. RanunculacEAE 



3. Stems not climbing or trailing. 



5. Leaflets coarsely toothed; flowers greenish, dioecious; fruit a pair of samaras 



Acer negundo in 100. AcERACEAE 



5. Leaflets finely serrate; flowers whitish, perfect; fruit an inflated, 3-lobed 



capsule 99. Staphyleaceae 



2. Leaflets 5-11 (rareiy 3-5). 



6. Leaves palmately compound, the leaflets serrate, straight-veined; flowers irregular, 

 in large panicles, most of them sterile; capsule leathery, smooth or spiny, 



usually with a single large glossy seed 101. HiPPOCASTANACEAE 



6. Leaves pinnately compound. 



7. Plants climbing or trailing; leaflets 9-11, serrate, 3-6 cm. long; flowers perfect, 

 the corolla red, 5-lobed, somewhat 2-lipped, 6-9 cm. long; capsules cylin- 

 drical, 8-12 cm. long Campsis in 140. BiGNONIACEAE 



7. Erect trees or shrubs. 




24 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



8. Branches with a large pith; fruit a drupe; flowers regular, perfect, numerous, 



small, whitish, cymose ; stamens 5; ovary inferior 



Sambiicus in 146. Caprifoliaceae 



8. Branches with a small pith; fruit a samara; flowers small, greenish, dioe- 

 cious, appearing before the leaves. 

 9. Leaflets 3-5 (rarely 7-9), at least some of them usually coarsely toothed; 



samaras in pairs; stamens 4-6 Acer negundo in 100. AcERACEAE 



9. Leaflets 5-11, entire to shallowly serrate; samaras single; stamens 2.... 



Fraxiniis in 125. Oleaceae 



I. Leaves simple. 



10. Margins toothed or lobed. 



11. Margins toothed, not lobed; shrubs. 



12. Young branchlets more or less quadrangular; leaves serrulate; flowers per- 

 fect, axillary, greenish or purplish; petals 4-6; calyx 4-5-cleft; stamens 



4-5, inserted on the disk; fruit deeply 3-5-lobed 



Euon\imus in 96. Celastraceae 



12. Branchlets terete or nearly so. 



13. Leaves evergreen, small, oval, crenate above the middle; stems slender, 

 trailing; flowers in pairs, nodding, pink, fragrant, about 1 cm. long 



Linnaca in 146. Caprifoliaceae 



13. Leaves otherwise. 



14. Margins dentate or sharply serrate; ovary inferior. 



15. Principal lateral veins 1-5 pairs; corolla of 4 separate petals; 



stamens more than 5; capsule many-seeded 



79. Hydrangeaceae 



15. Principal lateral veins 5-10 pairs; corolla sympetalous, 5-lobed 



or 2-lipped, the 5 stamens inserted on the tube; fruit a 1- 



seeded drupe or a many-seeded capsule ... 146. Caprifoliaceae 



14. Margins crenate; ovary superior; stamens 4-5, inserted with the 



petals and opposite them; fruit a drupe 



Rhamnus in 102. Rhamnaceae 



1 1 . Margins lobed and often toothed. 

 16. Lobes acute, toothed. 



17. Trees; styles 2; fruit a pair of samaras 100. AcERACEAE 



17. Shrubs; style 3-lobed; fruit a 1 -seeded drupe 



Vihurnimi in 146. Caprifoliaceae 



16. Lobes obtuse, entire; shrubs; stamens 5, inserted on the pink sympetalous 



corolla; fruit a 2-seeded drupe 



S^mphoricarpos in 146. CAPRIFOLIACEAE 



10. Margins entire, or merely undulate or slightly crenulate or denticulate. 



18. Plants parasitic on the branches of trees; leaves thick, leathery; fruit a berry 



48. LORANTHACEAE 



18. Not parasitic. 



19. Leaves beneath, and branchlets covered with minute silvery scales; flowers 

 small, axillary, dioecious; calyx 4-parted; corolla 0; stamens 8; fruit a 



drupe I 12. Elaeagnaceae 



19. Leaves not silvery. 



20. Leaves with small black dots; low shrubs; flowers yellow, cymose; 

 sepals and petals each 4 or 5 ; stamens numerous; fruit a capsule 



106. Hypericaceae 



20. Leaves not black dotted. 



21. Leaves large (15-50 cm. long), ovate or cordate. 



22. Leaves visually in whorls of 3 ; flowers whitish, marked with 

 yellow and purple; anther-bearing stamens 2; capsules cylin- 

 drical Caialpa in 140. BiGNONIACEAE 



22. Leaves opposite; flowers purple; anther-bearing stamens 4; cap- 

 sules ovoid Pauloxvnia in 140. BiGNONIACEAE 



21. Leaves usually smaller. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 25 



23. Twining shrubs; upper leaves connate-perfoliate ; flowers per- 

 fect; corolla irregular, sympetalous, the 5 stamens mserted on 



its tube; ovary inferior; fruit a few-seeded berry 



Lonicera in 146. Caprifoliaceae 



23. Erect shrubs or small trees. 



24. Leaves slightly crenate near the middle, lanceolate, acuminate 

 at each end; flowers dioecious or polygamous, apetalous, or 

 petals small and deciduous; stamens 2-4; drupe with 1, or 



rarely 2 seeds Foresliera in 125. Oleaceae 



24. Leaves entire; ovary inferior. 



25. Leaves oval, short-petioled, not acuminate; flowers in 

 axillary or terminal clusters; corolla and calyx usually 



5-lobed; stamens usually 5 146. Caprifoliaceae 



25. Leaves with petioles usually 1 cm. or more in length; calyx 

 and corolla each 4-lobed; stamens 4. 

 26. Leaves glabrous, or sparsely pubescent along the mid- 

 vein, at least the upper ones usually in whorls of 



three; flowers in globose heads 



Cephalanlhus in 146. Rubiaceae 



26. Leaves pubescent, at least on the lower surface, never 

 whorled; flowers in cymes 117. CoRNACEAE 



Section 13. Trees or Shrubs With Alternate, Compound Leaves 



, Leaves once compound, i.e., not decompound. 

 2. Leaflets 3. 



3. Prickles present. 



4. Stipules adnate to the petioles; flowers rose; carpels enclosed in a hypanthium 



("hip") which becomes red and succulent in fruit; achenes bony 



Rosa in 83. Rosaceae 



4. Stipules not adnate to the petioles; flowers white; fruit of several or many 



fleshy drupelets inserted on a convex receptacle Rubus in 83. RoSACEAE 



3. Prickles none. 



5. Leaflets silky-pubescent; stipules present; flowers yellow, perfect; achenes 



densely pubescent - Poienlilla in 83. RosACEAE 



5. Leaflets not silky-pubescent, either glabrous or only short-pubescent; stipules 

 absent; flowers greenish, polygamous or dioecious. 

 6. Leaflets sessile, pellucid-punctate; fruit a finely pubescent, suborbicular 



samara, 1.5-3 cm. in diameter Plelea in 91. RuTACEAE 



6. Leaflets, at least the terminal one, petiolulate; fruit a drupe 



98. Anacardiaceae 



2. Leaflets more than 3. 



7. Leaves palmately compound. 



8. Stems prickly; tendrils none; stamens numerous Rubus in 83. RoSACEAE 



8. Stems not prickly; tendrils present; stamens 5..Parthenocissus in 103. VlTACEAE 

 7. Leaves pinnately compound. 



9. Leaflets entire or undulate, or remotely denticulate. 



10. Leaflets 3-7, silky-pubescent, revolute-margined ; flowers yellow; fruit an 



achene; shrub 30-100 cm. tall Poienlilla in 83. RosACEAE 



10. Leaflets 5-51. 



II. Leaflets with pellucid dots; flowers greenish yellow in small axillary 

 cymes, appearing before the leaves; branches often with sharp stout 

 stipular prickles; fruit ellipsoid, 4-6 mm. long, 1 -seeded, spicy 



flavored Zanlhoxylum in 91. RuTACEAE 



11. Leaflets without pellucid dots. 



12. Fruit a pod; flowers often papilionaceous 84. Leguminosae 



12. Fruit a drupe; flowers never papilionaceous 98. Anacardiaceae 



9. Leaflets more or less toothed. 




26 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



13. Leaflets 11-41, entire except for two or more coarse teeth at the base, 

 lanceolate or ovate-lanceolate, 7-15 cm. long; leaves 20-90 cm. long, 

 ill-scented; flowers small, greenish, polygamous, in erect panicles 

 10-30 cm. long; samaras 3-4 cm. long, twisted, with the compressed 



seed in the middle 92. SiMARUBACEAE 



13. Leaflets with numerous teeth. 



14. Stipules none; flowers greenish. 



15. Trees; staminate flowers in catkins; fruit a nut. ...40. JUGLANDACEAE 



15. Shrubs; flowers in panicles; fruit a drupe 98. AnacardiaceaE 



14. Stipules present (sometimes soon disappearing); flowers not green or in 



catkins 83. RosACEAE 



1 . Leaves 2-3-compound. 



16. Petioles and midribs often with small prickles; leaflets ovate, acute, serrate to 

 entire; flowers small, white, in umbels; drupes numerous, small, black, ovoid; 



shrub or small tree with prickly branches Aralla spinosa in 118. Araliaceae 



16. Petioles and midribs never spiny; fruit a legume. 



17. Leaflets 12-28, obtuse, 2-3.5 cm. long, remotely denticulate; trees, usually with 



spines on the trunk and branches Cleditsia in 84. Leguminosae 



17. Leaflets 30-60, acute, 4-8 cm. long, entire; trees without spines 



C^mnocladus in 84. LegUMINOSAE 



Section 14. Trees or Shrubs (Including Woody Climbers) 

 With Alternate Simple Entire Leaves 



1. Branches or stems more or less prickly or spiny. 



2. Leaves usually with a pair of tendrils at the base of the petiole 



Smilax in 31 . LiLIACEAE 



2. Tendrils absent. 



3. Leaves ovate or ovate-lanceolate, acuminate; twigs with sharp spines; flowers 

 small, greenish, dioecious; fruit yellow, as large as a grapefruit; trees with 



milky juice Madura in 44. MoRACEAE 



3. Leaves oblanceolate or lanceolate, often fascicled on short lateral branchlets. 

 4. Trailing or climbing shrub with arching or spreading light gray angular 



branches; flowers greenish purple; berries red, many-seeded 



Lyciitm in 1 36. Solanaceae 



4. Erect shrub or small tree; flowers white; drupe black, 1 -seeded 



122. Sapotaceae 



1. Plants without spines or prickles. 

 5. Plants prostrate or climbing. 



6. Stems prostrate; tendrils none 120. Ericaceae 



6. Stems climbing or twining. 



7. Tendrils usually present at base of petioles; flowers in umbels, greenish; fruit 



a berry Smilax in 31. LiLIACEAE 



7. Tendrils none; flowers axillary; leaves cordate; fruit a capsule 



49. Ari.stolochiaceae 



5. Plants erect; trees or shrubs. 



8. Leaves cordate, palmately veined, acute; pods 6-8 cm. long; shrub or small tree 



Cercis in 84. Leguminosae 



8. Leaves not cordate. 



9. Leaves bristle-tipped Qiiercii.s in 42. Fagaceae 



9. Leaves not bristle-tipped. 

 10. Stipules usually present. 



11. Flowers large, greenish or yellowish, solitary; trees 



60. Magnoliaceae 



1 1 . Flowers not as above. 



12. Mowers in catkins; fruit a capsule 38. SalicacEAE 



12. Flowers axillary; fruit a drupe 102. RhamnaceaE 



10. Stipules none. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 27 



13. Leaves somewhat palmately veined with 3 principal veins from near 

 the base, often with one or more lateral lobes; leaves and bark spicy- 

 aromatic Sassafras in 68. Lauraceae 



13. Leaves pinnately veined or 1 -veined. 



14. Pith of the twigs chambered, or divided by woody plates; trees with 



imperfect flowers. 



15. Leaves crowded towards the ends of the branches; twigs soon 



glabrous; drupe ovoid or ellipsoid, 1 -seeded; flowers 5-merous 



Nyssa in 117. CoRNACEAE 



15. Leaves not crowded; young twigs pubescent; berry large, glo- 



bose, 4-12-seeded, reddish yellow and sweet when ripe, 



astringent when green 123. EbENACEAE 



14. Pith continuous; flowers perfect. 



16. Leaves large, 15-40 cm. long at maturity, oblanceolate ; buds 



naked, reddish-pubescent; flowers axillary, dark purple or 

 green, 2-4 cm. in diameter; sepals 3; petals 6; stamens nu- 

 merous, in a globose mass surrounding the pistils 



61 . Annonaceae 



16. Leaves smaller. 



17. Leaves evergreen 120. ERICACEAE 



1 7. Leaves deciduous. 



18. Base of petiole hollow, covering the lateral buds; termi- 

 nal bud absent; leaves oval; bark tough and fibrous; 

 flowers pale yellow, appearing before the leaves; fruit 



an ellipsoid drupe DiVca in 111. ThymeleACEAE 



18. Petioles otherwise; terminal bud present. 



19. Leaves glabrous or more or less pubescent, but not 

 strigilose beneath. 

 20. Leaves minutely resinous-dotted beneath, elliptical- 

 obovate, ciliolate; flowers in axillary drooping 

 racemes; corolla ellipsoid, greenish or pink.... 



Caplussacia in 120. ERICACEAE 



20. Leaves not resinous-dotted. 



21. Petioles usually 1 cm. or more in length; 

 ovary superior. 

 22. Bark spicy-aromatic; buds scaly; drupe 



red, 1 cm. long at maturity 



— Lindera in 68. Lauraceae 



22. Bark not aromatic; winter-buds naked; 

 drupe 6-8 mm. in diameter, dark purple 



when ripe 



Rhamnus in 102. Rhamnaceae 



21. Petioles shorter; buds scaly; ovary inferior; 



fruit a several-seeded berry 



Vaccinium in 120. ERICACEAE 



19. Leaves strigilose and pale green beneath; lateral 

 veins running parallel to the margins, the upper 

 ones ending in the apex; petals 4; sepals 4; sta- 

 mens 4; flowers white, cymose ; fruit a bluish black 



drupe 6-8 mm. in diameter 



Cornits aUemifoIia in 117. CoRNACEAE 



Section 15. Trees and Shrubs With Alternate, Simple, Lobed Leaves 



1. Leaves palmately veined and lobed. 



2. Plants climbing by tendrils 103. VlTACEAE 



2. Plants not climbing; tendrils none. 



3. Some of the leaves usually 3-lobed, not serrate, aromatic 



Sassafras in 68. Lauraceae 




28 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



3. Leaves usually serrate or smuale-dentate as well as lobed. 

 4. Trees. 



5. Leaf -lobes not serrate or sinuate; blades white-tomentose beneath at first; 



flowers and fruits in catkins Populus in 38. Salicaceae 



5. Leaf-lobes serrate or sinuate-toothed. 



6. Flowers and fruits in dense, globose heads. 



7. Leaf-lobes serrate; leaves glabrous or pubescent, never white-tomentose; 



2-year old branchlets often corky-ridged 



Liquidambar in 81. Hamamelidaceae 



7. Leaf-lobes sinuate-toothed; blades white-tomentose beneath when young, 

 becoming nearly glabrous at maturity; branchlets terete; bark ex- 

 foliating 82. Platanaceae 



6. Flowers in catkins; pistillate flowers ripening into a succulent multiple fruit 



(a mulberry) ; leaf-lobes serrate-dentate Morus in 44. MoRACEAE 



4. Shrubs. 



8. Stamens 5; ovary inferior; fruit a berry; branches sometimes spiny or 



prickly 80. Grossulariaceae 



8. Stamens numerous; carpels 2-5, superior, separate, or united at the base, 



becoming follicles; branches never spiny; bark becoming shreddy 



- ....Phvsocarpus in 83. RoSACEAE 



1 . Leaves pinnately veined. 

 9. Lobes of the leaves serrate or crenate. 



10. Fruit of 2-5 follicles; bark shreddy; flowers in corymbs; branches never spiny 



Phvsocarpus in 83. RosACEAE 



10. Fruit a pome; branches often spiny. 



II. Flowers in cymes; styles united below the middle; pome large, the carpels 

 papery or leathery; branches (but not the twigs) sometimes with rather 



blunt spines Mains in 83. RosACEAE 



11. Flowers in corymbs; styles free; pomes small, the carpels bony; branches 



(and twigs) often with sharp spines Crataegus in 83. RosACEAE 



9. Lobes of the leaves not serrate. 



12. Leaves with a truncate apex and two broad lateral lobes; buds covered by the 



membranous stipules; flowers large Liriodendron in 60. MagNOLIACEAE 



12. Leaves not truncate at apex; flowers small. 



13. Leaves pmnatiftd with many rounded lobes on each side of the midvein; 

 monoecious shrub with fragrant foliage; flowers in erect catkins; fruit an 



ovoid nutlet surrounded by subulate bracts 39. Myricaceae 



13. Leaves with few lobes. 



14. Leaves with three principal veins from the base, aromatic; flowers yellow, 

 6-8 mm. broad, in racemes 3-5 cm. \ong-. -Sassafras in 68. Lauraceae 

 14. Leaves with I principal vein from the base, not aromatic; flowers green- 

 ish, the staminate in catkins; fruit an acorn. ...Qiicrciis in 42. Fagaceae 



Section 16. Trees and Shrubs With Alternate, Simple Leaves, 

 the Blades Toothed but Not Lobed 



], Base of blade symmetrical or nearly so. 



2. Flowers, at least the staminate (except Fagus) in catkins. 



3. Fruit a small several-seeded capsule, the seeds with a tuft of silky hairs; both 

 staminate and pistillate flowers m catkins; stigmas 2, often 2-lobed (sometimes 



3) ; dioecious shrubs or trees 38. Salicaceae 



3. Fruit not a capsule; seeds without a tuft of silky hairs; styles 2 or 3. 

 4. Fruit a 1-loculed, 1 -seeded nut; i)lants monoecious. 



5. Styles 3 42. Fagaceae 



5. Style 2-cleft, or stigmas 2 41. BeTULACEAE 



4. Fruit a juicy multiple fruit; plants often with milky juice; styles 2 



44. Moraceae 



2. Flowers never in catkins. 



6. Leaves with 1 principal vein from the base. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 29 



7. Leaves with 15-25 pairs of nearly straight, conspicuous lateral veins; margins 



sharply double-serrate; fruit a samara 43. UlmaceaE 



7. Leaves with fewer, less conspicuous veins ; fruit not a samara. 

 8. Stamens fewer than 15. 



9. Anthers opening by apical pores; pith of the branches solid 



120. Ericaceae 



9. Anthers opening lengthwise; flowers white or greenish. 

 10. Pith chambered, or separated by woody plates. 



1 1 . Leaves stellate-pubescent beneath; flowers perfect, white, nodding, 

 on slender pedicels; calyx 4-toothed; petals 4, united below; 



fruit dry, bony within, 1 -seeded, 4-winged 



Halesia in 124. StyracaceAE 



1 1. Leaves not stellate-pubescent. 



12. Flowers greenish, dioecious; fruit a drupe 



Nyssa in 117. CoRNACEAE 



12. Flowers white, perfect; fruit a 2-valved, ellipsoid, 2-loculed, 

 several-seeded capsule tipped with the 2 styles 



78. ESCALLONIACEAE 



10. Pith solid. 



13. Stems climbing, twining, or trailing; leaves elliptical, finely serrate, 

 glabrous; flowers in terminal racemes; capsules subglobose, yel- 

 low, with crimson seeds Celaslrus in 96. Celastraceae 



13. Stems erect. 



14. Flowers solitary or clustered in the axils; fruit a small, berry- 

 like drupe with 4-8 bony nutlets. ...97. Aquifoliaceae 



14. Flowers in small dense panicles or corymbs; fruit a 3-loculed 



capsule 102. Rhamnaceae 



8. Stamens 15 or more; fruit a drupe, pome, or follicle 83. RoSACEAE 



6. Leaves with 3 or more principal veins from the base. 



15. Leaves cordate, slender-petioled, abruptly acuminate, sharply serrate; trees 



104. TiLIACEAE 



15. Leaves not cordate. 



16. Low shrubs; pith continuous; flowers white; fruit a capsule; leaves ovate 



or elliptic-lanceolate, short-petioled, finely toothed 



Ceanoihus in 102. Rhamnaceae 



16. Trees or shrubs; pith of branches chambered; flowers greenish, apetalous; 

 fruit a red drupe ; leaves ovate-lanceolate or lanceolate, acuminate, 



scabrous '. Ce//is in 43. Ulmaceae 



Base of blade noticeably asymmetrical. 



17. Leaves sinuately or obtusely toothed, obovate or oval; flowers appearing in autumn 

 when the leaves are falling; petals 4, yellow, linear; calyx 4-parted; stamens 8, 



short; styles 2; fruit a capsule Hamamelis in 81. Hamamelidaceae 



17. Leaves serrate; flowers appearing in spring; fruit not a capsule. 



18. Leaves cordate, glabrous, or the lower surface pubescent or with tufts of hairs 

 in the axils of the veins; flowers appearing after the leaves, in drooping 

 cymes, small, fragrant, the jjeduncle united with the membranous bract; fruit 



small, globose, indehiscent 104. TiLIACEAE 



18. Leaves scabrous or hispidulous; flowers apetalous, appearing with or before 

 the leaves. 



19. Flowers in catkins: leaf-buds acute Oslr^a in 41. Betulaceae 



19. Flowers not in catkins; leaf-buds obtuse 43. Ulmaceae 



Section 17. Flowers on Leafless (or Almost Leafless) Twigs 



, Leaf-buds and leaf-scars opposite; flowers dioecious, polygamous, or monoecious; 

 styles or stigmas 2 ; fruit of samaras. 

 2. Bud-scales scurfy brown or black; bundle-scars forming a crescent-shaped line; 



calvx small, 4-cleft or obsolete; stamens usually 2; fruit a single samara 



Fraxinus in 125. Oleaceae 




30 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



2. Bud-scales not scurfy, paler; bundle-scars not forming a curved line; calyx usually 



5-Iobed; stamens 4-10, usually 8; fruit a pair of samaras 100. AcERACEAE 



1. Leaf-buds and leaf-scars alternate. 



3. Flowers (at least the staminate) in catkins, apetalous. 



4. Dioecious; ovary several-ovuled, 1-loculed; stigmas 2, often 2-lobed 



38. Salicaceae 



4. Monoecious. 



5. Styles or stigmas 3 (or 4) 42. Fagaceae 



5. Style 2-cleft, or stigmas 2 41. Betulaceae 



3. Flowers not m catkms. 



6. Branches with sharp stipular prickles; plants dioecious; sepals 0; petals 4-5, 



greenish yellow; stamens 4 or 5 ; pistils 2-5; leaves pinnate 



Zanthox^lum in 91 . RuTACEAE 



6. Branches not prickly; leaves simple. 



7. Flowers white (or pink), perfect; petals 5; sepals 5; stamens 15-25. 



8. Style 1 Prutius in 83. RosACEAE 



8. Styles 5 Amclanchier in 83. RosACEAE 



7. Flowers not white. 



9. Corolla papilionaceous, red-purple; flowers perfect, in umbel-like clusters; 



stamens 10; fruit a legume Cercis in 84. Leguminosae 



9. Corolla not papilionaceous; fruit not a legume. 



10. Corolla present, of 4 linear yellow petals; calyx 4-parted; stamens 8, 

 short; styles 2; fruit a capsule; flowers appearmg m autumn when 



the leaves are falling Hamamelis in 81. Hamamelidaceae 



10. Corolla none; flowers greenish, purplish, or yellowish, appearing in 

 spring. 

 1 1 . Flowers greenish or purplish; calyx 4-9-cleft; stamens 4-9, inserted 



on the calyx; styles 2; trees with serrate leaves 43. UlmacEAE 



11. Flowers yellowish or yellow; leaves entire. 



12. Calyx 6-parted; stamens 9, hypogynous; anthers opening by 

 valves; flowers fragrant, in small, sessile clusters; twigs with 



spicy odor and flavor Lindera in 68. Lauraceae 



12. Calyx tubular, corolla-like, obscurely 4-toothed 



111. Thymeleaceae 



Section 18. Ferns and Fern- Allies 



1. Plants attached to the substratum by roots, either growmg on land or submerged in 

 water, but not free-floating. 

 2. Leaves not quadnfoliolate or clover-like. 



3. Leaves narrow, sessile, 1 -veined, subulate or linear or oval, simple, not "fern- 

 like." 

 4. Leaves not whorled ; stem solid, not conspicuously jointed. 

 5. Stems elongated, leafy. 



6. Cones terete (or m some species the sporangia borne in the axils of ordin- 

 ary leaves); spores of only one kind, small; leaves without a ligule 



1. Lycopodiaceae 



6. Cones more or less 4-angled; spores of two kinds, large (megaspores), 

 and small (microspores), borne in different sporangia in the same cone; 



ligule present 2. Selaginellaceae 



5. Stem short, thick, corm-like; leaves rush-like, in a basal tuft; plants 



aquatic or growing in wet soil 3. IsOETACEAE 



4. Leaves whorled, united to form toothed sheaths at the conspicuous nodes on 



grooved, usually hollow stems; sporangia in a terminal cone 



4. Equisetaceae 



3. Leaves usually broad and "fern-like" in most spyecies, petiolate, often compound, 



with numerous or several free (rarely netted) veins. 



7. Small delicate ferns with filmy translucent leaves usually consisting of a single 



layer of cells; sporangia sessile on a filiform receptacle within a tubular or 



urceolate indusium 5. Hymenophyli.aceae 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 31 



7. Larger ferns with the leaves membranous to coriaceous, consisting of several 

 layers of cells; sporangia not as above. 

 8. Sporangia large, sessile, opening by a transverse slit, borne in a stalked 

 terminal spike or loose panicle, the sterile blade appearing lateral; verna- 

 tion erect or inclined 6. Ophioglossaceae 



8. Sporangia small, stalked, borne in clusters (sori) on the back of ordinary or 

 modified foliar leaves, or in pod-like divisions of modified leaves; verna- 

 tion usually coiled. 

 9. Sporangia covering some or all divisions of the fertile leaves, densely 

 crowded, short-stalked, globose, opening by a longitudinal slit into two 



valves; annulus none; veins free 7. OsMUNDACEAE 



9. Sporangia in sori on the back or margin of ordinary or modified leaves, 

 long-stalked, opening by a nearly complete vertical ring (annulus).... 



8. POLYPODIACEAE 



2. Leaves quadrifoliolate, clover-like, long-petioled ; sporocarps ovoid, borne at the 

 base of the petioles and containing both megaspores and microspores; plants 



perennial with slender rhizomes 9. Marsileaceae 



.Plants not attached by roots, minute (5-25 mm. broad), free-floating; leaves imbri- 

 cated, 2-lobed; sporocarps in pairs beneath the stem 10. Salviniaceae 



Section 19. Gymnosperms (except Hudsonia) 



, Leaves glabrous. 



2. Leaves (and cone-scales) spirally arranged, i.e., fascicled or alternate, never op- 

 posite or whorled. 

 3. Fruit berry-like, red, 1 -seeded, the seed nearly enclosed by the pulpy aril; micro- 



sporophylls with 3-8 pollen-sacs; cotyledons 2; leaves linear, evergreen 



1 1 . Taxaceae 



3. Fruit a woody cone, or 1-3-seeded, bluish, berry-like. 



4. Seeds winged; microsporophylls with 2 pollen-sacs; cone-scales and bracts 



mostly distinct; branchlets not deciduous 12. PiNACEAE 



4. Seeds wingless; microsporophylls with 3-8 pollen sacs; cone-scales without dis- 

 tinct bracts ; lateral branchlets (in our species) deciduous, the leaves light 



green, flattened, 2-ranked; bark fibrous 13. Taxodiaceae 



2. Leaves and cone-scales opposite or whorled, the leaves small, scale-like or subulate 



14. Cupressaceae 



.Leaves pubescent, subulate, numerous, 1-2 mm. long; low shrubs 10-20 cm. tall; 



flowers yellow; capsule ovoid, 3-angled, glabrous, l-2-seeded 



Hudsonia in 107. CiSTACEAE 




32 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



KEYS TO THE GENERA AND SPECIES 

 Division I. Pteridophyta. Ferns and Fern-allies 



1. Lycopodiaceae Michx. — Clubmoss Family 



1. Lycopodium L. — Clubmoss 



1. Sporangia borne in the axils of foliar leaves, not in distinct terminal cones. 



2. Leaves linear-oblanceolate, glossy, widest above the middle, erose-denticu- 



late toward the apex; cool moist woods, rare; Cook Co., Vasey; Coles 



Co., E. L. Stover L. hicidnliim Michx. 



2. Leaves lanceol.-j.te-Iinear, widest at the base, nearly or quite entire; cool 



woods, rare; Lake, La Salle, and Ogle counties 



L. porophilum Lloyd & Underw. 



1. Sporangia borne in terminal cones; sporophylls similar to the foliar leaves; 

 Evanston, Sept. 20, 1890, L. N. Johnson L. inundatum L. 



2. Selaginellaceae Underw. 



1. Selaginella Beauv. — Selaginella 



1. Leaves numerous, uniformly imbricated, many-ranked, subulate, short-awned; 

 dry sandstone rocks, local; n. 111., extending southward to Henderson and 

 La Salle counties. Rock Selaginella S. rupestris (L.) Spring 



1. Leaves of two kinds, 4-ranked, spreading in two planes, ovate, acute or 

 cuspidate; moist soil, local. [S. apiis (L.) Spring}*.. .>S. apoda (L.) Fern. 



3. Isoetaceae Underw. — Quillwort Family 



1. IsoETES L. — Quillwort 



1. Leaf-bases blackish; megaspores 280-440 /i in diameter, nearly smooth, or 

 with low tubercles; microspores finely spinulose, ashy-gray; wet meadows 

 or shallow ponds, chiefly in the western part of the state, rare, or perhaps 

 now extinct in 111 I. melanopoda Gay & Dur. 



1. Leaf-bases not blackish; megaspores 400-600 /i in diameter, honeycomb- 

 reticulate; microspores smooth or nearly so; ponds, rare. St. Clair Co 



/. engelmauni A. Br. 



4. Equisetaceae Michx. — Horsetail Fainily 



1. Equisetum L. 



L Stems perennial, evergreen, all alike, stiff and harsh, usually simple; stomata 

 in regular rows in the grooves; cones usually apiculate. 

 2. Stems tall, 16-50-anglcd, hollow; teeth of the sheaths deciduous. 



* Synonyms appear in brackets. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 5. Ophioglossaceae 33 



3. Sheaths about as long as broad, short-cylindrical, appressed, ashy-gray, 

 with a black band near the base; internodes rough-tuberculate; moist 

 sandy soil, common. \E. rohustum A. Br ; E. hyemale of Am. auth., 

 not L.; E. hyemale var. affi7ie (Engelm.) A. A. Eaton} Tall Scour- 

 in'g-rush E. prealtum Raf. 



3. Sheaths slightly longer than broad, dilated upward and somewhat fun- 

 nelform, green, and usually with a narrow black rim; internodes 



smooth; sandy soil, common. Smooth Scouring-rush 



E. laevigatum A. Br. 



2. Stems low, slender, usually 5-10-angled; teeth of the sheaths persistent. 



4. Stems 15-30 cm. tall, 2-4 mm. thick, 5-10-2rooved; central cavity 



one-third the diameter of the stem; sheaths 5-12-toothed; cones 



8-10 mm. long; moist sandy soil in the n. half of the state. [£. 



nelsoni (A. A. Eaton) Schaffnerj Variegated Scouring-rush 



E. variegatum Schleich. 



4. Stems 5-15 cm. tall, 1-2 mm. thick, 6-angIed and -grooved, tufted, 

 slender, flexuous, solid; sheaths mostly-3-toothed; cones 3-5 mm. 

 long; moist ground. Lake Co E. scirpoides Michx. 



1. Stems annual, flexible; stomata scattered; cor/as blunt. 

 5. Stems all alike, green, usually branched at maturity. 



6. Stems 10-30-angled; central cavity one-half or more the diameter of the 

 stem; sheaths tight; along ditches or in marshes. [E. limosum L.} 

 Water Horsetail E. fluviatile L. 



6. Stems 5-10-angled; central cavity about one-sixth the diameter of the 

 stem; sheaths loose; wet soil, not common. Peoria, Woodford, and 

 Tazewell counties. Marsh Horsetail E. palustre L. 



5. Stems of two kinds, the sterile green and branched, the fertile whitish or 

 brownish, appearing in early spring and soon withering; moist sandy 

 soil, common, particularly on railroad embankments. Field Horsetail.... 

 E. arvense L. 



5. Ophioglossaceae Presl — Adder's-tongue Family 



1. Sterile blade simple, entire; venation reticulate; sporangia in two rows in a simple 



slender spike 1 . Oph'wglossum 



1. Sterile blade pinnately divided; venation free; sporangia in a panicle.. ..2. Bolrvchium 



1. Ophioglossum L. — Adder's-Tongue 



1. Sterile blades usually 2-5, oval, apiculate, the principal veins 13 or more, 

 forming broad areolae containing numerous included veinlets; spores 

 pitted; hillsides, banks, thickets, chiefly on limestone, rare. Cave-in-Rock, 

 Hardin Co., E. J. Palmer 15469 0. engelmanni Prand 



1. Sterile blades usually solitary, or sometimes 2, oval, obtuse, the principal 

 veins 7-11, forming narrow areolae containing few included veinlets; 

 spores reticulate; m-eadows, open woods, swamps, moist thickets, rare. 

 Jackson and Union counties. [O. vulgatum of Am. auth., not L.; O. 

 arenarium E. G. Britt.} O. pusillum Raf. 




34 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



2. BoTRYCHlUM Sw. — Grape Fern 



1. Sterile blade stalked, attached near the base of the plant; lateral veins of the 

 leaf-segments forked; epidermal cells with straight walls. 



2. Leaf-segments incised; woods, local B. dissectum Spreng. 



2. Leaf-segments merely crenate or serrulate. 



3. Blades thin; segments acutish; woods, rare, s. 111.; also Lee Co 



B. obliqimm Muhl. 



3. Blades thick, somewhat coriaceous; segments obtuse; woods, rare, n. 111. 



[5. ternatiim var. intermedium D. C. Eaton; B. silaijolium of auth., 

 not Presl} B. midtifidum (S. G. Gmel.) Rupr. 



\. Sterile blade nearly or quite sessile, attached near the middle of the plant, 

 thin, membranous, the segments acute, incised; lateral veins of the leaf- 

 segments unbranched; epidermal cells with flexuous walls; moist woods, 

 common B. yirginianiim (L.) Sw. 



6. Hymenophyllaceae Gaud. — Filmy Fern Family 



L Trichomanes L. — Filmy Fern 



T. boschianiim Sturm. On sandstone near a spring, Jackson Hollow, Pope 

 Co., Aug. 2, 1923, Mary M. Steagall 37 (Univ. 111. herb.). 



7. Osmundaceae R. Br. — Royal Fern Family 

 L OSMUNDA L. 



1 . Leaves 2-pinnate, some of them fertile at the apex and forming an erect 



terminal panicle; swampy ground or wet woods. Royal Fern 



O. regalis L. 



L Leaves 1 -pinnate. 

 2. Leaves of two kinds, the fertile and sterile ones separate; sterile leaves 

 1-pinnate, longer than the fertile; each pinna with a tuft of tomentum 

 at base; swampy ground n.e. 111. Cinnamon Fern O. citinamomea L. 



2. Leaves fertile at the tip, or wholly sterile, or some of the larger ones with 

 some of the middle pinnae fertile; pinnae lacking tufts of tomentum; 

 moist ground in woods. Interrupted Fern .O. claytomana L. 



8. Polypodiaceae R. Br. — Fern Family 



l.Sporani^ia enclosed in £;lobose or necklace-like brownish portions of the contracted and 

 modified fertile leaves; fertile and sterile leaves dissimilar. 



2. Sterile leaves 1 -pinnatifid, the veins reticulate; fertile leaves 2-pinnate; rhizome 

 horizontal, the leaves therefore solitary 1. Onoclea 



2. Sterile leaves 2-pinnatifid, the veins free; fertile leaves I -pinnate; rhizome short. 



erect, the leaves therefore tufted 2. Pierelis 



1. Sporangia on the margin or back of ordinary foliar or modified leaves. 



3. Indusium inferior or partly so (often evanescent). 



4. Sori marginal, in minute cup-like inferior indusia at the ends of the veins; leaves 



bipinnate, delicate, fragrant, sparsely glandular-pubescent beneath 



3. Dennstaedtia 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 8. Polypodiaceae 35 



4. Sori dorsal. 



5. Indusium wholly inferior, roundish at first, soon splitting 4. Woodsia 



5. Indusium partly inferior, delicate, hood-like, attached by its base at one side 

 5. C^stopleris 



3. Indusium superior or none. 



6. Sori dorsal, i.e., on the back of the leaves away from the margin, or if apparently 

 near the margin not covered by the revolute edge of the leaf-segments. 



7. Sori orbicular or nearly so. 



8. Indusium peltate or reniform, conspicuous, but often soon deciduous. 



9. Indusium peltate; leaves (in our species) 1 -pinnate, the stipe and rachis 

 scaly, the pinnules spinulose-serrate, auriculate at the base of the 

 upper side 6. Polyslichum 



9. Indusium reniform, attached at its sinus; leaves 1 -3-pinnately compound 



7. Dr^opleris 



8. Indusium none. 



10. Leaves 2-3-pinnatifid, not jointed to the rhizome; sori small, on the backs 



of the veins 8. Phegopieris 



10. Leaves pinnately lobed, jointed to and arising from roundish knobs on 



the chaffy rhizome; sori large 9. Pol\)podium 



7. Sori elongated, oval to oblong or linear, straight or curved, two or more times 



as long as wide. 



11. Leaves simple, entire, 5-30 cm. long, lanceolate, tapering from a truncate 



or cordate or even hastate base, rooting at the tip and thus giving rise to 



new plants; veins forking and anastomosing 10. Campiosorus 



1 1. Leaves pinnate or pinnatifld. 



12. Leaves evergreen, coriaceous, small (5-40 cm. long); petioles firm, 



slender, wiry, brown or black ]\. Asplemum 



12. Leaves not evergreen, herbaceous; petioles soft, stoutish, stramineous 

 (when dry). 

 13. Son in chain-like rows parallel to the midveins; veins united to 

 form a series of narrow areolae along the midrib, elsewhere free 



14. IVoodwardia 



13. Sori and venation otherwise. 



14. Pinnae pinnate, the segments coarsely and irregularly toothed or 



incised 12. Alhy^rium 



14. Pinnae pinnatifid or merely undulate, or entire 13. Diplazium 



6. Sori marginal, i.e., borne at the edges of the lobes or segments of the leaves, 

 either in definite sori or in a continuous line and covered by the revolute leaf- 

 margin. 

 1 5. Leaves pedate, the petioles forked at the summit, dark brown or black, smooth, 



glossy; pinnules flabellate; sori several, distinct 17. Adianium 



15. Leaves pinnate, the petioles simple; sori apparently continuous along the 

 margin of the pinnule. 

 16. Petioles slender, less than 2 mm. thick; leaves small, ovate-lanceolate; 

 rhizome erect, or short-horizontal, copiously scaly. 

 17. Leaves glabrous. 



18. Leaves dimorphous, delicate, membranous; pinnules of the sterile 



leaves cuneate at the sessile or nearly sessile base 



1 4. Cr^plogramma 



18. Leaves uniform or nearly so, coriaceous; pinnules short-petiolulate 



at the rounded or truncate base 15. Pellaea 



17. Leaves pubescent, uniform; pinnules cuneate at the sessile or nearly 



sessile base 18. Cnetlanlnes 



16. Petioles coarse, 2-10 mm. thick; leaves large, coarse, triangular, 1-3-pin- 



nate, 30-100 cm. long; rhizomes horizontal, black, not scaly 



19. Pteridium 




36 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



1. Onoclea L. 



O. sensibilis L. Sensitive Fern. Moist woods, or edges of meadows, 

 common. 



2. Pteretis Raf. 



P. nodulosa (Michx.) Nieuwl. Ostrich Fern. Wet ground, not common; 

 n. III., southwd. to Peoria Co. [Onoclea nodulosa Michx.; Matteuccia struthi- 

 opteris and Onoclea struthiopteris of Am. auth.} 



3. Cystopteris Bernh. — Bladder Fern 



i. Leaves narrowly lanceolate, 30-120 cm. long when mature; axils of some of 

 the upper pinnae usually bearing small bulblets on the lower surface; basal 



pair of pinnae the largest; on moist cliffs in shaded ravines 



" C. bulbijera (L.) Bernh. 



1. Leaves broadly lanceolate, acute, 20-40 cm. long, the basal pair of pinnae 



usually slightly shortened; bulblets none; moist soil in woods, common 



C. f'^agilis (L.) Bernh. 



4. WooDsiA R. Br. 



L Leaves 20-50 cm. long, minutely glandular; petiole not jointed; indusium 

 ample, with few broad spreading jagged lobes; cliffs, not common. Cliff 

 Fern W. obtusa (Spreng.) Torr. 



I. Leaves 5-15 cm. long, rusty-chaffy beneath; petiole jointed a short distance 

 above its base; indusium inconspicuous, the divisions filiform; cliffs, rare. 

 Ogle Co. Rock Woodsia W. ilvensis (L.) R. Br. 



5. Dennstaedtia Bernh. 



{Diclfsonia L'Her.) 



D. punctilobtila (Michx.) Moore. Hay-scented Fern. Sandstone cliffs in 

 wooded ravines, rare. Wabash Co., Schneck. 



6. POLYSTICHUM Roth 



P. acrostichoides (Michx.) Schott. Christmas Fern. Common in wooded 

 ravines. 



7. Dryopteris Adans. 



(^Aspidium Sw. ; Thelyipteris Schmidel) 



1. Leaves membranous, not evergreen; vascular bundles of the petiole 2, free 

 or united; rhizomes slender, almost without scales. 



2. Lowest pinnae reduced in length, widely spaced, deffexed, the blade there- 

 fore conspicuously narrowed at the base; margins of the pinnules flat; 

 indusium glandular; veins mostly simple; vascular bundles usually 



united; woods and thickets, rare. New York Fern 



D. noveboracensis (L.) Gray 



2. Lowest pinnae only slightly reduced; margins of the pinnules revolute; 

 indusium glandless; veins forked; vascular bundles 2, distinct; marshes, 

 common. Marsh Fern D. thclypteris (L.) Gra) 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 8. Polypodiaceae 37 



1. Leaves of firm texture, often evergreen; vascular bundles of the petiole 5 

 or more; rhizom3 stout, conspicuously scaly. 

 3. Leaves 1 -pinnate, or nearly 2-pinnate. 



4. Sori along the margins of the obscurely crenate or entire pinnules; 

 leaves coriaceous; sandstone cliffs and wooded ravines, not uncom- 

 mon. Marginal Wood Fern D. marginalis (L.) Gray 



4. Sori near the midvein; pinnules toothed. 



5. Leaf-biades 20-40 cm. wide, ovate in outline, scarcely narrowed 

 below; pinnae broadest near the middle; rich woods in ravines; 

 rare; known from Fulton, McLean, Grundy, and La Salle coun- 

 ties. Goldie's Fern D. goldiana (Hook.) Gray 



5. Leaf-blades narrower, elliptical in outline, narrowed at the base; 

 lower pinnae broadest at the base; swampy woods, n. III., rare; 

 known from Lake, Kankakee, La Salle, and Ogle counties. Crested 



Wood Fern D. cristata (L.) Gray 



3. Leaves 2-3 -pinnate, the pinnules spinulose-toothed. 



6. Pinnae at right angles to the rachis; inner pinnules of the basal row 

 equalling or shorter than the next outer ones; leaves (at least the 

 rachis) usually with a few small scattered stipitate glands; indusium 

 with marginal glands; moist woods, locally throughout 111. except 



the e. and centr. counties. Common Wood Fern 



D. intermedia (Muhl.) Gray 



6. Pinnae oblique to the rachis; inner pinnules of the basal row longer 

 than the next outer ones; leaves and indusia not glandular; woods, 

 rare. Oregon, Ogle Co., M. B. Waite in 1883; Peoria, Brendel; 



Antioch, Lake Co., G. N. Jones 16507. Spinulose Wood Fern 



D. spinulosa (O. F. Muell.) Watt 



8. Phegopteris (Presl) Fee 



1. Leaves glabrous, ternate, the three divisions petioled; rachis not winged; 

 wooded ravines, rare; Ogle Co.; St. Clair Co. Oak Fern [Dryopteris 



linnaeana C. Chr.; D. disjuncta (Ledeb.) Morton] 



P. dryopteris (L.) Fee 



1. Leaves twice pinnatifid, pubescent or glandular beneath, the pinnae all 

 sessile, adnate to the rachis. 

 2. Rachis terete and wingless above the lowest pair of pinnae, these separated 

 from the next pair above; blades mostly longer than broad, short- 

 pubescent, 'especially on the veins; moist ravines, cliffs, and woods, 

 rare; Starved Rock, La Salle Co., Agnes Chase in 1901; "South Illi- 

 nois," without definite locality, Vasey. Long Beech Fern {Dryopteris 

 phegopteris (L.) C. Chr.; Thelypteris phegopteris (L.) Slosson; P. 



polypodtoides Fee} P. connectilis (Michx.) Watt 



2. Rachis winged above the lowest pair of pinnae by their adnate bases; 

 blades about as wide as long, or wider, the lower surface finely glandu- 

 lar, and often slightly pubescent; rich woods and ravines, not uncom- 

 mon. Broad Beech Fern P. hexagonoptera (Michx.) Fee 




38 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



9. PoLYPODiUM L. — Polypody 



1. Leaves glabrous; rocky ledges, locally abundant. [P. yiilgare of auth., not L.} 

 P. virginianum L. 



1. Leaves scaly beneath; on trees, rarely on rocks; Jackson Co., and southw. 

 [Acrostichiim polypodio'ides L., ex p.; P. polypodioides (L.) Watt, var. 

 michauxianum Weatherby] P. ceteraccinum Michx. 



10. CampTOSORUS Link 

 C. rhizophylUis (L.) Link. Walking Fern. Moist rocky ledges, not rare. 



IL AsPLENiUM L. — Spleenwort 

 1 . Rachis green, flat. 



2. Leaves pinnatifid, or pinnate below, lanceolate, tapering to a long narrow 

 tip, the segments obtuse, crenate; sandstone cliffs, rare, s. III. Pinnatifid 

 Spleenwort A. pinnatifidiim Nutt. 



2. Leaves 2-3-pinnate, rhombic in outline, the segments cuneate, finely 



toothed at apex; usually on calcareous cliffs; s. 111., without definite 

 locality, Brendel. \_A. ruta-muraria of Am. auth, not L.] Rue Spleen- 

 wort A. cryptolepis Fern. 



L Rachis black or brown, terete. 



3. Leaves pinnatifid, the apex caudate, the segments lanceolate, sessile, vari- 



able in size, more or less auricl'ed at base; on a rocky, wooded hillside 

 along the Mississippi River near McClure, Alexander Co., E. J. Palmer 

 in 1919. [Asplenmm platyneuron X Camptosorm rhizophyllus; X 



Asplenosorus ebenoides (R. R. Scott) Wherry] Scott's Spleenwort 



X -^- (^bcnoides R. R. Scott 



3. Leaves pinnate, with 15-40 pairs of leaflets. 



4. Leaflets auriculate on upper side near base, serrate; rocky woods, not 

 common. Ebony Spleenwort A. platyneuron (L.) Oakes 



4. Leaflets crenate, oval, obtuse, not auriculate; sandstone cliffs, s. III., rare. 

 Maidenhair Spleenwort A. trichomanes L. 



12. Athyrium Roth 



A. angustum (Willd.) Presl. Lady Fern. Woods, local. \_A. fltx-jcmma 

 ex p. of Am. auth., not L.] 



13. DiPLAZIUM Sw. 

 {Aspleuiiim ex p. of auth.) 



1. Pinnae entire or crenulate, the veins running into the sinuses; moist woods, 



common. [A. anguftifolium Michx.] Glade Fern 



D. pycnocarpon (Spreng.) Broun 



1. Pinnae deeply pinnatifid, the veins or veinlets running into the teeth; woods, 

 not infrequent. Silvery Spleenwort D. acrostichoides {Sw) Butters 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 10. Salviniaceae 39 



14. WOODWARDIA Sm. 

 (Anchistea Presl) 



W. virginicd (L.) Sm. Chain Fern. In an old tamarack bog 3 miles e. of 

 Antioch, Lake Co., G. D. Fuller & G. N. Jones in 1944. 



15. Cryptogramma R. Br. 



C. stelleri (S. G. Gmel.) Prantl. Rock-brake. On damp, usually calcareous 

 rocks, rare; n. III. 



16. Pellaea Link — Cliff -brake 



1. Stipes and rachises glabrous or nearly so; leaves 5-25 cm. long, pale bluish 

 green; chiefly calcareous rocks, rare P. glabella Mett. 



1. Stipes and rachises with numerous jointed hairs; leaves 10-50 cm. long, 



grayish green; dry, calcareous recks, not common 



P. atropurpurea (L.) Link 



17. Adiantum L. — Maidenhair Fern 

 A. pedatum L. Moist woods, common throughout 111. 



18. Cheilanthes Sw. — Lip Fern 



1. Leaves tomentose, 5-10 cm. long; indusia continuous; among rocks, not 

 common; chiefly in the w. and s. parts of the state; known from Jo 

 Daviess, Carroll, Jersey, Jackson, and Johnson counties C. jeei Moore 



1. Leaves hirsute and glandular, (5-) -10-20 cm. long; indusia discontinuous; on 

 rocks, St. Clair Co. and southw C. lanosa (Michx.) D. C. Eaton 



19. Pteridium Scop. 



P. latiusculum (Desv.) Hieron. Bracken or Brake Fern. Open woods, 

 common. \Pteris aquilina and Pteridium aquilinum of auth., not L.} 



9. Marsileaceae R. Br. 



1. Marsilea L. 



M. quadrifolia L. European Marsilea. Ponds, etc., introd. from e. U.S.; 

 nativie of Europe. In strip-mine ponds near Oakwood, Vermilion Co., G. N. 

 Jones 13052. 



10. Salviniaceae Reichenb. 



1. AzoLLA Lam. 



A. mexicana Presl. Mosquito Fern. Floating on still water, not common; 

 w. and s. 111. [/I. caroliniana of auth., not Willd.} 




40 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



Division II. Spermatophyta. Seed Plants 



Subdivision I. GYMNOSPERMAE. Gymnosperms 



11. Taxaceae Lindl. — Yew Family 



1. Taxus L. — Yew 



T. canadensis Marsh. Canada Yew. Ground-hemlock. Wooded hillsides 

 near streams, rare; n. 111.; known from Jo Daviess, Winnebago, Carroll, Ogle, 

 Lee, La Salle, and Kankakee counties. 



12. PiNACEAE Lindl. — Pine Family 



1 . Leaves in fascicles or clusters. 



2. Leaves evergreen, in fascicles of 2-5, surrounded at the base by a sheath; cones 



maturing the second year ....1. Pimis 



2. Leaves deciduous, in clusters of 25-50 on short lateral spurs; cones maturing the 



first year 2. Larix 



1 . Leaves scattered along the branchlets, evergreen; cones maturing the first year; 



branchlets roughened by the persistent, leaf-bases; leaves obtuse, flattened, short- 



petioled, soon deciduous from the twigs when dry 3. Tsiiga 



1. Pin US L. — Pine 



1. Leaves five in each fascicle, slender, bluish green, 6-12 cm. long; 'each leaf 

 with one vascular bundle; cones cylindrical, often curved, pendent, 10-15 

 cm. long; n. 111.; known from Lake, Jo Daviess, Carroll, Ogle, Lake, and 



La Salle counties. White Pine P. strobus L. 



1. Leaves two or three in a fascicle; each leaf with two vascular bundles. 



2. Leaves 2-4 cm. long, rigid, twisted, spreading; cone-scales spineless; n. 111., 



in Lake, Cook, and Ogle counties. Jack Pine P. banksiana Lamb. 



2. Leaves 7-12 cm. long, straight; cone-scales with a sharp prickle about 1 

 mm. long; s. 111., in Union, Jackson, and Randolph counties. Short- 

 l-eaf Pine P. echinata Mill. 



2. Larix Adans. — Larch 



L. laricina (DuRoi) K. Koch. Tamarack or American Larch. Bogs in Lake 

 and McHenry counties. 



3. TsuGA Carr. — Hemlock 



T. canadensis (L.) Carr. Sandstone bluffs, western Indiana (Parke Co.), 

 and in Wisconsin, but not yet discovered in Illinois. 



13. Taxodiaceae Neger 



1. Taxodium Rich. — Bald Cypress 



T. distichum (L.) Rich. Swampy ground in s. 111., extending northw. to 

 Lawrence and Marion counties. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 16. Sparganiaceae 41 



14. CuPRESSACEAE Neger 



l.BranchleU flattened in one plane; leaves all scale-like; cones woody 1. Thuja 



l.Branchlets not flattened; some or all of the leaves usually subulate; cones berry-like 

 or drupe-like, bluish, glaucous 2. Juniperus 



1. Thuja L. 

 T. occidentalis L. Arbor-vitae or Northern White Cedar. Ne. III., rare. 

 In III., chiefly on chffs and bluffs of St. Peter sandstone; also in tamarack 

 bogs. Known from La Salle, Kane, Cook, and Lake counties; also Peoria, 

 Brendel in 1853, but now extinct there. 



2. Juniperus L. — Juniper 

 1. Leaves all subulate, sharp-pointed, mostly in threes, 7-15 mm. long; low 

 shrub with spreading or decumbent branches; sand dunes near Lake Mich- 

 igan. [/. communis var. depressa Pursh; /. communis of auth., not L.; 



/. sibirica of auth., not Burgsd.} Low Juniper /. canadensis Burgsd. 



1. Leaves of two kinds, scale-like on the mature branchlets, subulate on the 



young growth, mostly opposite. 



2. Tree 10-25 m. tall; cones on straight peduncles; locally abundant on 



bluffs and wooded slopes. [/. virgimana var. crebra Fern. & Grisc] 



Eastern Red Cedar /. virginiana L. 



2. Prostrate shrub; cones on recurved peduncles; sand dunes near Wauke- 

 gan and Lake Bluff, Lake Co., the most southerly stations for this 



species. [/. sabina of auth., not L.} Trailing Juniper 



/. horizontalis Moench 



Subdivision. 11. ANGIOSPERMAE. Flowering Plants 

 Class I. Monocotyledoneae Juss. 



15. Typhaceae J. St. Hil. — Cat-tail Family 

 1. Typha L. — Cat-tail 



1 . Staminate and pistillate parts of the spike usually contiguous, the latter 

 becoming 2-3 cm. in diameter at maturity; pollen-grains in fours; stigma 

 spatulate; marshes and margins of ponds, common. June-July. Common 

 Cat-tail T. latifolia L. 



1. Staminate and pistillate parts of the spike separated by a short interval, the 

 pistillate part only 1-2 cm. in diameter at maturity; pollen-grains simple; 

 stigma linear; marshes, less common than the preceding species. Narrow- 

 leaved Cat-tail T. angiistifolia L. 



16. Sparganiaceae Agardh — Bur-reed Family 

 1. Sparganium L. — Bur-reed 



l.Achenes obpyramidal, truncate at the summit, sessile; stigmas usually 2; 



ditches and margins of ponds. June-July. Giant Bur-reed 



S. eurycarpum Engelm. 




42 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



1. Achenes fusiform, stipitate; stigma 1. 



2. Pistillate heads all strictly axillary, 2-2.5 cm. in diameter at maturity; 

 beak of the mature achene 2-3 mm. long; leaves 6-12 mm. wide. 



3. Inflorescence branched; stigmas 2-4 mm. long; ditches 



^S". androcladum (Engelm.) Morong 



3. Inflorescence usually simple; stigmas 1-2 mm. long; ditches 



S. americanum Nutt. 



2. Pistillate heads usually supra-axillary; leaves 3-7 mm. wide. 



4. Fruiting heads 2-2.5 cm. in diameter at maturity; beak of the mature 



achene 4 mm. long; ditches and ponds, not common 



S. chlorocarpum Rydb. 



4. Fruiting heads 1.5 cm. in diameter at maturity; beak of the mature 



achene 1-2 mm. long; ditches and ponds, not common 



S. acaule (Beebe) Rydb. 



17. Naiadaceae Lindl. — Naiad Family 

 1. Naias L.— Naiad 



1. Fruit glossy, with 30-50 longitudinal lines; style 1-2 mm. long; leaves with 

 20-30 minute teeth on each margin; ponds and slow streams, widely dis- 

 tributed, but not common. June-Aug N. flexilis (Willd.) R. & S. 



1. Fruit dull, with 10-20 rows of distinct reticulations; style 0.2 0.6 mm. long; 

 leaves with 40-50 minute teeth on each margin; ponds and shallow lakes, 



rare; Peoria and Macoupin counties. July-Sept 



N. giiadalupensis (Spreng.) Morong 



18. PoTAMOGETONACEAE Engler — Pondweed Family 



1. Flowers perfect, in spikes; leaves alternate, or the upper sometimes opposite 



1 . Poiamogelon 



1. Flowers unisexual, axillary; leaves opposite, filiform, I -veined, entire.. ..2. Zannichcllia 



1. PoTAMOGETON L. — Pondweed 



1 . Leaves uniform, all submerged. 

 2. Leaves linear to filiform. 



3. Stipules free from the petioles and blades. 



4. Leaves 9-35-veined; fruits 3.5-5 mm. long; lakes, n.e. 111. [P. 

 compressus Am. auth., not L.; P. zosterifolitis Am. auth., not 



Schum.] P. zosterijormis Fern. 



4. Leaves 1-7-veined; fruits 1.5-3 mm. long. 



5. Leaves 5-7-veined, with a pair of basal glands; stagnant water, not 

 common. [P. mucronatus Schrad.} P. jriesii Rupr. 



5. Leaves 1-3-veined. 



6. Blades usually without basal glands; fruiting spikes subcapitate, 



2-8 mm. long; ponds, ditches, and streams, chiefly in the n. 



half of 111 P. foliosus Raf. 



6. Blades usually with a pair of small translucent glands at the 



base; lakes, etc. [P. panormitanus Biv.} P. pusillus L. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 18. Potamogetonaceae 43 



3. Stipules adnate to the base of the leaves. 



7. Leaves filiform, less than 0.6 mm. wide, entire; lakes, rare 



P. pectinatus L. 



7. Leaves linear, 2-ranked, 3-6 mm. wide, the margin microscopically 



serrulate; lakes, rare P. robbinsii Oakes 



2. Leaves lanceolate to oval or ovate, L5-6 cm. wide. 

 8. Leaves perfoliate. 



9. Leaves slightly clasping at base, cucullate at the apex, mostly 8-30 



cm. long; fruits 4-5 mm. long; lakes, n.e. Ill 



P. praelongus Wulfen 



9. Leaves mostly 2-8 cm. long, strongly clasping at the base, the apex 



flat, not cucullate; fruits 2.5-4 mm. long; lakes, n.e. 111., rare 



P. richardsonii (A. Benn.) Rydb. 



8. Leaves not perfoliate. 



10. Leaves oval or lanceolate, the margin often crisped; fruit merely 



apiculate; lakes, local P. lucens L. 



10. Leaves linear-oblanceolate, serrulate throughout; beak of fruit 2-3 

 mm. long; ponds and streams, not common; known from Cook, 



Tazewell, and Vermilion counti'es; native of Eur P. aispus L. 



1 . Leaves of two kinds, broader floating ones, and narrower submerged ones. 



11. Submerged leaves lanceolate to elliptical, more than 5 mm. wide. 



12. Stem usually black-spotted; principal floating leaves somewhat 

 cordate at base; fruit 3-3.5 mm. long; shallow water, n.e. 111., 

 rare P. pulcher Tuckerm. 



12. Stem not black-spotted; leaves tapering at the base, or rounded. 



13. Floating leaves with 30 or more principal veins; lakes and 



ditches, local P. amplifolius Tuckerm. 



13. Floating leaves with fewer veins. 

 14. Mature spikes 4-6 cm. long. 



15. Submerged leaves sessile, the apex mucronate; fruit dis- 

 tinctly 3-keeled; lakes, local 



P. angustifolius Bercht. dC Presl 



15. Submerged leaves petioled, the apex acuminate. 



16. Floating leaves elliptical, not mucronate, 4-9 cm. 

 broad; submerged leaves lanceolate; style prominent 

 on the fruit; streams and ponds in the northern half 

 of the state; first collected near Oquawka, Hender- 

 son Co., by H. N. Patterson 



P. illinoensis Morong 



16. Floating leaves oval, mucronate, 1-3 cm. wide; sub- 

 merged leaves narrowly lanceolate; fruit tipped by 

 the nearly sessile stigma; ponds, ditches, and streams, 



not uncommon [P. nodosus Poir. (?)] -.- 



P. americanus C. & S. 



14. Mature spikes 1-2 cm. long; floating leaves oval, 1-3 cm. 

 wide; submerged leaves lanceolate, acuminate or cuspidate; 




44 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



ponds or slow streams, chiefly in the eastern part of the 



state, rare P. gramineus L. 



11. Submerged leaves linear or filiform, not more than 5 mm. wide. 



17. Submerged leaves linear, 2-5 mm. wide, conspicuously reticulate 



along the midvein; ponds and lakes, not common 



P. epihydrus Raf. 



17. Sumberged leaves filiform, 1-2 mm. wide. 



18. Spikes of 2 kinds: one emersed, cylindrical, many-flowered, the 

 other submerged, globose, few-flowered; ditches and slow 

 streams, not uncommon, chiefly in w. and s. III. [P. hybridus 



of Michx. and Am. auth.] P. diversifolius Raf. 



18. Spikes all alike, cylindrical. 



19. Blades of the floating leaves less than 1.5 cm. long, equalling 

 or longer than the petioles; spikes less than 1 cm. long; 



lakes, not common P. vaseyi Robbins 



19. Blades of the floating leaves 2.5 cm. or more in length, mostly 

 shorter than the petioles; spikes 1.5 cm. or more in length; 

 lakes, ponds, and ditches, not uncommon P. natans L. 



2. Zannichellia L. — Horned Pondweed 



Z.- palustris L. Ditches and ponds, not common. Peo*-ia and Henderson 

 counties. 



19. Juncaginaceae Lindl. — Arrow-grass Family 



I. Flowers numerous, greenish, in a long spike-like raceme; leaves all basal.. 1. Triglochin 

 1. Flowers few, white, in a loose raceme 2. Scheuchzeria 



1. Triglochin L. — Arrow-grass 



1. Carpels usually 6, in fruit ellipsoid, 3-6 mm. long; sandy or marly swales, 



or in swamps or along ditches, n. 111., not common. June- July 



T. mar'thma L. 



1. Carpels 3, in fruit clavate, 7-8 mm. long; calcareous soil, rare, Peoria, Kane, 

 and Lake counties. July-Sept T. palustris L. 



2. Scheuchzeria L. 



S. americana (Fern.) n. comb. Bogs, rare, n. 111. June-July. \_S. palustris 

 of Am. auth., not L.; S. palustris var. americana Fern., in Rhodora 25:177. 

 1923}. On the basis of shape and size of follicles, our plants appear .specifically 

 distinct from the European 5. palustris L. 



20. Alismaceae DC. — Water-plantain Family 



1. Flowers numerous, small, perfect, in a compound panicle; leaves oval or ovate; 

 stamens usually 6; carpels flattened, arranged in a ring on a small flat receptacle.... 

 I . Alisma 



I. Flowers in whorls, fewer; stamens 9-many; carpels in a head on a convex receptacle. 

 2. Leaves cordate or ovate, with 5-7 veins from the base; flowers [jerfect, 3-9 or more 



in each whorl ; plants annual 2. Echinodorus 



2. Leaves sagittate or lanceolate, more than 7-veined; plants perennial. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 21. H\'drocharitaceae 45 



3. Fruiting pedicels thickened, spreading or recurved; sepals suborbicular, surround- 

 ing the mature fruit; lower flowers perfect, the upper staminate with 9-15 

 stamens 3. Lophoiocarpus 



3. Fruiting pedicels not thickened, ascending; sepals spreading or reflexed in fruit; 



lower flowers pistillate, the upper staminate with numerous stamens 



4. Sagittaria 



1. Alisma L. — Water-plantain 



A. subcordatum Raf. Ditches and margins of ponds, common. July- Aug. 

 [A. plantago-aquatica Am. auth., not L.} 



2. ECHINODORUS Rich. 



1. Scape erect, 10-30 cm. tall; stamens 12; style longer than the ovary; achenes 

 with a straight beak; shores of ponds, rare. June-July. [E. rostratus 

 Engelm.~\ E. cordifolius (L.) Griseb. 



1. Scape prostrate, proliferous; stamens about 21; style shorter than the ovary; 



beak of the achene incurved; swamps. June-July 



E. radicans (Nutt.) Engelm. 



3. LoPHOTocARPus T. Durand 



L. calycinus (Engelm.) J. G. Sm. Shallow water, rare. Peoria, Brendel. 

 July-Sept. 



4. Sagittaria L. — Arrowhead 



1. Leaves sagittate; stamens with glabrous filaments. 



2. Bracts of the inflorescence ovate, obtusish; beak of tht achene horizontal; 

 shallow water; July-Sept. Common Arrowhead S. latifolia Willd. 



2. Bracts lanceolate, acuminate; beak erect. 



3. Achenes 2 mm. long, with thin, unequal wings on both margins, the 



beak 0.5 mm. long; shallow water. July-Sept S. cuneata Sheld. 



3. Achenes 2.5-3 mm. long, with thick, equal wings; beak 1-2 mm. long; 



muddy shores, or in ditches, common. July-Sept 



S. brevhostra Mack. & Bush 



1. Leaves linear, lanceolate, or oval; filaments more or less glandular- pubescent. 

 4. Achenes 3 mm. long, the beak 1.5 mm. long; pedicels very short, the 



pistillate flowers nearly sessile; ditches or muddy shores; June-Sept 



S. rigidd Pursh 



4. Achenes 2 mm. long, the beak less than 1 mm. long; pedicels of the pistil- 

 late flowers equalling those of the staminate; shallow water. June-Sept. 

 S. graminea Michx. 



21. Hydrocharitaceae Aschers. — Frogbit Family 



1 . Leaves cordate, petioled 1. Limnobhim 



1 . Leaves neither cordate nor petioled. 



2. Leaves basal, ribbon-like, elongated, floating 2. Vallisneria 



2. Leaves small, whorled or opposite, sessile, pellucid, 1 -veined; stems elongated, leafy, 

 floating 3. Anacharis 




46 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



1. LiMNOBlUM Rich. — Frogbit 



L. spongia (Bosc) Steud. Shallow water and mud, rare. Union Co. June- 

 Aug. 



2. Vallisneria L. — Eelgrass 



V. americana Michx. Wild Celery. Ponds and slow streams, mostly in the 

 n. half of the state. July- Aug. [K. spiralis sensu auth., not L.] 



3. Anacharis Bab. & Planch. — Waterweed 

 {Elodea sensu Michx., non Juss.) 



1. Leaves elliptical or oblong, obtuse, 1.2-4 mm. wide; slow streams, widely 

 distributed. July-Aug A. canadensis (Michx.) Planch. 



1. Leaves linear, acute, 0.7- L8 mm. wide; ponds and slow streams. July-Aug. 

 A. occidentalis (Pursh) Vict. 



22. Gramineae Juss. — Grass Family 



KEY TO THE TRIBES 



1. Plants woody; stems perennial Tribe 1. Bambuseae 



1. Plants herbaceous; stems annual. 



2. Spikelets 2-many-f lowered (except Hordeum and some Chlorideae). 

 3. Inflorescense a panicle, this sometimes contracted and spike-like. 



4. Lemmas longer than the glumes, awnless or with a straight apical awn 



Tribe 2. Feskiceae 



4. Lemmas usually shorter than the glumes, usually with a bent awn arising from 



the back Tribe 4. Aveneae 



3. Inflorescence of solitary, racemose, or digitate spikes or racemes, the spikelets 

 sessile or nearly so. 



5. Spikelets solitaiy, or in clusters of 2-6, arranged alternately on opposite sides 



of the axis; spike solitary, terminal Tribe 3. Horaeae 



5. Spikelets in one-sided spikes or racemes, the spikes or racemes solitary or 



several Tribe 6. Chlorideae 



2. Spikelets with only one perfect flower. 



6. Inflorescence not monoecious; flowers all perfect, or perfect and staminate or 

 neutral. 

 7. Glumes present; stamens 3 or L 

 8. Glumes 2. 



9. Spikelets in pairs, one sessile and fertile, the other pedicelled and stam- 

 inate or neuter, or rarely absent or reduced to a pedicel ; rachilla 

 articulated below the glumes Tribe 10. Andropogoneae 



9. Spikelets not in pairs; rachilla disarticulating above the glumes 



Tribe 5. Agrostideae 



8. Glumes apparently more than 2 (except Paspalum). 



10. Glumes apparently 4, the second and third being sterile lemmas present 



below the fertile floret Tribe 7. Phalarideae 



10. Glumes apparently 3, the third being a sterile lemma, the two real glumes 



very unequal Tribe 9. Paniceae 



7. Glumes obsolete or minute Tribe 8. Orvzeae 



6. Inflorescence monoecious, the staminate and pistillate flowers in different parts 

 of the same spike, or in different inflorescences, the staminate above the 

 pistillate ones Tribe I 1. Tripsaceae 



Tribe L Bambuseae. — Bamboo Tribe 



One genus 1. Anmdinaria 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 22. Gramineae 47 



Tribe 2. Festuceae. — Fescue Tribe 



I. Plants 2-4 m. tall; rachilla plumose; panicles large 11. Phragmites 



I. Plants less tall; rachilla not plumose. 

 2. Lemmas prominently 3-nerved. 



3. Lemmas more or less villous on the nerves. 



4. Stem-nodes glabrous; palet not ciliate 13. Trtodta 



4. Stem-nodes pubescent; palet conspicuously ciliate 14. Triplasis 



3. Lemmas glabrous, or merely scabrous on the nerves. 



5. Lemmas less than 5 mm. long 7. Eragrostis 



5. Lemmas about 8 mm. long; the upper 2-4 lemmas empty 8. Diarrhena 



2. Lemmas 5-many-nerved, (the nerves sometimes indistinct). 



6. Spikelets with sterile lemmas above or below the fertile florets. 



7. Sterile lemmas above the fertile florets 12. Melica 



7. Sterile lemmas below the fertile florets 9. Uniola 



6. Spikelets without sterile lemmas. 



8. Lemmas awned. 



9. Lemmas bifid at apex, awned just below the apex or behind the teeth 



- 2. Bromus 



9. Lemmas entire, with an apical point or awn.. 3. Fesluca 



8. Lemmas awnless. 



10. Spikelets nodding, as broad as long, on capillary pedicels in open panicles; 



lemmas papery, imbricated, scarious-margined, cordate at the base, the 



apex obtuse or acutish 6. Briza 



10. Spikelets not as above in all respects. 



1 I . Spikelets strongly flattened, crowded in 1 -sided clusters at the ends of 



long branches ; keels of the glumes and lemmas hispid-ciliale 



:- 10. Dacl}}lis 



11. Spikelets neither strongly flattened, nor in 1 -sided clusters. 



12. Lemmas with cobwebby hairs at base 5. Poa 



12. Lemmas without cobwebby hairs. 



13. Nerves of the lemma parallel and prominent; lemma obtuse, 

 scarious at apex; tall perennials with flat leaves. ...4. Clvceria 



13. Nerves of the lemma converging at the apex (sometimes indis- 

 tinct). 



14. Lemmas 8-11 mm. long; spikelets large 2. Bromus 



14. Lemmas less than 8 mm. long. 



15. Lemmas keeled on the back, the apex obtuse or acute 



5. Poa 



15. Lemmas convex on the back or subcarinate, acute or awn- 

 tipped (obtusish in F. obtusa) 3. Fesluca 



Tribe 3. Horde ae. — Barley Tribe 



1. Spikelets solitary at each joint of the rachis. 



2. Spikelets placed edgewise to the rachis; first glume of the lateral spikelets absent 



21 . Lolium 



2. Spikelets placed flatwise to the rachis; glumes 2. 



3. Glumes 1 -nerved; spikelets with 2 perfect flowers 17. Secale 



3. Glumes 3-several-nerved. 



4. Glumes lanceolate or linear 15. Agrop^ron 



4. Glumes ovate 16. Triticum 



1. Spikelets 2-6 at each joint of the rachis. 



5. Spikelets 3 at each joint, 1 -flowered, the lateral pair usually aborted; glumes awn- 

 like 20. Hordeum 




48 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



5. Spikelels usually in pairs, 2-6-flowered. 



6. Spike loosely flowered, the spikelets widely spreading; glumes obsolete or bristle- 

 like 19. Hvstrix 



6. Spike densely flowered, the spikelets ascending; glumes well-developed 



18. Elvmus 



Tribe 4. Aveneae. — Oat Tribe 



1. Spikelets more than 5 mm. long. 

 2. Lemmas awned from the back. 



3. Spikelets more than I cm. long; plants annual 25. Avena 



3. Spikelets less than I cm. in length; lower floret long-awned, the upper one 

 usually awnless ; plants perennial 26. Arrhenatherum 



2. Lemma awned from between the apical teeth 27. Danlhonia 



1. Spikelets not more than 5 mm. long. 



4. Spikelets disarticulating above the glumes. 



5. Inflorescence contracted, spike-like; glumes unequal; plants of dry habitats 



22. Koeleria 



5. Inflorescence a spreading panicle; lemma awned from the middle or below; 



plants of moist habitats 24. Deschampsia 



4. Spikelets disarticulating below the glumes. 



6. Florets awnless, all perfect; glumes exceeded by the upper floret. .23. Sphenopholis 

 6. Lower spikelet perfect, awnless, the upper staminafe and bearing a hooked awn ; 



glumes longer than the florets 28. Holcus 



Tribe 5. Agrostideae. — Timothy Tribe 



1. Lemma of more delicate texture than the glumes, not at all indurated. 

 2. Inflorescence dense, spike-like; glumes keeled. 

 3. Lemma awnless. 



4. Glumes short-awned; leaves flat 35. Phleum 



4. Glumes awnless. 



5. Tall perennials; florets bearing a tuft of hairs at base 30. Ammophila 



5. Low annuals; florets without hairs at base 38. Hcleochloa 



3. Lemma awned; glumes awnless 34. Alopecurus 



2. Inflorescence an open or somewhat spike-like panicle; glumes not keeled. 



6. Grain permanently enclosed in the lemma and palet; pericarp adherent to the 

 gram. 

 7. Palet 1 -nerved, 1 -keeled; stamen I ; tall perennials with flat leaves and nodding 

 panicles 33. Cinna 



7. Palet 2-nerved and 2-keeled; stamens 3. 

 8. Lemma with long hairs at the base. 



9. Lemma and palet membranous; rachilla prolonged beyond the palet, 

 bristle-like 29. Calamagroslis 



9. Lemma and palet chartaceous; rachilla not prolonged beyond the palet 



3 1 . CalamovUfa 



8. Lemma without a tuft of hairs at the base. 



10. Lemma with a terminal awn. or mucronate at apex 36. Muhlenbergia 



10. Lemma awnless or with a dorsal awn 32. Agrosiis 



6. Grain not permanently enclosed in the lemma and palet, readily separating from 

 the pericarp 37. Sporobolus 



1 . Lemma indurated when mature, closely enveloping the grain. 



1 1 . Lemma awnless 40. Milium 



1 1 . Lemma awned. 



12. Lemma 3-awned 43. AristiJa 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 22. Gramineae 49 



12. Lemma 1-awned. 



13. Awn twisted or bent 42. Stipa 



13. Awn not twisted or bent. 



14. Lemma broad, the awn deciduous 41. Orpzopsis 



14. Lemma narrow, the tip awned or mucronate. 



15. Rachilla not prolonged behind the palet 36. Muhlenbergia 



15. Rachilla prolonged into a bristle behind the palet.. .. 39. Brac/il;e/p(rum 



Tribe 6. Chlorideae. — Grama Tribe 

 l.Spikelets with more than 1 perfect floret; plants annual. 



2. Spikes numerous, slender, racemose 47. Leptochloa 



2. Spikes few, digitate. 



3. Rachilla prolonged beyond the spikelets 45. Daciyloctenium 



3. Rachilla not prolonged 44. Eleusine 



l.Spikelets with only one perfect floret. 



4. Spikelets with one or more modified florets above the perfect one. 



5. Spikes digitate 5 1 . Chloris 



5. Spikes racemose 52. Bouteloua 



4. Spikelets without additional modified florets. 



6. Spikelets falling entire, the rachilla articulated below the glumes. 



7. Spikelets narrow; glumes unequal 50. Sparlina 



7. Spikelets globose; glumes equal 49. Becl(mannia 



6. Spikelets with the rachilla articulated above the glumes, these therefore persistent. 



8. Spikes digitate 46. C'^nodon 



8. Spikes racemose 48. Schedonnardus 



Tribe 7. Phalarideae. — Canary Grass Tribe 



1. First and second lemmas oval. 



2. Glumes nearly equal; lower florets staminate; spikelets brown, o\ossy. . 53. Hierochloe 

 2. Glumes very unequal; lower florets consisting of sterile lemmas.. ..54. Anthoxanthum 



1. First and second lemmas bristle-like 55. Phalaris 



Tribe 8. Oryzeae. — Rice Tribe 



l.Spikelets perfect; stamens 1-3 56. Leersia 



l.Spikelets unisexual; stamens 6 57. Zizania 



Tribe 9. Paniceae. — Millet Tribe 



l.Spikelets with an involucre of bristles or spine-bearing valves. 

 2. Spikelets subtended by bristles; inflorescence a dense, spike-like panicle.. ..63. Selaria 



2. Spikelets in a spiny involucre 64. Cenchrus 



L Spikelets not involucrate. 



3. Glumes awned or awn-pointed 62. Echinochloa 



3. Glumes not awned. 



4. Glumes 2 60. Paspalum 



4. Glumes 3. 



5. Spikelets in slender, I -sided racemes 58. Digiiaria 



5. Spikelets in panicles. 



6. Margins of lemma hyaline, flat; ligule a scale 59. Lepioloma 



6. Margins of lemma not hyaline, more or less inrolled; ligule of hairs 



6 1 . Panicum 




50 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



Tribe 10. Andropogoneae. — Sorghum Tribe 



1. Spikelefs In slender racemes, these single or 2 or 3 together, not panicled 



65. Andropogon 



l.Spikelets in open or contracted panicles. 



2. Panicle densely woolly; spikelets all perfect 66. Erianlhiis 



2. Panicle not woolly. 



3. Pedicelled spikelets staminate or neutral; panicle open; awns deciduous 



67. Sorghum 



3. Pedicelled spikelets reduced to a hairy pedicel; panicle narrow; awns persistent 

 68. Sorghastrum 



Tribe 11. Tripsaceae. — Corn Tribe 



1. Pistillate and staminate spikelets in different parts of the same inflorescence, the pis- 

 tillate below 69. Tripsaciim 



1. Pistillate spikelets in thick, axillary, solitary spikes ("cobs"); staminate spikelets in 

 terminal paniculate spikes, forming the "tassel" 70. Zea 



1. Arundinaria Michx. — Cane 



A. gigantea (Walt.) Chapm. River banks and swamps, s. III., forming 

 "cane-brakes." \_A. macros perma Michx.} 



2. Bromus L. — Brome Grass 

 1. Plants perennial. 



2. Spikelets awnless or nearly so, 2-3.5 cm. long, nearly terete; panicle erect, 

 10-20 cm. long, the branches spreading; plants with rhizomes; fields and 



roadsides, introd. from Eur. May-June. Hungarian Brome Grass 



..B. inemiis Leyss. 



2. Spikelets conspicuously awned; native species. 



3. Lemmas pubescent on the margins and sometimes near the base, other- 

 wise glabrous; second glume 3-nerved; first glume 1-nerved; hillsides 



and open woods. June-Aug B. ciliatus L. 



3. Lemmas evenly pubescent. 



4. Panicle 10-30 cm. long; second glume 3-nerved; first glunie 1-nerved. 



5. Sheaths (except the lower one or two) shorter than the internodes; 



blades scarcely auriculate at base; meadows, woods, and banks. 



June-Aug. Canada Brome B. purgans L. 



5. Sheaths longer than the internodes; blades somewhat auriculate at 

 base; meadows and open woods, not cominon; known from Jo 

 Daviess, Kane, Stark, and Wabash counties. July-Sept. \B. alt'is- 



simus sensu Pursh, non Gilib.; B. incanus (Shear) Hitchc] 



B. latigliimis (Shear) Hitchc. 



4. Panicle 7-10 cm. long; second glume 5-7-nerved; first glume 3- 



nerved; dry ground. June-July B. kalmii Gray 



1. Plants annual; weedy species, adventive from Europe. 



6. Lemmas awnless or nearly so, scnrious-margined, glabrous or scaberulous, 

 nearly as broad as long; .spikelets broadly oval, 1.5-2.5 cm. long; fields 



and waste places; introd. from Eur. June-July 



B. hrizaejorniis F. & M. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 22. Gramineae 51 



6. Lemmas awned, much longer than broad. 



7. First glume 3-nerved; second glume 5-7-nerved; lemmas broad, obtuse. 

 8. Panicle open, the branches ascending or drooping. 



9. Sheaths glabrous; awns shorter than the lemmas; fields and waste 



places; introd. from Eur. May-July. Cheat B. secalinus L. 



9. Sheaths retrosely pilose. 



10. Awns straight, 7-9 mm. long; fields and waste places; adv. 



from Eur. May-July B. commutatus Schrad. 



10. Awns flexuose, divergent at maturity, 9-12 mm. long; waste 



places; adv. from Eur. May-July B. japonicus Thunb. 



8. Panicle small, dense, erect or nearly so, 5-10 cm. long; sheaths 

 pubescent. 

 1 1 . Lemmas glabrous, 7 mm. long; roadsides and waste places; adv. 



from Eur. June-Aug B. racemosus L. 



11. Lemmas pubescent, 9-10 mm. long; roadsides, waste places, and 

 fields, common; adv. from Eur. May-July. [5. hordeaceus 



sensu auth., non L.} B. mollis L. 



7. First glume 1 -nerved; second glume 3-nerved; sheaths pubescent; awns 

 longer than the acuminate lemmas. 

 12. Awns 10-17 mm. long; lemmas pubescent; panicle dense; roadsides 



and fields; adv. from Eur. May-July B. tectorum L. 



12. Awns 2-3 cm. long; lemmas scabrous; panicle loose; waste places; 



adv. from Eur. May-July. [5. villosiis Forsk., not Scop.} 



B. sterilis L. 



3. Festuca L. — Fescue Grass 



1. Lemmas awnless or merely mucronate; leaves flat, 3-7 mm. wide. 

 2. Panicle narrow, erect; lemma 5-7 mm. long; meadows, roadsides, and 

 waste places; nat. from Eur. June-July. Meadow Fescue ...F. elatior L. 

 2. Panicle open; lemmas 4-5 mm. long. 



3. Panicle-branches elongate, slender, spreading, spikelet-bearing toward 

 the ends or above the middle; woods, local. May-July. Nodding 



Fescue. [F. nutans Spreng., not Moench} F. obtusa Spreng. 



3. Panicle more compact, the few shorter branches spikelet-bearing from 

 near the middle, the spikelets somewhat aggregate; woods, rather rare. 



June. [F. shortti Kunth] F. paradoxa Desv. 



1. Awn of lemma 1-7 mm. long; leaves involute, not more than 1 mm. wide. 

 4. Perennial, tufted; spikelets 4-5-f lowered; stamens 3; fields and waste places; 



nat. from Eur. May-June. Sheep Fescue F. ovina L. 



4. Annual, not tufted; spikelets 5-13-flowered; stamen 1; sandy soil. May- 

 June. Slender Fescue, [f . tenella Willd.J F. octoflora Walt. 



4. Glyceria R. Br. — Manna Grass 

 {Panicularia Heist.) 



1. Spikelets linear, nearly terete, 1-2 cm. long; panicles narrow, erect. 



2. Spikelets 1-1.5 cm. long, distinctly pedicelled; in shallow water, or at the 



edges of streams or ponds, n. half, of 111., not common 



G. borealis (Nash) Batch. 




52 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



2. Spikelets 1.5-2 cm. long, subsessile; in shallow water or wet soil. May- 



Aug. [G. fluitans of auth., not R. Br.} G. septentrionalis Hitchc. 



1. Spikelets ovate, more or less compressed, not more than 6 mm. long; panicles 

 usually nodding. 



3. Lemmas broadly ovate, obscurely nerved; spikelets 3-4 mm. wide; wet 



ground in the n. part of the state. June-July 



G. canadensis (Michx.) Trin. 



3. Lemmas elliptical, the nerves prominent; spikelets 1-2.5 mm. wide. 



4. Spikelets 4-6 mm. long; wet ground, rare. Jo Daviess Co 



G. grandis S. Wats. 



4. Spikelets 2-3 mm. long; wet ground, common, June- July. [G. nervata 

 (Willd.) Trin.] G. striata (Lam.) Hitchc. 



5. PoA L. — Blue Grass. Meadow Grass 



1. Perennials; stems (20-) 30-140 cm. tall. 

 2. Plants with conspicuous horizontal rhizom'es. 



3. Stems terete, 30-120 cm. tall; leaves bright green; panicle open, 5-20 

 cm. long, the ascending or spreadina branches in whorls of 3-5; lem- 

 mas 3 mm. long, copiously webbed at base; roadsides, lawns, fields 



and woods, very common. May-June. Kentucky Blue Grass 



P. pratensis L. 



3. Stems compressed above, 20-40 cm. tall; leaves bluish green; panicle 



narrow, 3-8 cm. long; lemmas 2-2.5 mm. long, scarcely webbed; road- 

 sides, cultivated ground, waste places, common; nat. from Eurasia. 



June-July. Canada Blue Grass P. compressa L. 



2. Plants without horizontal rhizomes. 



4. Lemmas glabrous, except the webbed base; damp woods, rare, n. 111. 



June-Aug. [P. debilis Torr., not Thuill.} P. langiiida Hitchc. 



4. Lemmas puberulent or pubescent, at least on the keel. 

 5. Lemmas webbed, i.e., with a tuft of soft hairs at base. 



6. Marginal nerves of the lemmas glabrous; woods and thickets, rare. 

 May-June P. alsodcs Gray 



6. Marginal nerves of the lemmas pubescent. 

 7. Intermediate nerves of the lemmas obscure. 



8. Panicle 5-10 cm. long, the lower branches mostly in pairs; wet 

 ground, rare P. paludigena Fern. & Wieg. 



8. Panicle 10-30 cm. long, the lower branches mostly fascicled; 



damp meadows. July-Aug. [P. triflora Gilib.} 



P. palustris L. 



7. Intermediate nerves of the lemmas prominent. 



9. Branches of the panicle spikelet-bearing from the middle; 



spikelets 3-4 mm. long; woods and thickets. May-July 



P. sylvestris Gray 



9. Branches of the panicle spikelet-bearing only near the ends; 

 spikelets 5-6 mm. long; meadows, rare, w. III. Discovered 

 at Canton by J. Wolf in 1882 ....P. nolfii Scribn. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 22. Gramineae 53 



5. Lemmas not webbed; nerves of the lemma pubescent; spikelets 6-8 



mm. long; moist woods, rare P. autumnalis Muhl. 



l.Low tufted annuals; stems 5-25 cm. tall. 



10. Lemmas distinctly 3 -nerved, the other nerves obscure; lemmas webbed at 



the base; anthers 0.2-0.3 mm. long; dry ground. May-Aug 



P. chctpmaniana Scribn. 



10. Lemmas 5-nerved, not webbed at the base; anthers 0.7-1 mm. long; 

 common in waste places, lawns, cultivated ground; nat. from Eurasia. 

 May-Oct P. annua L. 



6. Briza L. — Quaking Grass 

 B. maxima L. Fields and waste places, occasional; adv. from Eurasia. 



7. Eragrostis Host 



1. Stems creeping, rooting at the nodes, the flowering branches erect; plants 

 annual. 



2. Lemmas 1.5-2 mm. long; anthers 0.2-0.3 mm. long; flowers perfect; sandy, 

 gravelly, or muddy shores. July-Oct E. hypnoides (Lam.) BSP. 



2. Lemmas 3-4 mm. long; anthers 1.5-2 mm. long; plants dioecious; sandy 



soil, not common E. reptans (Michx.) Nees 



1. Stems erect or ascending, not rooting at the nodes. 



3. Spikelets 2-7- flowered, 2-4 mm. long. 



4. Panicle about as long as wide, the branches elongated, capillary; plants 



branched at the base; dry ground in open woods. July-Sept 



E. capillaris (L.) Nees 



4. Panicle much longer than broad, the branches short; plants branched 



from above the base; sandy soil and roadsides. Aug. -Oct 



E. jrankn C. A. Mey. 



3. Spikelets 5-35-flowered, 3-15 mm. long. 



5. Plants perennial, erect, 30-120 cm. tall. 



6. Panicle-branches spreading at maturity; spikelets 6-12-flowered; lem- 

 mas 1.5-2 mm. long; sandy soil. July-Oct. [£. pectinacea of auth., 

 not (Michx.) Nees} E. spectabilis (Pursh) Steud. 



6. Panicle-branches erect or ascending; spikelets 4-6-flowered; lemmas 



2.5-3 mm. long; sandy soil, chiefly in centr. and w. 111. [£. pilifera 



Scheele] E. trichodes (Nutt.) Wood 



5. Plants annual, usually 10-50 cm. tall, decumbent at base. 



7. Keels of glumes and lemmas with minute glands; spikelets 8-35- 



flowered. 

 8. Spikelets 2.5-3 mm. wide; waste places and cult, ground; nat. from 



Eur. Stink Grass. June-Sept. \_E. megastachya Link} 



E. cilianensis (All.) Link 



8. Spikelets 1.5-2 mm. wide; waste places and cult, ground; nat. from 

 Eur. [£. minor Host} E. poaeoides (L.) Beauv. 




54 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



7. Keels of glumes and lemmas glandless, scaberulous; spikelets usually 

 3-9-flowered, 1-1.5 mm. wide; fields, waste places, roadsides, and 

 cult, ground, common. July-Sept. [£. purshii Schrad.; E. pilosa of 

 auth., not (L.) B'eauv.} E. pectinacea (Michx.) Nees 



8. DiARRHENA Beauv. 



D. americana Beauv. Woods, locally throughout III. June-Sept. [Diarina 

 festucoides Raf.; Korycarpus cirundtnaceus Zea ex Lag.; Diarrhena diandra 

 (Michx.) Wood; Diarrhena festucoides sensu Fern., non Raspail}. 



9. Uniola L. 

 U. latifolia Michx. Open woods in s. and centr. III. June-Oct. 



10. Dactylis L. 



D. glomerata L. Orchard Grass. Fields and roadsides, very common; nat. 

 from Eur. May- June. 



11. PhraGMITES Trin. 



P. communis Trin. Common Reed. Wet ground, n. and centr. 111. Aug- 

 Sept. 



12. Melica L. 



1 . Glumes nearly equal and almost as long as the 2-flowered spikelet; leaves 



glabrous above, pubescent beneath; open woods. May-June 



M. miitica Walt. 



1. Glumes unequal, shorter than the usually 3-flowered spikelet; leaves pubes- 

 cent above and glabrous or scabrous beneath; rocky woods, more common 

 than the preceding species. May-June M. nttens Nutt. 



13. Triodia R. Br. 



{Tridens R. & S.) 



T. flava (L.) Smyth. Purpletop. Sandy soil and open woods in centr. and 

 s. 111., and extending northw. to Peoria and Kankakee counties. July-Sept. 



14. Triplasis Beauv. — Sand Grass 

 T. purpurea (Walt.) Chapm. Dry sand, centr, and n. III. Aug.-Sept. 



15. Agropyron Gaertn. — Wheat Grass 



1. Lemmas villous; plants with rhizomes; sandy shores of L. Michigan. July- 



Aug A. dasystachyum (Hook.) Scribn. 



1. Lemmas glabrous or merely scabrous. 



2. Plants tufted, not stoloniferous; horizontal rhizomes absent; glumes 

 scabrous on nerves and margins. 

 3. Lemmas awnless or short-awned; spike slender, lax; glumes 10-12 mm. 

 long; dry soil, rare. Cook Co., Agnes Chase; Stark Co., V. H. 



Chase. July-Aug. [/I. tenerum Vasey.} Slender Wheat Grass 



A. pauciflorum (Schw.) Hitchc. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 22. Gramineae 55 



3. Lemmas awned, the awn 1-3 cm. long; spike dense; glumes 7-9 mm. 



long; woods and meadows, rare. Ringwood, Vasey. July- Aug. [/4. 

 caninum sensu auth., non (L.) Beauv.} A. caninoides (Ramaley) 



Beal} A. subsecundum (Link) Hitchc. 



2. Plants stoloniferous, with horizontal rhizomes; glumes smooth, except on 

 the keel. 



4. Leaves glaucous; spikelets 7-13-flowered, L5-2.5 cm. long; along rail- 



roads, adv. from w. U.S. June-July. Bluestem A. stnithii Rydb. 



4. Leaves green; spikelets mostly 4-6-flowered, 1-L5 cm. long; waste 

 ground and fields, common; nat. from Eur. June-July. Quack Grass. 

 A. repens (L.) Beauv. 



16. Triticum L. — Wheat 

 T. aestivum L. Roadsides and fields, occasionally spontaneous 



17. Secale L. — Rye 

 S. cereale L. Occasionally spontaneous in fields and waste ground. 



18. Elymus L. Wild Rye 



1. Lemmas awnless; spike erect, dense, 7-25 cm. long; sand dunes along L. 

 Michigan. Cook Co., Killip in 1916; also Lake Co., G. D. Fuller. June- 

 July. [E, arenarius sensu Am. auth., non L.} Dune Grass 



E. mollis Trin. 



1 . Lemmas awned. 



2. Glumes subulate, obscurely nerved, 12-20 mm. long; spike nodding; 

 woods. June-Aug. \E. strtatus sensu auth., non Willd.} Slender Wild 



Rye E. villosus Muhl. 



2. Glumes lanceolate, 3 to several-nerved. 



3. Awn of lemma straight, about 1 cm. long; spike usually erect; glumes 

 strongly bowed out at base; roadsides and woods, common and 



variable. July-Aug E. virginicus L. 



3. Awn of lemma curved when dry, 2-3 cm. long; spike nodding; glumes 

 not bowed out at base; roadsides and edges of woods, common. July- 

 Aug. Nodding Wild Rye E. canadensis L. 



19. Hystrix Moench 



H. patula Moench. Bottlebrush Grass. Woods, common. June-July. [Hys- 

 trix hystrix (L.) Millsp.} 



20. HoRDEUM L. — Barley 



1. Rachis of spike becoming disjointed. 



2. Spikes nodding, 6-16 cm. long; awns 2-6 cm. long; tufted perennials. 

 3. Blades 2-4 mm. wide; awns 3-6 cm. long; roadsides and fields, common. 



June-Aug. Squirrel-tail Grass H. jubatum L. 



3. Blades 5-8 mm. wide; awns 2-3.5 cm. long; prairies and roadsides, 



chiefly w. 111. June-Aug. H. pammeli Scribn. dC Ball 



H. montanense Beal 




56 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



2. Spilces erect, 2-6. cm. long; awns less than 1.5 cm. long; blades 2-4 mm. 

 wide; plants annual; roadsides and fields. May-June. Small Wild 

 Barley H. pusillum Nutt. 



1. Rachis of spike not disarticulating; blades flat, 5-15 mm. wide; plants an- 

 nual; cult., and sometimes spontaneous; introd. from Eur. Barley 



H. vulgare L. 



21. LoLlUM L. — Rye Grass 

 1. Glume shorter than the spiloelet; plants perennial. 



2. Lemmas awned; spikelets mostly 10-20-f lowered; lawns, roadsides, and 



fields; introd. from Eur. June-Aug. Italian Rye Grass 



L. multiflorum Lam. 



2. Lemmas awnless or short-awned; spikelets mostly 5-10-flowered; meadows, 



lawns, roadsides; native of Eur. June-Aug. English Rye Grass 



L. perenne L. 



1. Glume as long or longer than the spikelet; plants annual; lemmas awned; 

 waste places, introd. from Eur. June-Aug. Darnel L. temulentum L. 



22. KoELERiA Pers. 



K. gracilis Pers. June Grass. Sandy soil, local. June-July. [K. cristata sensu 

 auth., non (L.) Pers.] 



23. Sphenopholis Scribn. — Wedge Grass 



1. Panicle narrow, densely-flowered, spike-like, erect or nearly so; prairies and 



open woods. May-June S. obtusata (Michx.) Scribn. 



1. Panicle lax, nodding, not spike-like, the branches more or less spreading. 

 2. Glumes subequal, the second broadly obovate, obtuse; lemmas obtuse, 



scabrous; woods. May-June S. nitida (Spreng.) Scribn. 



2. Glumes unequal, the first shorter than the narrowly obovate second one; 

 lemmas acute, glabrous; woods, fields, and roadsides. May-June. \S. 

 pallens sensu auth., non (Spreng.) Scribn.} S. intermedia Rydb. 



24. Deschampsia Beauv. — Hair Grass 



D. cespitosa (L.) Beauv. Moist soil along streams in the n. part of the 

 state. June-July. 



25. Avena L. — Oat 



1. Lemmas bearing stiff brownish hairs, at least at base; awn stout, geniculate, 



strongly twisted; spikelets mostly 3-flowered; fields and waste places; nat. 



from Eur. May-July. Wild Oat A. jatua L. 



1. Lemmas glabrous; awn small, usually straight, or absent; spikelets mostly 



2-flowered; commonly cult., occasionally spontaneous. May July. Oat 



A. sativa L. 



26. Arrhenatherum Beauv. 

 A. elatius (L.) Mert. & Koch. Tall Oat Grass. Fields, roadsides, and 

 waste places; nat. from Eur. June-July. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 22. Gramineae 57 



27. Danthonia Lam. &: DC. — Oat Grass 

 D. spicatd (L.) Beauv. Thin soil in open woods. June-July. 



28. HoLCus L. 



{Notholcus Nash) 

 H. lanatus L. Velvet Grass. Roadsides and fields, occasional; nat. from 

 Eur. June-Aug. 



29. Calamagrostis Adans. — Reed Grass 

 1. Panicle narrow but loose, becoming somewhat open; spikelets 3-3.5 mm. long; 



blades flat, 4-8 mm. wide; marshy ground. June-July. Blue-joint Grass 



C. canadensis (Michx.) Beauv. 



1. Panicle contracted, spike-like; spikelets 4-4.5 mm. long; blades involute, sca- 

 brous, 2-4 mm. wide; moist ground, n. III. June-Aug. Northern Reed Grass 

 C. inexpansa Gray 



30. Ammophila Host 



A. breviligulata Fern. Beach Grass. Sand dunes along L. Michigan. July- 

 Aug. [/I. ctrenaria sensu auth., non Link}. 



3L Calamovilfa Hack. 

 C. longifolia (Hook.) Scribn. Sand dunes along L. Michigan. Aug-Sept. 



32. Agrostis L. — Bent Grass 

 L Lemma awned; spikelets L5 mm. long; fields and open woods, s. 111. May- 

 June A. elliott'tana Schult. 



L Lemma awnless; spikelets 2-3 mm. long. 

 2. Palet evident, about half the length of the lemma; plants perennial, 30- 

 120 cm. tall, with strong, horizontal rhizomes; roadsides and fields, 

 very common. June-Aug. \_A. palustris sensu auth., non Huds.] Red- 

 top A. alba L. 



2. Palet lacking or minute. 



3. Panicle very diffuse, 15-60 cm. long, the branches scabrous, 5-15 cm. 

 long, spikelet-bearing near the ends; roadsides and fields. May-July. 



Tickle Grass A. scabra Willd. 



3. Panicle open but not diffuse, 10-20 cm. long, the branches smooth; 



woods. Aug.-Oct. Autumn Bent Grass 



A. perennans (Walt.) Tuckerm. 



33. CiNNA L. 

 1. Spikelets 5 mm. long, the awn 0.5-1 mm. long; panicle rather dense, the 



branches ascending; moist woods and borders of streams. July-Sept 



C. arundinacea L. 



1. Spikelets 3-4 mm. long, the awn 1-2 mm. long; panicle loose, the branches 



spreading or drooping; moist woods, n. III. July-Sept 



C. latifolia (Trev.) Griseb. 



34. Alopecurus L. — Foxtail 

 1. Spikelets 5-6 mm, long; plants perennial; fields and meadows; nat. from 

 Eur. June-July. Meadow Foxtail A. pratensis L. 




58 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



l.Spikelets 2-3 mm. long. 

 2. Awns scarcely exceeding the glumes; shallow water and wet banks. May- 

 July. [A. aristulatus Michx.] A. aequalis Sobol 



2. Awn bent, exserted from the spikelet 2 mm. or more. 



3. Plants perennial; stems decumbent and rooting at the nodes; anthers 



1.5 mm. long; in water and wet ground. June-July. Water Foxtail 



A. geniculatus L. 



3. Plants annual; stems tufted, branched at the base; anthers 0.5 mm. 



long; ditches and fields. [A. ramosus Poir.} ....A. carolinianus Walt. 



35. Phleum L. 



P. pratense L. Timothy. Roadsides and fields, very common; nat. from 

 Eur. June- July. 



36. Muhlenbergia Schreb. 



1. Panicles narrow, not diffuse or spreading. 



2. First glume obsolete or nearly so, the second minute, truncate; lemma 



long-awned; fields and dry woods. July-Oct. Nimble Will 



M. schreberi J. F. Gmel. 



2. Glumes at least half the length of the lemma, or longer. 

 3. Plants with conspicuous scaly rhizomes. 



4. Lemma awnless or nearly so; anthers 0.5-1 mm. long. 



5. Glumes lanceolate or oval, cuspidate, about half or two-thirds the 



length of the lemma; rocky woods. July-Oct 



M. sobolifera (Muhl.) Trin. 



5. Glumes subulate. 



6. Glumes equalling the lemma, or somewhat shorter, awnless or 

 short-awned. 

 7. Intemodes of the stem glabrous. 



8. Panicles shortly exserted or partly included in the sheath; 



fields, roadsides, waste places, common. Aug.-Sept 



M. mexkana (L.) Trin. 



8. Panicles usually well exserted; woods. Aug.-Oct 



M. brachyphylla Bush 



7. Internodes of the stem puberulent. 



9. Lemma short-pilose at base (on the callus) ; moist woods 



and thickets. Aug.-Oct M. foliosa (R. & S.) Trin. 



9. Lemma not pilose at base; woods, chiefly in the s. and 



centr. parts of the state M. glabriflora Scribn. 



6. Glumes much longer than the lemma, owned; panicle dense, 



somewhat interrupted; wet ground. Aug.-Sept 



M. racemusa (Michx.) BSP. 



4. Lemma long-awned. 



10. Spikelets 3-4 mm. long; glumes lanceolate, awn-pointed, shorter 

 than the lemma; anthers 1-1.5 mm. long; rocky woods. July- 

 Oct M. tcnuiflora (Willd.) BSP. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 22. Gramineae 59 



10. Spikelets 2-2.5 mm. long; glumes subulate-lanceolate, somewhat 

 shorter than or nearly equalling the lemma; anthers 0.3-0.6 

 mm. long; moist woods. Aug.-Oct. [M. torreyi (Kunth) 



Hitchc; M. umbrosa Scribn.] M. sylvatica Torr. 



3. Plants without scaly rhizomes; glumes lanceolate, shorter than the awn- 

 less lemma; anthers 1-1.5 mm. long; dry ground, n. 111. July-Sept. 



[Sporobolus brevifolms (Nutt.) Scribn.] 



M. cusptdata (Torr.) Rydb. 



1. Panicles open, the slender branches widely spreading. 



11. Spikelets 3-4 mm. long, the awns 1-2 cm. long; stems 60-100 cm. tall, 



tufted; rhizomes none; sandy soil, s. 111. Sept.-Oct 



M. capillarts (Lam.) Trin. 



11. Spikelets 1.5-2 mm. long, awnless; stems 10-40 cm. tall; plants with 

 creeping scaly rhizomes; sandy soil. June-Sept. [Sporobolus asperi- 

 folius Nees & Mey.} M. asperifolia (Nees &: Mey.) Parodi 



37. Sporobolus R. Br. — Dropseed 

 1. Plants perennial; leaf -blades much longer than the sheaths. 



2. Spikelets 1.5-2.5 mm. long; panicle either free and spreading at matur- 

 ity or remaining partly or wholly included in the sheath; leaf-sheaths 

 with a conspicuous tuft of whitish hairs at summit; sandy soil. Aug.- 



Sept S. cryptandrus (Torr.) Gray 



2. Spikelets 4-8 mm. long. 



3. Second glume shorter than the lemma; panicle contracted, more or less 

 included in the sheath. 

 4. Lemma glabrous, glossy; spikelets 5-6 mm. long; dry sandy soil. 



Sept.-Oct S. asper (Michx.) Kunth 



4. Lemma pubescent at base; spikelets 6-8 mm. long; sandy soil, s. 111. 



Aug. -Sept. [S. canovirens Nash} 



S. clandestinus (Spreng.) Hitchc. 



3. Second glume about as long as the glabrous lemma; spikelets 4-6 mm. 



long; panicle long-exserted at maturity; dry soil. Aug.-Sept 



S. heterolepis Gray 



1. Plants annual; sheaths enclosing the lateral panicles; leaf-blades short, scarce- 

 ly longer than the sheaths. 

 5. Lemma pubescent; spikelets 3.5-6 mm. long; dry sandy soil. Sept.-Oct. 



S. ragiiiiflorus (Torr.) Wood 



5. Lemma glabrous; spikelets 2-3 mm. long; dry sandy soil. Sept.-Oct. 



S. neglectus Nash 



38. Heleochloa Host 

 H. schoenoides (L.) Host. Waste places, occasional; introd. from Eur. 



39. Brachyelytrum Beauv. 

 B. erectum (Schreb.) Beauv. Woods. June- Aug. 



40. Milium L.— Wild Millet 



M. effusujn L. Moist woods. Kane Co., Vasey; Tazewell Co., Brendel. 

 May-July. 




60 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



41. Oryzopsis Michx. — Rice Grass 



1. Leaves narrow, involute; spikelets (excluding the awns) 3-4 mm. long; dry 

 soil, rare O. pungens (Torr.) Hitchc. 



1. Leaves flat, 4-15 mm. wide; spikel'ets (excluding the awns) 6-8 mm. long. 

 2. Leaves scattered along the stem, the upper surface pubescent; panicle 



15-30 cm. long; rocky woods, not common. Aug.-Sept 



- O. racemosa (Sm.) Ricker 



2. Leaves mostly basal, merely scabrous above; panicle 5-8 cm. long. Cook 

 Co., Shtpman in 1877 0. asperifolia Michx. 



42. Stipa L. 



S. spartea Trin. Porcupine Grass. Sandy soil, locally throughout 111., except 

 the s. counties. May-June. 



43. Aristida L. — Three-awned Grass 

 1. Awns jointed to the lemma. 



2. Awns united in a spiral column 6-15 mm. or more in length; sandy soil. 

 Aug.-Sept A. tuberculosa Nutt. 



2. Awn-column about 2 mm. long; sandy soil, not common. Mason Co., 



Behb in 1861 A. desmaiitba Trin. & Rupr. 



1. Awns distinct, not jointed to the lemma. 



3. Central awn much longer than the lateral awns, these erect. 

 4. Central awn spirally coiled at base. 



5. Second glume 7-9 mm. long, equalling or slightly longer than the 



first; roadsides and fields in centr. and s. 111. Aug. -Oct 



A. dichotoma Michx. 



5. Second glume 10-15 mm. long, much longer than the first. 



6. Lateral awns 1-2 mm. long, straight, erect; dry ground, not com- 

 mon. Sept. -Oct A. curtissii (Gray) Nash 



6. Lateral awns 2-7 mm. long, spreading; dry ground, n.w. Ill 



A. basiramea Engelm. 



4. Central awn not coiled. 



7. Lemma 4-5 mm. long; fields and roadsides, chiefly in the s. and w. 

 parts of the state. [A. gracilis Ell.} A. longespica Poir. 



7. Lemma 2-3 cm. long; fields and roadsides, in the s. half of the state. 

 Aug.-Sept. A. ramosissivia Engelm. 



3. Central awn subequal in length with the lateral ones. 



8. Glumes 8-11 mm. long; awns not over 2.5 cm. long; sandy soil. Aug.- 

 Sept A . purpurascens Poir. 



8. Glumes 2-3 cm. long; awns 4-7 cm. long; fields, open woods, and 

 roadsides. Aug.-Oct A. oligaiitha Michx. 



44. Eleusine Gaertn. 



E. indica (L.) Gaertn. Goose Grass, Waste places, roadsides, and culti- 

 vated ground; nat. from Eurasia. July-Oct. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 22. Gramineae 61 



45. Dactyloctenium Willd. 

 D. aegypticum (L.) Riclit. Crowfoot Grass. Waste ground and fields, not 

 common; nat. from the Old World tropics. 



46. Cynodon Rich. 



(Capriola Adans.) 

 C. dactylon (L.) Pers. Bermuda Grass. Fields, roadsides, and waste places; 

 nat. from Eur. July-Aug. 



47. Leptochloa Beauv. — Sprangie-top Grass 

 1. Sheaths pubescent; spikelets 1.5-2 mm. long; sandy soil, s. 111. Aug.-Sept. 



L. filijormis (Lam.) Beauv. 



1. Sheaths glabrous; spikelets 6-10 mm. long; wet meadows and along ditches, 



s. Ill L. fascicularis (Lam.) Gray 



48. Schedonnardus Steud. 

 S. paniculatus (Nutt.) Trel. Hancock Co., Mead in 1845; probably now 

 extinct in 111. "It was found on the original prairie, especially around salt 

 licks." — Mosher. 



49. Beckmannia Host — Slough Grass 



B. syzigachne (Steud.) Fern. Wet ground, rare; n.e. 111. "Clyde, III., fre- 

 quent, Umbach; the only station of this interesting grass." — Pepoon. [B. 

 erucaeformis sensu auth., non Host]. 



50. Spartina Schreb. — Cord Grass 



S. pectinata Link. Along ditches, moist ground along roads, in marshes, 

 etc. July-Sept. \_S. michauxiana Hitchc.} 



51. Chloris Sw. 



C. verticiUata Nutt. Windmill Grass. Sandy soil, or along roads, occa- 

 sional; adv. from w. of the Mississippi R. June-July. 



52. BouTELOUA Lag. — Grama Grass 



1. Spikes 1-4, usually curved, of 25 or more densely crowded spikelets. 

 2. Rachis of spike projecting beyond the uppermost spikelet in a prominent 

 point; keel of the second glume papillose-hispid; prairie soil, w. and 



n.w. 111. July-Sept B. hirsiita Lag. 



2. Rachis not projecting; keel of second glume g'abrous or with few hairs, 



these without papillose bases. Jo Daviess Co., Pepoon 173 



B. gracilis (HBK.) Lag. 



1. Spikes numerous (12 or more), each with 4-12 spikelets; prairie soil in the 

 n. half of 111. July-Sept B. curtipendula (Michx.) Torr. 



53. HiEROCHLOE R. Br. 

 {Savaslana Schrank; Torresia Ruiz & Pav.) 

 H. odorata (L.) Beauv. Sweet Grass. Moist meadows, fields, and road- 

 sides, n.e. III. May-June. 




62 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



54. Anthoxanthum L. 



A. odoratum L. Sweet Vernal Grass. Meadows, roadsides, waste places; 

 nat. from Eurasia. May-July. 



55. Phalaris L. — Canary Grass 

 1. Panicle 8-15 cm. long; spikelets 5-6 mm. long, the glumes not winged; 



marshes and wet meadows. May-July. Reed Canary Grass 



- P. arnndinacea L. 



1. Panicle ovoid, 1-4 cm. long; spikelets 6-8 mm. long; the glum'es winged; 



roadsides and waste places; nat. from Eur. June-July. Canary Grass 



P. canariensis L. 



56. Leersia Sw. 



(^Homalocenchnis Mieg.) 

 1. Spikelets broadly oval, densely imbricate, 3-4 mm. wide; stem terete; moist 



ground. Aug.-Oct. Catchfly Grass L. lenticularis Michx. 



1. Spikelets elliptical, 1-2 mm. wide. 



2. Spikelets 3-3.5 mm. long; stamens 1 or 2; leaves nearly smooth; stem 



compressed; moist woods. July-Sept. White Grass. ...L. virginica Willd. 



2. Spikelets 4-4.5 mm. long; stamens 3; leaves very rough; stem terete; wet 



ground. Aug. -Sept. Cut Grass L. oryzoides (L.) Sw. 



57. ZiZANiA L.— Wild Rice 

 1. Blades 4-10 mm. wide; body of the pistillate lemma 10-17 mm. long; usually 



in shallow water, July-Sept. [Z.. palustris sensu auth., non L.] 



Z.- aquatica L. 



1. Blades 1-5 cm. wide; body of the pistillate lemma 2-3 cm. long; shallow 



water. July-Sept Z.- interior (Fassett) Rydb. 



58. DlGlTARiA Heist. 

 (Svnlherisma Walt.) 

 1. Rachis of the racemes wingless; spikelets 1.5-1.8 mm. long; lower sheaths 

 pilose, the upper ones glabrous; stems usually erect; sandy soil. Aug.-Sept. 



D. flijormii (L.) Koel. 



1. Rachis winged; stems spreading, often rooting at the lower nodes. 



2. Sheaths glabrous; pedicels terete or nearly so; spikelets 2 mm. long; fields, 

 meadows, waste ground, roadsides, common; nat. from Eurasia. 



Smooth Crab Grass \^Syntherisma linearis (Krock) Nash] 



D. ischaemum (Schreb.) Muhl. 



2. Sheaths pilose; pedicels 3-angled, scabrous; spikelets 3-3.5 mm. long; 

 a common weed in cult, ground and waste places; nat. from Eur. July- 

 Oct. Common Crab Grass D. sangiiinalis (L.) Scop. 



59. Leptoloma Chase 

 L. cognatum (Schult.) Chase. Sandy soil. July-Sept. 



60. Paspalum L. 



1. Rachis of the spikes dilated, thin, more than 2 mm. broad, with membran- 

 ous margins. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 22. Gramineae 63 



2. Spikelets pubescent, 1-1.5 mm. long; blades 6-15 mm. wide; muddy banks 

 or in shallow water, s. and w. 111. Aug.-Oct. [P. re pens Berg.; P. mu- 

 cronatum Muhl.} P. fliiitans (Eli.) Kunth 



2. Spikelets glabrous, 2 mjn. long; blades 2-5 mm. wide; in ditches or along 



muddy or sandy shores, s. Ill P. dissectum L. 



1. Rachis narrow, less than 2 mm. broad; spikelets glabrous. 



3. Spikelets not more than 2 mm. long; plant often with 1 — several a.xillary 



peduncles from the upper sheath. 

 4. Spikelets orbicular; blades sparsely pilose and ciliate; sandy soil, road- 

 sides, etc. July-Sept P. stramineum Nash 



4. Spikelets oval or somewhat obovate; blades softly pubescent on both 



surfaces; moist sandy soil, throughout 111., except the n. part. July- 

 Sept. [P. rnuhlenbergii Nash] P. pubescens Muhl. 



3. Spikelets 2.8-3 mm. long; plant simple, without axillary peduncles from 

 the upper sheath. 



5. Spikelets orbicular, arranged singly in 2 rows; wet ground, chiefly in 



the s. half of the state. July-Sept P. circulare Nash 



5. Spikelets oval or slightly obovate, borne in pairs and appearing as if in 

 3 or 4 rows; ditches, rare, s. 111. Aug.-Sept. [P. pubiflorum var. 

 glabnim Vasey; P. laeviglume Scribn.} P. geminiim Nash 



61. Panicum L. 

 1. Spikelets glabrous. 



2. Spikelets 3 mm. or more in length. 



3. Plants glabrous, perennial, with rhizomes; panicle 15-50 cm. long; 

 spikelets 4-4.5 mm. long-pedicelled; roadsides and fields, common. 

 July-Sept. Switch Grass P. virgatum L. 



3. Plants pubescent. 



4. Spikelets 4-5 mm. long; panicles often drooping at maturity; waste 

 places; cult, and occasionally spontaneous; native of the Old 

 World. Broomcom Millet P. miliaceum L. 



4. Spikelets 3-3.8 mm. long, lanceoloid, pointed; panicles erect. 



5. Plants annual; panicles 10-30 cm. long; blades 2-5 mm. wide; 

 sandy soil, common. July-Oct P. flexile (Gatt.) Scribn. 



5. Plants perennial. 



6. Panicle loose, open, 20-50 cm. long; blades 6-10 mm. wide; 

 plants with long scaly rhizomes; along ditches, or in moist 

 soil, or woods, in the s. and w. parts of 111., extending northw. 



to Peoria and Henderson counties. July-Sept 



P. anceps Michx. 



6. Panicle 4-8 cm. long, not much exceeding the leaves, few- 

 flowered; blades 2-5 mm. wide; open woods. May-June 



P. depauperatum Muhl. 



2. Spikelets less than 3 mm. long. 

 7. Sheaths glabrous. 



8. First glume not m.ore than one fourth the length of the spikelets, 




64 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



rounded at the apex; plants annual, mostly glabrous; spikelets 



2.5 mm. long; fields and waste places, common. Aug. -Oct 



P. dichotomiflorum L. 



8. First glume more than one fourth the length of the spikelet; plants 



perennial. 



9. Spikelets 1.5-1.6 mm. long; blades 10-12 cm. long, 8-15 mm. 

 wide, ciliate at base, otherwise glabrous; panicle 8-12 cm. long; 

 stem-nodes densely bearded with reflexed hairs; wet ground, 

 local. June-Aug P. microcarpon Muhl. 



9. Spikelets 2-2.5 mm. long. 



10. Pedicels about half the length of the spikelets; panicles 10-30 

 cm. long, the spikelets subsecund; plants in dense turfts; 



moist ground. July-Oct. Munro Grass 



P. agrostoides Spreng. 



10. Pedicels longer than the spikelets, which are not at all secund; 

 panicles 4-12 cm. long. 



11. Sheaths bearing pale glandular spots, the margins gla- 

 brous; blades 8-11 mm. wide; spikelets 2.3-2.5 mm. 

 long, pointed; moist woods and thickets, s. 111. June- 

 July P. yadhnense Ashe 



11. Sheaths not spotted, the margins pubescent; blades 4-8 

 mm. wide; spikelets 2 mm. long, not pointed; open 

 woods, more common in s. 111., but extending nortbw. 



to Peoria Co. May-July. [P. barbulatum Michx.} 



P. dichotomum L. 



7. Sheaths pubescent. 



12. Spikelets lanceoloid, acuminate; panicle diffuse, often half the length 

 of the plant; sheaths copiously villous. 

 13. Spikelets 2-2.5 mm. long; fields, roadsides, and waste places, 

 common. July-Oct. Witch Grass P. capillare L. 



13. Spikelets 2.5-3 (-3.3) mm. long; moist sandy soil, occasional; w. 



111. July-Sept P. harbipulvinatuin Nash 



12. Spikelets elliptical, obtuse, 1.3-2.2 mm. long. 



14. Panicles 12-20 cm. wide, delicate, relatively few-flowered; blades 

 2-6 mm. wide, villous on both sides; roadsides and waste 



places. July-Oct. [P. tuckermani Fern.} 



P. philadelphicum Bernh. 



14. Panicles narrower; blades about 1 cm. wide, nearly or quite gla- 

 brous; plants much branched, with many axillary panicles; 

 moist sandy soil, along roads, in fields, or along streams, s. and 



centr. III., extending northw. to Henry Co. Sept. -Oct 



P. gattingeri Nash 



!. Spikelets pubescent or puberulent (occasionally only sparsely so). 



15. Spikelets 3 mm. or more in length; sheaths more or less pubescent or 

 ciliate. 

 16. Blades 1.5-4 cm. wide, ciliate, otherwise glabrous or nearly so. 



17. Spikelets 3.4-3.8 mm. long; nodes glabrous or puberulent; rocky 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 22. Gramineae 65 



or sandy woods. May-Aug P. latifolium L. 



17. Spikelets 4-4.5 mm. long; nodes retrorsely bearded; woods 



throughout III., except the n.e. counties. May-July 



P. boscii Poir. 



16. Blades 6-13 mm. wide; spikelets 3-4 mm. long. 



18. Sheaths with somewhat appressed or ascending hairs; spikelets 



3.5-4 mm. long, sparsely pubescent to nearly glabrous; blades 

 glabrous or n'early so above, puberulent beneath; sandy soil. 

 May-June P. oltgosanthes Schult. 



18. Sheaths with spreading hairs, or nearly glabrous. 



19. Spikelets 3-3.5 mm. long, sparsely pubescent to nearly 

 glabrous; blades glabrous or nearly so; sandy soil. May- 

 July P. scribiierianum Nash 



19. Spikelets 3.5-4 mm. long, papillose-pilos-e; blades mere or 

 less papillose-hirsute on both surfaces, or glabrous above; 



dry sandy soil. June-July P. leibergii (Vasey) Scribn. 



15. Spikelets less than 3 mm. long. 



20. Sheaths glabrous or nearly so, or merely ciliate. 

 21. Spikelets 2.1-2.9 mm. long. 



22. Blades 12-25 mm. wide, cordate at base; spikelets short-pubes- 

 cent, 2.7-2.9 mm. long; woods, s. III. May-June 



P. commutatiim Schult. 



22. Blades 2-4 mm. wide, not cordate; spikelets sparsely pilose to 



nearly glabrous, 2.1-2 A mm. long; wooded slopes and 

 ridges, rare. Starved Rock, G. N. Jones 15728. Perhaps 



merely a glabrous form of P. linearifolium Scribn 



P. werneri Scribn. 



21. Spikelets 1.3-1.9 mm. long, puberulent or nearly glabrous. 



23. Blades usually 1.5-2.5 cm. wide, ciliate toward the base, other- 



wise glabrous; nodes glabrous or nearly so; panicle 8-25 cm. 

 long, not more than half as wide as long; moist ground, 



chiefly in s. 111., but extending northw. to Peoria Co 



P. polyanthss Schult. 



23. Blades usually 6-14 mm. wide; panicle often about as wide as 

 long. 

 24. Ligule of conspicuous hairs 3-5 mm. long; sandy soil in 

 open woods. June-Sept P. lindheimeri Nash 



24. Ligule obsolete or nearly so; sandy soil, in the s. half of 

 III. June-July P. sphaerocarpon Ell. 



20. Sheaths pubescent. 



25. Sheaths conspicuously retrorsely pilose; blades 3-7 mm. wide; 

 panicle lax, few-flowered, 5-10 cm. long; spikelets 1.9-2 mm. 

 long; wooded slopes, throughout III., except the n. counties. 

 May-July P. xalapense HBK. 



25. Sheaths not retrorsely pilose. 

 26. Spikelets 2.7-3 mm. long. 




66 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



27. Blades 12-30 mm. wide; stems 50-120 cm. tall; panicle 7- 

 15 cm. long; sandy soil. June-Aug P. eland estiniim L. 



27. Blades 2-6 mm. wide; stems 8-40 cm. tall; panicles 2-8 cm. 

 long. 



28. Blades copiously pilose on both surfaces; panicles 2-4 



cm. long; dry ground, n.w. 111., not common 



P. wilcoxianum Vasey 



28. Blades scabrellous above, pilose beneath; panicles 4-8 

 cm. long, some of them usually more or less con- 

 cealed among the basal leaves; dry soil. June-July .... 

 P. perlongum Nash 



26. Spikelets less than 2.7 mm. long. 

 29. Sheaths with spreading hairs. 

 30. Spikelets 2.2-2.7 mm. long. 



31. Blades 2-4 mm. wide, 10-30 cm. long; spikelets 

 sparsely pilosulous or nearly glabrous; dry 

 woods, local. May-July.. P. linearifolmm Scribn. 



31. Blades 5-10 mm. wide, 6-10 cm. long; ligule 4-5 



mm. long; dry sandy soil. June-July 



P. villosisshnian Nash 



30. Spikelets 1.3-1.9 mm. long; ligule 3-5 mm. long. 



32. Upper surface of blades glabrous or with a few 



long hairs toward the base, the lower surface 

 glabrous or puberulent; moist ground. June-July 

 P. tennesseense Ashe 



32. Upper surface of blades not glabrous. 



33. Upper surface of blades pilose, the hairs 3-5 

 mm. long. 



34. Stems conspicuously villous with horizontal 

 hairs 4-5 mm. long; dry soil, chiefly in 



the n. half of the state. June-July 



P. praecochis Hitchc. & Chase 



34. Stems with shorter hairs. 



35. Axis of panicle pilose; the lowest pani- 

 cle branches often tangled or impli- 

 cate; wet mieadows or swamps in the 



n. half of the state. June-July 



P. tmpltcatiim Scribn. 



35. Axis of panicle puberulent; branches 

 ascending, not tangled; sandy soil, n. 



111. June-July P. mcridtonalc Ashe 



33. Upper surface of blades with somewhat ap- 

 pressed hairs 1-2 mm. long; meadows, com- 

 mon. May-Sept P. huachucac Ashe 



29. Sheaths with appressed hairs; ligule 1-1.5 mm. long; 

 blades glabrous or nearly so on the upper surface, puber- 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 22. Gramineae 67 



ulent beneath; spikelets 1.8-2 mm. long; sandy or grav- 

 elly soil in the n. part of 111., not common. June-July .... 

 P. tsugetorum Nash 



62. EcHiNOCHLOA Beauv. 

 1. Sheaths glabrous; spikekts awnless or short-awned. 



2. Spikelets acute or short-awned; panicle green, the branches straight; leaves 

 6-15 mm. wide; fields, roadsides, waste ground, common; nat. from 

 Eurasia. July-Sept. Barnyard Grass E. crusgdli (L.) Beauv. 



2. Spikelets obtuse, awnless; panicle dense, usually dark purple or brown, 

 the branches incurved; leaves 1.5-3 cm. wide; waste places and river 



banks; introd. from s.e. Asia. Japanese Millet. Billion dollar Grass 



E. frumentacea (Roxb.) Link 



1. Sheaths, at least the lower ones, papillose-hirsute; spikelets long-awned, the 



awns 1-5 cm. long, usually purple; wet ground. Aug.-Oct 



E. walteri (Pursh) Heller 



63. Setaria Beauv. 

 {Chaelochloa Scribn.) 



1. Plants perennial with short, branched rhizomes; bristles below each spikelet 

 8-12, yellowish or purplish, upwardly scabrous; waste ground, occasional. 

 [5". imberbis R. fid S.} S. geniculata (Lam.) Beauv. 



1. Plants annual. 



2. Bristles 5-15 at the base of each spikelet, upwardly barbed; a common 

 weed in waste ground and along roads; nat. from Eur. June-Sept. [5'. 



glauca of auth., not (L.) Beauv.} Yellow Foxtail 



S. lutescens (Weigel) F. T. Hubb. 



2. Bristles 1-3 at the base of each spikelet. 

 3. Spikelets about 2 mm. long. 

 4. Bristles 3-6 mm. long, retrorsely barbed; panicle 5-15 cm. long; weed 



in waste ground; nat. from Eur. July-Sept. Bristly Foxtail 



S. vertiallata (L.) Beauv. 



4. Bristles 7-12 mm. long, upwardly barbed; panicle usually less than 

 7 cm. long; a common weed throughout III.; nat. from Eur. June- 

 Sept. Green Foxtail S. yiridis (L.) Beauv. 



3. Spikelets 3 mm. long; bristles upwardly barbed; panicle thick, lobed or 

 interrupted, purplish or yellowish; cult, and sometimes spontaneous; 

 introd. from Eurasia. July-Sept. Italian Millet, or Hun3arian Grass 

 S. italica (L.) Beauv. 



64. Cenchrus L. — Sandbur 



C. longiipinus (Hack.) Fern. Sandy soil, cult, ground, and roadsides. 

 July-Sept. [C. tribidoides sensu auth., non L.; C. carolintanus sensu auth., 

 scarcely Walt.; C. pauciflorus sensu auth., non Benth.} 



65. Andropogon L. 

 1. Racemes usually borne singly on the few to many branches, 3-6 cm. long; 




68 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



joints of the rachis clavate; sandy or prairie soil and open woods. Aug.- 



Oct. Little Bluestem A. scoparius Michx. 



1. Racemes in fascicles of 2-7, the common peduncle enclosed in a bract-like 

 sheath or spathe; joints of the rachis not clavate. 

 2. Pedicellate spikelet staminate, as large as the sessile spikelet; racemes 5- 

 13 cm. long, exserted on a naked peduncle, the uppermost sheath in- 

 conspicuous, not inflated; rachis straight, the hairs inconspicuous and 

 shorter than the spikelets; stamens 3; prairie soil. July-Sept. [A. provin- 



aalis Lam.} Big Bluestem A. furcatus Muhl. 



2. Pedicillate spikelet reduced to 1 or 2 empty glumes or a m'ere pedicel; 

 racemes L5-4 cm^. long, from a broad, conspicuous, usually inflated 

 spathe; rachis flexuous, the hairs as long as or longer than the spikelets; 

 stamen 1; fields and roadsides in the s. half of the state. Sept. -Oct. 

 Broom-sedge A . virginicus L. 



66. Erianthus Michx. 



E. alope cur aides (L.) Ell. Plume Grass. Open woods, s. 111., rare. Jackson 

 Co., French in 1878; Union Co., Mulcaster in 1935. [E. divarkatus (L.) 

 Hitchc] 



67. Sorghum Pers. 



1. Perennial with creeping rhizomes; spikelets readily deciduous at maturity; 

 pedicellate spikelet usually staminate; fields and waste places, escaped 

 from cult.; introd. from Eur. June-Oct. \^Holcus halepensis L.] Johnson 

 Grass S. halepeyise (L.) Pers. 



1. Annual; spikelets persistent at maturity; pedicellate spikelet usually neutral, 

 shorter than the sessile one; waste places, occasionally escaped from cult.; 

 resembling Z^ea mays when not in bloom. [^Holcus sorghum L.; Sorghum 

 saccharatum Moench] Sorghum S. vulgare Pers. 



68. SORGHASTRUM Nash 



S. nutans (L.) Nash. Indian Grass. Prairies, open woods, roadsides. Aug.- 

 Oct. 



69. Tripsacum L. 



T. dactyloides L. Gama Grass. Wet ground, rare, chiefly in the s. half of 

 the state. May-Sept. 



70. Zea L. Maize. Indian Corn 

 Z.- mays L. Cult., and rarely spontaneous. July-Sept. 



23. Cyperaceae J. St. Hil. — Sedge Family 



1 . Spikelets all alike; flowers of the spikelet, or at least one of tiiem perfect. 

 2. Glumes of the s[)ikelet 2-ranked; spikelets flattened or subterete. 



3. Perianth bustles none; s[)ikclets in umbellate clusters; stems mostly triangular. 



4. Spikelets several-many-f]owered ; glumes many 1. Cvperus 



4. Spikelets 1 -flowered; glumes 2-4 2. Kpllingia 



3. Perianth of 6-9 bristles; Inflorescence axillary; stem te»ete, hollow; achenes 



beaked 3. Diilichhim 



2. Glumes spirally imbricated. 



5. Spikelets with several to many perfect flowers. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 23. Cyperaceae 69 



6. Base of the style swollen, peisistent as a tubercle on the achene. 



7. Spikelet solitary; bristles usually present; stems leafless 4. Eleocharis 



7. Spikelets several; bristles none; leaves filiform, the sheaths pubescent 



5. Bulbost\^lis 



6. Base of style deciduous, sometimes enlarged. 



8. Flowers with a perianth of 3 stalked sepals, or of 1 or 2 hyaline glumes. 

 9. Bristles 3; achene and glumes stipitate; plants perennial 6. Fuirena 



9. Bristles 0; achene and the solitary minute glume sessile; plants annual 



7. Hemicarpha 



8. Flowers without a perianth. 



10. Style conspicuously swollen at the base; bristles none 8. Fimbristvlis 



10. Style not at all or only slightly thickened at base; bristles usually present. 



II. Bristles few, short, not exceeding the glume 9. Scirpus 



II. Bristles apparently numerous, long, slender, silky 10. Eriophonim 



5. Spikelets 1-4-flowered, polygamous. 



12. Base of the style persistent as a tubercle on the achene; perianth bristles 



usually present; style 2-cleft II. Rh\)nchospora 



12. Style wholly deciduous; bristles 0; style 3-cleft 12. Cladlum 



1. Spikelets usually unisexual; plants monoecious, or rarely dioecious. 



13. Achenes v/hite, bony, globose, usually supported on a disk, not enclosed in a sac 



(perigynium) ; pistillate spikes I-flowered 13. Scleria 



I3.Achen2s not bony, enclosed in a perigynium 14. Carex 



1. Cyperus L. 



1. Glumes deciduous from the persistent rachilla of the spikelet. 

 2. Style 2-cleft; achenes lenticular. 



3. Spikelets straw-colored or yellowish; achenes black, glossy, the super- 

 ficial cells rectangular; wet ground. [C. flavescens sensu auth., non 

 L.} C. poaejormis Pursh 



3. Spikelets green or brown; achenes brown, dull, the superficial cells 

 quadrate. 

 4. Glumes glossy, subcoriaceous; style scarcely exserted; stamens 3; 

 moist ground, in t!ie n. part of the state, often abundant and 



forming dense mats C. rivularis Kunth 



4. Glumes dull, reddish tinged, membranous; style conspicuously ex- 

 serted; stamens usually 2; marshy ground, or margins of ponds 



and streams C. diandrus L. 



2. Style 3-cleft; achenes trigonal. 

 5. Rachis prominently winged. 



6. Glumes straw-colored or pale brown, ovate acute; achenes ovoid; 

 plants perennial with a scaly tuber-bearing rhizome; moist ground. 

 [C. phymatodes Muhl.] Chufa or Nut Sedge C. esculentus L. 



6. Glumes dark brown, lanceolate, mucronate; achenes obovoid; plants 



annual; along streams and ditches, and in fields 



C. erythrorhizos Muhl. 



5. Rachis wingless or only very narrowly winged. 



7. Plants perennial; spikelets 8-16 mm. long; stamens 2 or 3. 



8. Stem rough; spikelets ascending; glumes 3-4.5 mm. long; achenes 

 2.5-3 mm. long; sandy soil in the n. part of the state, extending 

 southw. to Mason Co C. schweinitzn Torr. 



8. Stem smooth; spikelets spreading; glumes 2-2.5 mm. long; achenes 




70 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



1.5-2 mm. long; sandy soil, rare. Lake, Kankakee, and Sanga- 

 mon counties C. honghtonii Torr. 



7. Plants annual; spikelets 4-8 mm. long; stamen 1. 



9. Glumes long-acuminate, tapering to the recurved awn; wet sandy 

 soil along streams or ditches; plants fragrant when dry. [C. m- 

 flexus Muhl.} C. aristatus Rottb. 



9. Glumes merely acute; wet soil, chiefly in centr. and n. Ill 



C. acuminatns Torr. & Hook. 



1. Spikelets falling wholly away from the axis of the spikes, usually the 2 



lower glumes persistent; style 3-cleft; achenes trigonal. 



10. Plants perennial, with corm-like bases; spikelets more or less flattened. 



11. Spikelets 3-flowered; achenes 3-4 times as long as wide; inflore.scence 



composed of 5 or 6 globose heads; sandy borders of woods, or in 



old fields, chiefly in s. 111., but known also from Peoria Co. fC. 



woljii Wood} C. ovularis (Michx.) Torr. 



11. Spikelets 4-25-flowered. 



12. Leaves 4-6 mm. wide; achenes linear-oblong, acute; spikelets in 

 large umbels; moist meadows and alluvial soil near streams .... 



C. strigosiis L. 



12. Leaves 2-4 mm. wide; achenes obovoid, apiculate; inflorescence 

 consisting of 1-7 globose heads; dry sandy soil [C. filiculmis 



var. macilentus Fern.} C. filiculmis Vahl 



10. Plants annual; spikelets nearly terete. 



13. Glumes imbricated; achenes obovoid; wet ground, and sandy shores. 

 [C. specwsus of auth , not Vahl; C. jerax sensu Britt., not Rich.} 



C. ferruginescens Boeckl. 



13. Glumes scarcely overlapping; achenes linear-oblong; wet ground, 

 often on lake shores; Lake, McHenry, and Winnebago counties .... 

 C engclmanni Steud. 



2. Kyllingia Rottb. 



K. piimda Michx. Moist ground, chiefly along streams and ditches; s. 111., 

 extending northw. to Champaign Co. 



3. Dulichium Rich. 



D. arundinaceum (L.) Bntt. Wet ground, chiefly along borders of streams 

 and ponds, local. 



4. Eleocharis R. Br. — Spike Rush 



1. Spikelet linear, scarcely thicker than the stem; glumes of the mature spikelet 

 persistent; plants aquatic, about 1 m. tall. 

 2. Stems terete, conspicuously nodo,sv;; achenes 2-2.5 mm. long (including 

 the style-base); shallow water, n.w. 111. Wolf Lake, Hill in 1890. \E. 



intcrstincta sensu auth., non R. & S.} E. eqiinetoides (Ell.) Torr. 



2. Stems sharply 4-angled, continuous, not septate; achenes 2.5-4 mm. long, 

 including the beak (1 mm. long); shallow water, not common. Wolf 

 Lake, Hill; St. Clair Co., Brendcl. [E. mutata sensu auth., non R. &. 

 S.] E. quadrangulata (Michx.) R. & S. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 23. Cyperaceae 71 



1 . Spikelet usually much thicker than the stem; glumes persistent. 

 3. Style 2-cleft; achenes lenticular or biconvex. 

 4. Perennials with rhizomes. 



5. Sheaths loose, hyaline and scarious at the summit; glumes hyaline- 

 margined; wet soil, rare. Wolf Lake, Chicago, Hill 



E. olivacea Torr. 



5. Sheaths close, not hyaline at the summit. 



6. Basal glumes of the spikelets usually 2 or 3 below the thinner 

 fertile glumes. 

 7. Tubercle elongate, much longer than broad; achenes narrowly 

 obovoid or pyriform; stems subterete, rather firm; ponds, 



swamps, and marshes, n. Ill E. pdustris (L.) R. & S. 



7. Tubercle depressed-deltoid, umbonate, or broadly ovate, as 

 broad as or broader than long; achenes broadly obovoid or 

 roundish. 

 8. Stems firm, nearly terete; fertile glumes ascending, oval, acu- 

 minate; marshes, ditches, shores, local throughout III 



E. smallii Britt. 



8. Stems soft, compressed; fertile glumes appressed, obtusish; 

 wet ground, not common; chiefly in the s. half of the state, 



extending northw. to Menard Co E. mamillata Lindb. 



6. Basal glume solitary, spathiform, usually encircling the base of the 



spikelet; wet ground E. calva Terr. 



4. Annuals, with fibrous roots. 



9. Tubercle flattened or saucer-shaped; mature achenes black, 1 mm. 

 long; wet ground. [E. capitata R. Br.; E. caribaea (Rottb.) Blake; 



E. dispar E. J. Hill} E. geniculata (L.) R. & S. 



9. Tubercle conical or deltoid, acute; mature achenes pale brownish. 

 10. Tubercle conical, narrower than the top of the achene; wet 



ground in the n. half of the state E. ovata (Roth) R. & S. 



10. Tubercle depressed-deltoid, as wide as the top of the achene. 

 11. Bristles about equalling the achene, or sometimes rudimen- 

 tary; muddy shores and along ditches 



E. engelmanni Steud. 



11. Bristles much exceeding the achene; wet ground throughout 



111., not uncommon E. obtusa (Willd.) Schult. 



3. Style usually 3-cleft; achenes trigonal or turgid. 



12. Tubercle plainly distinguishable from the achene; achenes less than 

 2 mm. long. 

 13. Achenes cancellate and striate. 



14. Spikelet flattened, 3-9-flowered, the glumes 2-3-ranked; bristles 

 3-4, fugacious; stems very slender, not more than 0.5 mm. 

 in diameter, 5-20 cm. long; wet ground and shallow water .... 

 E. acicularis (L.) R. &: S. 



14. Spikelet terete, the glumes many-ranked; bristles 0; stems 

 about 1 mm. in diameter; wet ground; Fulton, Peoria, Stark 




72 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



and La Salle counties. Discovered at Canton by J. Wolf 



E. woljii Gray 



13. Achenes papillose or pitted. 



15. Tubercle depressed; achene about 1 mm. long; perennials with 

 rhizomes. 

 16. Stems filiform, about 0.5 mm. wide, angular; glumes obtuse; 

 wet ground, local. {_E. elliptica Kunth; E. capltata var. 



borealis Svens.] E. tenuis (Willd.) Schult. 



16. Stems flattened, 1 mm. or more in width; glumes acuminate, 

 often bifid; moist ground throughout 111. [E. acuminata 



(Muhl.) Nees} E. compressa Sulliv. 



15. Tubercle conical-subulate; achenes 1.5 mm. long (incl. the 



tubercle) ; glumes obtuse; tufted annuals with filiform stems; 



muddy shores, not common ...£. intermedia (Muhl.) Schult. 



12. Tubercle confluent with the top of the achene, long conical; achenes 



2-3 mm. long. 



17. Stems flattened, 1-2 mm. wide, 30-60 cm. long; marshes and 



shores, not common E. rostellata Torr. 



17. Stems somewhat 3-angled, filiform, less than 1 mm. wide, 5-30 cm. 

 tall; marshes and shores, n.e. III. [Scirpus pauciflora Liphtf.^ .... 

 E. pauciflora (Lightf.) Link 



5. BuLBOSTYLlS [Kunth] C. B. Clarke 



(Slenophplliis Raf.) 



B. capillaris (L.) C. B. Clarke. Sandy soil, n. 111., extending southw. to 

 Henderson and Kankakee counties; also apparently in Pope Co. [^Stenophyllus 

 capillaris (L.) Britt.} 



6. FuiRENA Rottb. — Umbrella Sedge 



F. pumila Torr. Shores, swamps, and wet meadows, n.e. 111. [F. squarrosa 

 sensu auth., non Michx.} 



7. Hemicarpha Nees 8C Arn. 



1. Spikelets 2-4 mm. long; glumes elliptical, the tips somewhat recurved; wet 



sandy soil, chiefly in the n. half of the state 



H. micrantha (Vahl) Britt. 



1. Spikelets 4-7 mm. long; glumes broadly ovate, appressed; wet sandy soil, n. 

 Ill M. drummondi Nees 



8. FlMBRISTYLIS Vahl 



1. Style 2-cleft; achenes lenticular, about 1 mm. long, brownish; spikelets ovoid 

 or ellipsoid, 5-10 mm. long; moist sandy soil, rare, n. 111. \F. puherula 

 (Michx.) Vahl] F. caroliniana (Lam.) Fern. 



1. Style 3-cleft; achenes trigonal, about 0.5 mm. long, whitish, the 3 angles 

 ridged; spikelets linear; moist sandy or alluvial soil, local. \F. autumnalis 

 sensu auth., non R. & S.] F. mucronulata (Michx.) Blake 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 23. Cyperaceae 73 



9. SciRPUS L — Bulrush 



1. Involucral bract one, appearing like a continuation of the stem, or lacking. 

 2. Spikelets soUtary, rarely two. 



3. Bract 1-5 cm. long, twice the length of the cylindrical or ovoid spikelet; 



in ponds and slow streams, or on muddy shores, rare. Cook Co 



S. subterminalis Torr. 



3. Bract shorter than or equalling the spikelet; bogs, n. 111. Ringwood, Mc- 



Henry Co., Vasey S. cespitosus L. 



2. Spikelets usually several to many. 



4. Spikelets few, 1-12, appearing lateral. 



5. Stems terete, or obtusely 3-angled; plants annual, tufted; bristles 



minute or absent, or equalling or exceeding the achene. 



6. Stems subterete with rounded sides; spikelets acutish; involucral 



bract always erect; achenes glossy, black, plano-convex; wet 



shores, rare ^S". smithit Gray 



6. Stems obtusely 3-angled with concave sides; spikelets blunt; invol- 



ucral bract usually divaricate at maturity; achenes dull, un- 

 equally biconvex, or lenticular; wet soil, rare. Mason Co., Vasey 



in 1862. [S. debilis of Pursh, not Lam.] S. purshianus Fern. 



5. Stems sharply 3-angled; plants perennial, with rhizomes. 



7. Bristles longer than the trigonal achenes; glumes yellowish brown, 



entire, mucronate; swamps ..S. torreyl Olney 



7. Bristles not longer than the plano-convex achenes; glumes reddish 

 brown, awn-tipped; shores and marshy ground throughout 111. 

 S. americanus Pers. 



4. Spikelets numerous in small clusters in compound umbels; plants peren- 

 nial with rhizomes, the terete stems 1-3 m. tall. 

 8. Achenes 2 mm. long, nearly as long as the glumes; spikelets ovoid, 

 5-10 mm. long; marshes and shallow water, throughout 111., except 

 the s. part S. validus Vahl 



8. Achenes 2.5-3 mm. long, shorter than the glumes; spikelets ellipsoid, 

 1-2 cm. long; shallow water in the n. half of the state. [5". occiden- 



talis (Wats.) Chase] 5. acutus Muhl. 



1. Involucral bracts several, foliaceous; stem 3-angled, leafy; plants perennial. 

 9. Spikelets 3-15 in an irregular umbel; rays 5-12, elongated, recurved- 

 spreading; spikelets ellipsoid, 1.5-4 cm. long; in the n. half of the state. 



S. fluviatilis (Torr.) Gray 



9. Spikelets numerous, umbellate or capitate. 

 10. Bristles downwardly barbed. 



11. Style 2-cleft; achenes plano-convex; bristles usually 4; spikelets 4- 



9 mm. long; swamps, rare. Lake Co., Gates 2770, 3059 



S. rubrotinctus Fern. 



11. Style 3-cIeft; achenes trigonal; bristles 6. 



12. Bristles twice the length of the achene; leaves 4-6 mm. wide; 

 spikelets 2.5-3 mm. long, commonly proliferous; wet ground 

 in woods in the s. half of the state S. polyphyllus Vahl 




74 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



12. Bristles scarcely exceeding tbe achene; leaves 6- 16 mm. wide; 

 spikelets 4-8 mm. long, several to many in dense glomerules; 



along ditches, streams, and lake shores, throughout 111 



S. atrovirens Willd. 



10. Bristles smooth, 6, flexuous. 



13. Bristles scarcely exceeding the glumes; spikelets cylindrical, 6-8 

 mm. long; leaves 5-10 mm. wide; wet ground in woods, or along 

 ditches, common S. lineatiis Michx. 



13. Bristles at maturity much longer than the glumes; spikelets sessile 

 in glomerules of 3-15; leaves 4-6 mm. wide; wet ground, locally 



abundant, sometimes covering large areas 



S. cyperiniis (L.) Kunth 



10. Eriophorum L. — Cotton Sedge 



1. Leaves 1-1.5 mm. wide; involucral bract short, erect. 



2. Blade of the upper stem-leaf not longer than the sheath; swamps and 



bogs, Peoria, Brendel; Woodford Co., McDonald in 1887 



E. gracile Roth 



2. Blade of the upper stem-leaf much longer than the sheath; bogs, rare; 



Beardstown, Cass Co., Geyer E. tenelluyn Nutt. 



1 . Leaves broader, 2-6 mm. wide; involucral leaves 2 or more. 



3. Glume of the spikelets with several striations or ribs; stamen 1; plants 



flowering in July and Aug.; not uncommon in Lake Co 



E. virginiciim L. 



3. Glume with midvein prominent; stamens 3; plants flowering in May and 

 June. 

 4. Midvein of glume extending to the apex; upper leaf-sheaths not dark- 

 girdled at the summit; bogs in n. Ill 



E. viridicar'tnatum (Engelm.) Fern. 



4. Midvein of glume not extending to the tip; upper leaf-sheaths dark- 

 girdled at the summit; bogs, n.e. Ill E. angnstifolitim Honck. 



11. Rhynchospora Vahl — Beaked-rush 



1. Bristles downwardly barbed, or sometimes smooth. 



2. Glumes whitish; bristles 9-15; bogs, Lake Co., Gleason & Shobc 137; 

 Peoria, Brendel R. Ma (L.) Vahl 



2. Glumes brown; bristles 6. 



3. Leaves filiform, less than 0.5 mm. wide; spikelets 3-6 in a terminal 



cluster; bogs and springy ground, n. III., rare R- capillacea Torr. 



3. Leaves linear, 4-7 mm. wide; spikelets numerous in clusters or heads; 



lake shores, and moist ground; Cook Co., Hill in 1906; Kankakee 



Co., Hdl in 1871, Sherff 1656. [R. glomcrata sensu auth.} 



R. capitellata (Michx.) Vahl 



1. Bristles upwardly barbed; leaves flat, 1-4 mm. wide; spikelets ovoid, sessile, 



in erect cymose clusters; wet sandy soil, Kankakee Co., Hdl in 1871 



R. cymosa Ell. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 23. Cyperaceae 75 



12. Cladium p. Br. — Twig-rush 

 (Mariscus Zinn) 



C. mariscoides (Muhl.) Torr. Bogs, marshes, or wet shores, in Cook, Lake, 

 jnd McHenry counties. 



13. ScLERiA Berg — Nut-rush 



l.Spikelets in terminal clusters; achenes supported by a basal disk (hypogyn- 

 ium). 

 2. Achenes smooth, ovoid, 3 mm. long, the hypogynium covered with a 

 rough white crust; leaves glabrous, 3-9 mm. wide; moist sandy soil in 



the n. half of the state, rare S. triglomerata Michx. 



2. Achenes papillose, subglobose, 1.5-2 mm. long; leaves puberulent, 1-2 



mm. wide; dry ground, s. 111.; Johnson Co., Brendel 



S. paitciflora Muhl. 



1 . Spikelets in an interrupted spike; hypogynium absent; achenes transversely 

 wrinkled and reticulate; leaves glabrous, 1 mm. or less in width; moist 

 meadows, Peoria, McDonald; Woodford Co., McDonald in 1887; Will 

 Co., Hill in 1911 S. yerticillata Muhl. 



Carex L. — Sedge 



KEY TO GROUPS 

 l.Pengynia glabrous. 



2. Stigmas two; achenes lenticular or plano-convex. 



3. Spikes of one kind, bearing both pistillate and staminate flowers; lateral spikes 

 sessile. 

 4. Spikes androgynous, i.e., with the staminate flowers at the apex Group I 



4. Spikes gynecandrous, i.e., with the staminate flowers at the base or middle of 

 the spike Group II 



3. Spikes usually of two kinds, the terminal commonly staminate, the lower entirely 

 or mostly pistillate Group III 



2. Stigmas three; achenes trigonal. 



5. Spike solitary, terminal, small, few-flowered, androgynous Group IV 



5. Spikes two or more. 



6. Beak of the perigynium (if present) small, entire or emargmate, or if bidenlu- 

 late the short teeth soft and thin Group V 



6. Beak of the perigynium sharply bidentate Group VI 



I.Perigynia more or less pubescent or puberulent; stigmas 3; achenes trigonal 



Group VII 



Group I 



Spikes of one kind, bearing both pistillate and staminate flowers; lateral 

 spikes sessile; stigmas 2; achenes lenticular or plano-convex. 



1 . Stems arising singly from long creeping rhizomes. 



2. Perigynia 3-5 mm. long, lanceoloid, strongly bidentate at apex: inflores- 

 cence nodding; leaves flat, 2-5 mm. wide; marshes and bogs in the n. 

 half of the state C. sartwellii Dewey 



2. Perigynia about 2 mm. long, ovoid, the apex entire; inflorescence stiff, 

 erect, subcapitate; leaves narrow, involute; bogs, rare; McHenry and 

 Lake counties C. chordorrhiza Ehrh. 




76 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



1. Stems tufted. 



3. Perigynia subulate-lanceolate. 



4. Perigynia 4 mm. long, the beak about the length of the body; swamps 



and wet meadows C. stipata Muhl. 



4. Perigynia 5-7 mm. long. 



5. Perigynium about 5 mm. long, tapering gradually from base to apex; 

 inflorescence 2.5-6 cm. long; leaves 3-6 mm. wide; swampy woods 



C. laevivaginata (Kiikenth.) Mack. 



5. Perigynium 6-7 mm. long, abruptly enlarged below into a disc-like 

 base; inflorescence 7-17 cm. long; leaves 5-10 mm. wide; swampy 



ground C. cruscorvi Shuttlw. 



3. Perigynia oval, ovate-lanceolate, ovoid or ellipsoid. 



6. Spikes usually fewer than 12; inflorescence often capitate. 

 7. Leaves 1-4 mm. wide; sheaths close. 



8. Perigynia spongy-thickened at the base. 



9. Perigynium with a minute beak 0.2 mm. or less in length; bogs, 



n.e. Ill C. dispertna Dewey 



9. Perigynium with a distinct beak 0.6-1 mm. long. 



10. Beak entire-margined; glumes acuminate or cuspidate. 



1 1 . Body of the perigynium broadly ovate, deep green, 



abruptly short-beaked; dry woods, not common 



C. retro flexa Muhl. 



1 1 . Body of the perigynium ovate-lanceolate, light green, 



tapering to the beak; dry woods, s. 111.; (fide Macken- 

 zie; no 111. spec, seen) C. texensis (Torr.) Bailey 



10. Beak minutely serrulate along the edges. 



12. Broadest leaves 1-2 mm. wide; perigynium tapering into 



the beak; stigmas long, slender, usually not twisted; 

 woods and thickets, common C. rosea Schk. 



12. Broadest leaves 2-3 mm. wide; perigynium abruptly con- 

 tracted into the beak; stigmas short, stout, contorted, 

 red; dry woods, common C. convoluta Mack. 



8. Perigynia not spongy-thickened at the base. 



13. Heads mostly 1.5-3.5 cm. long; leaves and stems stiff and wiry; 

 perigynia oval, 3-3.5 mm. long, 2.5 mm. wide, the beak 0.5 

 mm. long, serrulate; sandy soil, often in open woods, in the 

 n. half of III. [C. plana Mack.] C. niuhlenbergii Schk. 



13. Heads mostly 8-15 mm. long; leaves and stems soft; perigynia 

 2.5-3 mm. long. 

 14. Perigynia oval, 1-1.5 mm. wide, the serrulate beak 1 mm. 



long; open woods or along roads, frequent 



C. cephalophora Muhl. 



14. Perigynia ovate, truncate at base, 2 mm. wide, the beak 0.5 

 mm. long, entire or nearly so; meadows and open woods, 



not common. Jackson Co., French in 1905 



C. leavcnworthn Dewey 



7. Leaves 4.5-8 mm. wide; sheaths loose. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 23. Cyperaceae 77 



15. Stem about 2 mm. in diameter below the head, soft and wing- 

 angled, flattened when pressed and dry. 

 16. Beak of the perigynium about half the length of tha body, 

 which is strongly nerved dorsally; sheaths rugose ventrally; 

 woods and thickets, local C. conjuncta Boott 



16. Beak about as long as the body of the faintly nerved perigyn- 



ium; sheaths not rugose; meadows, not common 



C. alopecoidea Tuckerm. 



15. Stem 1 mm. in diameter below the head, not winged. 



17. Inflorescence elongate, interrupted, 3-9 cm. long; beak of the 



perigynium shorter than the body; glumes acute; woods and 



thickets, chiefly in the n. half of the state, common 



C. sparganioides Muhl. 



17. Inflorescence short, compact, 1-3 cm. long. 



18. Beak of the perigynium equalling the body; glumes acute; 



woods and thickets C. cephaloidea Dewey 



18. Beak of the perigynium shorter than the body; glumes 

 cuspidate. 

 19. Perigynium ovoid; sandy or gravelly ridges and banks 



C. gravida Bailey 



19. Perigynium ellipsoid. 



20. Perigynium not deep green at maturity; sandy soil 



C. lunelliana Mack. 



20. Perigynium deep green at maturity; dry woods, not 



common C. aggregata Mack. 



6. Spikes numerous (10 or more). 



21. Beak of the perigynium much shorter than the body; fields and 



pastures in the n. half of the state C. brachyglossa Mack. 



21. Beak equalling the body. 



22. Glumes awned; leaves 2-5 mm., wide; swampy ground, often 



along ditches, common throughout 111 



C. vulpinoidea Michx. 



22. Glumes acute; leaves 1-3 mm. wide. 



23. Perigynium 2-2.5 mm. long, glossy, not concealed by the 

 glume; wet meadows; Stark, Peoria, and Fulton counties 



C. diandra Schrank 



23. Perigynium 2.5-3.5 mm. long, dull, nearly concealed by the 

 glume; wet meadows, n. Ill C. prairea Dewey 



Group II 



Spikes of one kind, gynecandrous, bearing both pistillate and staminate 

 flowers, the staminate occurring at the base or the middle of the spike; lateral 

 spikes sessile; stigmas two; achenes lenticular or plano-convex; perigynia 

 glabrous. 

 1. Perigynia not thin- or wing-margined. 



2. Perigynia 4-5 mm. long; beak serrulate, bidentate, 1.5-2 mm. long; wet 

 ground C. bromoides Schk. 




78 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



2. Perigynia 2-4 mm. long. 



3. Beak of the perigynium entire or emarginate, not more than 0.5 mm. 

 long; perigynium oval, plano-convex; spikes 2 or 3, each 2-5-flowered; 



tamarack swamp, Lake Villa, Lake Co., Gleason & Shobe 



C. trisperma Dewey 



3. Beak of the perigynium bidentate, serrulate, 0.5-1 mm. long. 



4. Perigynia deltoid; spikes 4-6; anthers 1-2 mm. long; swampy mead- 

 ows C. sterilis Willd. 



4. Perigynia ellipsoid; spikes 2-3, widely spreading at maturity; anthers 



0.7-0.9 mm. long; damp soil. [C scirpotdes Schk., ex p.} 



C. interior Bailey 



1. Perigynia thin- or wing-margined. 

 5. Perigynia 1-2 mm. wide. 

 6. Leaves 4-8 mm. wide. 

 7. Perigynia 4-5 mm. long. 



8. Tips of the perigynia appressed; inflorescence compact, stiff; mead- 

 ows and ditches, comm.on. [C. tribtiloides var. sangamonensis 

 Clokey] C. trthuloides Wahl. 



8. Tips of the perigynia spreading; inflorescence fiexuous, nodding; 



moist ground. [C. tribuloides var. reducta Bailey] 



C. projecta Mack. 



7. Perigynia 3-4 mm. long. 



9. Margins of the perigynium abruptly contracted near the ba.se of 



the beak; meadows and thickets, chiefly in the n. half of the 



state. [C. cristata Schw., non Clairv.] C. cristatella Britt. 



9. Margins uniform, not at all contracted. 



10. Inflorescence moniliform; body of the perigynium suborbicular; 



woods and roadsides C. jestucacca Schk. 



10. Inflorescence an elongated (2.5-5 cm.) interrupted head; body 

 of the perigynium oval; woods, common. [C. mirabilis 



Dewey, non Host} C. normally Mack. 



6. Leaves 0.5-4 mm. wide. 

 11. Perigynia lanceolate. 



12. Perigynia 7-10 mm. long, bidentate at apex, longer than the 

 glumes, appressed, straw-colored, flattened, the translucent 



margins finely serrulate; wet ground in woods 



C. mushngumensis Schw. 



12. Perigynia 4.5-6 mm. long. 



13. Plants strongly stoloniferous, the stems arising from an 

 elongated rhizome; sandy soil, rare; Kankakee, Hill; Peoria 



Brcndel C siccata Dewey 



13. Plants not stoloniferous, the stems tufted; marshes and wet 



meadows, common C. scoparia Schk. 



1 1 . Perigynia oval or lance-ovate to obovate. 



14. Perigynia lance-ovate, widest near the middle or base. 



15. Perigynia 3-3.5 mm. long; spikes closely aggregated, not 



clavate at base; marshes and ditches, n. Ill 



C bebbii Olney 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 23. Cyperaceae 79 



15. Perigynia 3.5-4.5 mm. long; spikes clavate at base, not aggre- 

 gated, usually in a flexuous, moniliform inflorescence; 



open woods [C. straminea of auth., not Willd.} 



C. teuera Dewey 



14. Perigynia rhombic-ovate to suborbicular, widest above the 

 middle; open woods, rare [C. straminea sensu Mack., non 

 Willd.] C. absolutescens Schw. 



5. Perigynia 2.3-4 mm. wide. 



16. Glumes aristate; perigynia obovate, 4-5 mm. long; swamps, rare, n.e. 

 Ill C. alata T. & G. 



16. Glumes acute to obtusish; perigynia oval or ovate. 

 17. Perigynia flat, thin, translucent. 



18. Perigynia 5.5-6.5 mm. long, 3-4 mm. wide; leaf-sheaths hya- 

 line; dry soil in the n. half of the state C. bicknellii Britt. 



18. Perigynia 4-5 mm. long, 2.5-7 mm. wide; leaf-sheaths green; 



wet ground in the n. part of III., rare 



C. suberecta (Olney) Britt. 



17. Perigynia thick, coriaceous or subcoriaceous, plano-convex. 



19. Body of the perigynium ovate, broadest near the base, tapering 



into the beak; in woods and along ditches, not common 



C. molesta Mack. 



19. Body of the perigynium broadly ovate to suborbicular, abruptly 



contracted into the beak; open woods and roadsides 



C. brevior (Dewey) Mack. 



Group III 



Stigmas 2; achenes lenticular; perigynia beakless or short-beaked; spikes 

 normally unisexual, i.e., the terminal spike commonly staminate, the lower 

 spikes entirely or mostly pistillate. 



1. Perigynia obovoid or subglobose, beakless, yellowish or brownish, plump, 

 nerved, about 2 mm. in length, longer than the obtuse, pale brown 



glumes; wet ground, n. Ill C. atirea Nutt. 



1. Perigynia compressed, short-beaked, the beak less than 0.5 mm. long. 

 2. Glumes obtuse, approximately equalling the perigynia. 



3. Perigynium 2.7-3.2 mm. long, strongly flattened; stems strongly phyl- 

 lopodic, the dried-up leaves of the previous year persistent; wet 

 ground, n. Ill C. substricta (Kijkenth.) Mack. 



3. Perigynium 2.2-2.7 mm. long; stems aphyllopodic; leaves of the pre- 



vious year not persistent; swamps C. stricta Lam. 



2. Glumes acuminate or acute, longer than the perigynia; stems aphyl- 

 lopodic. 



4. Perigynia 2-2.5 mm. long, turgid; moist ground in woods 



C. haydenii Dewey 



4. Perigynia 1.5-1.7 mm. long, flattened; moist ground in woods 



C. emoryi Dewey 




80 American Midland Natliralist Monograph No. 2 



Group IV 



Spike solitary, terminal, small, few- flowered, androgynous; perigynia gla- 

 brous; stigmas three; achenes trigonal. 



1. Perigynia 2.5-3.5 mm. long, beakless, ellipsoid; leaves 0.5-1.5 mm. wide; 

 glumes obtuse; bogs and wet meadows C. leptalea Wahl. 



1. Perigynia 5-6 mm. long, globose, with a roughened entire beak 3 mm. long; 



leaves 2-3 mm. wide; glumes aristate, foliaceous; dry woods 



C. jamesii T. & G. 



Group V 



Stigmas three; achenes trigonal; spikes two or more; perigynia glabrous, the 

 beak (if present) small, entire, emarginate, or bidentulate. the short teeth (if 

 present) soft and thin. 



1. Leaves 1-3 cm. wide; beak of the perigynium abruptly bent. 

 2. Perigynia sharply triangular, closely 30-50 nerved. 



3. Perigynia 2.5-3.5 mm. long; cauline sheaths blade-btaring, green; open 



woods, not common C. platyphylla Carey 



3. Perigynia 4-5 mm. long; cauline sheaths bladeless, ted-tinged; woods, 



rare C. plantaginea Lam. 



2. Perigynia obtusely triangular, tapering at the base, 3-4 mm. long, finely 

 nerved; woods, not uncommon C. albursitia Sheldon 



1. Leaves usually less than 1 cm. wide. 



4. Leaves capillary, 0.5 mm. wide; perigynia 2 mm. long, minutely straight- 

 beaked or beakless; glumes obtuse; rocky soil, or sandy thickets in the 



n. half of 111., rare C. eburnea Boott 



4. Leaves 1-9 mm. wide. 



5. Perigynium beakless, or the straight beak not more than 0.5 nim. long. 



6. Mature perigynia conspicuously nerved or ribbed. 

 7. Spikes drooping on slender peduncles. 



8. Lateral spikes 3-6, linear-cylindrical, 2-3 mm. thick; perigynia 

 twice the length of the obtuse glumes; leaves 3-7 mm. wide; 

 moist woods and meadows, common C. graciUiina Schw. 



8. Lateral spikes 1-2, ellipsoid, 5-8 mm. thick; perigynia nearly 



equalling the acute or mucronate glumes; bogs, Peoria and 

 Tazewell counties, Brendel C. limosa L. 



7. Spikes ascending or erect. 



9. Terminal spike gynecandrous; leaves and base of stem more or 



less pubescent. 



10. Perigynia beakless, 2-3.5 mm. long; leaves 1.5-4 mm. wide. 



11. Perigynia 2-2.3 mm. long, ellipsoid, appressed or ascend- 

 ing, somewhat longer than or about equalling the 

 glumes; dry woods and meadows throughout 111. [C. 



triceps sensu auth., not Michx., or Schrank] 



C. hirsutella Mack. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 23. Cyperaceae 81 



ll.Perigynia 2.5-3.5 mm. long, obovoid, squarrose-spreading, 



shorter than the glumes; meadows, s. Ill 



C. bushii Mack. 



10. Perigynia 4-6 mm. long, ellipsoid, ascending, the beak short, 

 bidentulate; glumes awned, hyaline-margined; leaves 3-8 

 mm. wide; roadside ditches and alluvial soil in woods, fre- 

 quent C. davisii Schw. 8C Torr. 



9. Terminal spike staminate. 



12. Perigynia tapering at the base, triangular in cross-section. 

 13. Pistillate glumes mucronate or awned; stems phyllopodic; 

 stolons deep-seated; plants of open marly or sandy soil. 

 14. Pistillate spikes cylindrical, 3-4.5 mm. thick; sandy 



soil C. tetanxa Schk. 



14. Pistillate spikes ellipsoid, 5-8 mm. thick; meadows 



and prairies C meadii Dewey 



13. Pistillate glumes obtuse; pistillate spikes 3-4 mm. thick; 

 stems aphyllopodic; stolons superficial; woodland 



plants C. woodii Dewey 



12. Perigynia rounded at the base, nearly terete in cross-section. 

 15. Pistillate glumes mucronate or awned. 



16. Leaves 5-10 mm. wide; perigynia 2-2.5 mm. long; 



plants cespitose; alluvial soil, n.e. Ill 



C. haleana Olney 



16. Leaves 1.5-3 mm. wide; perigynia 3-3.5 mm. long; 



plants stoloniferous; sandy flats, n.e. 111., rare 



C. crawei Dewey 



15. Pistillate glumes acute; leaves 3-9 mm. wide; perigynia 

 2-3.5 mm. long; moist meadows and woods, common 



C. gramdar'is Muhl. 



6. Mature perigynia faintly impressed-nerved or nerveless; spikes erect 

 or ascending. 

 17. Terminal spike staminate; pistillate glumes mucronate or awned. 

 18. Sheaths and lower blades pubescent; perigynia 2.5 3 mm. 



long; moist ground, rare. "N. 111.," Vasey 



C. pallescens L. 



18. Plants glabrous; perigynia 3.5-5.5 mm. long. 



19. Perigynia 1.5 mm. wide; bract-sheaths with serrulate mar- 

 gins; peduncles of the pistillate spikes scabrous; mead- 

 ows and ditches, not common C. conoidsa Schk. 



19. Perigynia 2-2.5 mm. wide; bract-sheaths and peduncles 



smooth or nearly so. 



20. Pistillate spikes 3-12-flowered; leaves thin, soft, not 



glaucous. 



21. Perigynia 4.5-5.5 mm. long; awn of the pistillate 



glumes minutely serrulate; stems brownish at 



base; leaves 4-8 mm. wide; woods, thickets, and 



meadows, common C. grisea Wahl. 




82 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



21. Perigynia 3.5-4.5 mm. long; awn of the pistillate 

 glumes smooth; stems reddish at base; leaves 2-4 

 mm. wide; dry banks and wooded hillsides, rare; 

 Stark Co., V. H. Chase C. amphibola Steud. 



20. Pistillate spikes 12-35-flowered; leaves strongly glau- 

 cous, thick, firm; awn of the pistillate glumes 



smooth; open woods, and roadsides, local 



C. glaucodea Tuckerm. 



17. Terminal spike gynecandrous. 



22. Perigynia elliptical, light green, granular, much shorter than 

 the purplish black cuspidate glumes; leaves 1.5-4 mm. 



wide; plants stoloniferous, growing in bogs, n. Ill 



C. biixbaumti Wahl. 



22. Perigynia obovate-orbicular, slightly wrinkled, about equalling 

 the reddish brown acute or obtuse glumes; leaves 4-9 mm. 

 wide; plants cespitose, growing in moist woods, thickets, 

 and roadside ditches, common C. shortiana Dewey 



5. Beak of the perigynium curved, or if straight 0.7-1 mm. long; glumes 

 mucronate or aristate. 

 23. Beak oblique or abruptly curved, 0.3-0.5 mm. long. 



24. Stems purplish tinged at base; lower pistillate spikes en long 

 capillary peduncles; perigynia 2.5-3.2 mm. long; woods, not 



uncommon. [C. laxiflora var. gracillima Boott} 



- C. gracilescejis Steud. 



24. Stems brownish at base; lower pistillate spikes short-peduncled; 



perigynia 3-4 mm. long, woods, common. [C. laxiflora var. 

 blanda (Dewey) Boott] C. blanda Dewey 



23. Beak straight, 0.7-1 mm. long; perigynia 40-50-nerved. 



25. Sheaths pubescent; perigynia 4-5 mm. long; leaves 3-7 mm. 



wide; wooded hillsides, rare; near Peoria, Brendcl, McDonald; 

 Stark Co., V . H. Chase C. hitchcockiana Dewey 



25. Sheaths glabrous; perigynia 3-4 mm. long; leaves 2-4.5 mm. wide; 

 dry woods in tbe n. half of the state C. oligocarpa Schk. 



Group VI 



Stigmas three; achenes trigonal; spikes two or more; perigynia glabrous, 

 the beak sharply bidentate. 



1 . Staminate spike solitary or none; sometimes th'e terminal spike bearing some 

 pistillate flowers. 



2. Mature perigynia 1-2 cm. long. 



3. Pistillate spikes globose, the ellipsoid perigynia widely radiate-sp-ead- 

 ing; beak of the perigynium 1.5-2.5 mm. long; moist woods, common 

 C. grayii Carey 



3. Pistillate spikes ellipsoid to cylindrical, the ovoid-lanceoloid perigynia 

 ascending; beak of the perigynium 5-10 mm. long. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 23. Cyperaceae 83 



4. Leaves 3-5 mm. wide; perigynia 10-12 mm. long, the beak smooth, 

 not serrulate; pistillate spikes subglobose-ellipsoid, 2-3.5 cm. long; 

 staminate spike 2-2.5 mm. wide; stems solitary or few from elon- 

 gate rhizomes; achenes longer than wide, the angles not promi- 

 nently thickened; wet ground in woods, s. 111. [C. halei sensu 

 Carey, non Dewey] C. louisianica Bailey 



4. Leaves 5-15 mm. wide; perigynia 13-20 mm. long; pistillate spikes 

 ellipsoid-cylindrical, 2-8 cm. long; staminate spike 3-5 mm. wide; 

 stems cespitose. 



5. Beak of the perigynium serrulate; achenes longer than wide, the 

 angles not thickened; swamps, common C. lupuUna Muhl. 



5. Beak of the perigynium smooth; achenes as wide as long, the an- 

 gles prominently thickened; wet ground, local 



C. lupuliformis Sartw. 



2. Mature perigynia not more than 1 cm. long. 



6. Leaves involute-filiform; pistillate spikes 1 or 2, sessile, globose, few- 

 flowered; perigynia ovoid, turgid, glossy, 4-7 mm. long, nearly twice 



the length of the obtuse glumes; bogs. Lake Co. Htll in 1908 



C. oligosperma Michx. 



6. Leaves flat. 



7. Perigynia obovoid, 4-5 mm. long, truncate above and abruptly subu- 

 late-beaked; terminal spike often mostly pistillate. 



8. Perigynia shorter than the serrulate, linear-subulate glumes; ditches 



and swamps, extending northw. to McLean Co 



C. frankii Kunth 



8. Perigynia much longer than the glumes. 



9. Perigynia squarrose; glumes acute to mucronate; style strongly 

 curved near the ovary; swampy ground and roadside ditches, 

 common C. squarrosa L. 



9. Perigynia ascending; glumes obtusish or acutish; style straight 

 throughout; swamps and roadside ditches, chiefly in the s. 

 half of III., but extending northw. to Macon Co. [C. typhi- 

 noides Schw.} C. typhina Michx. 



7. Perigynia lanceoloid, ellipsoid, or ovoid, more or less tapering into 

 the beak. 



10. Glumes with a serrulate awn. 



11. Perigynia lanceoloid, strongly ribbed, soon reflexed. 



12. Teeth of the perigynium erect or slightly spreading, 0.5- 

 1 mm. long; perigynium 4-5 mm. long, the beak shorter 

 than the body; bogs and swamps, Kane and Du Page 

 counties C. pseudocyperus L. 



12. Teeth strongly divergent, 1-2 mm. long; perigynium 5-7 

 mm. long, the beak equalling or exceeding the body; 



swamps and ditches C. comosa Boott 



11. Perigynia ellipsoid or ovoid, often inflated, 5-9 mm. long. 




84 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



13. Perigynia 15-20-nerve(d, 1.5-2 mm. thick, the beak 2 mm. 

 long; wet ground, common; chiefly in the n. half of the 

 state C. hystricina Muhl. 



13. Perigynia 8-10-nerved, 2.5-3 mm. thick, the beak 3-4 mm. 



long; swamps, wet meadows, and ditches, common 



C. lurida Wahl. 



10. Glumes not serrulate. 



14. Beak of the perigynium 0.5-1 mm. long, minutely bidentate; 

 perigynia ellipsoid, 2-3.5 mm. long; lake shores and river 

 banks, n.e. 111. [C. oedert var. pumda (Coss. & Germ.) 

 Fern.] C. viridula Michx. 



14. Beak of the perigynium 2-2.5 mm. long, equalling or exceed- 

 ing the body. 

 15. Pistillate spikes erect, sessile; perigynia spreading or re- 

 flexed, 2-3 times as long as the glumes; beak of the 



perigynium sparsely serrulate; wet meadows, n.e. Ill 



C. viridula Michx. 



15. Pistillate spikes pendulous on slender peduncles; perigynia 

 spreading-ascending, about as long as the glumes; beak 

 smooth; alluvial soil in the n. half of the state. [C. 



longirostris sensu Torr., non Krock} 



C. sprengeln Dewey 



1. Staminate spikes two or more; perigynia ovoid or ovoid-lanceoloid, usually 

 more or less inflated. 

 16. Teeth of the perigynium short, not more than 0.5 mm. long. 



17. Perigynia fusiform or narrowly ellipsoid, short-beaked, the beak not 

 more than 1 mm. long. 



18. Perigynia strongly nerved; swamps and ditches 



C. lacustris Willd. 



18. Perigynia impressed-nerved; ditches, and wet ground in woods... 

 C. hyaltnolepis Steud. 



17. Perigynia ovoid-lanceoloid, inflated, papery, strongly nerved; beak 



2-3.5 mm. long; swampy ground, local C. retrorsa Schw. 



16. Teeth of the perigynium 0.5-2 mm. long. 



19. Perigynium 5-6.5 mm. wide, 7-10 mm. long, the teeth 0.5-1 mm. 

 long; wet ground in woods; Lake Forest, Vasey; Cook Co., Gates 

 C. tucker mam Dewey 



19. Perigynium 2-3.5 mm. wide. 



20. Teeth 1-2 mm. long; marshy ground C. laevicotiica Dewey 



20. Teeth 0.5-1 mm. long. 



21. Lower perigynia refle.xed or widely spreading; stems scattered, 

 obtusely angled; plants stoloniferous; leaves 4-12 mm. wide; 



ditches and shores, n. Ill C. rostrata Stokes 



21. Perigynia ascending; stems cespitose, sharply angled; leaves 

 3-5 mm. wide; swamps, and wet ground in woods, chiefly in 

 the n. half of the state C vesicaria L. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 23. Cyperaceae 85 



Group VII 



Perigynia more or less pubescent or puberulent (sometimes only slightly 

 so); stigmas 3; achenes trigonal. 



1. Perigynium beakless, or the beak less than 0.4 mm. long. 



2. Terminal spike staminate throughout; perigynia 2.5-3 mm. long. 



3. Perigynia ellipsoid, 3-12 in a spike, longer than, or equalling the 

 glumes; leaves 2.5-5 mm. wide; woods and thickets in the n. half of 

 111 C. digitalis Willd. 



3. Perigynia obovoid, 10-25 in a spike, shorter than the obtuse, purple, 



hyaline-margined glumes; leaves 2-2.5 mm. wide; dry, rocky soil 



C. ricbardsonii R. Br. 



2. Terminal spike with some pistillate flowers. 



4. Perigynia 3.5-4.5 mm. long; dry woods C. pedunculata Muhl. 



4. Perigynia 2-2.5 mm. long. 



5. Stems usually shorter than the leaves; pistillate spikes ellipsoid; 



perigynia obovoid; woods and roadsides, not common 



C. swanii (Fern.) Mack. 



5. Stems usually longer than the leaves; pistillate spikes cylindrical; 



perigynia ellipsoid; woods, n.e. Ill C. virescens Muhl. 



1. Beak of the perigynium 0.4-2 mm. long; terminal spike (or spikes) wholly 

 staminate. 

 6. Mature perigynia 12-18 mm. long; leaves 5-15 mm. wide; moist woods, 



comm^on C. grayii Carey 



6. Perigynia shorter. 



7. Perigynia 9-10 mm. long; leaves 3-8 mm. wide; wet meadows 



C. trichocarpa Muhl. 



7. Perigynia 2.5-5 mm. long. 



8. Some, or all, of the spikes half hidden among the tufted leaf-bases; 

 plants densely tufted, 5-15 cm. tall; pistillate spikes 5-10 mm. 

 long; perigynia plump, stipitate, 2-keeled, 2.5-3.5 mm. long; dry 



sandy or gravelly soil, chiefly in the n. half of the state 



C. umbellata Schk. 



8. All the spikes near the summit of the stem. 



9. Leaves pubescent; woods, common. [C. pubescens sensu Muhl., 

 non Poir.} C. hntijolia Mack. 



9. Leaves glabrous. 



10. Pistillate spikes 3-12 mm. long. 



11. Staminate spike stout, 2-4 mm. thick; body of the perigyn- 

 ium suborbicular, about as long as wide; plants strongly 

 stoloniferous, the stolons slender, reddish, fibrillose, scaly; 



dry open woods, common, flowering in early spring 



C. pennsylvanica Lam. 



1 1 . Staminate .spike 0.5-2 mm. thick; body of the perigynium 

 ellipsoid, longer than wide. 




86 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



12. Mature leaves 3-5 mm. wide; dry woods, in the n. part 



of the state, flowering in early spring 



C. communis Bailey 



12. Mature leaves 1-2.5 mm. wide; dry woods, flowering in 

 early spring. [C. yaria of Muhl., not Lumn., or 



Host] C. artitecta Mack. 



10. Pistillate spikes 1-7 cm. long. 



13. Leaves involute, 1-2 mm. wide; swamps and bogs, n. III. 



C. lasiocarpa Ehrh. 



13. Leaves flat, 2-6 mm. wide. 



14. Perigynia 2.5-3.5 mm. long, the beak 1 mm. long; pistil- 

 late spikes 5-8 mm. thick; style straight, jointed with 

 the achene; swamps, chiefly in the n. and centr. parts 



of the state C. lanuginosa Michx. 



14. Perigynium 5 mm. long, the beak 1.5 mm. long; pistil- 

 late spikes 8-12 mm. thick; style flexuous, continuous 

 with the achene; ditches and moist woods; Macon 



Co., Clokey 2338 (type collection) 



C. subimpressa Clokey 



24. Araceae Necker — Arum Family 



1. Leases with 3-1 I leaflets; spathe conspicuous, convolute at least below, enveloping 

 the cylindrical or slightly flattened spadix which is flower-bearing near the base; 



flowers monoecious or dioecious, without perianth; plant cormose 1. Arisaema 



1. Leaves simple, or absent at flowering time. 



2. Leaves sagittate or cordate, or absent; spadix terminal. 



3. Spathe ovoid, fleshy, greenish or yellowish, purple-mottled; spadix globose, cov- 

 ered by the perfect flowers; perianth of 4 hooded sepals; leaves appearing 

 later, large, ovate, cordate; plant with a very fetid odor 2. Syimplocarpiis 



3. Spathe narrow, elongate, convolute, green; spadix cylindrical, bearing sfaminate 



flowers above and pistillate below; perianth none; leaves sagittate... .3. PeZ/a/n/ra 



2. Leaves linear, erect, equitanl; spathe merely a foliaceous prolongation of the scape; 



spadix cylindrical, borne laterally on the leaf-like, 3-angled scape; perianth with 



6 membranous concave divisions; rhizomes and leaves aromatic 4. Acorus 



1. Arisaema Mart. 

 1. Leaflets 3; spadix terete, club-shaped, obtuse, overarched by the green or 

 purpled-striped spathe; moist woods, common. Apr.-May. Jack-in-the- 



Pulpit. Indian Turnip. [A. triphyllum sensu auth., not Schott} 



A . atrorubens (Ait.) Blume 



1. Leaflets 7-11; spadix slender, projecting beyond the green spathe; moist 

 woods, common. May-June. Green Dragon. Dragonroot [Mur'tcauda 

 dracontium (L.) Small} A. dracontium (L.) Schott 



2. Symplocarpus Salisb. — Skunk-cabbage 

 {Spalhyema Raf.) 

 S. joetidus (L.) Nutt. Swamps, local; chiefly in n.e. and centr. 111., ex- 

 tending southw. to Jasper Co.; apparently absent from the w. and s. counties 

 Feb.-Apr. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 25. Lemnaceae 87 



3. Peltandra Raf. 



P. virginica (L.) Kunth. Muddy margins of ditches or ponds, or in shal- 

 low water, or swamps, local; extending northw. to Kankakee and Peoria coun- 

 ties. May-June. 



4. AcoRUS L. — Sweetflag 

 A. calamus L. Swamps, or wet ground along streams, local. June-Aug. 



25. Lemnaceae Dumort. — Duckweed Family 



1 . Plants with roots. 



2. Root solitary, without vascular tissue 1. Lemna 



2. Roots several, each with a vascular bundle 2. Spnodela 



1. Plants without roots, ellipsoid, minute 3. Wolffia 



1. Lemna L. — Duckweed 

 L Plants paddle-shaped, 6-10 mm. long, remaining connected, wholly sub- 

 merged; ponds and ditches, local L. trisulca L. 



L Plants oval or roundish, 2-5 mm. long, soon separating, floating. 

 2. Plant-body symmetrical or nearly so. 



3. Plant round to oval, indistinctly 3-veined, dark green, biconvex; utricle 

 lenticular; stagnant water and slow streams, local L. minor L. 



3. Plant elliptical, indistinctly 1 -veined, pale green, nearly flat; utricle 



elongate; stagnant water, rare L. minima Phil. 



2. Plant-body asymmetrical. 



4. Plant obliquely obovate, 3-veined, thick, papillose on the median line; 



ponds and streams, local L. perpusilla Torr. 



4. Plant elliptical, often somewhat falcate, obscurely 1 -veined, smooth; 



ponds and swamps, rare. [L. cyclostasa of auth.} 



L. valdiviana Phil. 



2. Spirodela Schleid. 

 S. polyrhiza (L.) Schleid. Plants roundish-obovate, 3-8 mm. long, floating. 

 Ponds, ditches, slow streams, locally abundant. 



3. Wolffia Horkel 



{Brwuera Franch) 

 1. Plants globose or ellipsoid, not flattened, 0.5-1 mm. long, loosely cellular, 

 not punctate, floating somewhat beneath the surface; locally abundant in 



stagnant water W. columbiana Karst. 



1 . Plants flattened on the upper surface, brown-punctate, compactly cellular, 

 floating at the surface of the water. 

 2. Plants 1-1.5 mm. long, rounded-ovate, strongly gibbous, the upper surface 

 with a central conical papilla; in permanent pools of stagnant water, rare. 



Wabash Co., Schneck. W. papulifera Thompson 



2. Plants 0.5-0.8 mm. long, ellipsoid, slight gibbous, symmetrical, the upper 

 surface flat or slightly convex, gradually rising to the acute apex; stag- 

 nant water, rare; Sangamon Co., E. Hall W. punctata Griseb. 




88 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



26. Eriocaulaceae Lindl. — Pipewort Family 



1. Eriocaulon L. — Pipewort 



E. septangulare With. Borders of ponds and lakes. Pepoon says ". . . 

 from East Chicago eastward." Locally abundant in northern Indiana, but no 

 Illinois specimens seen. 



27. Xyridaceae Lindl. — Yellow-eyed Grass Family 

 L Xyris L. — Yellow-eyed Grass 



X. torta Sm. Moist sandy soil, not common. July-Aug. [X. flexuosa of 

 auth., not Muhl.] 



28. Commelinaceae Reichenb. — Spiderwort Family 



1 . Petals equal; perfect stamens 6; filaments pubescent 1. Tradescaniia 



I. Petals more or less unequal; perfect stamens 3; filaments glabrous 2. Cornmelina 



I. Tradescantia L. — Spiderwort 



L Leaves lanceolate, L5-5 cm. broad, not glaucous; margins ciliolate; sepals 

 sparsely pilose or glabrous; cymes axillary and terminal; stems 40-80 cm. 

 tall; woods, common in the central and s. part of the state. June-Aug. [T. 



pilosa Lehm.} T. subaspera Ker 



L Leaves linear or linear-lanceolate; cymes terminal. 



2. Leaves glaucous; sepals glabrous, or pilose at the tip; petals 12-16 mm. 

 long; stems usually 40-90 cm. tall; prairies, roadsides, open woods, 

 common. May-Sept. [T. reflexa Raf.} T. canaliculcita Raf. 



2. Leaves not glaucous; petals 16-20 mm. long; stem 10-30 cm. tall. 



3. Sepals and pedicels pubescent with non-glandular hairs; petals blue; 



meadows, open woods, and thickets, common. May-June 



T. virginiana L. 



3. Sepals and pedicels copiously glandular-villous; petals rose; meadows, 

 thickets, roadsides, not common; w. 111. June T. hracteata Small 



2. Commelina L. — Dayflower 



1. Plants perennial, native; stems erect or nearly so, not decumbent and root- 

 ing at the nodes; margins of the spathe connate at base; seeds smooth, 

 farinose. 

 2. Leaves lanceolate; sheaths ciliate with long, ferruginous hairs; all three 

 petals blue; wet woods, rare, s. 111. Union Co., Seymour in 1880. Aug.- 



Sept C virghiica L. 



2. Leaves linear-lanceolate; sheaths not ferruginous-ciliate; two posterior 

 petals blue, the anterior stnall, white; sandy soil, chiefly in w. 111. July- 

 Sept. [C. virginica of auth., not L.; C. crispa Woot.} C. crccta L. 



1. Plants annual, nat. from e. Asia; stems decumbent, often rooting at the 

 lower nodes; margins of spathe not united; two posterior petals blue, the 

 anterior small, white; leaves lanceolate; moist shaded ground, not uncom- 

 mon. July-Oct C. communis L. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 30. Juncaceae 89 



29. PoNTEDERlACEAE Dumort — Pickerelweed Family 



1. Flowers 2-lipped; stamens 6; leaves large, cordate to lanceolate; fruit a 1 -seeded 

 utricle I . Poniederia 



1. Flowers regular, salverform; stamens 3; leaves either reniform or linear; fruit a 

 many-seeded capsule 2. Heleranthera 



1. PoNTEDERiA L. — Pickerelweed 

 P. cordata L. Margins of ponds and streams. June-Sept. 



2. Heteranthera R. & P. 



1. Leaves reniform; flowers white or pale blue; stamens unequal; shallow water 



or muddy shores, s. 111. Aug.-Sept. Mud-plantain 



H. reniformis R. & P. 



1. Leaves linear, grass-like; flowers yellow; stamens equal; shallow water or 



muddy shores. July-Sept. [H. graminea (Michx.) Vahl; Zosterella dubia 



(Jacq.) Small] Water-stargrass H. dubia (Jacq.) MacM. 



30. Juncaceae Vent. — Rush Family 



1. Capsule many-seeded, 1- or 3-loculed, with axial or parietal placentae; plants glabrous 

 ; 1. J uncus 



1 . Capsule 3-seeded, 1-loculed, with basal placentae; plants often sparsely pilose 



2. Luzula 



\. Juncus L. — Rush 



L Inflorescence appearing lateral, the involucral bract erect, terete, simulating 

 a continuation of the stem; leaves reduced to sheaths. 

 2. Stamens 3; perianth 2.5-3.5 mm. long; anthers shorter than the filaments; 



stems densely tufted; ditches and marshy ground. Common Rush 



/. effusus L. 



2. Stamens 6; perianth 5-6 mm. long; anthers much longer than the fila- 



ments; stems usually arising singly from the rhizome and growing in 

 a row; shores and wet ground, n. 111. [/. balticus sensu auth., non 

 Willd.} /. litorum Rydb. 



L Inflorescence terminal. 



3. Leaves flat (or involute), not septate. 



4. Flowers borne singly on the branches of the inflorescence, not in heads. 



5. Annual; stem branched, the inflorescence more than half the height 



of the plant; sandy soil, roadsides, or ditches; June-Oct. Toad 



Rush /. btifonius L. 



5. Perennials; inflorescence less than half the length of the plant. 



6. Capsule longer than the perianth, reddish or dark brown; leaves 

 nearly terete. 

 7. Seeds cylindrical, 1 mm. or more in length, with caudate appen- 

 dages half as long as the body; damp shores, rare. July-Aug. 

 Cook Co., Bebb /. vaseyi Engelm. 



7. Seeds ellipsoid, 0.5 mm. long, short-pointed or obtuse; sandy 

 soil, rare, n.e. Ill /. greenei Oakes 5C Tuckerm. 




90 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



6. Capsule shorter than or equalHng the perianth, greenish or pale 



brown; leaves flat. 



8. Auricles at the summit of the sheaths thin, scarious, hyaline, 



conspicuously extended beyond the point of insertion; fields, 



roadsides, open woods, very common. May-Sept. [/. tejiuis 



sensu Am. auth., non Willd.} /. macer S. F. Gray 



8. Auricles not conspicuously extended beyond the point of in- 

 sertion. 

 9. Sheaths and auricles membranous, hyaline; perianth erect, 



3-4 mm. long; sandy soil. May-Aug /. interior Wieg. 



9. Sheaths and auricles cartilaginous, yellowish; perianth spread- 

 ing, 4-5 mm. long; meadows, common. May-Aug 



/. dudleyt Wieg. 



4. Flowers in heads (glomerules) . 



10. Heads few (2-20) ; stamens not persistent; meadows or ditches, not 

 common. June-Sept /. marginatus Rostk. 



10. Heads numerous (20-100); stamens persistent, exserted; wet sandy 

 soil in the s. half of the state, not common. [/. aristtilatus sensu 



auth., non Michx.} /. b'lflorus Ell. 



3. Leaves terete, hollow, more or less septate. 

 1 1 . Stamens 6; seeds not caudate. 



12. Involucral leaf longer than the short-branched inflorescence; fila- 

 ments longer than the anthers. 

 13. Heads 7-10 mm. in diameter; flowers 3-4 mm. long, the petals 

 equalling or exceeding the sepals; wet ground, rare, n. III. 

 July-Aug /. nodosus L. 



13. Heads 1-1.5 cm. in diameter; flowers 4-5 mm. long, the petals 



much shorter than the sepals; ditches, common. July-Aug. 



/. torreyi Coville 



12. Involucral leaf much shorter than the long-branched inflorescence; 

 filaments about as long as the anthers. 



14. Branches of the inflorescence widely divergent; sepals acumi- 



nate; sandy shores, n.e. III. July-Aug /. articidatui L. 



14. Branches of the inflorescence erect or closely ascending; sepals 

 obtuse or mucronate; wet soil, n.e. 111. July-Aug. [/. alpinus 



var. instgnis Fries] /. richardsonianus Schult. 



11. Stamens 3. 



15. Seeds caudate. 



16. Perianth 3-4 mm. long, the segments acuminate; heads 5-50- 

 flowered; wet ground. Aug. -Oct /. canadensis J. Gay 



16. Perianth 2-2.5 mm. long, the segments obtuse; heads 3-5-flow- 



ered; wet ground. July-Sept 



/. brachycephalns (Engelm.) Buch. 



15. Seeds not caudate; perianth-segments acuminate. 



17. Capsule acuminate or subulate, longer than the perianth; heads 



2-30, each 15-40- flowered; perianth 2.5-3 mm. long; wet sandy 

 soil. July-Sept /. scirpoides Lam. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 31. Liliaceae 91 



17. Capsule obtuse or merely acute at the apex, about equalling or 

 shorter than the perianth. 

 18. Capsule about two-thirds the length of the perianth; sepals 



longer than the petals; wet ground. June-Aug 



/. brachycarpus Engelm. 



18. Capsule about equalling the perianth; sepals and petals 

 nearly equal. 

 19. Heads 1-50; branches of the inflorescence ascending; 



perianth 3-3.5 mm. long; wet ground. May-Aug 



/. acuminatus Michx. 



19. Heads more numerous; branches of the inflorescence 

 widely divergent; perianth 2-2.5 mm. long; swampy 

 ground, not common. June-July. [/. robustus sensu 

 auth., non Wats.] /. nodatus Coville 



2. LuzuLA DC. — Woodrush 



(Juncoides Adans.) 



1. Flowers solitary (rarely 2) at the tips of the slender ascending or loosely 

 spreading peduncles; inflorescence an umbel; perianth 3-4.5 mm. long, 

 pale brown, shorter than the capsule; wooded banks, rare. Starved Rock 

 State Park, G. N. Jones & G. D. Fuller 15746 L. saltuensu Fern. 



1. Flowers subsessile, crowded in small head-like clusters. 



2. Rays of the inflorescence erect or ascending; perianth 2-3 mm. long; heads 

 mostly cylindrical. 



3. Base of plant commonly with small corms; perianth about 2.5 mm. 

 long, slightly shorter than the capsule; stem-leaves 2-4 mm. wide; 



sandy soil in open woods, rare. Apr. -May. Kankakee Co., Hill 



L. bulbosa (Wood) Rydb. 



3. Plant not cormose; perianth about 3 mm. long, slightly exceeding the 

 capsule; stem-leaves 4-8 mm. wide; dry open woods, chiefly n.e. 111. 

 Apr.-May L. multiflora (Ehrh.) Lej. 



2. Rays of the inflorescence strongly divergent, unequal; plant without 

 corms; perianth 3-4 mm. long, much longer than the capsule; dry open 

 woods, rare. Apr.-May L. echinata (Small) Hermann 



31. Liliaceae Adans. — Lily Family 



l.Stem leafy (bearing one or more leaves). 



2. Flowers large, 4-10 cm. long; leaves alternate or whorled; fruit a capsule 



9. Lilium 



2. Flowers smaller. 

 3. Leaves whorled. 



4. Flowers several; leaves in usually two whorls, parallel-veined 18. Medeola 



4. Flower solitary; leaves in one whorl, net-veined 19. Trillium 



3. Leaves alternate. 



5. Flowers axillary or terminal, solitary or few, or in umbels. 



6. Leaves reduced to scales with filiform short branchlets appearing like leaves 

 about I cm. long in the axils; flowers axillary, small, greenish, nodding, 

 on slender, jointed pedicels; berry red, I -seeded 13. Asparagus 




92 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



6. Leaves foliaceous. 



7. Flowers in axillary umbels, dioecious; leaves net-veined; fruit a berry 



20. Smilax 



7. Flowers not in umbels. 



8. Stem simple; perianth-segments united below the middle; flowers green- 

 ish; fruit a berry 17. Polygonaium 



8. Stem forked above; perianth-segments free; flowers yellowish; fruit a 

 capsule 1 6. Uviilaria 



5. Flowers in a termmal raceme or panicle. 

 9. Leaves linear; styles 3, separate. 



10. Stem puberulent above; perianth-segments clawed, and (in our species) 

 bearing a pair of glands; plants with a rhizome 4. Melanihium 



10. Stem glabrous; plants from a bulb. 



I 1 . Perianth-segments lanceolate, acuminate, glandless; panicle many- 

 flowered 1 . Slenaidhiiim 



1 I . Perianth-segments bearing a large obcordate gland; raceme simple 

 or sparingly branched, few-or several-flowered 2. Zigadenus 



9. Leaves not linear. 



12. Leaves 2 or 3, cordate at base; perianth-segments 4, white; stamens 4; 

 fruit a berry 15. Maianthemum 



12. Leaves several, lanceolate; perianth-segments and stamens each 6. 



13. Flowers (in our species) greenish purple; styles 3; leaves strongly 



veined; fruit a capsule 5. Veratrum 



13. Flowers white; style short, single; fruit a berry 14. Smilacina 



1. Leaves all or mostly basal, or apparently so, rarely absent at flowering time; fruit 

 a capsule. 

 14. Flowers 6-12 cm. long, orange; perianth-segments united below; leaves linear.... 



8. Hemerocallis 



14. Flowers smaller, not orange. 



15. Flower solitary, nodding; leaves 2 (or 1); plants from deep-seated corms 



10. Ervthrouium 



15. Flowers several. 



16. Flowers in racemes. 



17. Flowers whitish, small; leaves equitant; inflorescence glandular; plants 

 with a short rhizome 3. Toficldia 



17. Flowers lavendar (rarely white); leaves not equitant; plants glabrous, 



from a bulb I I. Camassia 



16. Flowers in a corymb or umbel; plants with bulbs. 



18. Flowers in a corymb, greenish white; filaments flattened at the base; 



midvein of leaves whitish 12. Ornithogalam 



18. Flowers m an umbel. 



19. Plants with the odor and taste of onions (alliaceous) ; flowers often 

 replaced by bulblets; seeds 1 or 2 in each locule of the capsule 

 6. AUhim 



19. Plants not alliaceous; seeds several in each locule 



7. Noihnscordum 



I. Stenanthium (Gray) Kunth 

 S. graimneum (Ker) Morong. Woods, and moist ground along creeks, 

 rare, s. 111.; extending nortliw. to Richland, Fayette, and Pike counties. June- 

 Aug. 



2. Zigadenus Michx. — Death Camas 



Z.. glaucus Nutt. Bogs, n. 111., not common. July-Aug. [Z- chloranthus of 

 auth., not Richards.; Z. elegans of auth., not Pursh]. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 31. Liliaceae 93 



3. ToFiELDiA Huds. — Asphodel 

 T. glutinosa (Michx.) Pers. Bogs in Lake, McHenry, and Cook counties. 

 June-July. 



4. Melanthium L. 



M. virginicum L. Bunchflower. Meadows, rare, w. and centr. III. June- 

 July. 



5. Veratrum L. 



V. woodii Robbins. Moist wooded ravines, rare. July-Sept. Bear Creek, 

 Hancock Co., S. B. Mead in 1843; Burton Creek, Adams Co., G. D. Fidler 

 in 1944. 



6. Allium L. — Onion 



1. Leaves two, elliptical-lanceolate, 3-6 cm. wide, disappearing before flowering 

 time; perianth-segments white, obtuse, 6-7 mm. long; filaments subulate, 

 equalling the perianth; capsule strongly 3-lobed; woods in the n. half of 111. 

 June-Aug. Wild Leek A. tricoccum Ait. 



1 . Leaves linear, terete or flat, less than 1 cm. wide, present at flowering time. 

 2. Leaves terete, hollow; umbels bulblet-bearing; filaments dilated, the alter- 

 nate ones with a tooth on each side; ovary not crested; meadows and 

 fields. June-July; nat. from Eur. Field Garlic A. vineale L. 



2. Leaves flat or concave, not terete; filaments not dilated. 



3. Umbel erect, usually with bulblets; scape terete; stamens included; 

 capsule not crested; meadows, roadsides, and woods, common. May- 

 June. Wild Garlic A. canadense L. 



3. Umbel not bulblet-bearing; capsule 6-crested; stamens exserted. 

 4. Umbel nodding in flower; scape angular; banks, n. 111. July-Sept. 



Nodding Onion A. cernuiim Roth 



4. Umbel erect; scape terete; rocky slopes, w. 111.; Union Co., Earle; 



Jo Daviess Co., Pepoon. July- Aug A. stellatum Ker 



7. NoTHOSCORDUM Kunth — False Garlic 



N. bivalve (L.) Britt. Meadows, rare; apparently absent from the n. half 

 of the state. Apr.-May. \^Allium striatum Jacq.J 



8. Hemerocallis L. — Day Lily 

 H. fulva L. Roadsides, common; nat. from Eurasia. June-July. 



9. Lilium L. — Lily 



1. Flowers erect; perianth segments with oval or lanceolate blades and a slender 

 claw; leaves mostly alternate, linear, 2-7 mm. wide; dry open woods in 

 the n. half of 111. June-July. [L. philadelphicum var. andinnm (Nutt.) 

 Ker} L. umbellatum Pursh 



1 . Flowers nodding; perianth-segments oblanceolate, not clawed, recurved; 

 leaves mostly whorled, elliptic-lanceolate, 1-2 cm. wide; moist woods, 

 thickets, meadows. June-July [L. canadense and L. superbum of auth., 

 not L.} L. michiganense Farw. 




94 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



10. Erythronium L. — Trout Lily 



1. Perianth yellow; style clavate, the stigmas erect, united; woods apparently 

 absent from the w. part of 111. Apr. -May E. amertcanum Ker 



1. Perianth white or pale lavender; style 3-cleft, the recurved stigmas 1-3 mm. 

 long; alluvial soil in woods, common. Apr E. albidum Nutt. 



11. Camassia Lindl. — Camas 



(Quamasia Raf.) 



C. scillioides (Raf.) Cory. Wild Hyacinth. Moist woods or meadows, 

 [C. esculenta (Ker) B. L. Robins.; Q. hyacinthma (Raf.) Britt.}. 



12. Ornithogalum L. 



O. umbellattim L. Star-of-Bethlehem. Roadsides, edges of fields, locally 

 abundant; escaped from cult.; nat. from Eur. Apr.-May. 



13. Asparagus L. 

 A. officinalis L. Garden Asparagus. Roadsides and fields, common; introd. 

 from Eur. May-June. 



14. Smilacina Desf. — False Solomon's-seal 



(Vagnera Adans.) 



1. Flowers numerous in a panicle; perianth-segments 1-2 mm. long; woods, 

 common. May-June S. racemosa (L.) Desf. 



1. Flowers few in a raceme; perianth-segments 3-5 mm. long; woods, common. 

 May-June S. stellata (L.) Desf. 



15. Maianthemum Wigg. 



M. canadense Desf. Moist woods, n. 111. May-June. Our plants belong to 

 the var. interius Fern. 



16. Uvularia L. — Bellwort 



(Oalfcsia Wats.; Oal^esiclla Small) 



1. Leaves perfoliate, puberulent beneath; capsules obtusely 3-angled, rounded 



or retuse at the ape.x; moist woods, not uncommon. Apr.-May 



U. grandiflora Sm. 



1. Leaves sessile, glabrous; capsules sharply 3-angled, acutish at each end; 

 woods, rare. Wabash Co., H. Shearer in 1900. [Oak^sia sessilifolia (L.) 

 Wats.} U. sessilijolta L. 



17. Polygonatum Hill — Solomon's Seal 



1. Leaves puberulent on the veins beneath; peduncles commonly 2-flowered; 

 flowers 9-12 mm. long; woods. May-June. [P. biflorum sensu auth., non 

 (Walt.) Ell.} P. pubescens (Willd.) Pursh 



1. Leaves glabrous; peduncles commonly 2-5-flowered; flowers 15-18 mm. long; 

 woods, and roadsides, common. May-June. [P. commutatum (R. & S.) 

 Dietr.; P. giganteum Dietr.} P. biflorum (Walt.) Ell. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 31. Liliaceae 95 



18. Medeola L. 



M. virginiana L. Indian Cucumber-root. Wooded ravines, rare. Evanston, 

 Cook Co., L. N. Johnson in 1889. 



19. Trillium L. 



1. Flowers sessile; petals purple. 



2. Leaves sessile; sepals not reflexed; moist woods, local. Apr.-May 



T. sessile L. 



2. Leaves short-petioled; sepals reflexed; woods, common. Apr.-May. Purple 



Trillium T. recurvatum Beck 



1. Flowers peduncled; petals white (or purple). 



3. Leaves sessile or essentially so; fruit 6- angled, winged. 



4. Petals 4-6 cm. long, obovate or oblanceolate; peduncle erect or ascend- 

 ing; woods, e. and n.e. 111., rare. Apr.-May 



T. grandiflorum (Michx.) Salisb. 



4. Petals 2-4 cm. long, oval; peduncle usually horizontal or declined, rare- 

 ly erect; woods, common. Apr.-May. [T. declinatum (Gray) Gleas- 

 on, non Raf.] Occasional purple-flowered plants are sometimes mis- 

 taken for the eastern T. erectum L T. gleasoni Fern. 



3. Leaves short-petioled; petals white, 1.5-3 cm. long; peduncle erect; fruit 3- 

 lobed, not winged; wooded slopes, local; known from Stark, Peoria, 

 Sangamon, Piatt, and Champaign counties. Mar. -Apr. Snow Trillium 

 T. nivale Riddell 



20. Smilax L. 



{Nemexia Raf.) 



1. Stems woody, usually more or less prickly, at least on the lower part; ovules 

 solitary in each locule of the ovary. 

 2. Leaves glaucous on the lower surface, ovate; umbels 6- 12 -flowered; open 

 woods and sandy soil, s. 111. May-June. Sawbrier S. glauca Walt. 



2. Leaves green on both surfaces. 



3. Leaves more or less contracted near the middle or 3-lobed, commonly 

 deltoid-hastate, often spinulose on the margins and veins beneath; 

 umbels 15-45-flowered; fruit mostly 1 -seeded; thickets, s. 111. May- 

 June. Fringed Greenbrier S. bona-nox L. 



3. Leaves ovate, cordate, or roundish. 



4. Leaves thin; branchlets terete; prickles black, terete (upper branches 

 often without prickles); peduncles longer than the petioles; fruit 

 black, not glaucous, usually 1 -seeded; woods and thickets, com- 

 mon. May-June. Common Greenbrier S. hisp:da Muhl. 



4. Leaves firm; branchlets angular; prickles flattened, green; peduncles 

 shorter than the petioles; fruit glaucous, 2- or 3-seeded; dry woods, 

 s. 111. May-June S. rotundifolia L. 



1. Plants herbaceous, not bristly or prickly; ovules two in each locule. 



5. Leaves puberulent and green beneath; stem climbing; fruit black; wooded 

 slopes, s. 111. May S. pulverulenta Michx. 




96 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



5. Leaves glaucous beneath; fruit bluish, glaucous, 2-5-sceded. 



6. Stem climbing, 1-3 m. long; tendrils present; umbels 25-100-flo\vered; 

 peduncles in the axils of leaves; woods, common. May-June. [S. her- 

 bacea vat. lasioneuron (Hook.) A. DC; S. herbacea sensu auth., not 

 L.] Carrion Flower S. lasioneuron Hook. 



6. Stem erect, 40 60 cm. tall; tendrils usually absent; umbels with fewer 

 than 25 flowers; peduncle in the axil of a bract below the leaves; 



moist woods, locally throughout III., except the s. counties. May 



S. ecirrhata (Engelm.) Wats. 



32. DioscoREACEAE Lindl. — Yam Family 

 1. DioscoREA L. — Yam 



1. Petioles glabrous or nearly so at the insertion of the blade; mature capsules 

 1.5-2.3 cm. long; all the leaves alternate (or the three lowest close to- 

 gether or indefinitely whorled); blades glabrous or puberulent beneath; 

 seeds (exclusive of the wing) 3-4.5 mm. broad; rhizome mostly 5-8 mm. 

 thick (when dry), simple, or rarely branched; thickets or open woods, 

 common. May-July [D. paniculata Michx.] D. vUlosa L. 



1. Petioles puberulent at the insertion of the blade; mature capsules 2.5-3 cm. 

 long; lower leaves in whorls of 4-9 (usually 6) ; lower surface of blades 

 glabrous or puberulent, glaucous or green; seeds (exclusive of the wing) 

 5 6.5 mm. broad; rhizome stout, irregularly knotted, 1-1.5 cm. thick; 



woods, s. 111., not common. May-June. [D. glauca Muhl.} 



D. quaternata (Walt.) Gmel. 



33. Amaryllidaceae Lindl. — Amaryllis Family 



I. Bulbous herbs; flowers umbellate, on a solid scape; perianth white, the segments 



united below mto a cylindrical tube I. hfymenocallis 



I . Plants not bulbous. 



2. Flowers in a long spike or spike-like raceme; leaves basal. 



3. Perianth greenish yellow; leaves thick, succulent; anthers versatile; ovary wholly 



inferior 2. Agave 



3. Perianth white (in our species) ; leaves thin, flat, lanceolate; anthers not versatile; 



ovary half inferior 3. Alelris 



2. Flowers solitary or subumbellate, bright yellow; low mostly pubescent herbs with 

 grass- like leaves 4. Hvpoxis 



1. Hymenocallis Salisb. 



H. occidentalis (Le Conte) Kunth. Spider Lily. Stream-banks, rare, "s. 

 111.," M. Craig in 1890. 



2. Agave L. — American Aloe 

 A. virginicd L. Sandy soil, s. 111. June-Aug. [Manjrcda rirginica (L.) 

 Salisb.] 



3. Aletris L. — Colic-root 



A. jarinosa L. Sandy woods, Kankakee, Cook, and Lake counties, rare. 

 July-Aug. 



4. Hypoxis L. — Star-grass 



H. hirsuta (L.) Coville. Meadows, sandy soil, open woods, common. Apr.- 

 June. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 34. Iridaceae 97 



34. Iridaceae Lindl. — Iris Family 



1. Leaves more than 1 cm. wide; flowers large; plants with rhizomes. 



2. Flowers blue or reddish; seeds flattened or angular; style-branches broad, petal-like, 

 opposite the anthers 1 . Iris 



2. Flowers orange, mottled with purple; seeds globose, black, shining, succulent; style- 

 branches filiform, alternate with the anthers 2. Belamcanda 



I. Leaves less than 7 mm. wide; flowers small; plants without rhizomes....3. Sis^rinchium 



1. Iris L. — Iris 



1. Flowers blue, variegated with yiellow and white. 



2. Leaves somewhat glaucous; sepals 5-8 cm. long; capsule obscurely 3- 

 lobed, L5 cm. thick; ditches, wet meadows, moist woods, banks of 

 streams, ponds, and sloughs, common. May-June. [/. versicolor sensu 

 auth. ex p., non L.} /. shrevei Small 



2. Leaves green, not glaucous; sepals 8-10 cm. long; capsule strongly 6- 

 angled, 2 cm. thick; meadows, swamps, and borders of woods, s. 111. 

 May-June. [/. foliosa Mack. 8c Bush; /. hexagona sensu auth., non 

 Walt.] /. brevicaulis Raf. 



L Flowers dull reddish brown, variegated with blue and green; leaves pale 

 green and somewhat glaucous; sepals 3-5 cm. long; swamps, s. 111., rare. 

 May 7. fuha Ker 



2. Belamcanda Adans. 



(Cemmingia Fabr.) 



B. chinensh (L.) DC. Blackberry-lily. Roadsides and banks, chiefly s. III., 

 escaped from cult.; native of Asia. June- July. 



3. SiSYRlNCHlUM L. — Blue-eyed grass 



\. Spathes and flowers arising directly from apex of stem; leaves and stem 

 glaucous, 1-2 mm. broad, the margins entire. 



2. Spathes usually 2, with a single outer leaf-like bract; margins of the outer 

 bract free to the base; perianth usually white, or sometimes purple; 

 capsules 3-4 mm. long, straw-colored; meadows and prairies, common. 

 May-June S. albidum Raf. 



2. Spathe solitary; outer bract with the edges united 3-5 mm. above the 



base; perianth bluish purple; capsules 4-6 mm. long, dark brown; 

 prairies, n. e. 111. May-June S. augustifoliiim Mill. 



1. Spathes peduncled from the axil of a leaf-like bract; leaves and stems dark 

 green, glossy, 2-6 mm. broad, the margins usually minutely serrulate; 

 perianth bluish purple; capsules 4-6 mm. long. 



3. Leaves and stems dark green, not glaucous; stem broadly winged, almost 



straight; inner bract of spathe 1.5-3 cm. long; moist meadows. May- 

 June. \_S. gramineiim Curtis, not Lam.} S. graminoides Bickn. 



3. Leaves and stems glaucous; stem narrowly margined, curved or flexuous; 

 inner bract of spathe 1-1.5 cm. long; sandy soil, local; Kankakee Co., 

 R. A. Schneider. May-June S. atlanticum Bickn. 




98 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



35. Burmanniaceae Blume — Burmannia Family 



1. Thismia Griff. 



T. americana N. E. Pfeiff. "Chicago, 111., in open prairie," N. E. Pjeiffer. 

 Known only from the original collection; type, herb. Field Mus.; isotype, herb. 

 Univ. of III. Discovered in Aug. 1912; now probably extinct. [^Sarco siphon 

 americanns Schlecht.j. 



36. Orchidaceae Lindl. — Orchid Family 



1 . Lip large, inflated, moccasin-shaped; leaves plaited; fertile anthers 2....1. C])pripedium 

 1 . Lip concave or flat, not moccasin-shaped; fertile anther 1. 

 2. Plants with ordinary green foliage at flowering time. 



3. Flowers distinctly spurred, the spur 2 mm. or more in length. 



4. Flowers bicolored, the lip white and the sepals and petals purple; leaves 2, 

 basal, oval 2. Orchis 



4. Flowers concolored 3. Habenana 



3. Flowers spurless. 



5. Flowers large (more than 1 cm. broad), solitary or few. 



6. Leaves grass-like; flowers several, racemose, pink-purple 4. Calopogon 



6. Leaves not grass-like. 



7. Flowers axillary; lip not crested 5. Tnphora 



7. Flowers terminal, solitary or few; lip fringed and crested 6. Pogonia 



5. Flowers smaller, several to many, in spikes or racemes. 



8. Flowers sessile or nearly so, spicate, white or greenish white. 



9. Spike more or less twisted spirally; leaves alternate, not variegated, often 

 soon withering 7. Spiranihes 



9. Spike not spiral; leaves basal, often whitish-variegated 8. Coodviera 



8. Flowers distinctly pedicelled, racemose, greenish or purplish. 



10. Leaf solitary near the middle of the stem, ovate or oval, clasping; 



flowers many, greenish, 2-3 mm. long 9. Malaxis 



10. Leaves two, basal; flowers few 10. Liparis 



2. Plants with leaves absent at least at flowering time (or with a single basal withered 

 one persisting). 



1 1 . Inflorescence a spirally twisted spike; flowers white or greenish white 



7. Spiranthes 



1 I . Inflorescence not spirally twisted. 



12. Stem bulbous at base, with one basal, oval green leaf usually withering by 



flowering time.. I 1 . Aplectrum 



12. Plant lacking chlorophyll; rhizomes coral-like; leaves reduced to scales 

 12. Corallorrhiza 



1. Cypripedium L. — Lady's Slipper 



L Sepals oval, not twisted, shorter than the white lip, which is 3-4 cm. long, 

 tinged with purple; wet woods or springy places, rare. Peoria Co., Brendel; 

 Lake Co., Gates. June-July. Showy Lady's Slipper. [C hirsutum sensu 

 auth., haud Mill.; C. spcctabile Salisb.} C. reginae Walt. 



L Sepals lanceolate, attenuate, twisted, equalling or exceeding the lip. 



2. Lip white, 2-2.5 cm. long, purple-veined inside; sepals and petals greenish 

 yellow, purple-lined; bogs, swamps, or wet ground on "original prairie," 

 very rare. May-June. White Lady's Slipper C. candidiim Muhl. 



2. Lip yellow, 2-5 cm. long; wooded hillsides or in ravines, or bogs, rare. 

 May-June. Yellow Lady's Slipper. [C. pubescens Willd.; C. hirsutum 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 36. Orchidaceae 99 



of auth., not Mill.; C. parviflorum var. pubescens (Willd.) Knight} ..-. 

 C. parviflorum Salisb. 



X C. andrewsii Fuller (C. candidumyC^parviflorum) , with cream-colored 

 lip 2-2.5 cm. long, and purple sepals and petals, has been collected near Spring 

 Bay, Woodford Co., V. H. Chase 4024. 



2. Orchis L. 



O. spectabilis L. Showy Orchis. Woods, rare. May-June. [Gakorchis spec- 

 tabiiis (L.) Rydb.} 



3. Habenaria Willd. 



(Perularia Lindl.; Platanthera Rich.; Coeloglossum Hartm. ; Denslovia 

 Rydb.; Limnorchis Rydb.; Lvsias Salisb.; Blephariglottis Raf.) 



1. Lip not fringed or deeply lobed; flowers greenish. 

 2. Stem with one to several leaves. 



3. Leaves several; bracts mostly longer than the flowers. 

 4. Lip not entire, 6-8 mm. long. 



5. Lip 3-toothed at apex; spur shorter than lip; rich woods, n. 111., 



rare. May-June. Long-bracted Orchid 



H. bracteata (Muhl.) R. Br. 



5. Lip with a median tubercle and a tooth on each side near the base; 

 spur longer than the lip; wet ground, rare, Lake, Cook, Peoria, 

 Tazewell, and Wabash counties. June-July. Tubercled Orchid 

 H. flava (L.) Gray 



4. Lip entire, shorter than the slender spur; swamps, rare; Lake, Peoria, 

 Woodford and Tazewell counties. June-July. [H. hyperborea Am. 



auth., not Orchis hyperborea L.} 



H. huronensis (Nutt.) Spreng. 



3. Leaves 1 or 2; bracts shorter than the flowers; lip entire at base, cuneate, 

 truncate, 3-5 mm. long; wet ground, rare, n.e. 111. July-Aug. Wood 

 Orchid H. clavellata (Michx.) Spreng. 



2. Stem scapiform; leaves basal, orbicular, 3-10 cm. broad; lip lanceolate, 

 entire, about 1 cm. long; flowers yellowish green; rich woods, n.e. 111., 

 rare. Jime-July. Round-leaved Orchid H. hookeri Torr. 



L Lip fringed or deeply lobed; flowers large and showy. 



6. Flowers orange-yellow; lip oval, about 1 cm. long, the conspicuous fringe 

 3-5 mm. long; swampy ground, n. 111., rare. July-Aug. Yellow Fringed 



Orchid H. ciltaris (L.) R. Br. 



6. Flowers whitish, greenish, or purplish; lip more or less 3-lobed, each lobe 

 fringed or denticulate. 

 7. Petals entire; flowers greenish; lobes of the lip narrow, few-fringed; 



swamps, rare, n.e. 111. June-July. Green Fringed Orchid 



H. lacera (Michx.) Lodd. 



7. Petals denticulate; lobes of the lip fan-shaped. 



8. Lip deeply fringed and 3-parted, the fringe 2-5 mm. long. 



9. Flowers white, the spikes relatively few-floweted; wet meadows. 




100 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



rare. June-July. White Fringed Orchid 



H. leucophaea (Nutt.) Gray 



9. Flowers lilac or purplish, crowded in the spilce; meadows and 

 swamps, Lake and Cook counties, rare. July-Aug. Small Purple 



Fringed Orchid H. psycodes (L.) Spreng. 



8. Lip toothed but not fringed; flowers violet purple; moist woods, 



rare, s. 111. July-Aug. Fringeless Purple Orchid 



H. peramoena Gray 



4. Calopogon R. Br. 



(Limodonim L. ex p.) 



C. pulchellus (Salisb.) R. Br. Grass-pink Orchid. Meadows, in the n. half 

 of 111. June-July. 



5. Triphora Nutt. 



T. trianthophora (Sw.) Rydb. Nodding Pogonia. Woods, not common. 

 Aug. -Sept. [^Pogonia trianthophora (Sw.) BSP.] 



6. Pogonia Juss. 



P. ophioglossoides (L.) Ker. Swamps and meadows, n.e. III., not common. 

 June-July. 



7. Spiranthes Rich. — Ladies' Tresses 



L Spike 8-12 mm. thick; flowers 4-5 mm. long, in a single spiral; rachis and 

 upper part of stem glabrous; leaves oval, basal, soon withering, and usually 



absent at flowering time; open woods. July-Sept 



S. gracilis (Bigel.) Beck 



1. Spike 1.5-2.5 cm. thick; flowers 7-10 mm. long, in 2 or 3 spirals; rachis and 

 upper part of stem pubescent; leaves linear; meadows and swamps. Aug.- 

 Oct S. cernua (L.) Rich. 



8. GOODYERA R. Br. 



{Peranuum Salisb.) 



G. piibescens (Willd.) R. Br. Rattlesnake-plantain. Woods, rare. July- 

 Aug. [Epipactis pubcscens (Willd.) A. A. Eaton.] 



9. Malaxis Sw. 



M. untjolia Michx. Adder's-mouth Orchid. Woods, very rare. Athens, 

 Menard Co., E. Hall in 1861. 



10. LiPARis Rich. — Twayblade 

 {Lepiorchis Thouars.) 



1. Flowers few, greenish; lip about 5 mm. long, shorter than the petals; w\et 

 ground in the n. half of the state, rare. June-July L. loesclii (L.) Rich. 



1. Flowers numerous, purple; lip 10-12 mm. long, about equalling the petals; 

 woods, not common. June-July L. liliifolia (L.) Rich. 




JoNE: Flora of Illinois, 38. Salicaceae 101 



11. Aplectrum Nutt. 

 A. hyemale (Muhl.) Torr. Puttyroot. Rich woods, rare. May-June. 



12. CoRALLORRHiZA R. Br. — Coralroot 

 1. Lip with 2 basal lobes or teeth; mature capsules 1-1.6 cm. long; woods, rare. 



Peoria, Brendel; Forest Hill, Hill. July-Aug. Spotted Coralroot 



C. maculata Raf. 



1. Lip entire or denticulate; mature capsules not more than 1 cm. long; woods, 



rare. Menard Co., Hall; Peoria, Brendel; Carlinville, Andrews. Aug.- 



Sept. Late Coralroot C. odontorhiza (Willd.) Nutt. 



Class II. DICOTYLEDONEAE Juss. 

 37. Saururaceae Lindl. — Lizard-tail Family 



1. Saururus L. 



S. cernuus L. Lizard-tail. Wet ground in woods, or on muddy shores; 

 locally abundant; extending northw. to Peoria and Vermilion counties. June- 

 Sept. 



38. Salicaceae Lindl. — Willow Family 



1 . Catkin-scales fimbriate; leaves mostly broad, long-petioled ; buds with several scales 



1. Populus 



1. Scales entire; leaves usually narrow and short-pelioled; bud-scale one 2. Salix 



1. Populus L. — Poplar 



1. Petioles terete or nearly so, not strongly flattened lateral! v. 

 2. Buds small, pubescent or glabrous, not viscid. 



3. Leaves sinuate-dentate to lobed; capsules 2-4 mm. long; catkin scales 

 fringed with silky hairs; stigmas linear; bark smooth, whitish gray, 

 rough only at the base of old trunks; introduced species. 

 4. Leaves persistently densely white-tomentose beneath, 3-5-lobed or 

 irregularly dentate; buds copiously white-tomentose; stigmas yel- 

 low; roadsides and yards, often escaped from cult.; introd. from 

 Eurasia. Apr. White Poplar P. alba L. 



4. Leaves glabrous at maturity, gray-canescent beneath when young, 

 glabrate, the margins sinuate-dentate; bud-scalej ciliate or finely 

 pubescent; stigmas purple; introd. from Eur.; cult., and persisting 

 in a few places. Gray Poplar P. canescens (Ait.) Sm. 



3. Leaves crenate-serrate, ovate, cordate at base, long-petioled, tomentose 

 when young, becoming glabrous or remaining floccose beneath; bark 

 furrowed; capsules 7-9 mm. long; catkin-scales glabrous; stigmas 

 broad; borders of swamps, local; s. 111., extending northw. to Craw- 

 ford Co. Apr. -May. Swamp Cottonwood P. heterophylla L. 



2. Buds (at least the terminal) elongated, pointed, glabrous, glossy, resi- 

 nous-aromatic; leaves pale beneath, crenulate-serrate; bark smooth; 

 capsules on short stout pedicel,"^; catkin-scales with silky hairs; stigmas 

 broad. 




102 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



5. Leaves ovate-lanceolate, glabrous; river banks and wet ground, n.e. III. 



[P. balsamifera sensu auth., non L.] Balsam Poplar 



P. tacamahaca Mill. 



5. Leaves ovate, cordate; petioles, and veins on the lower surface of the 

 blades puberulent or pubescent; planted and sometimes persisting; 

 origin unknown. Athens, Menard Co., E. Hall in 1861; Waukegan, 

 Gates 2780; Pecria, Brendel. Balm of Gilead P. candicans Ait. 



1 . Petioles strongly flattened laterally, at least near the blade. 

 6. Buds pubescent or glabrous, not glutinous; catkin-scales with silky hairs; 

 stigmas linear; leaves dull or gray-green. 



7. Leaves coarsely dentate, the blades 6-10 cm. long, white-tomentose be- 

 neath when young, glabrate in age, broadly ovate, the base truncate 

 to broadly cuneate; bud-scales finely appressed-pubescent, glabrate; 



river banks. Apr.-May. Large-toothed Aspen 



P. grandidentata Michx. 



7. Leaves finely crenate, glabrous from the beginning, ovate to orbicular, 



the blades 3-6 cm. long; buds glabrous (or merely ciliolate), glossy; 

 thickets and margins of woods in the centr. and n. parts of the state. 

 Apr. Quaking Aspen P. tremii'oidcs Michx. 



6. Buds viscid, glossy, glabrous; catkin-scales glabrous; stigmas broad; leaves 

 bright or yellow green. 



8. Leaves rhombic-ovate, cuneate at base, crenate-serrate; petioles gland- 



less; branches closely ascending or nearly erct, forming a narrow 

 tree; native of Eur.; cult, and sometimes found wild. Lombardy 

 Poplar P. italica Moench 



8. Leaves broadly deltoid, mostly truncate at base, coarsely dentate with 

 incurved teeth; petioles usually with a pair of glands at the base of 

 the blade; branches widely spreading, forming a broad-crowned tree; 

 along streams and in low ground, common. Mar. -Apr. [P. balsami- 

 fera L.; P. vtrginiana Foug.; P. mondijera Ait.} Cottonwood 



P. dcltoides Marsh. 



2. Salix L.— Willow 



1. Scales of the catkins pale or yellowish, caducous; catkins on short leafy 

 lateral branchlets. 

 2. Style not more than 0.5 mm. long. 



3. Ovaries and capsules distinctly pedicelled. 



4. Ovaries and capsules glabrous; leaves lanceolate, petioled, finely 

 serrate; stamens 3-9. 

 5. Capsules 3-6 mm. long at maturity; trees 10-20 m. tall. 



6. Capsules 3 mm. long; leaves linear-lanceolate, green on both 

 sides, the petioles 3-6 mm. long; common along streams. May. 

 Black Willow S. nigra Marsh. 



6. Capsules 4-5 mm. long; leaves lanceolate, glaucous beneath, the 

 petioles usually 5-15 mm. long; along streams. Apr.-May. 

 Peach-leaved Willow S. amygdaloidcs Anders. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 38. Salicaceae 103 



5. Capsules 7-11 mm. long; shrubs 2-4 m. tall; swamps and bogs, 

 Lake Co. June. Autumn Willow S. serissima (Bailey) Fern. 



4. Ovaries and capsules appressed-silky at first, soon glabrous; leaves 

 linear, subsessile, remotely denticulate; stamens 2; shrub; common 

 along streams. Apr.-June. \_S. longifolia of Muhl., not Lam.} 

 Sandbar Willow S. interior Rowlee 



3. Ovaries and capsules nearly sessile, or very short-pedicelled, glabrous; 

 stamens 2; tree; commonly planted and often spontaneous; introd. 

 from Eur. May. White Willow S. alba L. 



2. Style distinct, 0.5-1 mm. long; ovaries and capsules glabrous. 



7. Catkins slender, 4-7 mm. in diameter at flowering time, 8-18 mm. thick 

 in fruit; stamens 2; tree; nat. of Eur.; often planted, and self-propa- 

 gating from broken branchlets. Apr.-May. Brittle Willow 



S. jragilis L. 



7. Catkins stout, 8-14 mm. in diameter at flowering time, 2-2.5 cm. thick 

 in fruit; stamens 5; style almost 1 mm. long; shrubs; swamps, and 



along streams and lake shores. Shining Willow S. lucida Muhl. 



1. Scales of the catkins brown to black (except S. bebbiana), persistent; sta- 

 mens 2. 

 8. Ovaries and capsules glabrous. 



9. Style 0.5-1.5 mm. long; scales densely silky-villous; young twigs often 

 more or less puberulent; leaves serrate or serrulate. 



10. Flowering catkins appearing before the leaves, sessile or nearly so, 

 subtended by a few bracts; leaves pale green or more or less 

 glaucous beneath, at least at maturity. 



11. Style 0.5 mm. long; capsules 4-7 mm. long, on pedicels 1-2 mm. 

 long; leaves lanceolate, acuminate, becoming glabrous or near- 

 ly so; wet ground, common. Apr.-May S. cordata Muhl. 



11. Style 1 mm. long; capsules 7-10 mm. long, on pedicels 2-4 mm. 

 long; leaves ovate-lanceolate, acute; swamps in the n. third of 



the state. May. Blue-leaf Willow S. glaucophylla Bebb 



10. Flowering catkins on short leafy peduncles 1-2 cm. long; style 0.7- 

 1.5 mm. long; capsules 5-8 mm. long, the pedicels less than 1 

 mm. long; leaves ovate to oval, acute or abruptly acuminate, 

 silky-pubescent, not glaucous; sandy shores, n.e. 111. \_S. syrticola 



Fern.} S. adenophylla Hook. 



9. Style 0.1-0.2 mm. long, the stigmas therefore sessile or nearly so; scales 

 glabrous on the back, pilose within; twigs glabrous; leaves oblanceo- 

 late or elliptical, entire, glaucous beneath; catkins appearing with the 



leaves; bogs and wet meadows, n. 111., rare. Apr.-May 



S. pedicellaris Pursh 



8. Ovaries and capsules pubescent. 



12. Catkins with some small leafy bracts at base, in flower as the leaf-buds 

 are opening. 

 13. Scales yellowish or pink- tipped, thinly villous, shorter than the 

 pedicel; capsules 6-10 mm. long; stigmas nearly sessile; leaves 




104 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



elliptical, entire or nearly so, tomentose beneath; wet ground, 

 chiefly n. III. May. Bebb Willow S. bebbiana Sarg. 



13. Scales dark brown or black. 



14. Style 1-1.5 mm. long; capsules white-tomentose, 6-8 mm. long 

 at maturity; leaves thick, elliptical-lanceolate, the revolute 

 margins entire or repand; bogs in the n. half of 111. May. 

 Sage Willow S. Candida Fluegge 



14. Style less than 0.5 mm. long; ovaries and capsules strigose. 



] 5. Cap.sules acuminate, 6-8 mm. long, the pedicel 2.5-5 mm. 

 long; catkins 10-15 mm. long; leaves linear-oblanceolate, 

 glandular-serrulate; wet ground, chiefly in the n. third of 

 the state. Apr.-May S. petiolaris Sm. 



15. Capsules obtuse, 3-5 mm. long, the pedicel 1-1.5 mm. long; 

 catkins 18-30 mm. long; leaves lanceolate, acuminate, 



finely serrate; wet ground. Apr. Silky Willow 



S. sericea Marsh. 



12. Catkins sessile or nearly so, appearing before the leaves; young twigs 

 glabrous or puberulent. 

 16. Pistillate catkins 2-4 cm. long, becoming 4-6 cm. long in fruit; 

 mature capsules 9-12 mm. long; pedicel shorter than the scale; 

 leaves elliptical to obovate, glabrous or nearly so at maturity, 

 glaucous beneath; tall shrubs (2-7 m. high) of wet ground; 

 common. Apr.-May. Pussy Willow. [S. eriocepbala Michx.; 



S. prinoides Pursh; S. discolor var. latifolia Anders.] 



S. discolor Muhl. 



16. Pistillate catkins 1.5-2 cm. long, becoming 2-4 cm. long in fruit; 

 mature capsules 6-9 mm. long; pedicel equalling or slightly 

 longer than the scale; leaves linear-oblanceolate, pubescent be- 

 neath; low shrubs of sandy or clayey soil, common. Apr.-May. 

 Prairie Willow. [S. tristis Ait.} S. humilis Marsh. 



KEY FOR STAMINATE SPECIMENS 



1 . Stamens 3 or more; scales yellowish, caducous; catkms on leafy branchlets. 

 2. Catkins slender, 6-10 mm. thick; petioles not glandular; trees. 



3. Leaves linear-lanceolate, green on both sides; stamens more than twice the length 

 of the scale; nectary yellow 5. uigra 



3. Leaves broadly lanceolate, paler and somewhat glaucous beneath; stamens not 



more than twice the length of the scale; nectary red S. anipgdalonjcs 



2. Catkins 1-1.5 cm. thick; petioles usually glandular at base of blade. 



4. Catkins 3-6 cm. long; leaves serrate, green on both surfaces S. hicida 



4. Catkins 1-1.5 cm. long; leaves serrulate, glaucous beneath 5. scrissima 



1. Stamens 2 (rarely 3 or 4). 

 5. Filaments pilose. 



6. Filaments pilose half their length; leaves linear, subsessile, remotely denticulate; 



shrubs 5. interior 



6. Filaments pilose only near base; trees. 



7. Twigs pubescent; young leaves silky-pubescent 5. alba 



7 . Twigs and leaves glabrous 5. fragilis 



5. Filaments glabrous. 



8. Catkins on short Icafy-bracted branchlets. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 40. Juglandaceae 105 



9. Leaves entire 5. pedicellaris 



9. Leaves glandular-serrulate. 



10. Leaves sericeous above 5. adenophylla 



10. Leaves glabrous or nearly so from the first. 



1 1. Twigs puberulent 5. cordaia 



1 1. Twigs glabrous 5. glaucoph\)lla 



8. Catkins sessile or nearly so. 

 12. Anthers red. 



13. Young twigs white-tomentose ; catkins about 2.5 cm. long 5. Candida 



13. Young twigs puberulent; catkins 1-1.5 cm. long 5. humills 



12. Anthers yellow. 



14. Scales yellowish or pink-fipped 5. bebbiana 



14. Scales dark brown. 



15. Catkins 10-18 mm. long 5. pellolaris 



15. Calkins 2-4 cm. long. 



16. Anthers 0.5 mm. long S. sericea 



16. Anthers 0.7-0.9 mm. long. 



17. Catkins slender, 5-8 mm. thick, with a few leafy-bracts at base 



5. cordata 



1 7. Catkins stout, dense, sessile, about 1 cm. thick, without leafy- 

 bracts at base S. discolor 



39. Myricaceae Dum. — Bayberry Family 



L CoMPTONiA Banks 



C. peregrina (L.) Coult. Sweetfern. Open v^'oods, n.e. III., not common. 

 Apr.-May. [^Myrica asplenifolia L.] 



40. Juglandaceae Lindl. — Walnut Family 



1 . Pith of twigs lamellate or chambered jstaminate catkins sessile or nearly so; leaflets 

 conduplicate in vernation; nut enclosed in an indehiscent husk 1. Juglans 



1 . Pith solid; staminate catkins slender, long-peduncled ; leaflets involute in vernation; 

 husk of nut splitting into 4 valves 2. Carya 



I. Juglans L. — Walnut 



1 . Lower surface of mature leaflets softly stellate-pubescent and somewhat 

 glandular; leaflets 7-19; upper margin of leaf-scar pubescent, straight or 

 curved; stamens 8-12; anthers brown; pith dark brown; fruit ellipsoid, 

 acute, viscid-pubescent; woods, not common. May. Butternut..../, cinerea L. 



1 . Lower surface of mature leaflets glandular-puberulent, shortly-pubescent 

 along the midvein, the terminal one rarely present; leaflets 11-23; upper 

 margin of leaf-scar notched, not pubescent; pith light brown; fruit sub- 

 globose, glandular; woods, common. May. Black Walnut. /. nigra L. 



2. Carya Nutt. — Hickory 

 (Hicoria Raf.) 

 1. Leaflets 9-17 (usually 13), lanceolate, acuminate, the lateral ones somewhat 

 falcate; bud-scales 4 or 6, valvate. 



2. Rachis and lower surface of leaflets pubescent; staminate catkins fascicled; 

 nut smooth, nearly terete; seed not bitter; river-bottom woods, com- 

 mon; apparently absent from the n. part of the state. Apr.-May. Pecan. 




106 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



[C. olivaeformis Nutt.; C. pecan (Marsh.) Engler SC Graebn.} 



C. illinoensis (Wang.) K. Koch 



2. Leaves glabrous; staminate catkins in threes on a common peduncle; nut 



sharply angled; seed very bitter; bark of trunk exfohating in long strips; 



river bottoms, rare, s. III. Mar.-Apr. Water Hickory. Bitter Pecan 



C. aquatica (Michx. f.) Nutt. 



1 . Leaflets 5-9 (or rarely 11). 



3. Bud-scales mustard-yellow, 4 or 6, valvate in pairs; leaflets lanceolate, 



acuminate, sessile or nearly so, the lateral ones somewhat falcate; stam- 

 inate catkins in threes on a common peduncle; nut smooth, globose, 

 acute, thin-shelled, whitish; seed becoming bitter; bark of trunk not 

 exfoliating, gray, close, smooth or ridged, woods, common. May- June. 

 Bitternut Hickory. Yellowbud Hickory. [C. atnara Nutt.; Hicoria 

 minima Britt.} C. cordiformis (Wang.) K. Koch 



3. Buds not yellow; bud-scales 6 or more, imbricated. 



4. Leaflets usually 7 (rarely 5 or 9) . 



5. Leaflets at maturity glabrous or nearly so; young twigs, and rachises 

 of mature leaves glabrous; terminal bud 5-10 mm. long; bark close 

 or scaly; nut 1.5-3 cm. long, compressed, round at the base; woods, 

 centr. and s. III. May-June. [C. microcarpa Nutt.] Small-fruited 

 Hickory C. ovaUs (Wang.) S.irg. 



5. Leaflets at maturity pubescent beneath; terminal bud 1-2.5 cm. long. 



6. Rachis and lower surface of mature leaflets stellate-tomentose; 



bark rather close, ridged; nut 1.5-3 cm. long, rounded at base; 



seed somewhat astringent; woods. May- June. [C. alba (L.) K. 



Koch, not Nutt.} Mockernut. Bigbud Hickory 



C. tomentosa Nutt. 



6. Rachis and lower surface of mature leaflets short-pubescent espe- 

 cially along the veins; bark shaggy; nut 3-6 cm. long, cuneate at 

 base; seed sweet, not astringent; woods, not common. Big Shag- 

 bark Hickory C. lacinioia (Michx. f.) Loud. 



4. Leaflets usually 5 (rarely 3 or 4) . 



7. Terminal bud 1-2 cm. long, grayish-tomentulose; twigs stout; leaflets 

 more or less pubescent beneath, at least on the veins; dry husk of 

 fruit 4-10 mm. thick; bark shaggy; woods, common. [C. alba 

 Nutt.] Shagbark Hickory C. ovata (Mill.) K. Koch 



7. Terminal bud 5-10 mm. long, glabrous or nearly so; twigs slender; 

 mature leaflets glabrous except on the veins; bark shallowly ridged, 

 tight; dry husk of fruit 1-3 mm. thick; woods, not infrequent. Pig- 

 nut Hickory C. glabra (Mill.) Sweet 



41. Betulaceae Agardh. — Birch Family 



I. Nuts small, compressed and often wmged, without an involucre, borne in catkins; 



staminate flowers consisting of 2-4 stamens and a 2-4-parted calyx. 



2. Scales of the pistillate catkins 3-lobed, deciduous (sometimes only tardily so) ; 



stamens 2, bifid; leaf-buds sessile, with 3 or more scales; bark often peeling 



horizontally 1 . Be tula 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 41. Betulaceae 107 



2. Scales of the pistillate catkins 5-lobed, woody, persistent; stamens 4; buds usually 



stalked and with 2 valvate scales; bark not peeling horizontally 2. Altnis 



l.Nuts with a foliaceous involucre or subtended by or enclosed in a large bractlet, 

 borne in clusters or catkins; stamens 3-10; calyx none; buds with several scales. 



3. Shrubs; leaves broadly cordate-ovate, doubly serrate usually with 5-8 pairs of 

 veins; leaf-buds obtuse; nuts in clusters, each enclosed in a foliaceous involucre 

 3. Cor\)lus 



3. Small trees; leaves oval or ovale, with 9 or more pairs of veins; leaf-buds acute; 



fruits in pendent catkins, the nut subtended by or enclosed in a large bractlet. 



4. Fruiting bracts foliaceous, 3-lobed; bark of the trunk and branches smooth; 

 lower surface of leaves glossy green with small tufts of whitish hairs in the 



axils of the principal veins; lateral veins unbranched; anthers glabrous 



4. Carpinus 



4. Fruiting bracts becoming sac-like, inflated, enclosing the nut; bark rough, scaly; 

 lower surface of leaves pale dull green, thinly short-pilose; lateral veins 

 usually forked near the margin; anthers pilose at apex 5. Oslr\^a 



1. Betula L. — Birch 



1. Trees up to 30 m. tall, with acute or acuminate, serrate or double-serrate 



leaves; bark of trunk and large branches pe^Ung horizontally in thin strips. 



2. Bark of trunk gray or brown; fruiting catkins erect or suberect, the scales 



more or less persistent; wing of the fruit not broader than the nutlet. 



3. Fruiting catkins nearly sessile, ovoid or subglobose; bracts ciliate; leaves 



oval; bark of twigs with faint wintergreen flavor; locally in wooded 



areas in the n. half of III.; known from Lake and Lee counties. Our 



plants have been named var. macrolepis Fern. Yellow Birch 



B. lutea Michx. f. 



3. Fruiting catkins short-peduncled, ellipsoid; bracts tomentose; leaves 

 rhombic-ovate; bark bitter, not aromatic; river banks, the common 

 birch in III. May. River Birch B. nigra L. 



2. Bark chalky- or silvery-white; fruiting catkins cylindrical, slender-pedun- 

 cled, usually pendulous, the scales deciduous; wing of the fruit distinct- 

 ly broader than the nutlet; cold woods, local, n. III. May. Paper Birch. 



Canoe Birch B. papyrifera Marsh. 



I. Shrubs 0.5-4 m. tall; bark brown, not exfoliating; twigs of the season 

 pubescent or puberulent, sometimes glandular. 



4. Leaves ovate, acute, 3-6 cm. long, serrate; fruiting catkins 1.5-2.5 cm. long, 



10-12 mm. thick; edge of boggy meadow. Beach, Lake Co., G. N. Jones. 

 [5. glandultfera X lutea Rydb.; B. lutea X pumila var. glandulifera 



Rosend.} X ^- purpusii Schneid. 



4. Leaves obovate, obtuse, or acutish, mostly 1.5-3 cm. long, crenate-dentate; 

 fruiting catkins about 1 cm. long, 6-8 mm. thick; bogs, n.e. III. May. 

 Dwarf Birch B. pumila L. 



2. Alnus Hill— Alder 



1 . Leaves oval to ovate, doubly or coarsely serrate, usually rounded at the 

 base; stipules lanceolate; nut orbicular; wet ground, rare; Lake, McHenry, 

 and Boone counties. June. Speckled Aider A. incana (L.) Moench 




108 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



1. Leaves obovate, finely serrate, tapering at the base; stipules oval; nut ovate; 

 wet ground, s. III., as far n. as Wabash Co. Apr.-May. Smooth Alder .... 

 A. rugosa (DuRoi) Spreng. 



3. CoRYLUS L. — Hazel 



C. americana Walt. Thickets, common; probably the only species in 111. 

 Mar.-Apr. 



4. Carpinus L. 



C. caroliniana Walt. Blue Beech. Muscle Tree. Woods, common. Apr.- 

 May. 



5. OsTRYA Scop. 



O. virginiana (Mill.) K. Koch. Ironwood. Hop-hornbeam. Woods, com- 

 mon. Apr.-May. 



42. Fagaceae a. Br. — Beech Family 



l.Stamlnale flowers in small pendent globose heads on slender peduncles; nuts sharply 



trigonal; winter buds lanceoloid, acuminate 1. Fagus 



I.Slammate flowers in slender catkms. 

 2. Staminate catkins erect or ascending, 15-30 cm. long; involucre prickly, 2-7-flowered 



2. Castanea 



2. Staminate catkins pendent; fruit an acorn in a scaly involucre-cup; winter buds 

 ovoid, obtuse or acute 3. C^uercus 



1. Fagus L. — Beech 



F. grandijolia Ehrh. American Beech. Woods, especially near streams, 

 local; chiefly in the valleys of the Mississippi, Ohio, and Wabash rivers; absent 

 from centr. and w. 111. 



2. Castanea Hill — Chestnut 

 C. dentata (Marsh.) Borkh. Rocky woods, s. 111., very rare. Pulaski and 

 Union counties. June. 



3. QuERCus L. — Oak 



1 . Leaves entire, elliptical or oblanceolate, bristle-tipped. 



2. Leaves permanently stellate-tomentulose beneath; woods, common. Shin- 

 gle Oak Q. imbricaria Michx. 



2. Leaves quite glabrous on both surfaces, or sometimes sparsely pubescent 



on the lower surface along the midvein; moist woods, rare. Massac Co., 



Teljord in 1924; Mermet, McDougall 145. Willow Oak 



Q. phellos L. 



1 . Leaves not entire. 



3. Leaf-lobes with bristle-tips; acorns maturing the second season. (Red or 



Black Oaks.) 



4. Leaves 3-5-lobed above the middle, obovate in outline. 



5. Leaves glabrous or nearly so beneath; buds ovoid, small; acorn-cups 

 saucer-shaped, 1.5 cm. in diameter; woods, Crystal Lake Park, 

 Urbana, G. N. Jones 12514; supposedly a hybrid between Q. 

 borealis and Q. hnbricaria Q^. riincmata Engelm. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 42. Fagaceae 109 



5. Leaves brownish sfellate-tomentulose beneath; buds conical-fusiform, 



8-10 mm. long; acorn-cups turbinate, 1.5-2 cm. m diameter, enclos- 

 ing half the acorn; upland woods, not common. Black Jack Oak 

 Q. marilandica Muench. 



4. Leaves pinnately 5-9-Iobed or cleft. 



6. Leaves grayish-tomentulose beneath; lobes often falcate; acorn glo- 



bose; cup saucer-shaped; woods, s. III., not common. [Q. pagodae- 



folia Ashe; Q. falcata Michx.] Spanish Oak Q. rubra L. 



6. Leaves glabrous or nearly so, not grayish tomentulose beneath, but 

 often with tufts of hairs in the axils of the principal veins. 



7. Leaves lobed about halfway to the midvein; acorn cup shallow, 

 saucer-shaped; winter-buds nearly glabrous; inner bark gray or 

 reddish; woods, common. [Q. rubra sensu DuRoi, non L.; Q. 



borealis var. maxima (Marsh.) Ashe}. Red Oak 



Q. borealis Michx. f. 



7. Leaves usually cleft more than half-way to the midvein. 



8. Acorn-cup shallow, saucer-shaped, enclosing not more than one- 

 third of the acorn; inner bark gray or reddish; winter buds 

 glabrous or sparsely pubescent. 



9. Acorn-cup 1-1.5 cm. in diameter, the rim only 3-4 mm. high; 



acorn 1-1.5 cm. long; woods along streams. Pin Oak 



Q. palustris Muench. 



9. Acorn-cup 16-22 mm. in diam-eter, the rim 5 mm. or more 



high; acorn 1.8-2.5 cm. long; woods near streams, s. III. 



[Q. schneck't Britt.] Q. shumardii Buckl. 



8. Acorn-cup hemispherical or turbinate enclosing about one-half 

 of the mature acorn. 



10. Scales of the acorn-cup closely appressed; winter buds coni- 



cal, sparsely pubescent to glabrous. 



11. Acorn-cup 15-25 mm. in diameter, the scales glabrate, 

 glossy; acorn ovoid; inner bark reddish or gray; upland 



woods, s. 111. Scarlet Oak Q. coccinea Wang. 



11. Acorn-cup 10-15 mm. in diameter, the scales puberulent; 

 acorn ellipsoid; inner bark yellowish; upland woods, n. 

 III. Northern Pin Oak. Hill's Oak. Discovered near 

 Chicago in 1891, by the pioneer Illinois botanist, E. J. 



Hill Q. ellipsotdalts E. J. Hill 



10. Scales of the acorn-cup pubescent, loosely imbricated, the 

 upper forming a fringed border; cup 18-25 mm. in diam- 

 eter; winter-buds large, angular, densely grayish pubescent; 

 inner bark yellowish or orange; upland woods, common. 



Black Oak Q. yelutina Lam. 



3. Leaf-lobes not bristle-tipped; acorns maturing in the autumn of the first 

 year. 

 12. Leaves irregularly deeply lobed, often somewhat lyrate. (White 

 Oaks.) 




110 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



13. Mature leaves usually glabrous and glaucous beneath; winter-buds 

 nearly or quite glabrous; acorns 1.5-2 cm. long, 3-4 times the 

 length of the shallow cup; upland woods, common. White Oak 



Q. alba L. 



13. Mature leaves pubescent beneath; acorn-cup one-half to one-third 

 the length of the acorn; buds ovoid, pubescent. 

 14. Young twigs pubescent; lower surface of leaves grayish or 

 brownish stellate-pubescent; mature acorns ovoid, 1-2 cm. 

 long, about 1 cm. in diameter; cup one-third to one-half as 

 long as the acorn, nearly sessile; upland woods, more com- 

 mon in the s. part of the state, but extending northw. to 



Adams, Mason, Coles, and Clark counties. Post Oak 



Q. stellata Wang. 



14. Young twigs glabrous or nearly so; lower surface of leaves 

 whitish tomentulose; mature acorns 2-3.5 cm. long, the cup 

 2-5 cm. in diameter, short-peduncled. 

 15. Upper scales of acorn-cup caudate-acuminate, forming a 

 fringe around the acorn, which is half immersed in the 

 cup; leaf-buds acutish, the terminal 5-8 mm. long; vigor- 

 ous 1 -year-old twigs sometimes with corky ridges; upland 

 woods, common. Bur Oak Q. macrocarpa Michx. 



15. Scales broad, not caudate-acuminate; acorn nearly or quite 

 immersed in the cup; buds obtuse the terminal 2-4 mm. 

 long; swamps and bottomland woods in the s. third of 

 the state. Overcup Oak Q. lyrata Walt. 



12. Leaves angularly dentate, coarsely toothed or merely undulate, but 

 not at all or only slightly lobed. (Chestnut Oaks.) 



16. Leaves elliptical or lanceolate, glossy dark green above, more or 

 less whitish stellate-tomentulose beneath, with 8-13 pairs of 

 lateral veins, each vein ending in an acutish, mucronate, often 

 incurved tooth; acorns nearly sessile, or short-peduncled, 10-18 

 mm. long; hillsides and wooded bluffs, common. [Q. acuminata 



(Michx.) Houba} Chinquapin Oak 



Q. muhlenbergii Engeim. 



16. Leaves obovate, cuneate toward the base, angularly shallowly 



coarsely dentate; acorns 2-3 cm. long. 



17. Leaves regularly obtusely dentate; lateral veins 9-12 pairs; fruit 



sessile or short-peduncled, the peduncles less than 1 cm. 



long; bottomlands and borders of streams, chiefly s. 111. [Q. 



michauxii Nutt.} Q. prinm L. 



17. Leaves undulate-crenate or coarsely sinuate. 



18. Lateral veins 10-16 pairs; fruit sessile or nearly so; hillsides 

 and crests of ridges. Union Co. [Q prinus sensu auth., 

 not L.] Chestnut Oak Q. montana Willd. 



18. Lateral veins 4-8 pairs; fruit on peduncles 2-6 cm. long- 

 alluvial soil, throughout III., except the n.w. part. [Q. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 43. Ulmaceae HI 



platanoides (Lam.) Sudw.} Swamp White Oak 



Q. bicolor Willd. 



43. Ulmaceae Mirb. — Elm Family 



I. Leaves with I principal vein from the base, the lateral veins straight, parallel, usually 



more than 10 pairs; flowers m clusters on twigs of the preceding season; twigs with 



solid pith. 



2. Flowers appearing before the leaves; fruit a 1 -seeded, flat, thin-winged samara; 



leaves usually doubly serrate 1. Ulmus 



2. Flowers appearing with the leaves; fruit nut-like, muricate; leaves simply serrate 

 2. Planera 



1. Leaves (at least when mature) with 3-5 veins from the base, the lateral veins curved, 

 fewer than 10 pairs; flowers borne on the twigs of the season, appearing with the 

 leaves; twigs with chambered pith; fruit a drupe; bark corky-ridged 3. Celtis 



I. Ulmus L. — Elm 



L Flowers drooping, on slender pedicels; calyx not ciliate; leaves gkbrous or 

 nearly so above; nut scabrous. 



2. Branches not corky-winged; buds glabrous or nearly so; fruit glabrous ex- 

 cept the ciliate margins; woods, very common. Apr. American or White 

 Elm U. americana L. 



2. Branches (at least some of them) usually more or less corky- winged; 

 fruit pubescent. 



3. Buds pubescent; leaves 5-13 cm. long; flowers racemose; woods, in the 

 n. half of the state, not common. Apr.-May. Rock Elm. \{J . race- 

 rnosa Thomas, not Borkh.} U. thomasi Sarg. 



3. Buds glabrous or nearly so; leaves 2-8 cm. long; flowers fascicled; hill- 

 sides, cliffs, ridges, s. 111. Apr. Winged Elm U. alata Michx. 



L Flowers nearly sessile in erect dense clusters; calyx ciliate; leaves scabrous 

 above; buds reddish-pubescent; branches not corky-winged; woods, com- 

 mon. Apr. Slippery Elm U. fulva Michx. 



2. Planera J. F. Gmel. 



P. aqiiatica [Walt.} J. F. Gmel. Water Elm. Swamps, s. 111., not common. 

 Apr.-May. A specimen without flowers or fruits collected at Mermet, July 18, 

 1928 (McDougdll 142), may be this species, but sterile specimens often close- 

 ly resemble smooth-branched material of Ulmus alata. 



3. Celtis L. — Hackberry 



1. Leaves sharply serrate; drupes 7-9 mm. in diameter at maturity; fruiting 

 pedicels longer than the petioles: nutlet brownish, 6-8 mm. long, obovoid, 

 pitted; tree, 10-20 m. tall; woods, usually near streams, common. Apr.- 

 May. [C. crassifolia Lam.] Hackberry C. occidentalis L. 



1. Leaves entire or nearly so; nutlet 5-6 mm. long, globose, pitted. 

 2. Leaves lanceolate, long-acuminate, usually broadly cuneate at base; fruit- 

 ing pedicels longer than the petioles; drupes 4-6 mm. in diameter; tree, 

 10-30 m. tall; woods and river banks, s. 111., in the valley of the 




112 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



Wabash R., northw. to Lawrence Co., and the Mississippi valky 



northw. to Adams Co. [C. missis sippiensis Bosc] Sugarberry 



C. laevigata Willd. 



2. Leaves ovate, short-acuminate, usually rounded or subcordate at base; 

 fruiting pedicels about as long as the petioles; drupes 6-8 mm. in diam- 

 eter; shrub or small tree to 4 m. tall; sand dunes or rocky banks of 



streams, rare and local. Dwarf Hackberry 



C. pumila (Muhl.) Pursh 



44. Moraceae DC. — Mulberry Family 



I . Leaves serrate or lobed, 3-vemed at base; branches never spiny; flowers in spikes 

 1. Morus 



L Leaves entire, pinnately veined; branches usually spiny; staminate flowers in loose 

 racemes, the pistillate in globose heads; fruit large, globose, yellowish green. 8-12 

 cm. in diameter 2. Madura 



1. MoRUS L. — Mulberry 



1 . Leaves becom.ing scabrous above, the lower surface pubescent, or hispidulous 

 along the veins; lateral lobes, if present, caudate; buds somewhat diver- 

 gent, acute; fruit reddish purple, 2 cm. or more in length; native tree; 

 woods, common. May-June. Red Mulberry M. rubra L. 



1. Leaves glabrous, somewhat glossy and nearly smooth above; lower surface 



glabrous or nearly so, except on the veins or in their axils; lateral lobes 



usually obtuse; native of Asia. 



2. Fruit whitish or pinkish, 1-1.5 cm. long; cult., and rarely escaped. May. 



White Mulberry M. alba L. 



2. Fruit dark red, smaller; a small bushy tree; leaves commonly much lobed; 

 along fences and in woods, common. [M. alba var. tatarica (L.) Ser.} 

 M. tatarica L. 



2. Maclura Nutt. 



M. pomifera (Raf.) Schneid. Osage-orange. Hedge-apple. Commonly 

 planted for fences and windbreaks, sometimes spontaneous; native from Va. 

 to Kans., and southw. M.iy-June. 



45. Cannabinaceae Lindl. — Hemp Family 



1. Erect herbs; pistillate flowers in spikes ..1. Cannabis 



1 . Stems twining; flowers in catkin-like drooping clusters (hops) 2. Hutnulus 



1. Cannabis L. — Hemp 



C. sativa L. Common Hemp. Marijuana. Moist soil, edges of fields, along 

 roads, waste ground, locally common; nat. from Asia. July-Sept. 



2. HiJMULus L. — Hop 



H. americanus Nutt. Ainerican Hop. Sandy soil at edges of woods and 

 along fences, coinmon. Aug. fW. lupulus sensu auth., non L.] 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 47. Santalaceae 113 



46. Urticaceae Reichenb. — Nettle Family 



1. Leaves mostly opposite. 



2. Plants with stinging hairs, perennial; stigma capitate-tufted I. Urtica 



2. Plants without stinging hairs. 



3. Plants perennial, more or less pubescent; stems opaque; petioles usually somewhat 



shorter than the blades; stipules separate; stigma filiform 2. Boehnteria 



3. Plants annual, glabrous; stems translucent; blades glossy above, about as long 



as the petioles; stipules united; stigma capitate-tufted 3. Pilea 



1 . Leaves alternate. 

 4. Plants with stinging hairs; leaves ovate, 5-12 cm. broad; flowers in loose branched 



cymes 4. Laporlea 



4. Plants without stinging hairs; leaves lanceolate, less than 2.5 cm. wide; flower 

 clusters sessile in the leaf-axils 5. Parietaria 



1. Urtica L. — Nettle 



1. Plants perennial, 0.5-3 m. tall; flower-clusters in branched paniculate spikes. 

 2. Leaves lanceolate, firm, not cordate at base; alluvial soil, chiefly in the n. 

 half of th'e state. July- Aug. [U. gracilis sensu auth., non Ait.} Com- 

 mon Nettle U. procera Muhl. 



2. Leaves ovate-lanceolate or ovate, coarsely serrate, thin, cordate or rounded 

 at base; waste places and roadsides, not common; nat. from Eur. July- 

 Sept. Great Nettle ^- d'^oica L. 



1. Plants annual, 10-40 cm. tall; flower-clusters simple, two in each leaf-axil; 

 leaves oval or ovate, 1-4 cm. long, acute, coarsely serrate or incised; waste 

 places; nat. from Eur. May-Sept. Small Nettle U. urens L. 



2. BoEHMERiA Jacq. — False Nettle 

 B. cylindrica (L.) Sw. Moist woods. July- Aug. 



3. PiLEA Lindl. — Clearweed 



1 . Fruit ovate, gt^en, irregularly roughened, purplish-marked, not margined; 

 moist shaded ground, common. July-Sept P. pumila (L.) Gray 



1. Fruit shortly lanceolate, dull brownish, smooth, with a distinct narrow mar- 

 gin; moist ground rare. July-Sept P. fontaiia (Lunell) Rydb. 



4. Laportea Gaud. 



{Urlicastrum Fabr.) 

 L. canadensis (L.) Gaud. Wood Nettle. Woods, common. July-Aug. 



5. Parietaria L. — Pellitory 

 P. pennsylvanica Muhl. Woods, common. May-Sept. 



47. Santalaceae R. Br. — Sandalwood Family 



1. Comandra Nutt. 



C. umbellata (L.) Nutt. Sandy soil or grassy roadsides, local. May-June. 

 [C. richardsiana Fern.] 




114 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



48. Loranthaceae D. Don — Mistletoe Family 

 1. Phoradendron Nutt. 



P. flavescens (Pursh) Nutt. American Mistletoe. Parasitic on American 

 elm, black gum, oak, and other deciduous trees, s. III., northw. to Union and 

 Lawrence counties. 



49. Aristolochiaceae Blume — Birthwort Family 



I . Stem prostrate, rooting at the nodes; flowers regular, 3-lobed; calyx persistent; 



stamens 12 1. Asanim 



1 . Stem erect or twinmg; flowers very irregular, the calyx deciduous; stamens 6 



- 2. Arisiolochia 



1. AsARUM L. — Wild Ginger 



1. Calyx-lobes deltoid-ovate, shortly acuminate, scarcely longer than the calyx- 

 tube, spreading or reflexed at flowering time; woods, common. May 



A. reflexum Bickn. 



1 . Calyx-lobes lanceolate, caudate-acuminate, much longer than the tube, erect 

 or spreading at flowering time; wooded hillsides, local; extending southw. 



to Knox, Peoria, and Kankakee counties. May-June 



A. acuminatum (Ashe) Bickn. 



2. Aristolochia L. — Birthwort 



l.Low herb; flowers purple, 1-1.5 cm. long, solitary on sl'ender basal scaly 

 peduncles; calyx-tube curved like the letter S; leaves ovate-lanceolate, 

 cordate or hastate at base, thin, green on both sides; capsule subglobose, 

 ridged, about 1 cm. in diameter; rich woods, s. 111., rare. Virginia Snake- 

 root A. serpciitarta L. 



1. Twining shrub; flowers on axillary solitary pubescent bractless peduncles; 

 calyx tomentose, the tube abruptly bent, yellowish green, about 3 cm. 

 long, dark purple within; leaves suborbicular or broadly ovate, tomentose; 

 capsule ellipsoid, 4-6 cm. long; rich woods, s. 111., rare; extending northw. 

 to Wabash and Jackson counties. Dutchman's Pipe A. tomentosa Sims 



50. Polygonaceae Lindl. — Buckwheat Family 



I. Plants not climbing by tendrils; calyx-tube not enlarged in fruit; leaves with sheathing 

 stipules. 

 2. Sepals 6, the three inner ones becoming enlarged (valves) in fruit (except in the 



first species); stigmas tufted 1. Runwx 



2. Sepals 5, sometimes 4, nearly equal; stigmas capitate. 



3. Leaves not hastate-deltoid, or if so, the stems climbing by prickles or reclining. 

 4. Branches not at all adnate to the stem; flowers clustered (or if solitary not 



pink and the leaves not linear) 2. Polpgoitiim 



4. Branches more or less adnate to the internodes of the stem; stipular sheaths 

 oblique or truncate, glabrous; flowers solitary in the axils of the bracts in 

 slender panicled racemes; calyx pink; stamens 8; slender annual wiith 



linear leaves 3. PoI\}f;<>inlla 



3. Leaves hastate-deltoid; stem erect, smooth; flowers while; mature achenes much 



exserted from the calyx 4. Fagopwum 



I. Plants climbing by tendrils; calyx-tube conspicuously enlarged in fruit, tnclosing the 



achene ; stipules obsolete; flowers in slender axillary and terminal racemes 



5. Brimim hia 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 50. Polygon aceae 115 



1. RuMEX L. — Dock 



1. Leaver hastate, sometimes linear or lanceolate; plants with acid juice, dioe- 

 cious or polygamous; rhizomes horizontal. 



2. Calyx essentially unchanged in fruit; achenes granular, dull, much longer 

 than the sepals; fields, roadsides, waste ground, common; nat. from 

 Eur. May-July. Field Sorrel or Sour Dock R. acetorella L. 



2. Inner sepals winged in fruit, thin, reticulate, cordate, 3-4 mm. wide, en- 



closing the smooth, glossy achene; sandy soil; Madison Co., McDonald 



R. hastatulus Baldw. 



1. Leaves not hastate or markedly acid; flowers perfect; roots stout. 



3. Inner sepals (valves) entire or merely denticulate. 



4. Leaves flat, not crisped, pale green or glaucescent, acute at each end; 

 native species. 



5. Pedicels about equalling or shorter than the valves, curved. 



6. Only one valve (rarely two or three) bearing a tubercle; valves 

 4-5 mm. long; leaves lanceolate; roadsides and alluvial soil, 

 common. June. Pale Dock R. altissimus Wood 



6. Usually all three (rarely only 2) valves bearing a tubercle; valves 

 2.5-3 mm. long; leaves linear-lanceolate; sandy soil, not common. 



Chicago, Flick- June. [/?. viexicanus of auth., not Meisn.] 



R. triangulivahis (Danser) Rech.f. 



5. Pedicels several times longer than the valves, deflexed, nearly straight, 

 jointed close to the base; wet ground, common. June-July. Swamp 

 Dock R. verticillatus L. 



4. Leaves wavy-margined or crisped, dark green. 



7. Only one of the valves bearing a small or rudimentary tubercle; 

 valves cordate, nearly or quite entire, 5 6 mm. broad; pedicels 

 with a conspicuous joint; waste ground, occasional; nat from Eur. 

 May-July. Patience Dock R. patientia L. 



7. Usually all three valves bearing well-developed tubercles. 



8. Pedicels obscurely jointed; leaves 5-10 cm. wide, the lower ones 

 narrowed at the base; stem 1-2 m. tall; wet ground, not com- 

 mon; chiefly in the n. half of the state; Aug. -Sept. Water Dock 

 R. britannica L. 



8. Pedicels conspicuously jointed; leaves narrower, the lower ones 

 truncate or cordate at the base; stem 30-90 cm. tall; cult, and 

 waste ground, or roadsides, common; nat. from Eur. May-June. 

 Curly Dock R. crispus L. 



3. Valves with spinulose teeth. 



9. Valves 3-4 mm. long, deltoid, reticulate, only one tubercled; pedicels 

 jointed below the middle; lowest leaves broadly ovate, cordate at the 

 base; plants perennial; fields and roadsides, common; nat. from Eur. 

 July-Aug. Bitter Dock R. obtusifolius L. 



9. Valves 2 mm. long, with slender teeth, all three valves tubercled; pedi- 




116 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



eels jointed at base; leaves linear-IanceoIate, narrowed at base, undu- 

 late or crisped; sandy shores, local. McHenry Co., Vasey; Cahokia, 



Eggert. July-Sept. [/?. per s tear io ides sensu auth., non L.} 



R. fneginus Phil. 



2. Polygonum L. 



(Persicaria Mill.) 

 1 . Stems not twining. 



2. Stems not retrorsely bristly. 

 3. Flowers axillary. 



4. Stems leafy throughout; achenes included in or only shortly exserted 

 from the calyx. 



5. Sepals with yellowish green margins; stems erect or ascending. 

 6. Leaves oval, obtusish; achenes dull; waste ground. Aug.-Oct. 

 Erect Knotweed P. erectum L. 



6. Leaves lanceolate or narrowly oval, acute; achenes glossy; sandy 



soil. July-Sept P. ramosissimtim Michx. 



5. Sepals with pink or white margins; stems prostrate or spreading. 



7. Leaves thick, prominently veined, oval, pale green; stipules very 



conspicuous; achenes granular; waste ground, not common. 



Aug.-Oct P. buxijorme Small 



7. Leaves thin, not prominently veined, bright green, narrowly 

 elliptical to linear; stipules not conspicuous; achenes striate; 

 waste ground, very common; variable in appearance. July-Oct. 



Common Knotweed P. aviculare L. 



4. Stems with the upper leaves reduced in size. 



8. Achenes conspicuously exserted from the calyx; branches terete, 

 striate; stamens 5 or 6; sandbars or rocky ground, not common. 

 Aug.-Oct. Long-fruited Knotweed P. exsertuin Small 



8. Achenes included in the calyx; stem and branches angular, slen- 

 der; leaves plicate; stamens 8; sandy soil. July-Sept. Slender 



Knotweed P. tenue Michx. 



3. Flowers in terminal or axillary panicles. 



9. Styles short; calyx not curved, the sepals usually 5. 



10. Panicle terminal, usually solitary; perennial marsh or aquatic or 

 more or less amphibious herbs with long rhizomes. 

 11. Panicle ovoid or ellipsoid, 1-3 cm. long. 



12. P'eduncle glabrous or nearly so; leaves elliptical, glabrous, 

 glossy above, obtuse or acute; shallow water. June-Aug. 

 [P. fluitans Eaton; P. amphibiuiii sensu Am. auth., 



non L.] P. natans (Michx.) Eaton 



12. Peduncle pubescent; leaves elliptical-lanceolate, pubescent, 

 not glossy, acute or attenuate; swampy ground. June- 

 Aug. [P. hartwrightii Gray; P. amphibium var. hart- 



wrightii Bissell] 



P. natans f. hartwrightii (Gray) Stanford 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 50. Polygonaceae 117 



11. Panicle linear-cylindrical, 3-9 cm. long, the peduncle glandular- 

 hispidulous or strigose; leaves lanceolate, acuminate; wet 

 ground, common. July-Oct. [P. emersum (Michx.) Eaton; 

 P. muhlenbergii (Meisn.) Wats.] P. coccineum Muhl. 



10. Panicle usually several (except in depauperate plants), axillary as 

 well as terminal; plants of moist rich soil. 



13. Sheaths not ciliate. 



14. Panicles erect; glands of the peduncles stipitate; stamens 8 

 or fewer; achenes 2-3 mm. wic'e; cult, ground, roadsides, 



or along streams, common. Aug. -Oct 



P. pennsylvanicum L. 



14. Panicles drooping; glands of the peduncles sessile; stamens 



6; achenes 1.5-2 mm. wide; moist soil, common. July- 

 Sept P- lapathijol'mm L. 



13. Sheaths ciliate. 



15. Stems and peduncles glandular-hispidulous; sandy soil, 



local. Aug.-Sept P. careyi Olney 



15. Stems and peduncles not glandular-hispidulous. 

 16. Sepals glandular-dotted. 



17. Spikes drooping; stamens 4 or 6; achenes dull; 

 along ditches, common. Aug.-Oct. Water-pepper 

 P. hydropiper L. 



17. Spikes erect; stamens 8; achenes glossy; along 



ditches, common. July-Aug. Water Smartweed 

 P. punctatum L. 



16. Sepals not evidently glandular-dotted. 



18. Leaves lanceolate, elliptical, or linear, 0.5-2 cm. 



broad; stems 15-100 cm. tall. 

 19. Plants perennial, native; leaves not dark- 

 blotched; stamens 8; panicles linear, slender, 

 erect, often interrupted at base, 3-8 cm. long, 

 less than 5 mm. thick. 

 20. Leaves strigose on both surfaces, lanceolate; 

 flowers white or pink; swamps, rare. June- 

 Sept P- setaceum Baldw. 



20. Leaves glabrous or nearly so. 



21. Leaves lanceolate; calyx white or pink; 

 achene 2-2.5 mm. long, the tip covered 

 by the calyx; wet ground or in water, 

 common. July-Sept. Mild Water-pep- 

 per P. hydropiperoides Michx. 



21. Leaves linear or linear-lanceolate; calyx 

 greenish white; achene 1.5-2 mm. long, 

 the tip protruding beyond the calyx; 



swamps, s. III., rare 



P. opelousanum Riddell 




118 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



19. Plants annual, adv. from Eur.; leaves (when 

 fresh) with a more or less evident dark blotch; 

 calyx pink; stamens 6; cult, ground, waste 

 places, roadsides, common. May-Sept. [Persi- 

 caria persicaria (L.) Small; P. mitis Gilib.; 



P. maculosa S. F. Gray} Lady's Thumb 



P. persicaria L. 



18. Leaves broadly ovate, acuminate, long-petioled; 

 stems 1-3 m. tall; garden escape, introd. from 



Asia. Aug.-Sept. Prince's Feather 



P. orientale L. 



9. Styles long, exserted, persistent, reflexed, becoming hooked in fruit; 

 calyx curved; sepals 4; stamens 4; racemes slender, rigid, greenish; 

 leaves ovate, acuminate; woods, common. July-Sept. [Torara vir- 



giniana (L.) Raf.] Virginia Knotweed P. virginianum L. 



2. Stems retrorsely bristly on the angles. 



22. Leaves sagittate; stem 4-angled; stamens 8; styles 3; achenes 3-angled; 

 wet ground, not common. July-Oct. [Tracaulon sagittatiim (L.) 

 Small] P. sagittatum L. 



22. Leaves hastate; stem ridged; stamens 6; styles 2; achenes lenticular; 

 wet ground, not common. July-Oct. [Tracaulon arifolium (L.) 

 Raf.] P. arifolium L. 



1. Stems twining, not prickly; flowers in panicled racemes; leaves ovate, cor- 

 date; outer sepals winged or keeled at maturity. 

 23. Outer sepals merely keeled at maturity. 



24. Achenes dull, minutely granular; stipules glabrous; plants annual; 

 nat. from Eur.; fields and waste places, common. May-Sept. Black 

 Bindweed P. convolvulus L. 



24. Achenes glossy, smooth; stipules with a fringe of stiff reflexed hairs 



at base; perennial; rocky soil, rare. June-Sept P. cilinode Michx. 



23. Outer sepals developing conspicuous wings; achenes glossy, not striate. 



25. Calyx 5-8 mm. long at maturity, flat-winged; achenes 2.5-3 mm. long; 



edges of woods, common. Aug.-Sept P. dumetorwn L. 



25. Calyx 10-12 mm. long when mature, undulate wing-margined; 

 achenes 3.5-5 mm. long; woods and roadsides, common. July-Oct. 

 P. scandens L. 



3. PoLYGONELLA Michx. — Jointweed 



{Conopyrum F. & M.; Dcloppnim Small) 



P. articulata (L.) Meisn. Sandy soil, local; n. 111. as far southw. as Peoria 

 and Kankakee counties. July-Oct. 



4. Fagopyrum Gaertn. — Buckwheat 



F. esculentum Moench. Fields or roadsides, occasionally escaped from 

 cult.; introd. from Eur. July-Sept. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 51. Chenopodiaceae 119 



5. Brunnichia Banks 



B. cirrhosa Gaertn. Banks of streams, s. III., not common. Pulaski Co., 

 Brendel in 1860; Metropolis, Massac Co., Gleason in 1902. 



51. Chenopodiaceae Dumort. — Goosefoot Family 



1 . Leaves not spine-tipped or subulate. 



2. Flowers perfect, not enclosed in a pair of triangular bracts; perianth present. 

 3. Flowers in clusters; fruit enclosed in the calyx. 



4. Calyx not horizontally winged 1. Chenopodium 



4. Calyx becoming horizontally winged. 



5. Leaves linear or narrowly lanceolate, entire, yellowish green; flowers spicate 



2. Kochia 



5. Leaves sinuate-dentate; flowers paniculate 3. C\)cloloma 



3. Flowers solitary, axillary; fruit exserted from the marcescent calyx; leaves linear 



4. Corispermum 



2. Flowers unisexual, the pistillate enclosed by a pair of triangular bracts; leaves 



narrowly lanceolate to hastate 5. Atriplex 



1 . Leaves subulate, spinescent; stems branched, striate; flowers 1-3 in the axils 



6. Salsola 



1. Chenopodium L. — Goosefoot. Pigweed 

 1 . Plants more or less glandular and aromatic, not at all farinose (mealy) . 

 2. Leaves sinuate-pinnatifid; pericarp not gland-dotted; fruit only partly 

 enclosed by the calyx; roadsides, waste ground, occasional, nat. from 

 Eur. July-Aug. Jerusalem Oak C. botrys L. 



2. Leaves repand-dentate to subentire; pericarp gland-dotted; fruit complete- 



ly enclosed by the calyx; waste ground, common, nat. from S. Am. 

 July-Aug. [C. anthelminticum L.} Mexican Tea C. ambrosio'tdes L. 



1. Plants not glandular or aromatic, but sometimes farinose. 



3. Flowers in globose clusters 1 cm. or more in diameter, forming an inter- 



rupted spike, the calyx becoming red, succulent, and strawberry-like at 

 maturity; leaves triangular to lanceolate; seeds horizontal, dull, 0.8 mm. 

 in diameter; sandy soil, occasional. May-Aug. [Blitum capitatum L.} 

 Strawberry Pigweed C. capitatum (L.) Aschers. 



3. Flowers in smaller glomerules; calyx not succulent. 



4. Leaves sinuately dentate or entire. 



5. Sepals more or less prominently keeled in fruit. 



6. Pericarp loose, readily separating from the seed; leaves thin; seeds 



horizontal. 



7. Leaves green and glabrous or nearly so on both surfaces when 



mature, slender-petioled, lanceolate to ovate, entire, or the 



lower ones sinuate-dentate; woods, common. June-Oct. [C. 



boscianum sensu auth. non Moq.} C. standleyanum Aellen 



7. Leaves densely farinose at least beneath, rather short-petioled, 

 linear or lanceolate, often somewhat hastately toothed; sepals 

 strongly carinate; sandy soil, occasional; native w. of the Mis- 

 sissippi R.; probably adventive in 111. Urbana, G. N. Jones 

 11813. July-Sept. [C. leptophyllum sensu auth., non Nutt.] 

 Narrow-leaved Goosefoot C. praterlcola Rydb. 




120 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



6. Pericarp firmly adherent to the seed. 

 8. Leaves more or less sinuately dentate. 



9. Leaves commonly densely farinose on the lower surface; seed 

 1-L2 mm. in diameter; cult, ground and waste places, com- 

 mon; nat. from Eur. July-Sept. Lamb's Quarter 



C. album L. 



9. Leaves green and glabrous on both surfaces. 



10. Leaves lanceolate to rhombic-ovate; seeds 1.5-1.7 mm. in 

 diameter; stem 1-3 m. tall; plants often purplish in 

 autumn; fields and roadsides, common; nat. from Eur. 



June-Oct. [C. missouriense Aellen} 



C. paganum Reichenb. 



10. Leaves triangular-ovate or somewhat deltoid-hastate, often 

 truncate at base; seed 1 mm. in diameter; stem 30-90 

 cm. tall; waste places, occasional; nat. from Eur. July- 

 Sept. City Goosefoot C. urbiaim L. 



8. Leaves small, entire, or merely hastately toothed, the upper ones 

 smaller, elliptical, cuspidate; seed puncticulate, 1 mm. in diam- 

 eter; dry soil. July-Sept C. berlandieri Moq. 



5. Sepals only slightly or not at all keeled. 



11. Leaves bright green on both surfaces; seeds 1-1.5 mm. in diameter. 



12. Leaves rhombic-ovate, coarsely toothed; stem slender, erect or 

 decumbent, 30-60 cm. long; seeds sharp-edged; waste places, 



nat. from Eur. July-Oct. Nettle-leaved Goosefoot 



C murale L. 



12. Leaves broadly triangular-hastate, entire or nearly so, 5-12 

 cm. long; stem stout, erect; seeds obtuse-edged; waste 



places, nat. from Eur. July-Oct. Good-King-Henry 



C. bonus-henricus L. 



11. Leaves pale green, sinuate-margined, 1-3 cm. long, the lower sur- 

 face whitish-mealy; stem low, spreading or prostrate; seeds 

 6-0.8 mm. in diameter, sharp-edged; waste places, nat. from 

 Eur. July-Sept. Oak-leaved Goosefoot C. glaucum L. 



4. Leaves sharply divaricately lobed or coarsely few-toothed, thin, large, 

 green, glabrous; sepals slightly keeled, incompletely covering the 

 seed; pericarp firmly adherent; seed 1.5-2 mm. in diameter; fields, 

 woods, or waste ground, nat. from Eur. July-Sept. [C. gigantosper- 

 mum Aellen] C. hybridum L. 



2. KoCHiA Roth 



K. scoparia (L.) Schrad. Summer Cypress. Frequently cultivated, and 

 occasionally spontaneous in waste ground or along roads; introd. from Eur. 

 July-Sept. 



3. Cycloloma Moq. 



C. atriplicijoltum (Spreng.) Coult. Winged Pigweed. Sandy soil, local. 

 July-Aug. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 52. Amaranthaceae 121 



4. CoRiSPERMUM L. Bugseed 

 C. nitidum Kit. Sandy soil, local. July-Sept. 



5. Atriplex L. 

 1. Leaves lanceolate; bracts rhombic, cuneate at base; waste ground; nat. from 



Eur. July-Aug ^. patula L. 



1. Leaves hastate; bracts ovate, rounded at base; waste ground; nat. from Eur. 



Aug. -Oct ^- hastata L. 



6. Salsola L. — Saltwort 

 S. pestijer A. Nels. Sandy soil, local; nat. from Asia. July-Sept. [S. kali 

 var. tenuijolia G. F. W. Mey.} 



52. Amaranthaceae J. St. Hil. — Amaranth Family 



1. Leaves alternate; filaments separate and distinct; anthers 2-loculed. 



2. Flowers monoecious or polygamous; both staminate and pistillate flowers with 3-5 



sepals; fruit thin, dry, dehiscent 1. Amaranthus 



2. Flowers dioecious; pistillate flowers without a calyx; staminate flowers with 5 

 conspicuous mucronate sepals longer than the bracts; fruit fleshy, 3-5-angled, 



indehiscent — 2. Acnida 



1. Leaves opposite; plants pubescent; flowers perfect; calyx 5-cleft; filaments united 

 in a tube; anthers 1-loculed 3. Froelichia 



1. Amaranthus L. — Amaranth 

 1. Flowers in dense terminal and axillary panicles; plants tall, erect. 



2. Leaves with a pair of rigid axillary spines; waste ground, common; nat. 



from trop. Am. July-Oct. Spiny Amaranth A. spinosus L. 



2. Leaves without spines. 



3. Spikes stout, 1-1.5 cm. thick; stem pubescent; common weed in fields 

 and waste ground; nat. from trop. Am. Aug.-Sept. Rough Pigweed 



A. retroflexus L. 



3. Spikes slender, 4-6 mm. thick; stem glabrous. 



4. Bracts deltoid-lanceolate, half the length of the .sepals; river banks, 



rare A. ambigens Standi. 



4. Bracts subulate, twice the length of the sepals; weed in waste 



ground; nat. from trop. Am. Sept.-Oct A. hybridus L. 



1. Flowers in small axillary clusters; plants diffusely branched or prostrate. 

 5. Stems prostrate or ascending, forming a loose mat; upper leaves scarcely 

 reduced; sepals 4-5; utricle smooth or nearly so when dry; seeds about 

 1 mm. in diameter; fields and roadsides, common. July-Sept. Prostrate 



Amaranth A . blitoides Wats. 



5. Stems erect, forming round, bushy-branched tumbleweeds in late summer; 

 upper leaves much reduced; sepals 3; utricle rugose when dry; seeds 

 about 0.5 mm. in diameter; waste ground and fields, common. July- 

 Sept. Tumbleweed A. graecizans L. 



2. Acnida L. — Water-hemp 



l.Stem erect, 1-3 m. tall; leaves lanceolate or ovate-lanceolate. 

 2. Leaves obtuse or notched at the apex; pistillate inflorescence of slender in- 

 terrupted spikes; fruit circumscissile; sandy soil. July-Sept 



A. tamariscina (Nutt.) Wood 




122 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



2. Leaves acute or acuminate; pistillate inflorescence of closely clustered 

 spikes; fruit indehiscent or splitting irregularly; seeds about 0.8 mm. in 



diameter; banks of streams. July-Sept. [A. tuberculata Moq.} 



A. altissima Riddell 



l.Stem slender, decumbent or prostrate, 10-40 cm. long; leaves obovate or 

 spatulate, rounded or obtuse at the apex; pistillate inflorescence of closely 

 clustered spikes; fruit indehiscent or irregularly splitting; seeds 1-1.2 mm. 



in diameter; banks of streams. July-Sept 



A. subnuda (Wats.) S'tandley 



3. Froelichia Moench 



F. campestris Small. Sandy soil, chiefly in the w. half of the state; also 

 Kankakee Co. June-Sept. [F. floridana of auth., not Moq.} 



53. Phytolaccaceae Lindl. — Pokeweed Family 

 1. Phytolacca L. — Pokeweed 

 P. americana L. Woods and fields, common. June-Sept. [P. decandra L.} 



54. Nyctaginaceae Lindl. — Four-o'clock Family 



1. MiRABILIS L. 

 (^Allwnia Loefl.; Oxvbaphus L'Her.) 



1. Leaves ovate or ovate-lanceolate, all except the uppermost petiolate; gravelly 

 or sandy soil, particularly along railroad embankments, common through- 

 out 111. May-Aug. Umbrella-wort M. nyctaginea (Michx.) MacM. 



1. Leaves linear to lanceolate, sessile. 



2. Leaves lanceolate, 0.5-5 cm. wide; sandy meadow near lake, Hyde Park, 



Chicago, Aug. 8, 1889, Agnes Chase 1173 



M. hirsuta (Pursh) MacM. 



2. Leaves linear, thick, glaucous, usually not more than 5 mm. wide; road- 

 side near Morgan Park, Cook Co., Aug. 16, 1898, Hdl 



M. linearis (Pursh) Heimerl 



55. Illecebraceae Lindl. — Whidow-wort Family 



1 . Leaves oval 1 . ParoiiMchia 



1. Leaves linear-subulate 2. Scleranihus 



1. Paronychia Adans. — Forked-chickweed 



(Anychia Michx.) 

 l.Stem glabrous; sepals oval; utricle longer than the calyx; sandy soil. June- 



Aug P. canadensis (L.) Wood 



1. Stem puberulent; sepals ovate; utricle about as long as the calyx; sandy soil, 



not common. June-Sept. [Anychia polygonoides Raf.] 



P. jastigiata (Raf.) Fern. 



2. Scleranthus L. 

 S. annuus L. Waste ground; nat. from Eur. Apr. -Oct. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 58. Caryophyllaceae 123 



56. AizoACEAE A. Br. — Carpetweed Family 



1. Mollugo L. 



M. verticillata L. Carpetweed. Fields, roadsides, and waste places, com- 

 mon; nat. from the s. states. June-Oct. 



57. PoRTULACACEAE Reichenb. — Purslane Family 



1. Leaves several, clustered at the base of the stem, terete; petals rose; capsule papery, 



opening by 3 valves 1. Talinum 



I. Leaves not all clustered at the base of the stem. 



2. Leaves 2, linear-lanceolate; petals pink or white; capsule 3-6-seeded, opening by 



3 valves 2. Cla})tonia 



2. Leaves numerous, thick, spatulate; petals yellow (in our species); capsule circum- 

 scissile, many-seeded 3. Poriulaca 



I. Talinum Adans. 

 T. rugospermum Holz. Rock Pink. Sandy soil, rare; Henderson, La Salle, 

 Lee, Ogle, and Jo Daviess counties. June- Aug. 



2. Claytonia L. 



C. virginica L. Spring Beauty. Woods and waysides, abundant throughout 

 the state. Mar-. May. 



3. PORTULACA L. 



p. oleracea L. Purslane. Fields and waste ground, common; nat. from Eur. 

 July-Sept. 



58. Caryophyllaceae Reichenb. — Pink Family 



1. Sepals separate or nearly so; petals without claws or appendages. 

 2. Petals deeply 2-cleft or 2-parted. 



3. Capsules cylindrical, commonly curved, opening by a row of 10 (rarely 8) apical 

 teeth; styles 5 1. Ceraslium 



3. Capsules ovoid or ellipsoid, splitting into usually 6 (rarely 8 or 10) valves; styles 



3 (except in S. aquatica) 2. Stellaria 



2. Petals entire or emargmate, or absent. 



4. Styles as many as the sepals 3. Sagina 



4. Styles fewer than the sepals 4. Arenaria 



1. Sepals united into a tubular calyx; petals clawed. 



5. Calyx-teeth much longer than the calyx-tube; styles 5 5. Agroslemma 



5. Calyx-teeth much shorter than the calyx-tube. 



6. Styles 5 or 3 (0 in the staminate flowers of L\]chnis). 



7. Styles 3, rarely 4; flowers perfect; capsule opening by 6 teeth 6. Silene 



7. Styles 5 (or flowers unisexual) ; capsule opening by 10 teeth 7. L))chtus 



6. Styles 2; calyx terete or 5-angled 8. Saponaria 



I. Cerastium L. — Mouse-ear Chickweed 

 L Petals much longer than the sepals. 



2. Flowers L2-2 cm. broad; fruiting calyx 6-7 mm. long; capsule 12-14 mm. 

 long; seeds 1 mm. in diameter; plants perennial; in thin soil, chiefly in 

 limestone areas. May-June. [C. arvense sensu auth., non L.; C. arvense 

 var. oblongifolium (Torr.) Hollick &C Britt.] Field Mouse-ear Chick- 

 weed C. velutinum Raf. 



2. Flowers 5-8 mm. broad; fruiting calyx 4-5 mm. long; capsule 9-11 mm. 

 long; seeds 0.4-0.6 mm. in diameter; plants annual; moist ground, com- 

 mon. Apr. -May. Nodding Mouse-ear Chickweed C. nutans Raf. 




124 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



1. Petals equalling or only slightly longer than the sepals. 



3. Pedicels longer than the sepals, the cyme therefore rather loose; sepals 

 acutish or obtuse, 4-5 mm. long, elliptical-lanceolate, broadly scarious- 

 margined; stems spreading, 10-30 cm. long; plants perennial or bien- 

 nial; waste ground, lawns, fields, common, nat. from Eur. May-Aug. 

 Common Mouse-ear Chickweed C. vulgatiim L. 



3. Pedicels scarcely longer than the sepals, the cyme therefore compact; 

 sepals acuminate, 5-6 mm. long, linear-lanceolate, narrowly scarious- 

 margined; stem erect, 10-25 cm. tall; plants annual; moist ground; nat. 

 from Eur. Apr.-May C. viscosuf?i L. 



2. Stellaria L. — Chickweed 

 (Alsine L. ex p., non Wahl.) > 



1 . Leaves oval or ovate. 



2. Petals shorter than the sepals; stem terete, with a single line of hairs; 

 stamens 3-7; styles 3-4; plant annual; waste ground and fields, very 



common, adv. from Eur. Mar.-June. Common Chickweed 



S. media (L.) Cyrill. 



2. Petals much longer than the sepals; stem more or less angled, glabrous 



below, glandular-puberulent above; stamens 10; styles 5; plant peren- 

 nial; waste places, occasional; adv. from Eur. Waukegan, Lake Co., 

 July 1, 1908, Gates 2820; Jo Daviess Co., G. N. Jones 15861; Sanga- 

 mon Co., G. D. Fuller 4460. Water Chickweed 



S. aquatica (L.) Scop. 



1 . Leaves linear or narrowly lanceolate. 



3. Pedicels erect; flowers few or solitary; leaves linear-lanceolate, widest near 



the base; seeds smooth; moist ground, not common. July-Aug. [5. 

 longipes sensu auth., non Goldie} S. stricta Richards. 



3. Pedicels spreading, the cymes diffuse. 



4. Leaves linear, acute at each end; fruiting calyx 2-3 mm. long; seeds 

 smooth; moist ground. May-June iS'. longifolia Muhl. 



4. Leaves narrowly lanceolate, broadest near the base; fruiting calyx 4-5 

 mm. long; seeds rugulose; moist ground; adv. from Eur. May-June 

 S. gramin-'a L. 



3. Sagina L. — Pearl wort 

 S. decumbens (Ell.) Torr. & Gray. Dry ground, not common. Apr.-May. 



4. Arenaria L. — Sandwort 



{Moehringia L.) 

 1. Leaves oval or ovate; valves of the capsules 2-toothed or 2-cIeft. 



2. Leaves oval, obtuse, 1-3 cm. long; sepals obtuse, shorter than the petals; 



seeds smooth; woods in the n. half of the state. May-June 



A. lateriflora L. 



2. Leaves ovate, acute, 2-8 mm. long; sepals acuminate, longer than the 

 petals; seeds rough; waste ground; adv. from Eur. Apr.-June. Thyme- 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 58. Caryophyllaceae 125 



leaved Sandwort .' A. serpyllijolia L. 



1 . Leaves linear-filif orm or subulate; valves of the capsule entire. 



3. Leaves rigid, subulate, evergreen, with others fascicled in the axils; plant 

 perennial, glabrous; capsule shorter than the sepals; dry wooded bluffs, 

 and on rocks, rare; n. 111. May-July. [/4. mkhauxii (Fenzl) Hook, f.] 

 A. stricta Michx. 



3. Leaves soft, linear-filiform; plant annual; pedicels glandular-puberulent; 

 capsule nearly equalling the sepals; wooded slopes along streams, rare. 

 May-June A . patula Michx. 



5. Agrostemma L. 



A. githago L. Com Cockle. An occasional weed in fields and waste ground; 

 seeds poisonous; adv. from Eur. May-July. 



6. SiLENE L. — Catchfly 

 1 . Leaves opposite, not whorled. 



2. Calyx ovoid or clavate, not becoming inflated in fruit or constricted at 

 the mouth. 

 3. Stem glabrous or nearly so, or the upper intemodes glutinous. 



4. Flowers 12-17 mm. in diameter, in flat-topped cymes; calyx clavate, 

 1-1.5 cm. long; leaves ovate-lanceolate; waste places, adv. from 

 Eur. June-July. Sweet William S. armeria L. 



4. Flowers 3-4 mm. in diameter, paniculate; calyx ovoid, 5-8 mm. long; 



upper leaves linear to lanceolate; roadsides and fields, not uncom- 

 mon. May-July. Sleepy Catchfly .S". antirrhina L. 



3. Stem puberulent. 



5. Calyx 12-25 mm. long. 



6. Petals white or pink; calyx 12-16 mm. long; roadsides and fields, 



adv. from Eur. June-July. Forked Catchfly 



S. dkhotoma Ehrh. 



6. Petals crimson or scarlet; calyx 15-25 mm. long. 



7. Leaves ovate-lanceolate; petals mostly undivided; roadsides and 

 prairies, s. 111., rare. July-Aug. Royal Catchfly S. regia Sims 



7. Leaves spatulate or oblanceolate; petals 2-cleft; woods. Apr.- 

 July. Firepink S. virginici L. 



5. Calyx 3-4 cm. long, its lobes linear-lanceolate, 4-8 mm. long; petals 

 white; cultivated ground or roadsides, adv. from Eur. June-July. 

 Night- flowering Catchfly S. noct'tflora L. 



2. Calyx strongly inflated in fruit, more or less constricted at the mouth. 

 8. Calyx campanulate or subglobosc, veiny; plants glaucous; flowers nu- 

 merous in loose terminal panicles; fields or roadsides, adv. from Eur. 

 May-July. [5'. inflata Sm.; S. vulgaris (Moench) Garcke; S. lati- 



folta (Mill.) Britten & Rendle.} Bladder Catchfly 



S. cucubalus Wibel 




126 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



8. Calyx subcylindrical; plants not glaucous; flowers few, usually solitary; 



woods, not common. June-July. [5. alba Muhl.} 



S. nivea (Nutt.) Otth. 



1. Leaves mostly in whorls of four, acuminate; petals white, 1.5-2 cm. long; 

 calyx campanulate, 1-1.5 cm. long; woods, common. June-Aug. [5. stel- 

 lata var. scabrella Palmer & Steyerm.} S. stellata (L.) Ait. 



7. Lychnis L. — Campion 



{Melandrium Roehl) 

 1. Flowers white or pink, fragrant, opening in the evening; similar in appear- 

 ance to Silene noctiflora, but plants dioecious or monoecious, calyx-teeth 

 triangular, 3-5 mm. long, styles 5, and the capsules with 5 bifid teeth; 



fields and roadsides; nat. from Eur. May-Aug. Evening Campion 



L. alba Mill. 



1. Flowers red, inodorous, opening in the morning; waste places, occasional; 

 adv. from Eur. June-Aug. Red Campion L. dioica L. 



8. Saponaria L. 



{Vaccaria Medic.) 

 1. Calyx terete; flowers 2-3 cm. in diameter (sometimes double), in dense 

 corymbiform cymes; plants perennial; roadsides, common, adv. from Eur. 

 June-Sept. Bouncing Bet S. officinalis L. 



1. Calyx sharply 5-angled; flowers 6-8 mm. in diameter, few, in a loose cyme; 

 plants annual; roadsides and fields, adv. from Eur. June-Aug. [Vaccaria 

 vulgaris Host} Cow-herb S. vaccaria L. 



59. Elatinaceae Lindl. — Waterwort Family 

 1. Elatine L. — Waterwort 

 E. brachysperma Gray. Shallow water, rare. Springfield, Bebb.; Athens, 

 Hall. 



60. Magnoliaceae J. St. Hil. — Magnolia Family 



1. Leaves entire, acute or acuminate; buds pubescent; fruit a follicle \. Magnolia 



1 . Leaves with a truncate apex and two broad lateral lobes; buds glabrous; fruit a 

 samara 2. LirioJendron 



1. Magnolia L. 



M. acuminata L. Cucumber Tree. Woods, s. 111., as far north as Union, 

 Johnson, and Pope counties. May. 



2. Liriodendron L. — Tulip Tree 

 L. tulipifera L. Woods, local; s. 111., extending northw. to St. Clair and 

 Crawford counties. Apr.-June. 



61. Annonaceae DC. — Custard-apple Family 

 1. AsiMiNA Adans. 



A. triloba (L.) Dunal. Pawpaw. Woods, nearly throughout 111., extending 

 northw. to Cook and Lee counties. Apr.-May. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 62. Ranunculaceae 127 



62. Ranunculaceae Juss. — Buttercup Family 



1 . Flowers yellow. 



2. Petals none; sepals petal-like, yellow, deciduous; leaves crenate; carpels several- 

 ovuled, becoming follicles I . Callha 



2. Petals present; sepals green; carpels I -ovuled, becoming achenes 9. Ranunculus 



I. Flowers not wholly yellow. 



3. Flowers white to pink. 



4. Stems climbing; leaves opposite; flowers in panicles, dioecious 15. Clemalis 



4. Stems not climbing; leaves not opposite. 



5. Flowers zygomorphic; upper petal spurred; leaves palmately divided or cleft; 



inflorescence a raceme 7. Delphinium 



5. Flowers actinomorphic, spurless. 



6. Aquatic plants with finely dissected leaves; sepals 5, green; petals 5, white; 



carpels I -ovuled, becoming achenes 9. Ranunculus 



6. Not aquatic, mostly woodland plants. 



7. Flowers racemose; petals small, stamen-like or none; leaves ternately 

 compound. 

 8. Racemes simple, short; fruit red or white, berry-like 5. Aclaea 



8. Racemes paniculate, elongate; fruit a follicle 6. Cimicifuga 



7. Flowers solitary or in pairs, or 3 or 4 in an umbel, not racemose. 



9. Flowers with an involucre of 3 sepal-like bracts immediately beneath 



the calyx; leaves 3-lobed 14. Hepalica 



9. Flowers without an involucre, or the involucre similar to the leaves, and 



remote from the flowers. 



10. Sepals 3, petaloid, evanescent; petals none; carpels 2-ovuled, 



becoming berries ; leaves reniform, palmately lobed....2. Hydrastis 



10. Sepals 5 or more, petal-like; petals none; fruit of achenes or 



follicles. 



II. Leaves palmately lobed or cleft, the segments usually sessile; 



fruit of achenes; plants with a rhizome or caudex 



12. Anemone 



1 1 . Leaves ternately compound, the leaflets stalked. 



12. Flower solitary; leaflets mucronulate; carpels 3-4, each 2-3- 

 ovuled, becoming divaricate, slender-beaked follicles 5 mm. 

 long; style present; roots not at all or only slightly 



thickened 3. Isopyrum 



12. Flowers usually 3 or 4 in an umbel; leaflets not mucronulate; 

 carpels 4-15, each 1 -ovuled, becoming ribbed achenes 8-12 

 mm. long at maturity; stigma sessile; roots tuberous- 

 thickened 13. Anemonella 



3. Flowers red, blue, purple, or greenish. 



13. Leaves entire, basal, linear; sepals minutely spurred at base; receptacle becom- 

 ing conspicuously elongated 8. Myosurus 



13. Leaves lobed, parted, or compound. 



14. Flowers red, spurred, nodding so that the five spurs point upward; stamens 



exserted; anthers yellow 4. Aqudegia 



14. Flowers not red. 



15. Flowers spurred, blue; leaves alternate 6. Delphinium 



1 5. Flowers spurless ; petals none. 

 16. Leaves alternate. 



17. Leaves simple, palmately lobed; flowers all perfect. 



18. Flowers solitary, subtended by 3 small sessile bracts simulating 



a calyx; sepals 6-12 14. Hepalica 



18. Flowers corymbose; involucres none; sepals 3-5, usually 4.... 



1 1 . Traulvetleria 



17. Leaves ternately compound; flowers polygamous or dioecious.... 



10. Thalictrum 



16. Leaves not alternate; flowers solitary. 



19. Leaves (of the stem) whorled, dissected 12. Anemone 



19. Leaves opposite 15. Clematis 




128 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



1. Caltha L. — Marsh-marigold 

 C. palustris L. Wet ground, centr. and n. III. Apr. -May. 



2. Hydrastis Ellis 

 H. canadensis L. Goldenseal. Woods, not common. Apr.-May. 



3. ISOPYRUM L. 



7. b'lternatum (Raf.) T. & G. False Rue Anemone. Moist woods, common 

 throughout 111., except the s. part. Apr.-May. 



4. Aquilegla L. — Columbine 

 A. canadensis L. Wooded ravines, throughout III. Apr.-June. 



5. AcTAEA L. — Baneberry 



1. Pedicels in fruit nearly as thick as the peduncle; petals usually truncate at 

 apex; fruit greenish white, tipp>ed with the sessile purple stigma; seeds 3- 

 10, each 4-5 mm. long; rich woods, common. Apr.-June. \^A. pachypoda 



Ell.; A. "brachypoda" Rydb.} White Baneberry. Doll's Eyes 



A. alba (L.) Mill. 



1. Pedicels slender; petals spatulate, tapering to the tip; fruit red, poisonous; 



seeds 10-16, each 3-4 mm. long; woods, n. 111. Apr.-June 



...A. rubra (Ait.) Willd. 



6. CiMICIFUGA L. 



C. racemosa (L.) Nutt. Black Cohosh. Bugbane. Woods, very rare, St. 

 Clair and Wabash counties. June-July. 



7. Delphinium L. — Larkspur 



1. Carpel 1; follicle erect, pubescent; flowers blue, pink, or white; annual, nat. 

 from Eur., frequently cult, and occasionally escaped to roadsides, fields, 

 and waste places. June-Aug D. ajacis L. 



1. Carpels 3; native perennials. 



2. Follicles erect, puberulent; roots elongate; rac-emes 10-20 cm. long. 



3. Flowers white or bluish white; racemes virgate; seeds wingless; prairies 

 and open woods, w. 111., rare. May-June. [D. albescens Rydb.; D. 

 penardi of auth., not Huth} Prairie Larkspur D. vircscens Nutt. 



3. Flowers blue; raceme lax; seeds winged; "banks of the Mississippi near 



Oquawka," Patterson. [D. azureum Michx.} Blue Larkspur 



D. carolinianum Walt. 



2. Follicles wid'ely divergent; roots short, tuberous; racemes lax; flowers blue 

 (rarely white); woods, local; apparently absent from the n. part of the 

 state. May-June. Dwarf Larkspur D. tricorne Michx. 



8. Myosurus L. — Mousetail 



M. minimus L. Moist ground in woods, local. Apr.-June. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 62. Ranunculaceae 129 



9. Ranunculus L. — Buttercup 



{Datrachium S. F. Gray) 

 1 . Petals white; achenes transversely wtiiikled; plants aquatic. 



2. Beak of achene 0.5-1 mm. long; leaves rigid, not collapsing when wirh- 

 drav/n from the water; ponds and slow streams. May-July. [/?. circi- 

 natiis sensu auth., non Sibth.} R. longirostrts Godr. 



2. Beak of achene minute; leaves soft, usually collapsing when withdrawn 



from the water; ponds and slow streams. May-July. {R. aquatilis L., 

 var. capillaceus DC.} R. trichopbyllus Chaix 



1. Petals yellow; achenes not transversely wrinkled. 



3. Plants stoloniferous, the cordate or reniform crenate glabrous leaves 



basal and at the nodes of the stolons; flowers 6-8 mm. in diameter, the 

 5-8 petals slightly shorter than the oval sepals; achenes thin-v/alled, dis- 

 tinctly striate or ribbed, minutely apiculate, in ellipsoid heads 5-15 mm. 

 long; wet sandy soil, n. 111., not common. May-July. \^Oxygraphis cym- 



balaria (Pursh) Prantl; Halerpestes cymbalaria (Pursh) GreeneJ 



R. cymbalaria Pursh 



3. Plants not stonoliferous; achenes not thin-walled or striate. 



4. Plants aquatic, immersed in water or creeping on mud, the leaves pal- 

 mately lobed or divided, or finely dissected into filiform divisions. 

 June-Aug. [R. delphinifolius Torr.} R. flabellaris Raf. 



4. Plants not floating; if stems creeping in mud and rooting at the nodes, 

 the leaves not finely dissected. 



5. Basal leaves merely denticulate or crenate. 



6. Leaves lanceolate or oblong- lanceolate, remotely denticulate. 



7. Achenes compressed, the body 1-2 mm. long, the beak subulate, 

 1 mm. long; head of achenes 6-8 mm. in diameter; plants 

 perennial; swamps or ditches, local. June-Aug. [R. obtusius- 

 cidus Raf. and R. laxicaulis (T. dC G.) Darby, are nomina 

 dubia.} R. ambigens Wats. 



7. Achenes turgid, keeled, 0.7-1 mm. long, apiculate; head of 



achenes 3-4 mm. in diameter; plants annual; wet ground, s. 



III. May-June R. oblongijolius Ell. 



6. Basal leaves reniform or cordate, merely crenate (some of the 

 later ones often lobed or cleft) ; stem-leaves cleft or lobed; 

 achenes minutely beaked, in globose bear's. 



8. Petals much longer than the sepals; flowers 1.5 cm. or more in 



diameter; plant more or less pubescent; prairies, Jo Daviess 

 Co., May 1891, Pepoon. [R. oralis Raf. (?); R. brevicaulis 



Hook.} Prairie Buttercup R. rhomboideus Goldie 



8. Petals shorter than the sepals; flowers less than 1 cm. in diam- 

 eter; plant glabrous or nearly so; moist ground, very common. 



Apr. -May. Small-flowered Buttercup R. abortivus L. 



5. Leaves all lobed or divided. 



9. Petals not longer than the sepals; flowers less than 1 cm. in diam- 

 eter. 




130 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



10. Stem glabrous or nearly so, hollow; acbencs merely apiculate, 

 in ellipsoid heads; along ditches, in the n. half of th? state. 

 May-July. Celery-leaved Buttercup R. sceleratus L. 



10. Stem pubescent. 



11. Basal leaves slightly lobed; achenes with a short, recurved 

 beak, in globose heads; woods, s. 111., not common. Apr.- 

 May R. micranthus Nutt. 



11. Basal leaves deeply parted or divided. 



12. Leaf-divisions merely serrate; heads of achenes globose, 

 the achenes with slender, hooked beaks; woods. Apr.- 

 June R. recurvatus Poir. 



12. Leaf-divisions cleft or incised; heads of achenes ellip- 

 soid, the achenes with short nearly straight beaks; wet 

 ground. July-Aug R. pennsyhanicus L. £. 



9. Petals longer than the sepals; flowers 1.5-2.5 cm. in diameter. 



13. Beak of the mature achene less than 1 mm. long, recurved. 

 14. Stem more or less cormose-thickened at base; leaves with 

 the terminal division stalked; sepals reflexed; fields and 

 roadsides, adv. from Europe. May-July. Bulbous Butter- 

 cup R. bulbosus L. 



14. Stem not swollen at base; leaves with all the divisions ses- 



sile; sepals spreading; roadsides and fields, adv. from 

 Europe. May-July. Tall Buttercup R. acris L. 



13. Beak of the mature achene 1 mm. or more in length. 



15. Petals broadly obovate; plants stoloniferous. 



16. Beak of the achene curved; mature achene 2-2.5 mm. 

 in diameter; roadsides and fields, comm.on; adv. from 



Europe. Apr.-June. Creeping Buttercup 



R. repens L. 



16. Beak nearly straight; mature achene 3-3.5 mm. in diam- 



eter; wet woods, common. Apr.-June. Marsh Butter- 

 cup R. septejitnonalis Poir. 



15. Petals oval or narrowly obovate; achenes 2-2.5 mm. in 

 diameter; plants not stoloniferous. 



17. Stem strigose; leaf -lobes narrow; root tuberous-thick- 



ened; woods and meadows. Apr.-May. Tufted Butter- 

 cup R. fascicularis Muhl. 



17. Stem villous; leaf-lobes oval to oblanceolate; roots not 

 thickened; woods or roadsides. Apr.-May. Bristly 

 Buttercup R. hispidus Michx. 



10. Thalictrum L. — Meadow-rue 



1. Leaflets glabrous on both surfaces. 



2. Leaflets thin, suborbicular in outline, obtusely 5-9-lobed; stem-leaves 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 62. Ranunculaceae 131 



slender-petioled; rich woods. Apr.-May. Early Meadow-rue 



T. dioicum L. 



2. Leaflets thick, oval, sharply 3-Iobed, revolute-margiri'ed; stem-leaves ses- 



sile or nearly so; moist thickets and hedge-rows. June-July 



T. hypoglaucum Rydb. 



1. Leaflets glandular or short-pubescent beneath; stem-leaves sessile. 



3. Leaflets finely glandular with short-stipitate or sessile glands on the lower 



surface; woods and roadsides, local. May-June. Waxy Meadow-rue 



T. revolutum DC. 



3. Leaflets finely short-pubescent on the lower surface, not glandular; moist 



ground, local. May-June. Purplish Meadow-rue 



T. dasycarpiim Fisch. 8C Lall. 



1 1 . Trautvetteria Fisch. & Meyer 



T. cawlinensis (Walt.) Vail. False Bugbane. Possibly along the Wabash 

 River in s.e. 111.; near Beardstown, Cass Co., S. B. Mead. June-July. 



12. Anemone L. 



(Pulsatilla Adans.) 



1. Styles elongate, plumose; plant villous; leaf-segments linear; sepals 5-7, 

 bluish-purple, 2-3.5 cm. long; prairie soil, n. 111. Mar. -Apr. [/4nemone 

 patens var. woljgangiana of Gray, not Koch; Pulsatilla hirsutissima 

 (Pursh) Britt.} Pasque Flower A. ludoviciana Nutt. 



1 . Styles shorter, glabrous or pubescent, not plumose; sepals white. 



2. Achenes villous. 



3. Stem-leaves siessile; stem arising from a small tuber; sepals 6-20, pubes- 

 cent outside; bluflFs, rare; centr. and n. 111. Apr.-May 



A. caroliniana Walt. 



3. Stem-leaves stalked; plants with rhizomes. 



4. Fruiting heads cylindrical, more than twice as long as wide; style 1 

 mm. long; leaf-segments toothed above the middle; roadsides or 

 open woods, centr. and n. 111. May-July A. cyl.ndrlca Gray 



4. Fruiting heads ellipsoid, not more than twice as long as wide; style 

 1.5-2 mm. long; leaf-segments sharply serrate to below the middle; 



woods, throughout 111. June-Aug. Tall Anemone 



A. virginiana L. 



2. Achenes not villous; plants with rhizomes. 



5. Stem-leaves sessile; basal leaves simple, deeply lobed; achenes wing- 

 margined when mature; flowers 1-3; alluvial soil, centr. and n. III. 

 May- July. Meadow Anemone A. canadensis L. 



5. Stem-leaves stalked; basal leaf solitary, compound, appearing later; 

 achenes not wing-margined; flower solitary; rich woods, not common; 



chiefly n. and e.-centr. III. Apr.-May. Wood Anemone 



A. quinquefolia L. 




132 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



13. Anemonella Spach 



{Svndesmon Hoffmg.) 

 A. thalictroides (L.) Spach. Rue-anemone. Dry open woods, local. Apr.- 

 May. [Thalictrum anemonoides Michx.] 



14. Hepatica Hill 

 1. Leaf-lobes acute or acutish; flowers varying from purplish to white; woods, 



not uncommon. Apr. -May [H. acuta (Pursh) Britt.] 



H. acutiloba DC. 



1. Leaf-lobes rounded at the apex; woods, n.e. III. [H. triloba sensu auth., 



non Chaix} H. americana (DC.) Ker 



15. Clematis L. 



{Viorna Reichenb.; Atragene L.) 

 1. Flowers solitary, nodding; sepals purplish. 



2. Leaves conspicuously reticulate beneath; sepals thick, leathery, the tips 

 recurved, marginless or only narrowly margined; fruiting styles glabrous 

 or nearly so; moist woods and thickets, common. June-Aug. Leather- 

 flower C. pitcheri T. &: G. 



2. Leaves thin, not conspicuously reticulate. 



3. Sepals thick, leathery, 1.5-2.5 cm. long; fruiting styles plumose; thickets 

 and stream banks, rare, s. 111. June-July. [Viorna ndgwayi Standi.] 



C. viorna L. 



3. Sepals thin, 3-4.5 cm. long, with wide undulate or crisped margins; 

 fruiting styles pubescent but not plumose; s. 111., not common. Pulas- 

 ki Co., Brendel C. crispa L. 



1. Flowers panicled; sepals white, thin, spreading, 8-12 mm. long; moist 

 ground, local. July-Aug. Virgin's Bower C. v'lrgintana L. 



63. Nelumbonaceae Lindl. — Lotus Family 



1 . Petals and sepals each 3-4. 



2. Leaves all peltate, entire, floating; stamens 12-18; carpels 4-18 1. Brasenia 



2. Submersed leaves dissected; stamens 6; carpels 2-3 2. Cahomha 



1. Petals and stamens numerous; sepals 4-5; leaves orbicular, 20-90 cm. broad; flowers 

 pale yellow, 10-25 cm. in diameter; carpels immersed in a top-shaped receptacle 

 3. N dumbo 



1. Brasenia Schreb. 



B. schreberi Gmel. Watershield. Ponds and slow streams, rare. Lnke and 

 McHenry counties. June-July. 



2. Cabomba Aubl. 



C. caroliniana Gray. Ponds, s. 111., rare. Mt. Carmel, Oct. 12, 1876, 

 Schneck 40. 



3. Nelumbo Adans. 



{I\chm)hitim Juss.) 

 N. lutea (Willd.) Pers. American Lotus. Shallow water and muddy 

 shores, local. July-Aug. [Nymphaea pentapetala Walt., based on a monstros- 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 66. Berberidaceae 133 



64. Nymphaeaceae DC. — Waterlily Family 



I . Leaves oval or ovate-lanceolate; flowers yellow; stamens hypogynous ; sepals 5-7; 



petals 10-20, small, filament-like 1. Niiphar 



I . Leaves orbicular; flowers white; stamens epigynous ; sepals 4; petals numerous 



- - 2. N^mphaea 



I. NUPHAR Smith 

 (N^mphaea L., ex p.; Nymphozaiilhus Rich.) 

 L Leaves oval; flowers 3-9 cm. in diameter; sepals 6; stamens in 5-7 rows; 

 ponds and slow streams, rare. June-Aug. \N. advena var. brevtfolia 



Standi.] Yellow Pond Lily N. advena Ait. 



L Leaves ovate-lanceolate; flowers 2-3 cm. in diameter; sepals 5; stamens in 4- 

 5 rows. Reported from the Lower Wabash Valley by J. Schneck in 1876. 

 N. sagitttjolia (Walt.) Pursh 



2. Nymphaea L. — Waterlily 

 (Casialia Salisb.) 



1. Flower not fragrant, 10-25 cm. in diameter; petals spatulate; leaves green 

 beneath, prominently veined; rhizome with numerous self-detaching 

 tubers; seeds 3-4.5 mm. long, globose-ovoid; ponds and slow streams, 

 rare. June-Aug. White Waterlily N. tuberosa Paine 



1. Flower very fragrant, 6-12 cm. in diameter; petals elliptical; leaves purplish 

 beneath, indistinctly veined; rhizome without tubers; seeds 1.5-2.5 mm. 

 long, ellipsoid; lakes and shallow ponds, rare, n.e. 111. June-Sept. Fragrant 

 Waterlily N. odorata Ait. 



65. Ceratophyllaceae Gray — Hornwort Family 



1. Ceratophyllum L. — Hornwort 



1. Leaf -divisions linear, rather rigid, flattened, serrate; achenes with a spine on 



each side at the base; ponds and slow streams, not uncommon 



C. demersum L. 



1 . Leaf-divisions filiform, flaccid, entire or with a few short bristles; achenes 

 with 3-5 spines on each side; ponds and slow streams, local; Oquawka, 



Patterson; Kankakee De Selm; without locality, Mead in 1829 



C. echinatum Gray 



66. Berberidaceae T. & G. — Barberry Family 



I . Leaves simple ; flowers solitary, white ; petals 6-8. 



2. Leaves 7-9-lob£cl; berry yellowish green, pulpy, many-seeded, 4-5 cm. long 



I. Podophpllum 



2. Leaves 2-cleft; capsule obccnical, many-seeded, 1.5-2 cm. long, opening at the top 



by a lid 2. Jeffersonia 



I.Leaf ternately compound; flowers yellowish green, in a terminal panicle; sepals 6; 

 petals 6, small, thick, spatulate, gland-like; seeds bluish-black, berry-like, about 8 

 mm. in diameter 3. CaulophvUiim 



1. Podophyllum L. 

 P. peltatum L. Mayappie or Mandrake. Woods, common, Apr. 



2. Jeffersonia Bart. 



r May 36\C>QS 



/. diphylla (L.) Pers. Twinleaf. Woods, local. Apr.-May. /Hq 




134 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



3. Caulophyllum Michx. 

 C. thalictrotdes (L.) Michx. Blue Cohosh. Woods, common. Apr. -May. 



67. Menispermaceae DC. — Moonseed Family 



1 . Leaf-blades usually as broad as or broader than long; petioles 3-20 cm. long: drupe 



black. 



2. Leaf-blades reniform in outline, slightly peltate near the base, palmately 3-7-angled 



or shallowly lobed, dark green and glabrous above, paler and sparsely pilosulous 



along the veins beneath; panicles 2-6 cm. long; petals 6-9; sepals 4-10; stigma 



flabellate; stamens 12-18, or 24; drupe bluish black, about 1 cm. in diameter.... 



1 . Menispermiim 



2. Leaf-blades deeply palmately lobed, cordate at the base, the lobes acuminate; 

 panicles 10-20 cm. long; sepals 9; petals 0; stamens 9 or 12; stigma radiate; 



drupe black, ovoid, 2-2.5 cm. long 2. Calvcocarpiim 



1 . Leaf-blades usually somewhat longer than broad, ovate or deltoid, sinuately lobed or 

 entire, softly pubescent beneath; petioles 1-5 cm. long; petals, sepals, and stamens 

 each 6, or the stamens in the pistillate flowers reduced or lacking; stigma subulate; 

 drupe red, 6-8 mm. long 3. Cocculus 



I. Menispermum L. — Moonseed 



M. canadense L. In alluvial soil in woods, thickets, or along fences, com- 

 mon. May-June. 



2. Calycocarpum Nutt. 



C. lyoni (Pursh) Nutt. Cupseed. Moist thickets, rich woods, and river 

 banks, s. III., rare. June-July. 



3. Cocculus DC. 



{Cebatha Forsk. ; Epibaierium Forst.) 

 C. carolinus (L.) DC. Carolina Snailseed. Banks of streams, s. 111., rare. 

 July-Aug. 



68. Lauraceae Lindl. — Laurel Family 



1 . Flowers appearing with the leaves in corymbose racemes; anthers 4-loculed; leaves 

 often lobed; fruit blue-black 1. Sassafras 



1. Flowers in small roundish nearly sessile umbel-like clusteis en ba:e twigs; anthers 

 2-loculed; leaves always entire; fruit red 2. Lindcra 



1. Sassafras Nees — Sassafras. Ague-tree 



S. albidum (Nutt.) Nees. Rich woods, common throughout 111., except the 

 n. counties. May. Variable as to pubescence. [S. variifoliui7i (Salisb.) Ktze; 

 S. officinale Nees & Eberm.; S. alhidiini var. nioUc (Raf.) Fern.} 



2. LiNDERA Thunb. 

 L. benzoin (L.) Blume. Spice-bush. In moist woods and along streams, 

 common. Mar. -Apr. Specimens with petioles and lower surface of blades more 

 or less pubescent [L. benzoin var. pubescens (Palmer & Steyerm.) Rehd.], 

 have been mistaken for R. melissaefolium (Walt.) Nees, a species of more 

 southerly range which probably does not occur in our limits. [^Benzoin aestivale 

 (L.) Nees.} 



69. Papaveraceae B. Juss. — Poppy Family 



1. Flower white, solitary; petals 4-15 (usually 8), fugacious; leaves basal, glabrous, 

 roundish, palmately lobed, glaucous beneath; plants perennial with horizontal 

 rhizomes; juice red 1. Saugiilnarin 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 70. Fumariaceae 135 



1 . Flowers not white ; petals 4-6, fugacious. 



2. Flowers yellow; leaves pinnatifid; capsules dehiscent from the base; juice yellow. 

 3. Petals 18-25 mm. long; buds erect, ovoid; capsules ovoid, acute at each end, 



bristly-hirsute 2. St\)lophorurn 



3. Petals 8-13 mm. long; buds nodding, obovoid; capsules linear, glabrous.. 



3. Chelidonium 



2. Flowers red or pink; juice milky; capsules globose or pyriform, opening by 4-20 

 tooth-like lids under the margin of the discoid stigma 4. Papavcr 



1. Sanguinaria L. 

 S. canadensis L. Bloodroot. Woods, common. Apr. 



2. Stylophorum Nutt. 

 5". diphyllum (Michx.) Nutt. Celandine Poppy. Woods. Apr.-June. 



3. Chelidonium L. — Celandine 



C. ma'jus L. Occasionally found in waste places, roadsides, and woods, 

 usually near towns; nat. from Eur. May-Aug. 



4. Papaver L. — Poppy 

 1. Plant glaucous, glabrous; leaves lobed, clasping the stem; capsules globose; 



waste places, introd. from Eur. June- Aug. Opium Poppy 



P. somniferum L. 



1. Plant hirsute, not glaucous; leaves pinnate, tapering to the petioled base; 



capsules obovoid or turbinate; waste places, introd. from Eur. May-July. 



Com Poppy P. rhoeas L. 



70. Fumariaceae DC. — Fumitory Family 



1. Corolla with each of the two outer petals spurred or saccate at the base; capsules 



several-seeded 1 . Dicenlra 



1. Corolla with only one petal spurred. 



2. Flowers yellow or pinkish; capsules linear, several-seeded, dehiscent; style p)er- 



sistent 2. Cor^dalis 



2. Flowers deep purple tipped with crimson; pods globose, 1 -seeded, indehiscent, 

 glabrous, minutely tuberculate; style deciduous 3. Fumaria 



1. Dicentra Bemh. 



{Bicuculla Adans.) 



1. Corolla with 2 divergent spurs; mner petals minutely crested; flowers not 

 fragrant; stem from a bulb-like corm; woods, common. Apr.-May. 

 Dutchman's-breeches D. cucullaria (L.) Bernh. 



1 . Corolla heart-shaped, the spurs short and rounded; crests of the inner petals 

 conspicuous, projecting; flowers fragrant; stem from a short horizontal 

 rhizome bearing small whitish or yellowish corms; woods, usually less 

 common than the preceding species, beginning to flower a week or ten 

 days later. Squirrel-corn D. canadensis (Goldie) Walp. 



2. CORYDALIS Vent. 

 (Capnoides Adans.) 



1. Flowers 5-9 mm. long, pale yellow; outer petals crested on the back. 



2. Crest of the petals dentate; capsules pendulous, on slender pedicels 1-1.5 




136 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



cm. long; seeds puncticulate, sharp-margined; moist woods, local. Apr.- 



May. [C. aurea of auth., not Willd.} Pale Corydalis 



C. flctvtda (Raf.) DC. 



2. Crest of the petals entire; capsules erect or ascending, the pedicels 2-3 



mm. long; seeds smooth, round-margined; woods, local. May-July. 



Small-flowered Corydalis C. micrantha (Engelm.) Gray 



1. Flowers 12-16 mm. long; outer petals not crested; capsules erect or as- 

 cending. 



3. Flowers orange-yellow; spur one-third to one-half the length of the corolla; 



capsules 1-1.5 cm. long, the pedicels 2-3 mm. long; seeds smooth; rocky 



woods in the n. third of 111. Apr.-May. Golden Corydalis 



C. montana Engelm. 



3. Flowers rose, tipped with yellow; spur short and rounded, less than I/4 

 the l<ength of the corolla; capsules 3-4 cm. long; pedicels 6-10 mm. 

 long; seeds slightly puncticulate; rocky woods, extending southw. to 

 Morgan Co. May-Aug. Pink Corydalis C sempervirens (L.) Pers. 



3. FuMARiA L. — Fumitory 

 F. officinalis L. Waste places, occasional; adv. from Eur. May-Aug. 



71. Cruciferae B. Juss. — Mustard Family 



1. Petals yellow, yellowish, or cream (sometimes fading whitish). 

 2. Pods several times longer than wide. 



3. Pubescence of smiple hairs or plants glabrous. 

 4. Pods with a distmct flattened or conical beak. 



5. Pods flattened. 2.5-4 cm. long, 2 mm. wide; petals twice as long as the 

 sepals; leaves mostly basal, oblanceolate, smuate-dentate or pinnatifid.... 

 4. Diplolaxis 



5. Pods terete, or slightly angular 3. Drassica 



4. Pods merely tipped with the style or stigma. 



6. Leaves lobed to pinnatifid; petals yellow. 



7. Pods 4-angled; seeds in I row in each locule; valves of the pod 1 -nerved 



5. Barbarea 



7. Pods terete or nearly so. 



8. Valves of the pod with 1-3 nerves; seeds in 1 row in each locule.... 



7. Sis\)mhriiim 



8. Valves nerveless; seeds in 2 rows in each locule 6. Rorippa 



6. Leaves entire, cordate-clasping the stem, glabrous, glaucous; petals cream, 



8-10 mm. long; pods linear, ascending, 8-10 cm. long 9. Connngia 



3. Pubescence (at least of the leaves) of branched hairs. 



9. Leaves entire to dentate; pubescence of appressed, 2-branched hairs which 

 appear as if attached by the middle; petals more than 3 mm. long; pods 



4-angled 10. Erysimum 



9. Leaves bipinnatifid or Iripinnatifid, usually finely dissected, sparsely pubescent 

 with short, branched hairs; petals 2-3 mm. long; pods terete or nearly so 



I 1 . Desciirainia 



2. Pods short, not more than three times as long as wide. 



10. Pods flattened parallel to the broad septum, orbicular, 3 mm. broad, shallowly 

 notched at the apex; leaves linear-spafulate, entire, densely stellate-canescent 



21. Al'pssiitn 



10. Pods turgid, not compressed, or only slightly so, ellipsoid, obovoid, or globose. 



I 1 . Leaves plnnately parted or lobed; pods ellipsoid 6. Rorippa 



I 1 . Leaves entire or toothed, and except in Lesquerella, sagittate-clasping the 

 stem. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 71. Cruciferae 137 



12. Pods globose. 



13. Pods reticulate when dry, indehiscent, 1-2-seeded; plant hispid with 



branched hairs 23. Neslia 



13. Pods smooth, dehiscent, 2-16-seeded; plant stellate-pubescent 



24. Lesquerella 



12. Pods obovoid 25. Camelina 



I. Petals white, pink, or purple (rarely absent), never yellow. 

 14. Pods several times longer than wide (a silique). 



15. Pods indehiscent, cylindrical, several-seeded, with pith between the seeds but 

 no true partitions, breaking at maturity into 1 -seeded segments; petals purple 

 or white. 

 16. Pod 2-seeded, 2-iointed 1. Cal(ile 



16. Pod several-seeded, several-jointed 2. Raphanus 



15. Pods dehiscent by 2 valves, without transverse partitions. 



17. Pods more or less flattened parallel to the septum. 



18. Leaves palmately cleft and divided 13. Dentaria 



18. Leaves otherwise. 



19. Pubescence of simple hairs or none; leaves simple or pinnately 

 divided; valves of the pod nerveless, elastically dehiscent and 

 recurving at maturity 15. Cardamine 



19. Pubescence, at least in part, of branched hairs. 



20. Pods slightly flattened, or nearly terete, more than 1.5 cm. long; 



stem leafy 1 6. Arabis 



20. Pods strongly flattened, 2-15 mm. long; leaves chiefly basal 



(except D. brachycarpa) 12. Draba 



17. Pods terete or tetragonal, net at all flattened. 



21. Valves of the pod conspicuously keeled, 3-nerved; leaves deltoid- 

 cordate, dentate, petiolate; plant with garlic odor 8. Alliaria 



21. Valves of the pod rounded or flat. 



22. Leaves simple, pinnately lobed to entire. 



23. Petals white; plant sparsely pubescent with forked hairs; pods 

 1-1.5 cm. long; stigma 2-lobed 17. Arabidopsis 



23. Petals purple; plant glabrous; lower leaves pinnatifid at the 

 base, dentate, the upper ones lanceolate, dentate, tapering to 



an auriculate base; pods 2-3 cm. long; stigma entire 



14. lodanlhus 



22. Leaves odd-pinnate with 1-1 I roundish or oval leaflets; petals 

 white; mature pods 1-2 cm. long, somewhat curved; aquatic 

 glabrous perennial 1 8. Nasturtium 



14. Pods short, usually not more than three times as long as wide (a silicle). 

 24. Pubescence, if any, of simple hairs. 



25. Pods terete, ellipsoid, or subglobose, not at all flattened; plants glabrous. 



26. Basal leaves 15-30 cm. long, oval or ovate, crenate; root large, thick, 



pungent; pods 2-loculed, seldom maturing, the style 0.5 mm. long 



- 20. Armoracia 



26. Basal leaves smaller, often finely divided (if in water) ; pods 1-loculed, 



the style 2-3 mm. long 19. Neobecl^ia 



25. Pods more or less compressed or flattened. 



27. Plants grayish pubescent; upp>er leaves ovate, clasping, dentate; the 



lower oblanceolate ; pods broadly ovate, indehiscent, papillose, 4 mm. 

 broad, notched at the base, the style 1 -2 mm. long 26. Cardaria 



27. Plants green, pubescent or glabrous; pods suborbicular, dehiscent, 

 notched at the apex. 



28. Pods 2-seeded, less than 5 mm. broad; branches puberulent 



- -.27. Lepidium 



28. Pods several-seeded, 1-1.5 cm. broad; plants glabrous.. ..28. Thlaspi 




138 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



24. Pubescence of forked or stellate hairs, at least on the stem. 



29. Petals deeply bifid; pods ellipsoid to nearly globose, scarcely flattened; 

 seeds several in each locule, winged 22. Derteroa 



29. Petals entire or nearly so; pods strongly flattened. 



30. Plants densely stellate-pubescent; pods orbicular, 3 mm. broad, shallowly 



notched at the apex 21. Alvssum 



30. Plants nearly glabrous; pods triangular 29. Capsella 



1. Cakile Ludw. — Sea Rocket 



C. edentula (Bigel.) Hook. Shore of L. Michigan, not common. July- 

 Sept. 



2. Raphanus L. — Radish 



1. Pods conspicuously torulose and longitudinally ridged when dry, 3-4 mm. 

 thick; petals yellowish, spatulate, clawed, veiny, fading whitish or purplish; 

 fields and waste ground, nat. from Eur. June-Aug. [^Raphanistrum inocuum 

 Moench] Wild Radish R. raphanistrum L. 



l.Pods smooth, not torulose, 5-9 mm. thick; petals purple, less commonly 

 white, 1.5-2 cm. long, conspicuously veined; fields and waste ground, 

 escaped from cult. May-Sept. Radish R. sativus L. 



3. Brassica L. 

 1 . Leaves not clasping the stem. 



2. Pods hispid, 3 cm. long, with a flattened beak half the length of the pod; 



fields and waste places, nat. from Eur. Apr.-Aug. White Mustard 



B. alba (L.) Rabenh. 



2. Pods glabrous. 



3. Pods ascending, 3-5 cm. long, 2-3 mm. thick, the beak 4-8 mm. long; 



pedicels ascending, 6-10 mm. long. 



4. Flowering pedicels 3-6 mm. long, shorter than the flowers; beak of 



the pod more or less flattened, usually containing a seed in the 



basal part; fields and waste places, nat. from Eur. May-Sept. Field 



Mustard B. arvensis (L.) Rabenh. 



4. Flowering pedicels 7-10 mm. long, equalling or exceeding the flowers; 

 beak of the pod terete, seedless; fields and waste places, nat. from 

 Eurasia. July-Sept. Indian Mustard B. juncea (L.) Cosson 



3. Pods 'erect, 1-1.5 cm. long, 1-1.5 mm. thick; beak terete, 1.5-2 mm. 

 long; pedicels erect, 3-5 mm. long; lielcb and waste places, nat. from 



Eur. Apr.-Sept. Black Mustard B. nigra (L.) Koch 



1. Upper leaves sessile and claspmg by the auriculate base. 



5. Leaves glaucous; petals pale yellow; fields and waste places, nat. from 



Eur. Apr.-Oct. Yellow Mustard B. campestris L. 



5. Leaves not glaucous; petals bright yellow; waste places, escaped from 

 cult., native of Eur. Turnip B. rapa L. 



4. Diplotaxis DC. 



D. muralis (L.) DC. Sand Rocket. Waste places, occasional, adv. from 

 Eur. June-Aug. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 71. Cruciferae 139 



5. Barbarea R. Br. — Wintercress 



1. Petals bright yellow, 6-8 mm. long; basal leaves with 2-8 lateral leaflets; 

 mature pods 1.5-2.5 cm. long, the pedicel not as thick as the pod; road- 

 sides, fields, and waste places, very common; nat. from Eur. Apr. -June 

 [B. stncta of auth., not Andrz.; B. barbarea (L.) MacM.} Common 

 Wintercress B. vulgaris R. Br. 



1. Petals pale yellow, 4-6 mm. long; basal leaves with 8-16 lateral leaflets; 

 mature pods 5-6 cm. long; pedicels about as thick as the pods; waste 

 places, occasional; nat. from Eur. May- June. [5. praecox R. Br.] Early 

 Wintercress B. verna (Mill.) Aschers. 



6. RoRiPPA Scop. — Yellow Cress 



(Radicula Hill) 

 1. Petals 3-5 mm. long; perennials with rhizomes. 



2. Leaves pinnately divided, not auriculate at base; pods linear, the style 0.5 



mm. long; moist ground, nat. from Eur. May-Sept 



R. sylvestris (L.) Besser 



2. Leaves pinnately lobed, auriculate at base; mature pods cylindrical, the 



style 2-3 mm. long; river banks. Apr.-Aug 



R. sinuata (Nutt.) Hitchc. 



1. Petals 1.5-2 mm. long; leaves with small auricles at base; style on mature 

 pod not more than 0.5 mm. long; annual or biennial native species. 



3. Mature pods 6-12 mm. long, on pedicels 0.5-2 mm. long; stem glabrous; 



muddy creek banks, common. May-Oct 



R. sessiliflora (Nutt.) Hitchc. 



3. Mature pods 2-5 mm. long, on pedicels 3-10 mm. long. 



4. Stem glabrous or nearly so; wet ground or in water, common. May- 

 Oct R. palustris (L.) Besser 



4. Stem hirsute; wet soil. June-Aug R. Inspida (Desv.) Britt. 



7. Sisymbrium L. 



1. Pods 1-1.5 cm. long, on very short pedicels closely appressed to the stem; 

 petals 3 mm. long; stem divaricately branched above; leaves pinnatifid 

 into 5-13 lobes; waste ground, common, nat. from Eur. May-Sept. Hedge 

 Mustard S. officinale (L.) Scop. 



1. Pods 3-10 cm. long, spreading or ascending on slender pedicels; petals 5-8 

 mm. long. 



2. Lower part of stem spreading-hirsute; upper leaves with linear divisions; 

 petals pale yellow, 6-8 mm. long; pods 7-10 cm. long, the ascending 

 pedicels 5-8 mm. long; a common weed in fields and waste places, nat. 

 from Eur. May-Aug. Tumble Mustard S. altissimum L. 



2. Lower part of the stem retrorsely hirsute; upper leaves with lanceolate 

 divisions; petals bright yellow, 5-6 mm. long; pods 3 cm. long, on 

 spreading pedicels 1-1.5 cm. long; fields and waste places, adv. from 

 Eur S. loeselii L. 




140 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



8. Alliaria Adans. — Garlic Mustard 



A. officinalis Andrz. Roadsides and waste places, adv. from Eur. May- 

 June. lAlliaria alliaria (L.) Britt.] 



9. Conringia Link 



C. orientalis (L.) Dum. Hare's-ear Mustard. Waste places, occasional; 

 adv. from Eur. May-July. 



10. Erysimum L. 



(Cheirinia Link) 

 1. Petals more than 1 cm. long; pods 4-8 cm. long; plant biennial; sandy soil, 



Cass, Mason, and La Salle counties. May-June. Western Wallflower 



E. asperum DC. 



1. Petals 4-9 mm. long; annuals. 



2. Petals 4-5 mm. long; pods erect 2-2.5 cm. long, on ascending pedicels; 

 leaves entire or nearly so; fields and waste places; chiefly in the n. half 

 of the state. June-Aug. Wormseed Mustard E. cheiranthoides L. 



2. Petals 6-9 mm. long; pods spreading, 4-8 cm. long; leaves repand-dentate 

 or denticulate; waste places, roadsides, fields, etc.; adv. from Eur. May- 

 June E. repandum L. 



11. Descurainia Webb. &: Barth. — Tansy Mustard 



(Sophia Adans.) 



D. brachycarpa (Richards.) O. E. Schulz. Sandy soil or roadsides, com- 

 mon. Apt. -June. [^Sisymbrium canescens Nutt., var. brachycarpon (Richards.) 

 Wats.} 



12. Draba L. — Whitlowcress 



1. Stem leafy -branched; pods narrowly oval, acute, 2-3 mm. long, 1 mm. wide, 

 glabrous, 6-16 seeded, equalling or exceeding the pedicels; petals entire, 



whitish, sometimes minute or none; dry soil, s. 111. Apr.-May 



D. brachycarpa Nutt. 



1. Stem scapose, the leaves chiefly basal; pods 15-60-seeded. 



2. Petals entire or emarginate, 3-5 mm. long: pods mostly longer than the 

 pedicels. 



3. Pods linear, 8-12 mm. long, 1-2 mm. wide, glabrous or hispidulous; 

 rachis and pedicels glabrous; leaves entire or nearly so; sandy soil, 



locally abundant. Apr.-May. [D. caroliniana Walt.} 



D. rcptans (Lam.) Fern. 



3. Pods oval to linear-elliptical, 6-15 mm. long, 2 mm. wide, pubescent; 

 rachis and pedicels pubescent; leaves dentate above the middle; sandy 



soil, s. 111. Mar.-May D. cuneifolia Nutt. 



2. Petals deeply 2-cleft; pods oval, glabrous, 4-10 mm. long, shorter than 

 the pedicels; cultivated ground and waste places, occasional; nat. from 

 Eurasia. Apr.-May D. verna L. 



13. Df.ntaria L. — Toothwort 

 D. laciniata Muhl. Woods, common. Mar.-May. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 71. Cruciferae 141 



14. loDANTHus T. &: G. 

 /. pinnatifidus (Michx.) Steud. Woods, especially near streams, common. 

 May-July. 



15. Cardamine L. — Bittercress 

 1. Leaves toothed or entire; petals 7-12 mm. long; plants perennial; stem with 

 a tuberous base. 

 2. Petals white; stem 15-50 cm. tall, puberulent at base, otherwise glabrous; 



basal leaves oval; cauline leaves 4-8; wet ground. May-June 



C. bulbosa (Schreb.) BSP. 



2. Petals pale lavender; stem 10-25 cm. tall, sparsely hirsute, varying to 



glabrous; basal leaves orbicular; cauline leaves 2-6; woods. Apr.-May .... 



C. douglassii (Torr.) Britt. 



1. Leaves pinnate or pinnatifid. 



3. Petals white or pink, 8-13 mm. long; plants perennial; wet ground, n. 



III., rare. Apr.-May C. pratensis L. 



3. Petals white, 2-3 mm. long; plants annual. 



4. Leaves nearly all basal, more or less pubescent; stamens 4; an occasional 



weed in cultivated ground; nat. from Eur. Apr.-May ....C. hirsuta L. 



4. Stem more or less leafy, the leaves glabrous; stamens usually 6; native 



plants. 



5. Leaflets or leaf -segments of the median and upper leaves oblong to 



oval, often toothed, the terminal one larger; rachis narrowly 



winged; wet soil. Apr.-Aug C. pennsylvanica Muhl. 



5. Leaflets or leaf-segments of the median and upper leaves linear, 

 entire, not decurrent, the terminal one similar; rachis not winged; 

 moist soil. Apr.-May C arenicola Britt. 



16. Arabis L. — Rockcress 

 1. Pods erect or ascending. 



2. Stem-leaves and basal leaves pinnatifid; pods ascending, 2-2.5 cm. long; 

 petals 1.5-3 mm. long; rocky woods in the s. half of 111. Apr.-May 

 [^Sibara yirginica (L.) Rollins} A. yirginica (L.) Poir. 



2. Stem-leaves entire or dentate. 



3. Stem-leaves not auricled at the base, spatulate or linear, 1-3 cm. long; 

 basal leaves pinnatifid; pods ascending, 2-3.5 cm. long; petals 6-8 mm. 



long; rocky or sandy soil in the n. third of 111. May-July 



A. lyrata L. 



3. Stem-leaves auricled at the base; basal leaves entire or dentate. 

 4. Mature pods erect or appressed, not more than 1 mm. wide. 



5. Pods 5-9 cm. long, nearly terete; seeds almost wingless, in two dis- 

 tinct rows; petals 3-4 mm. long, cream or pale yellowish; waste 

 places, nat. from Eur. May-July. [Turritis glabra L.} Tower 

 Mustard A. glabra (L.) Bernh. 



5. Pods 4-5 cm. long, flat; seeds winged, in only 1 row; petals 4-5 

 mm. long, white or pale pink; among rocks near streams. May- 

 June. [A. hirsuta Am. Auth.; A. ovata (Pursh) Poir. (?)] 



A. pycnocarpa Hopkins 




142 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



4. Mature pods spreading or ascending, 1.5-2 mm. wide, flat; seeds 

 winged, in two rows; petals 5-8 mm. long, pink; river banks, rare. 

 Dixon, Lee Co., Vasey. June-July. [A. drummondii of auth., not 



Gray; A. divaricarpa of auth., not A. Nels.} A. confinis Wats. 



1. Pods divaricately spreading, or arcuate-recurved or pendulous at maturity. 

 6. Leaves not auricled at base, lanceolate or oblong-lanceolate, 3-12 cm. 

 long; pods pendulous, falcate, 5-7 cm. long, 2-3 mm. wide; seeds 

 winged; petals 5-6 mm. long, greenish white; sepals pilosulous; wooded 



slopes. May-July. Sicklepod A. canadensis L. 



6. Leaves, at least the median and lower, auriculate at base; mature pods less 

 than 2 mm. wide. 

 7. Mature pods 2-2.5 cm. long, straight, spreading; seeds wingless; petals 

 white or pale lavender, 2-3 mm. long; stem-leaves oblanceolate, ob- 

 tusish, unequally dentate; moist woods near streams, common. May- 

 June A. dentata T. & G. 



7. Mature pods 4-9 cm. long, arcuate-recurved; seeds winged; petals green- 

 ish white, 4-6 mm. long; plant glabrous throughout; gravelly soil in 

 woods. Apr. -June. Smooth Rockcress A. laevigata (Muhl.) Poir. 



17. Arabidopsis Heynh. 



(Sienophragma Celak.) 

 A. thaliana (L.) Heynh. Mouse-ear Cress. Waste places, nat. from Eur. 

 Apr. -June. \_Arabis thaliana L.; Sisymbrium thalianiim (L.) J. Gay] 



18. Nasturtium R. Br. — Watercress 

 N. officinale R. Br. In clear water, especially in or near springs; nat. from 

 Eurasia. May-Sept. [Sisymbriu7n nasturtium-aquaticum L.; Radicida nasturtium- 

 aquaticum (L.) Britten & Rendle} 



19. Neobeckia Greene 



N. aquatica (Eaton) Greene. Ditches, ponds, or slow streams. June- Aug. 

 \_Rorippa americana (Gray) Britt.; Radicida aquatica (Eaton) B. L. Robins.; 

 Rorippa aquatica (Eaton) Palmer & Steyerm.; Nasturtium lacustre Gray; Ar- 

 moracia aquatica (Eaton) Wieg.} 



20. Armoracia Gaertn. — Horseradish 

 A. rusticana Gaertn. Waste places, ditches, roadsides, escaped from cult.; 

 native of Eur. May-June. 



21. Alyssum L. — Sweet Alyssum 



A. alyssoides L. Fields and waste places, nat. from Eur. May-June. 



22. Berteroa DC. 



B. incana (L.) DC. Hoary Alyssum. Occasionally found in waste places, 

 adv. from Eur. June-Sept. 



23. Neslia Desv. 

 N. paniculata (L.) Desv. Ball Mustard. Waste ground, occasional; adv. 

 from Eur. May-Sept. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 72. Capparidaceae 143 



24. Lesquerella Wats. — Bladder-pod 



1. Pods, as well as the whole plant, densely stellate-pubescent; plants perennial; 

 in sand or sandy soil, w. III., rare. Havana, Mason Co., Aug. 22, 1904, 

 Glectson [L. ludoviciana (Nutt.) Wats.] L. argentea (Pursh) MacM. 



l.Pods glabrous; plants annual, sparsely stellate-pubescent. "By the Chicago 

 & Alton R.R. near Rock Bridge, s. of Willow Springs, June 9, 1894," 

 Hill; east of Sag Bridge, June 9, 1894, Moffatt 172 ("only two plants 

 found; fruit immature."); native in Okla. and Tex. [L. nuttallii Wats.} 

 L. gracilis (Hook.) Wats.} 



25. Camelina Crantz 



l.Stem glabrous; leaves auriculate at base; petals yellow, 5-6 mm. long; pods 

 6-9 mm. long, 5-6 mm. broad; pedicels 12-25 mm. long; an occasional 



weed in fields and waste places, adv. from Eur. June-July 



C. sativa (L.) Crantz 



1. Stem hirsute below; leaves sagittate at base; petals pale yellow, 3-4 mm. 

 long; pods 4-6 mm. long, 4-5 mm. broad; pedicels 8-15 mm. long; fields 

 and roadsides, nat. from Eur. May-July C. microcarpa Andrz. 



26. Cardaria Desv. 

 C. draba (L.) Desv. Fields and waste places, nat. from Eur. Apr. -June. 

 \_Lepidinm draba L.} 



27. Lepidium L. — Peppercress 



1 . Stem-leaves sagittate at base, oblanceolate, pubescent, dentate to entire; 

 pods oval, papillose, 5-6 mm. long, in dense elongated racemes; pedicels 

 puberulent, divaricate, 4-8 mm. long; fields and waste places, nat. from 

 Eur. May-July. Field Peppercress L. campestre (L.) R. Br. 



1 . Stem-leaves merely sessile, not sagittate at base; stamens 2 or 4; pods sub- 

 orbicular, 2-3 mm. in diameter; waste places, very common. May-Nov. 

 Common Peppercress L. virginicum L. 



28. Thlaspi L. 

 T. arvense L. Field Pennycress. Fields and waste places, nat. from Eur. 

 May-Aug. 



29. Capsella Medic. 



(Bursa Weber) 

 C. burs a- past oris (L.) Medic. Shepherd's Purse. Fields and waste places, 

 very common; nat. from Eur. Mar.-Oct. 



72. Capparidaceae Lindl. — Caper Family 



1. Petals entire, or notched at the apex. 



2. Petals notched; pod sessile or nearly so on its pedicel; stamens more than 6 



1 . Polanisia 



2. Petals entire; pod long-stipitate on its pedicel; stamens 6 2. Clcome 



1. Petals laciniate, unequal; stamens 6-14; pod long-stipitate on its pedicel... .3. Crisiatella 




144 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



1. POLANISIA Raf. 

 1. Petals whitish, 4-5 mm. long; stamens 9-12; sandy soil, often along railroads. 



July-Aug. Clammyweed P. graveolens Raf. 



1. Petals pale yellow, 8-10 mm. long; stamens 12-16; sandy soil, not common; 



probably has spread eastw. into 111. along railroads. June-Aug 



P. trachysperma T. SC G. 



2. Cleome L. 



C. seniilata Pursh. Dry soil, w. 111.; Henderson Co., Patterson: adv. from 

 w. U.S. July-Sept. [C. integrifolia T. 8C G.} 



3. Cristatella Nutt. 

 C. jamesii T. & G. Sandy soil. Mason and Jo Daviess counties. June-Aug. 



73. Sarraceniaceae LaPyl. — Pitcher-plant Family 



1. Sarracenia L. — Pitcher-plant 

 .5". purpurea L. Peat bogs. Lake and McHenry counties. May-June. [5'. 

 purpurea subsp. gibbosa (Raf.) Wherry} 



74. Droseraceae S. F. Gray — Sundew Family 



1. Drosera L. — Sundew 



1. Leaf-blades suborbicular; seeds fusiform, striate, glossy, 1-1.5 mm. long; 

 bogs, n. 111. July-Sept. Round-leaved Sundew D. rotundifolia L. 



1 . Leaf-blades linear-spatulate; seeds ellipsoid, papillose, 0.7-1 mm. long; bogs 



rare, n.e. III. July-Sept. [D. longifolia of auth.} Long-leaved Sundew 



D. intermedia Hayne 



75. Crassulaceae DC. — Stonecrop Family 



1. Petals 5, acute; plants succulent; pistils 5 or 4, distinct or nearly so, becoming 

 follicles in fruit I . Sedum 



1. Petals none or linear and inconspicuous; plants scarcely succulent; pistils becoming 

 united, and forming a 5-loculed capsule 2. Peulhonim 



1. Sedum L. — Stonecrop 

 1. Leaves thick, terete or nearly so. 



2. Petals yellow; leaves obovoid, densely imbricated, about 3 mm. long; fol- 

 licles 3-4 mm. long; plants perennial; rocky places and ro.ndsides, occa- 

 sionally escaped from cult.; native of Eur. June-Aug. Mossy Stonecrop 

 S. acre L. 



2. Petals rose-purple, pink, or white; leaves linear, crowded, 5-25 mm. long, 



about 2 mm. wide; follicles 4-6 mm. long; on rocks, .>. III. May-July .... 

 S. pulchclluui Michx. 



1 . Leaves flat, broad. 



3. Petals white; leaves roundish-obovate, entire, chiefly in whorls of 3 or the 



upper alternate; rocky woods, and in moist soil in wooded ravines, 

 local. May S. tematum Mich.v. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 77. Saxifragaceae 145 



3. Petals pink; leaves oval, dentate or entire, alternate 2-5 cm. long; cliffs, 



not common; chiefly in s. 111. Aug.-Sept S. telephioides Michx. 



2. Penthorum 

 P. sedoides L. Ditch Stonecrop. Wet ground, common, July-Sept. 



76. Parnassiaceae Dum. — Grass- of- Parnassus Family 



1. Parnassia L. — Grass-of-Parnassus 



P. glauca Raf. Wet ground in the n. half of the state, rare. July-Sept. [P. 

 caroliniana of auth., not Michx.} 



77. Saxifragaceae Dum. — Saxifrage Family 



1 . Ovary-) -loculed ; placentae parietal or nearly basal. 

 2. Petals 5; stamens 5. 



3. Petals entire; inflorescence paniculate; leaves all basal 1. Heuchera 



3. Petals fringed; inflorescence racemose; stem with a pair of opposite, sessile leaves 



2. Milella 



2. Petals 0; stamens 10 or 8; flowers sessile, axillary, usually solitary 



3. Chr^sosplenium 



1. Ovary 2-loculed; placentae axial. 



4. Stamens 5; seeds wing-margined 4. SulUvanlia 



4. Stamens 10; seeds wingless 5. Saxifraga 



1. Heuchera L. — Alumroot 



1. Calyx m anthesis 6-8 mm. long, decidedly oblique; river banks, cliffs, or dry 

 woods, not uncommon, extending southw. to Macoupin and Effingham 

 counties. May-June. [H. cdiata Rydb.; H. richardsonii var. grayana 

 Rosend., Butters, & Lakela] H. hispida Pursh 



1. Calyx in anthesis 2-5 mm. long. 



2. Calyx in anthesis 2-2.5 mm. long, nearly regular; petals white; shaded 



cliffs, s. 111. July-Sept. [H. rugelii Shuttlw.} H. parviflora Bartl. 



2. Calyx in anthesis 4-5 mm. long, oblique; petals greenish or purplish; bluffs 



and rocky banks, not common. May-June 



H. hirsuticaulis (Wheelock) Rydb. 



2. MiTELLA L. — Miterwort 



M. diphylla L. Bishop's-cap. Wooded ravines, not common; chiefly in the 

 n. half of the state. May. 



3. Chrysosplenium L. — Golden Saxifrage 

 C. amerkanum Schw. Wet ground, n. III., rare. May-June. 



4. Sullivantia T. & G. 



S. renifolia Rosend. Cliffs, rare. Jo Daviess, Carroll, and Ogl'e counties. 

 June-July. 



5. Saxifraga L. — Saxifrage 



(Micranthes Haw.) 

 1. Sepals becoming reflexed; plants 30-90 cm. tall; leaves 10-30 cm. long, 

 entire or nearly so. 




146 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



2. Leaves pilose beneath; petals white, longer than the elliptical sepals; fila- 

 ments filiform; moist shaded sandstone cliffs, rare. Jackson Co.; La 

 Salle, Ogle, and Jo Daviess counties. May S. forbesii Vasey 



2. Leaves glabrous or nearly so beneath; petals greenish, equalling the deltoid 



sepals; filaments subulate; meadows, local. May-Juni'. 



S. pennsylvanica L. 



L Sepals ascending; plants 8-30 cm. tall; leaves 2-10 cm. long, dentate or 

 crenate; rocky bluffs. Reported from s. Ill S. virgitiiensis Michx. 



78. Escalloniaceae Dum. — Escallonia Family 

 (Iteaccae Agardh) 



1. Itea L. 

 /. virginica L. Virginia Willow. Swamps, rare, s. 111. May-June. 



79. Hydrangeaceae Dum. — Hydrangea Family 



1 . Flowers all fertile, solitary, or in cymes or racemes; stamens 15-60 1. Philadelphus 



1. Flowers in terminal corymbs, of 2 kinds, the marginal ones usually enlarged and 

 sterile; stamens usually 10 2. Hvidrangea 



1. Philadelphus L. — Mock-orange 



1. Sepals glabrous outside. 



2. Flowers usually solitary or 2 or 3 together, scentless; sepals 5-7 mm. long, 

 about equalling the calyx-tube; twigs glabrous; cult, and occasionally 



escaped; native southeastw. May. Scentless Mock-orange 



...P. inodorus L. 



2. Flowers in 5-9-flowered cymes, very fragrant; sepals 12-15 mm. long, ex- 

 ceeding the calyx-tube; twigs pubescent; commonly cult., and sometimes 



escaped; native of Eur. May-June. Sweet Mock-orange 



P. coronarius L. 



1. Sepals pubescent outside; flowers scentless or slightly fragrant, in 5-7-flow- 

 ered cymes; indigenous on the rocky bluffs of the Ohio River near Gol- 

 conda, Pope Co., E. ]. Palmer 15438, 19581; collected in June 1919. and 

 Oct. 1920; not otherwise known P. verrucosus Schrad. 



2. Hydrangea L. 



H. arborescens L. Wild Hydrangea. Ravines and wooded banks, through- 

 out 111., except the n. part. As here treated including var. oblonga T. & G. 

 with leaf-blades tapering at base, and var. deamii St. John (H. cinerea 

 Small), with the blades more pubescent beneath. 



80. Grossulariaceae Dum. — Gooseberry Family 



1. RiBES L. — Gooseberry. Currant 

 (Crossitlaria Mill.) 

 1. Branches usually with spines or prickles. 



2. Ovary and fruit setose; calyx-lobes shorter than the tube; woods and river 



banks. Apr. -May. [^R. gracile Michx.} Pasture Gooseberry 



R. cynosbati L. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 83. Rosaceae 147 



2. Ovary and fruit smooth; calyx-lobes equalling or exceeding the tube. 

 3. Stamens exserted; flowers greenish while; spines 5-15 mm. long; woods 

 and river banks, centr. and n. 111. Apr.-May. The common goose- 

 berry in 111. \^R. gracile sensu Pursh, non Michx.} 



R. missouriense Nutt. 



3. Stamens included; flowers green or purplish; spines 3-8 mm. long; 

 swamps and bogs, n. III. May- June. \_R. oxyacanthoides sensu auth., 



non L.] Wild Gooseberry R. hirtellum Michx. 



1. Branches not at all spiny or prickly. 



4 . Leaves minutely resinous dotted and more or less pubescent beneath; 

 flowers greenish white; calyx campanulate; fruit black; thickets and 

 moist woods, common as far s. as Christian Co. May-June. [^R. flori- 



dum L'Her.} American Black Currant R. amencanum Mill. 



4. Leaves not resinous dotted; shrubs escaped from cultivation. 



5. Flowers greenish; calyx saucer-shaped; fruit red; native of Eur. \R. 



rubriim sensu auth., non L.] Garden Currant R. sativum Syme 



5. Flowers yellow; calyx tubular; fruit black; cultivated ground and road- 

 sides, occasional; native of centr. U.S. {^R. aureum sensu auth., non 

 Pursh} Bufl-alo Currant R. odoratum Wendl. 



81. Hamamelidaceae Lindl. — Witch-hazel Family 



1. Leaves palmately veined and lobed; flowers apetalous L Liquidambar 



1. Leaves pinnafely veined, wavy-toothed; petals linear, yellow 2. Hamamelis 



1. Liquidambar L. — Sweet-gum 



L. stryaciflua L. Swampy woods, s. 111., extending northw. to Crawford 

 Co. Apr.-May. 



2. Hamamelis L. — Witch-hazel 



H. virginiana L. Woods, local; n. 111., extending southw. to Peoria and 

 Tazewell counties. Oct. 



82. Platanaceae Lindl. — Plane-tree Family 



1. Platan US L. — Plane-tree 



P. occidentalis L. Sycamore. In woods and along streams, common 

 throughout III. May. 



83. Rosaceae Juss. — Rose Family 



{Malaceae Small ; Drupaceae DC.) 

 1 . Trees and shrubs. 



2. Pistils several to many, simple, or pistil one, compound. 



3. Pistils 2-many, simple, superior; fruits achenes, drupelets, or follicles. 



4. Pistils 2-5, each becoming a 2-4-seeded follicle; shrubs with simple, serrate 

 to entire, or slightly lobed leaves. 

 5. Leaves palmately shallowly lobed; carpels 2-5, somewhat inflated at matur- 

 ity; pubescence of stellate hairs 1. Phvsocarpus 



5. Leaves serrate to entire; carpels 5-8, not inflated; pubescence of simple hairs, 

 or plant glabrous 2. Spiraea 




148 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



4. Pistils numerous, or rarely few. each becoming a 1 -seeded achene or drupelet. 

 6. Branches usually with prickles; leaflets serrate. 



7. Flowers white (in our species) ; leaves palmately compound, the stipules 

 not adnata to the petiole; fruit an aggregate of 1 -seeded drupelets form- 

 ing a blackberry or raspberry II. Rubiis 



7. Flowers rose (in our species) ; leaves pinnate (rarely 3-foliolate), the 

 stipules adnate to the petiole; fruit of seed-like achenes enclosed in the 

 hypanthium (calyx-tube) 12. Rosa 



6. Branches not prickly; leaflets entire, silky-pubescent; flowers yellow (species 

 of) 6. Potenlilla 



3. Pistil 1, compound, inferior, enclosed by the calyx-tube; styles 2-5; fruit a pome. 

 8. Leaves simple. 



9. Flowers in racemes; petals narrow; fruit small, berry-like, sweet, with thin 



pulp, its locules twice as many as the styles; branches not spiny 



13. Amelanchier 



9. Flowers in cymes or corymbs; petals roundish; locules of the fruit (carpels) 

 the same number as the styles. 

 10. Midvein of the leaves with small dark colored glands on the upper sur- 

 face; margins glandular-crenulate ; flowers in compound cymes; anthers 

 purple; styles united below; fruit small, berry-like; endocarp of the 



ripe carpels leathery 1 5. Arouia 



10. Midvein not glandular; margins not glandular-crenulate; fruit large, 

 fleshy. 

 I 1 . Inflorescence cymose; endocarp of the ripe carpels cartilaginous. 

 12. Styles free; orifice of the receptacle closed by the disk; anthers 



pink or red; fruit containing numerous stone-cells 



- 16. P\}rus 



12. Styles united below the middle; orifice of the receptacle open; 



anthers white or yellow; fruit without stone-cells 17. Mains 



I 1 . Inflorescence corymbose; styles free; endocarp of the ripe carpels 



hard and bony; branches usually with spines 18. Crataegus 



8. Leaves pinnate; flowers in terminal compound cymes; petals roundish; styles 3, 

 free; anthers white; pome small, berry-like, red, acid, 3-lcculed; branches 



not spiny 14. Sorhus 



2. Pistil 1, simple, superior, 2-ovuled; style I; fruit a I -seeded drupe; leaves simple 

 19. Pnirnis 



I. Herbs; pistils several to many, simple, superior; fruit achenes, drujjelets, or follicles. 

 13. Pistils 2-5, becoming 2-4-seeded follicles. 



14. Leaves trifoliolate or 3-parted, nearly sessile; stipules large; flowers white or 



pinkish, in loose terminal panicles 4. Cillenia 



14. Leaves pinnately compound. 



15. Leaves 2-3-pinnate; stipules minute or none; flowers numerous, unisexual, 

 in a large panicle; petals white, about 1 mm. long; follicles reflexed, 



usually 2-seeded 3. Aruncus 



15. Leaves pinnately 3-9-lobed or -foliolate; flowers perfect, pink or purple, 

 in dense cymose panicles 7. FilipcnJula 



13. Pistils one to many, becoming 1 -seeded achenes or drupelets. 



16. Pistils ripening into pulpy drupelets, forming a red raspberry; style terminal or 

 nearly so; leaves 3-5-foliolate ; petals white or pink 11. Ruhus 



16. Pistils ripening into achenes. 

 17. Calyx not bristly. 



18. Pistils several to many; petals present; calyx usually with 5 sepal-like 

 bractlets alternating with the sepals. 

 19. Style deciduous from the mature achene. 



20. Receptacle becoming succulent, red (or white), and edible in 

 fruit (a strawberry); petals white (or pink), obtuse: leaves 



trifoliolate 5. Fragaria 



20. Plants not as above 6. Potenlilla 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 83. Rosaceae 149 



19. Style persistent on the achene, jointed or plumose 8. Ceiitn 



18. Pistils 1-3; sepals 4, petaloid; petals none; achene usually solitary, 

 enclosed in the 4-angled calyx-tube; flowers (in our species) white, 

 in a dense cylindrical spike 9. Sanguisorba 



1 7. Calyx-tube with hooked bristles; flowers yellow, in spike-like racemes; 

 achenes 2 10. Agrimonia 



1. Physocarpus Maxim. 



(Opiilaster Medic; Phvsocarpa Raf.) 

 P. opulijolius (L.) Maxim. Ninebark. River banks, local, n. III. May- 

 June. Carpels 3-5, glabrous or pubescent. [P. intermedius (Rydb.) Schneid.J 



2. Spiraea L. 

 1. Leaves tomentose beneath; sepals reflexed; wet ground. July-Aug.; known to 



occur in Lake, Cook, Kankakee, and Iroquois counties. Hardback 



S. tomentosa L. 



L Leaves glabrous or nearly so beneath; sepals spreading or erect; moist 

 ground. July-Aug. \_S. salicijolia of auth., not L.] S. alba DuRoi 



3. Aruncus Adans. — Goat's-beard 

 A. dioicus (Walt.) Fern. Wooded ravines. May- June. Of local occurrence 

 throughout most of III., but apparently absent from the n. part of the state. 

 [^Aruncus aruncus of auth., not Spiraea aruncus L.; A. Sylvester of auth., not 

 Kostel.; A. pubescens Rydb.; A. allegheniensis Rydb.] 



4. GiLLENiA Moench — Indian Physic 

 G. stipidata (Muhl.) Trel. American Ipecac. Rich woods; extending 

 northw. to La Salle Co., more frequent southw. June- July. 



5. Fragaria L. — Strawberry 



L Robust, thick-leaved garden plants, often 20-40 cm. tall, sometimes escaped 

 from cult.; petals 9-12 mm. long; fruit ovoid-globose, 2-3 cm. in diameter; 



achenes set in shallow pits; roadsides and waste places. May 



F. chUoensis Duch. var. ananassa (Duch.) Hort. ex Bailey 



1. Native wild plants; fruit 6-15 mm. in diameter; plants usually smaller. 



2. Leaflets firm, dull green above, petiolulate; flowers in corymbs; petals 5- 

 10 mm. long; fruit ovoid or subglobose, 1-1.5 cm. in diameter at matur- 

 ity, the achenes set in pits; calyx-lobes not reflexed; grassy banks and 

 roadsides, or in open woods, very common. Apr.-June. [F. grayana 

 Vilm.] Wild Strawberry F. virginiana Duch. 



2. Leaflets thin, light green, subsessile; inflorescence irregular, the branches 

 unequal; petals 3-6 mm. long; fruit ovoid or conical, 6-9 mm. in diam- 

 eter, 1-1.5 cm. long, the calyx-lobes spreading or reflexed; achenes super- 

 ficial; rocky banks and open woods, n. III., local. May-June 



F. americana (Porter) Britt. 



6. POTENTILLA L. — Cinquefoil 



1. Shrubs 30-100 cm. tall, the bark shreddy; leaflets 5-7, elliptical, 1-2 cm. long, 

 silky-pubescent, the margins entire, revolute; flowers 1.5-3 cm. broad, yel- 




150 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



low; in swamp, sandy, or limy soil, local, n.e. 111.; also in Jo Daviess Co. 



June-Aug. \Dasiophora jruticosa (L.) Rydb.} Shrubby Cinquefoil 



P. fniticosa L. 



1. Herbs; leaflets not entire. 



2. Petals maroon-purple, acute, shorter than the sepals; leaves pinnate, 5-7- 

 foliolate, the leaflets oblanceolate, serrate, 3-8 cm. long, glaucous beneath; 

 receptacle becoming spongy; bogs and swamps, Lake Co. June-July. 

 [Comarum palustre L.} Purple Cinquefoil P. palustris (L.) Scop. 



2. Petals yellow, white, or cream, obtuse or retuse; receptacle not becoming 

 enlarged and spongy. 

 3. Leaves pinnate. 



4. Flowers solitary on long pedicels; petals yellow; plants stoloniferous; 

 leaflets 7-21, with smaller intermediate ones, sharply serrate, whit- 

 ish silky-pubescent beneath; wet ground. Lake and Cook counties. 



May-Aug. [^Argentina anserina (L.) Rydb.] Silverweed 



^...P. anserina L. 



4. Flowers cymose; leaflets not whitish pubescent beneath; plants not 

 stoloniferous. 



5. Petals white or cream; flowers 12-20 mm. in diameter: stamens 

 30; style nearly basal; stem stout, 1-2 m. tall, glandular-pubes- 

 cent; gravelly soil, not common. June-July. [Drymocallis agr't- 

 monioides (Pursh) Rydb.; D. arguta (Pursh) Rydb.] Tail 

 Cinquefoil P. arguta Pursh 



5. Petals yellow; flowers 6-10 mm. in diameter; stamens 20; style 

 terminal; stem decumbent at base, 20-40 cm. tall; wet ground, 

 rare. St. Clair Co., Brendel P. paradoxa Nutt. 



3. Leaves palmate. 

 6. Flowers cymose. 



7. Leaflets silvery-pubescent beneath; petals 4-5 mm. long; sandy or 

 gravelly soil. May-Sept. Silvery Cinquefoil P. argenta L. 



7. Leaflets green on both sides. 



8. Leaflets 5-9; petals pale yellow, longer than the sepals; stamens 

 about 30; mature achenes reticulate; waste places and along 



roads; native of Eur. May-July. [P. sulphurea Lam.] 



P. recta L. 



8. Leaflets 3; petals deep yellow, shorter than the sepals; stamens 

 10-25; moist ground, common. June-July. Rough Cinque- 

 foil P- monspeliensis L. 



6. Flowers solitary, axillary, long-peduncled, 10-15 mm. in diameter; 

 leaflets 5, oblanceolate, serrate; stem slender, ascending or trailing; 

 roadsides, gravelly soil, etc., common. May-June. [P. canadensis 

 of auth., ex p.] Common Cinquefoil P. simplex Michx. 



7. FiLIPENDULA Mill. 

 F. rubra (Hill) B. L. Robins. Prairie Meadowsweet. Moist ground, not 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 83. Rosaceae 151 



common. June-July. Known from Vermilion, Tazewell, and Peoria counties; 

 probably occurring elsewhere in 111. 



8. Geum L. — Avens 



1. Sepals becoming reflexed; petals yellow or white; styles jointed, bent near 

 the middle, the upper part deciduous, the lower persistent, hooked. 

 2. Receptacle stalked in the calyx; petals yellow, 2 mm. long; fruiting heads 

 at maturity about 1 cm. in diameter; achenes puberulent; woods, com- 

 mon. Apr.-May. Spring Avens G. vernum (Raf.) T. dC G. 



2. Receptacle sessile; calyx with 5 bractlets alternating with the sepals. 

 3. Petals white or cream, as long as the sepals or shorter. 



4. Peduncles softly velutinous-pubescent or puberulent; petals 5-7 mm. 

 long, equalling or slightly exceeding the sepals; mature fruiting 

 heads 1-1.5 cm. in diameter; receptacle copiously villous-hispid; 

 woods, thickets, and roadsides, common. June-Aug. [G. alburn 



Gmel.j White Avens G. canadense Jacq. 



4. Peduncles hirsute; petals 3-4 mm. long, shorter than the sepals; ma- 

 ture fruiting heads 1.5-2 cm. in diameter; receptacle glabrous or 

 nearly so; wet ground in woods and thickets. June-July. [G. vir- 



ginianum sensu auth., non L.} G. laciniatum Murr. 



3. Petals golden yellow, 5-8 mm. long, exceeding the sepals; receptacle 

 pubescent; moist thickets and roadsides. June-July. Yellow Avens .... 

 G. strictum Ait. 



1. Sepals not reflexed; petals purplish, shorter than the sepals; styles persistent, 

 plumose, not jointed; dry ground n. 111.. May-June. \_Sieversia triflora 

 (Pursh) R. Br.] G. triflorum Pursh 



9. Sanguisorba L. 



S. canadensis L. Moist ground, rare. Ottawa, Sept. 28, 1882, Seymour; 

 Joliet, Sept. 25, 1907, Hill; Troy, Sept. 25, 1907, Hill. 



10. Agrimonia L. — Agrimony 

 1. Principal leaflets 5-9, oval to obovate. 



2. Axis of raceme and lower surface of leaflets pubescent; fruiting calyx 

 turbinate. 

 3. Axis of raceme finely glandular and with a few long spreading hairs; 

 leaflets glabrous beneath or merely sparsely hirsute on the veins; 

 fruiting calyx 4-5 mm. long, with numerous radiating bristles; roots 

 not tuberous; woods and thickets, centr. and n. 111. June-Aug. \_A. 

 hirsuta (Muhl.) Bickn.] A. gryposepala Wallr. 



3. Axis of raceme softly appressed- pubescent, not glandular, and without 

 longer spreading hairs; leaflets softly pubescent beneath, especially 

 along the veins; fruiting calyx 2.5-3 mm. long, with few ascending 

 or erect bristles; roots tuberous-thickened; open woods. July-Sept. 

 {A. mollis (T. & G.) Britt.} A. pubescens Wallr. 



2. Axis of raceme glandular and puberulent, but not pubescent; lower sur- 

 face of leaflets glabrous or nearly so, gland-dotted; fruiting calyx hemi- 




152 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



spherical, about 2 mm. long; roots tuberous-thickened; woods, chiefly in 



s. and w. III. July-Sept. [/I. striata sensu Bickn., non Michx.} 



A. rostellata Wallr. 



1. Principal leaflets 11-17, lanceolate, pubescent and glandular-granuliferous 



beneath; fruiting calyx 4-5 mm. long; moist ground. July-Sept 



A. parviflora Wallr. 



11. RuBUS L. — Bramble 



1. Stems herbaceous, not at all prickly; leaflets 3, rarely 5; fruit red, globose; 



bogs, n.e. 111. May-June. [R. triflorus Richards.} Dwarf Raspberry 



R. ptibescens Raf. 



1. Stems more or less woody, biennial or perennial, usually prickly or bristly. 



2. Leaves whitish-tomentulose beneath; petals 5-6 mm. long, not longer than 

 the sepals; fruit red or purplish, easily separating from the receptacle. 

 (Raspberries). 



3. Stems glaucous, recurved, rooting at the tips, not stoloniferous, with 

 stout hooked prickles; inflorescence corymbiform, the pedicels prick- 

 ly; fruit purplish black; moist ground, common. May-June. Black 

 Raspberry R. occidentalis L. 



3. Stems not glaucous, bristly-prickly, stoloniferous; inflorescence race- 

 mose; fruit red. 



4. Pedicels and calyx glandular-setose; wet ground and thickets, n. HI. 

 May-June. [R. idaeus L. var. aculeatissimus (C. A. Mey.) Regel 

 & Tiling} Wild Red Raspberry R. strigosus Michx. 



4. Pedicels and calyx tomentulose and often with small recurved prick- 

 les, not glandular; roadsides and near dwellings; occasionally per- 

 sisting; nat. from Eur. May-June. Cultivated Raspberry 



R. idaeus L. 



2. Leaves variously pubescent or glabrous, but not whitish-tomentose beneath; 

 fruit black when ripe, adhering to the cone-like receptacle. 

 5. Stems erect or arching, mostly 1-2 m. tall; petals 1-1.5 cm. long. 

 (Blackberries) . 

 6. Stems more or less prickly, not bristly, the prickles not numerous, 

 confined to the angles of the stem. 

 7. Leaflets laciniate; panicle 5-30-flowered, prickly and pubescent. Of 

 European origin; cult., and sometimes escaped to roadsides and 

 waste places. Urbana, G. N. ]ones 16419. June-July. Evergreen 

 Blackberry R. lacmiatus (West.) Willd. 



7. Leaflets serrate or lobed, not laciniate. 



8. Peduncles and pedicels with stalked glands, also usually pubes- 

 cent, and sometimes bearing small prickles; inflorescence race- 

 mose, not leafy, usually standing well beyond the foliage, each 

 pedicel subtended by a bract; open woods, pastures, roadsides, 

 and along fences, common. May-June. [R. nigrobaccus 

 Bailey} R. allegheniensis Porter 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 83. Rosaceae 153 



8. Peduncles and pedicels pubescent and sometimes prickly, but 

 without stalked glands. 

 9. Inflorescence elongate-racemose, leafy-bracted only at the 

 base; young stems (primocanes) angled and grooved; 



thickets. May-June. Tall Blackberry R. argutus Link 



9. Inflorescence short-corymbiform, conspicuously leafy-bracted 

 throughout; primocanes nearly terete; thickets. May-June. 

 [R. recurvans Blanch.} R. frondosus Bigel. 



6. Stems setose or hispid, not or only weakly prickly; sometimes nearly 

 unarmed. 

 10. Leaflets glabrous, or sparsely pubescent on veins on lower sur- 

 face; pedicels smooth or nearly so; sepals glandless; in sandy 

 swales eight miles e. of St. Anne, Kankakee Co., R. A. 



Schneider 1661 (not seen) R. offectus Bailey 



10. Leaflets softly pubescent beneath; pedicels and calyx setulose 

 and glandular; seven miles s.e. of Momence, Kankakee Co., 

 R. A. Schneider 1689 (not seen) R. schneideri Bailey 



5. Stems trailing or decumbent, slender, only the floral branches erect 

 (Dewberries). 



11. Stems retrorsely bristly (or nearly unarmed), not prickly; leaflets 

 firm, oblanceolate, glabrous on both sides, glossy above, paler and 

 dull beneath; petals 5-8 mm. long; meadows or low woods, n. 111. 

 June-July. Swamp Dewberry R. hispidus L. 



11. Stems usually with weak curved prickles; petals 10-15 mm. long; 

 fields, roadsides and woods, common. Apr.-June. \R. villosus 



Ait., non Thunb.; R. procumbens Muhl., nom. nud.J 



R. flagellaris Willd. 



12. Rosa L. — Rose 



1. The leaflets 3 (or 5), ovate or lanceolate, acute, sharply serrate, glabrous 



above; stems trailing or climbing; flowers corymbose; styles cohering in an 



exserted column; hypanthium globose. 



2. Leaflets glabrous beneath, glossy above; moist thickets and hedgerows. 



June-July. Climbing Rose R. setigera Michx. 



2. Leaflets softly pubescent beneath, dull above; pastures and borders of 



woods, common. June-July. [^R. setigera var. tomentosa T. & G.} 



R. rubifolia R. Br. 



1. The leaflets 5-11; stems erect or arching; styles separate, not exserted or 

 only slightly so. 



3. Leaflets glandular beneath, fragrant, the margins doubly serrate with 



gland-tipped teeth; sepals glandular-setose on the back, more or less 

 lobed, in fruit spreading or reflexed and tardily deciduous; prickles 

 curved, flattened; roadsides and fields, nat. from Eur. May-June. [R. 

 rubiginosa L.} Sweetbriar R. eglanteria L. 



3. Leaflets pubescent or glabrous beneath but not noticeably glandular or 

 fragrant; margins simply serrate. 




154 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



4. Leaflets not rugose or strongly reticulate; sepals more or less glandular 

 on the back; native species. 



5. Tall shrubs 1-2 m. high. 



6. Hypanthium glandular-setose; leaflets closely serrulate, acute at 

 each end; stipules narrow, more or less involute; prickles straight 

 or usually more or less curved, flattened at the base; moist 

 thickets, or swampy ground, local. June-July. \_R. Carolina of 

 auth., not L.] Swamp Rose R. palustris Marsh. 



6. Hypanthium usually smooth; stipules flat; leaflets sharply serrate; 



branches usually without prickles; thickets and open woods, 



local. May-June. Meadow Rose R. blanda Ait. 



5. Low shrubs 20-75 cm. tall; leaflets rather coarsely serrate; prickles 

 straight, or none. 



7. Stems woody; leaflets 5 or 7; dry soil along roads or edges of 



woods; the common species throughout 111. May-July. \R. 

 humilis Marsh.} Pasture Rose R. Carolina L. 



7. Stems semi-herbaceous, weak and bristly; leaflets usually 9, some- 

 times 7 or 11; roadsides and hedgerows, chiefly in n. and centr. 

 111. June-July. [R. pratincola sensu Greene, non A. Br.; R. 



heliophila Greene} R. suffiilta Greene 



4. Leaflets rugose, thick, strongly reticulate, dark green above, grayish 



pubescent beneath; sepals 2.5-3 cm. long, tomentose, not glandular; 



pedicels velutinous; shrub 1-2 m. tall, the branches densely prickly 



and bristly; roadsides, escaped from cult.; native of e. Asia 



R. rugosa Thunb. 



13. Amelanchier Medic. — Shadbush. Serviceberry 



1. Blades short-acuminate or decidedly acute; petals 12-18 mm. long; trees or 

 tall shrubs. 



2. Young leaves and racemes densely white-tomentose, soon glabrous; sepals 

 triangular, acute; fruit somewhat dry and mealy, insipid and falling 

 early; lowest fruiting pedicels 1-2.5 cm. long; wooded hillsides and 

 banks throughout 111., not uncommon. Apr.-May [A. canadensis sensu 

 auth., non L.} A. arborea (Michx. f.) Fern. 



2. Young leaves and racemes nearly or quite glabrous from the first; sepals 

 lanceolate, acuminate; fruit sweet and juicy; lowest fruiting pe:^icels 



mostly 2.5-5 cm. long; wooded hillsides, n. 111. Apr -Mav 



A. laevis Wieg. 



1. Blades rounded at the apex, or merely acuti.sh or mucronate, oval, tomentose 

 beneath at flowering time; petals 7-10 mm. long; shrubs 05-1.5 m. tall; 



rocky or sandy soil, n. 111. May. [A. hutnilis Wieg.] Low Shadbush 



A. spicata (Lam.) K. Koch 



14. Sorbus L. — Mountain-ash 



1. Winter-buds densely whitish villous, 5-10 mm. long; leaflets elliptical, acute, 

 3-5 cm. long; flowers 8-9 mm. broad; fruits 9-11 mm. in diameter; native 

 of Eur., cult., and occasionally escaping to woods or roadsides. European 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 83. Rosaceae 155 



Mountain-ash. Often mistaken for the following species 



S. aucuparm L. 



1. Winter buds glabrous, glutinous, 1-2 cm. long; leaflets lanceolate, acumi- 

 nate, finely serrate, 5-9 cm. long; flowers 5-6 mm. broad; fruits 4-6 mm. 

 in diameter; rocky woods, rare; near Oregon, Ogle Co., June 2, 1888, M. 

 B. Wake. American Mountain-ash S. amerkana Marsh. 



15. Aronia Medic. — Chokeberry 



A. melanocarpa (Michx.) Ell. Moist sandy woods, and bogs, n. 111. May- 

 June. Other species have been recorded from 111., but all specimens we have 

 seen are of this species. 



16. Pyrus L. — Pear 



P. communis L. Cult, and found occasionally as an escape in woods or 

 along roads; native of Eur. May. 



17. Malus Mill.— Apple 



1 Calyx glabrous outside (rarely somewhat villous) ; leaves glabrous or nearly 

 so; mature fruit 1-3 cm. in diameter; woods. Apr.-May. [Pyrus coronaria 

 L.; M. glance scens Rehd.; M. lancifolia Rehd.} Wild Sweet Crab-apple 

 M. coronaria (L.) Mill. 



1. Calyx tomentose; leaves pubescent beneath, at least along the veins. 



2. Leaves irregularly toothed, notched, or lobed, narrowed at the base; calyx- 

 lobes erect or spreading; fruit 2-4 cm. in diameter; woods, common. 



May. [Pyrus loensis (Wood) Bailey} Iowa Crab-apple 



M. ioensis (Wood) Britt. 



2. Leaves crenate-serrate, rounded or cordate at base; calyx-lobes usually 

 reflexed at anthesis; fruit larger; cult., and not infrequently wild; native 

 of Eur. and w. Asia. Apr.-May. [Pyrus malus L.; M. sylvestris of 

 auth., not Mill.] Apple M. pumila Mill. 



18. Crataegus L. — Hawthorn 



1 . Leaves cuneate at the base, widest near the middle or toward the apex. 

 2. Blades usually widest above the middle, mostly obovate or spatulate, the 

 margins merely serrate or only obscurely lobed; calyx-lobes entire. 

 3. Leaves firm, glabrous, glossy above, not impressed-veined. 



4. Pedicels glabrous; nutlets 8-9 mm. long; pastures and open woods, 

 especially near streams, common. May-June. [C. arduennae Sarg.; 

 C. attenuata Ashe; C. strongylophylla Sarg.; C. trahax Ashe} 

 Cockspur Thorn C. crusgalli L. 



4. Pedicels pubescent; nutlets 4-5 mm. long; low ground. Type loc. : 



Wady Petra, Stark Co.; known also from Peoria and Marion 



counties. [C. palmeri Sarg.} C. pratensis Sarg. 



3. Leaves thinner, dull, impressed-veined above. 



5. Pedicels and leaves glabrous; open woods, usually along streams, n.- 



centr. 111. May-June. [C. dispersa Ashe; C. pausiaca Ashe; C. 



peoriensis Sarg.; C. praestans Sarg.} 



.C. cujieiformis (Marsh.) Egglest. 




156 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



5. Pedicels and leaves pubescent; blades obovate, irregularly serrate; 



pastures and open woods, throughout 111. May-June 



C. punctata Jacq. 



2. Blades prevailingly widest near the middle. 



6. Blades more or less pubescent beneath, at least in the axils of the veins; 

 pedicels pubescent; calyx-lobes usually glandukr-serrulate. 

 7. Lower surface of mature leaves sparsely pubescent along the sides of 

 the veins with short, somewhat stiff hairs; corymbs sparingly 

 pubescent; stamens mostly 10, the filaments short; thorns usually 

 numerous, stout, 5-9 cm. long; banks of streams, chiefly in the n. 

 half of 111. May. [C. corporea Sarg.; C. divida Sarg.; C. ensifera 

 Sarg.; C. gaultii Sarg.; C. laxiflora Sarg.; C. longispina Sarg.; C. 

 rutila Sarg.; C. vegeta Sarg.; C. illinoiensis Ashe; C. rieoflurialis 

 Ashe; C. occidentalis Britt.; C. macracantha of auth., not Loud.] 

 C. succulenta Schrad. 



7. Lower surface of leaves softly pubescent, especially on the veins; 



petioles wing-margined; corymbs tomentose; stamens mostly 20, 

 the filaments slender; thorns few, slender, or none; thickets and 

 open woods, generally distributed in 111., flowering in the latter 

 part of May and early part of June. [C. structilis Ashe; C. tomen- 

 tosa sensu DuRoi, non L.} C. calpodendron (Ehrh.) Medic. 



6. Blades glabrous or essentially so; pedicels glabrous; calyx-lobes entire 

 or nearly so. 



8. Leaves oval or rhombic, acute or acutish, serrate, the base cuneate; 



lower surface with tufts of tomentum in the axils ol the veins; 

 fruit 5-8 mm. in diameter; alluvial soil, w. and s. 111. [C. nitida 

 sensu Egglest., ex p., non Sarg.; C. ovata Sarg.; C. acutifolia 

 Sarg.] C. viridis L. 



8. Leaves short-obovate to suborbicular, usually incised with shallow 

 lobes, these crenate; styles and nutlets usually 2; fruit 1-1.5 cm. 

 in diameter; thickets and open woods, not uncommon. May-June. 

 £C. brownii Britt.] C margaretta Ashe 



1. Leaves prevailingly widest below the middle or toward the subcordate, trun- 

 cate, rounded, or broadly cuneate base. 

 9. Leaves glabrous or nearly so at maturity, or only slightly pubescent be- 

 neath. 



10. Leaves deltoid-cordate (often conspicuously 3-5-Iobed); calyx-lobes 

 deltoid, entire; fruit 5-7 mm. in diameter, the calyx deciduous; 

 chiefly s. III., but extending northw. to Peoria Co. [C. cordata Ait.] 

 C. phaenopyrum (L. f.) Medic. 



10. Leaves otherwise; calyx-lobes lanceolate; fruiting calyx usually persis- 

 tent. 



11. Calyx-lobes entire or nearly so; inflorescence glabrous. 



12. Leaves thin, scabrellous on the upper surface when young, soon 

 glabrous; stamens 10 or fewer; fruiting calyx sessile; thickets, 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 83. Rosaceae 157 



pastures, or open woods, usually near streams, n.e. 111. May. 

 [C. aptomorpha Sarg.; C. bella Sarg.; C. colorata Sarg.; C. 

 cyanophylla Sarg.; C. depilis Sarg.; C. egani Ashe; C. fer- 

 rissii Ashe; C. ignea Sarg.; C. liicorurii Sarg.; C. magniflora 

 Sarg.; C. otiosa Ashe; C. paucispina Sarg.; C. sextilis Sarg.; 

 C. taetrica Sarg.; C. tenera Ashe; C. trachypbylla Sarg.; C. 

 M/>er Ashe} C. macros perma Ashe 



12. Leaves glabrous on both surfaces, firm to stibcoriaceous at ma- 



turity; stamens about 20; fruiting calyx with a distinct neck; 

 common throughout 111. May. [C. dissona Sarg.; C. con- 



juncta Sarg.; C. patrum Sarg 



C. pruinosa (Wendl.) K. Koch 



1 1 . Calyx-lobes glandular-serrate throughout. 



13. Inflorescence glabrous; Wabash Co., Schneck- [C eggertii 



Britt.] - C. coccinioides Ashe 



13. Inflorescence with pubescent pedicels; thickets and borders of 

 woods, usually near streams, in the n. half of 111. [C. accliva 

 Sarg.; C. arcnata Sarg.; C. assurgens Sarg.; C. corusca Sarg.; 

 C. delecta Sarg.; C. elongata Sarg.; C. pura Sarg.; C. sertata 

 Sarg.} C. pedicelldta Sarg. 



9. Leaves persistently softly pubescent beneath; pedicels villous; anthers 

 yellow; fruit usually more or less pubescent, at leapt toward the base, 

 12-20 mm. in diameter; open woods, usually near streams, apparently 

 the com.monest species in III. May. [C. lanigera Sarg.; C. lasiantha 



Sarg.; C. umbrosa Sarg.; C. valens Sarg.} 



C. jnollis (T. &: G.) Scheele 



19. Prunus L. — Plum. Cherry 



1. Flowers nearly sessile, solitary, large, pink; ovary and fruit densely tomen- 

 tose; stone deeply pitted; leaves appearing later, lanceolate, acuminate, 

 serrulate, glabrous, the upper surface glossy; cult, and sometimes spon- 

 taneous; native of Asia. Apr.-May. Peach [^Airiygdaliis persica L.} 



P. persica (L.) Batsch. 



1. Flowers pedicelled, white; ovary and fruit glabrous. 



2. Flowers in small umbels or corymbs, usually 2-5 or solitary, or in 6-10- 

 flowered racemes in P. mahaleb. 

 3. Flowers small, the petals only 3-6 mm. long. 



4. Small trees or tall shrubs with relatively broad lanceolate to oval or 

 obovate leaves toothed to the base, usually appearing after the 

 flowers. 

 5. Leaves lanceolate to ovate-lanceolate, acuminate. 



6. Pedicels 3-6 mm. long, puberulent; fruit globose, 12-15 mm. in 

 diameter; forming thickets in sandy soil, chiefly s. 111.; native 



southw. May. Chickasaw Plum P. angustifolia Marsh. 



6. Pedicels 8-14 mm. long, glabrous; fruit 6-7 mm. in diameter; 



wet woods, or in bogs, n. 111. Apr. Wild Red Cherry 



P. pennsylvanica L.f. 




158 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



5. Leaves ovate to suborbicular, apiculate, crenate, glandular between 

 the teeth; fruit ovoid, black or nearly so, 7-10 mm. long; road- 

 sides, occasionally escaped from cult.; introd. from Eur. May. 



Mahaleb Cherry P. mahaleb L. 



4. Dwarf shrubs; leaves oblanceolate, acute, serrate except toward the 

 cuneate base; fruit nearly globose, black, acid, 1-1.5 cm. in diameter 



at maturity; sandy soil, n. 111. Apr. -May. Sand Cherry 



P. pumila L. 



3. Flowers larger, the petals 7-16 mm. long. 



7. Leaves serrate, the sharp teeth not ending in a gland; petals 8-10 



mm. long; calyx-lobes not glandular-serrulate. 



8. Petioles glabrous beneath; lower surface of mature blades glabrous 



except along the veins; young twigs glabrous; borders of woods, 



common. May. Wild Plum P. atnericana Marsh. 



8. Petioles pubescent all around; blades usually more or less softly 



pubescent beneath; young twigs puberulent; woods, and road- 

 sides, common. Apr.-May. [P. americana var. mollis T. SC G.] 



P. lanata (Sudw.) Mack. & Bush 



7. Leaves crenate, the blunt teeth ending in a gland; calyx-lobes more 

 or less glandular-serrulate; petioles glabrous beneath; twigs gla- 

 brous. 



9. Calyx-lobes pubescent on both sides; petals 8-10 mm. long; leaves 



lanceolate; roadsides and edges of woods, common. Apr.-May. 



Hortulan Plum P. hortnlana Bailey 



9. Calyx-lobes glabrous within; petals 12-15 mm. long; leaves broadly 

 obovate or oval; river banks, woods, and roadsides thickets, n. 

 111. May. Canada Plum P. nigra Ait. 



2. Flowers several to many, in elongate racemes. 



10. Leaves thin, obovate, sharply serrate with erect or spreading teeth; 

 sepals nearly orbicular, glandular-serrate, deciduous; woods and 

 thickets, chiefly in the n. and centr. parts of the state. May. [P. 

 nana DuRoi} Common Chokecherry. The form with the lower sur- 

 face of the leaves, young twigs, and rachis of inflorescence pubes- 

 cent is f. deamti G. N. Jones P. virginiana L. 



10. Leaves firm, oval or lanceolate, crenulate-serrate with incurved teeth; 

 sepals obscurely glandular, persistent; woods, and along fences, 

 common throughout 111. May. [P. virginiana sensu Ehrh., non L.; 



Padus virgimana (L.) Mill.} Wild Black Cherry 



P. serotina Ehrh. 



84. Leguminosae Juss. — Pea Family 



1 . Trees or shrubs. 



2. Leaves simple, entire, suborbicular to reniform; flowers pink, jierfect, in sessile 

 umbels, appearing before tbe leaves; pods 6-8 cm. long, pointed at eacli end.... 

 3. Cercis 



2. Leaves compound. 



3. E.rect shrubs or trees. 



4. Shrubs: fjcx-ers in racemes. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 84. Leguminosae 159 



5. Twigs and petioles hispid; petals 5; pods linear, hispid, seveial-seeded 



- 20. Robinia 



5. Twigs and petioles not hispid; corolla of one purple petal; pods short, 



I -2-seeded 16. Atnorpha 



4. Trees ; petals 5. 



6. Leaves odd-pinnate, with 5-17 leaflets; flowers white, 1-2.5 cm. long. 



7. Stipules spiny, woody; stipels setaceous; bark rough; stamens diadelphous; 

 racemes 7-15 cm. long 20. Robinia 



7. Stipules and stipels none; bark smooth; wood yellow; stamens distinct; 



inflorescence 15-50 cm. long 7. Cladrastis 



6. Leaves l-2-pinnate. 



8. Leaflets ovate, entire, acute or acuminate; flowers pinkish white, 1.5 cm. 



long, in many-flowered racemes; pods woody; trees without spines 



4. C\;nmocladus 



8. Leaflets oval, remotely denticulate, obtuse; flowers small, greenish yellow, 

 in axillary spikes; pods leathery; trees usually with spines on the trunk 



and branches 5. Cledilsia 



3. Twining or climbing shrubs, not prickly; flowers purple, showy, racemose; petals 



5; leaflets 9-13; pods many-seeded 21. Wisteria 



. Herbs. 



9. Leaves simple; petals yellow 9. Crolalaria 



9. Leaves compound (rarely 1 -foliolate). 



10. Leaves even-pinnate (or bipinnate), or leaflets only 2. 

 1 1 . Leaves ending in a tendril; flowers papilionaceous. 



12. Style terete, pubescent near the apex 27. Vicia 



12. Style flattened, pubescent along the inner side 28. Lalhyrus 



II. Leaves not ending in a tendril; leaflets numerous, small; flowers not at all 



papilionaceous, in globose heads. 



13. Leaves bipinnate. 



14. Plants glabrous or nearly so; flowers greenish white; petals distinct 



or nearly so; pods flat, smooth 1. Desmanihus 



14. Plants with recurved prickles; flowers rose colored; corolla funnel- 

 form; pods prickly, 4-angled, or nearly terete 2. Schranl^ia 



13. Leaves pinnate; flowers yellow 6. Cassia 



10. Leaves not even-pinnate. 



15. Leaves trifoliolate, or digitate with usually not more than 5 leaflets (rarely 

 unifoliolate). 

 16. Leaves (and other parts of the plant) more or less glandular-punctate; 



leaflets 3-5, entire 15. Psoralea 



16. Leaves not at all glandular-punctate. 

 17. Leaflets toothed. 



18. Flowers in heads or spikes. 



19. Pods straight II. Trifolium 



19. Pods curved or coiled 13. Medicago 



18. Flowers reflexed in long slender racemes, white or yellow; pods 



small, straight, reflexed 12. Melilotus 



17. Leaflets entire. 



20. Fruit a loment, i.e., breaking transversely into I -seeded, inde- 

 hiscent segments. 

 21. Pods 1 -several-jointed and -seeded; leaflets usually stipellate; 



flowers purple or white 24. Desmodium 



21. Pods of a single 1 -seeded joint (the lower joint when present 



empty and stalk-like) ; leaflets without stipels, usually 



prominently veined. 



22. Flowers purplish or yellowish white; stamens diadelphous 



(9+ 1); anthers all alike; pods not longitudinally 



ribbed 25. Lespedeza 



22. Flowers yellow; stamens monadelphous ; anthers in 2 

 series; pods longitudinally ribbed 26. Sli}losanthes 




160 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



20. Fruit a legume. 



23. Leaflets not slipellate. 



24. Flowers in heads; pods small, often mcluded m the calyx, 



1-6-seeded, not stipitate; stamens diadelphous 



1 I . TrifoUum 



24. Flowers m racemes, or solitary. 



25. Flowers whitish (or yellow) in racemes; stamens dis- 

 tinct; pods stipitate, turgid or inflated; plants tending 



to turn black in drying 8. Dapiisia 



25. Flowers pink, solitary; stamens diadelphous; pods 



linear, somewhat compressed, not stipitate 



14. Hosacl^ia 



23. Leaflets stipeilate. 



26. Style glabrous; plants twining; flowers purplish or white. 



27. Calyx usually 5-toothed, not bracteolate; leaflets ovate 



35. Amphicarpa 



27. Calyx deeply 4-cleft, subtended by a pair of bractlets; 



leaflets oval 36. Calactia 



26. Style pubescent on the upper surface. 



28. Flowers yellow; stems twining; leaflets ovate; pods 



10-20 cm. long 32. Vigna 



28. Flowers bluish or nearly white. 



29. Flowers 4-5 cm. long, solitary or in pairs in the 

 axils, pale blue and lilac, delicately veined; stem 



ascending or twining 34. Cliioria 



29. Flowers smaller, racemose or umbellate. 



30. Flowers in short sessile axillary racemes; stem 

 erect; pods straight or nearly so, almost sessile, 



somewhat flattened 31. C/licine 



30. Flowers in racemes or umbels en long axillary 

 peduncles; stems twining or trailing. 

 31. Flowers in long loose racemes; keel of the 



corolla spirally coiled; pods falcate 



30. Phaseolus 



31. Flowers few, in umbel-like clusters; keel of 

 the corolla strongly incurved but not 

 spirally coiled; pods straight or nearly so 



33. Slrophost\}les 



I 5. Leaves with 5 or more leaflets. 



32. Leaves punctate; corolla indistinctly or imperfectly papilionaceous; pods 

 1 -seeded, indehiscent. enclosed in the calyx. 

 33. Stamens 5; leaflets (in our species) 6-35 mm. \ons,.. .. ]S. Pelalosiemum 



33. Stamens 10 or rarely 9; leaflets (in our species) 4-6 mm. long 



]7.Ddca 



32. Leaves not punctate; corolla papilionaceous; pods several-seeded. 



34. Leaflets 5-11. 



35. Stems twining or climbing; leaflets 5-7 (rarely 3), ovate or ovate- 

 lanceolate; flowers brownish purple, in axillary racemes 



29. Apios 



35. Stem erect; leaflets 7-11, oblanceolale ; flowers blue (or pink or 



white), in terminal racemes 10. Lupinus 



34. Leaflets 11-31. 



36. Plants hoary-pubescent; flowers in terminal racemes 



19. Tephrosia 



36. Plants strigose to glabrous; flowers in axillary racemes or head- 

 like umbels. 



37. Flowers racemose; pods not 4-angled or jointed 



22. Astragalus 



37. Flowers umbellate, rose colored; pods Imear, 4-angled, jointed 

 23. Coronilla 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 84. Leguminosae 161 



1. Desmanthqs Willd. 

 D. illinoensis (Michx.) MacM. Illinois Mimosa. River banks or along 

 railroads, local. \_Acua7i illinoensis (Michx.) Ktze.} Known from Cook, Kan- 

 kakee, Grundy, La Salle, and Peoria counties; also in s. 111. July- Aug. 



2. Schrankia Willd. 



(Leplogloitis DC; Morongia Britf.) 

 S. unc'mata Willd. Sensitive-brier. Dry sandy soil, rare. Peoria, Aug. 1901, 

 and June 1903, McDonald. [L. nuttallii DC; M. nncinata Britt.; S. nuttallii 

 (DC.) Standi.} 



3. Cercis L. — Redbud 



C. canadensis L. Woods, common throughout 111., except the n.w. counties. 

 Apr.-May. 



4. Gymnocladus Lam. — Kentucky CoflFee-tree 

 G. dioica (L.) K. Koch. Woods, common throughout III. May-June. 



5. Gleditsia L. 



1. Pods 10-50 cm. long, many-seeded, indehiscent; spines stout, often com- 

 pound, rarely absent; woods, common throughout 111. May-June. Honey 



Locust. The spineless form is /. inermis (Pursh) Fassett 



G. triacanthos L. 



1. Pods obliquely oval, 2-4 cm. long, 1 -seeded, at length dehiscent; spines 

 slender, mostly simple; borders of swamps, s. 111., rare; known from Alex- 

 ander, Johnson, Pulaski, Massac, Calhoun, Gallatin, and Lawrence coun- 

 ties. Water Locust G. aquatica Marsh. 



6. Cassia L. 



{Chamae crista Moench ; Dilremexa Raf.) 

 1. Corolla regular, the petals nearly equal; leaves not sensitive to the touch; 

 stipules deciduous; leaflets 2-6 cm. long; calyx-lobes obtuse; stamens 10, 

 the upper 3 imperfect. 



2. Leaflets 8-20; petiole with a gland near the base; pods 6-13 cm. long, 5- 

 10 mm. wide. 

 3. Leaflets lanceolate, acuminate; stipules lanceolate; petiolar gland glo- 

 bose; petals 1.5-2 cm. long; plants annual; waste ground, occasional; 



native of the tropics. Chicago, Moffatt in 1897. Coff-ee-weed 



-C. occidentalis L. 



3. Leaflets elliptical, mucronate; stipules setaceous; petals 10-12 mm. long; 

 plants perennial, native. 

 4. Ovary villous; petiolar gland clavate; pods loosely villous, the seg- 

 ments about as long as broad; seeds flat, suborbicular; alluvial soil, 

 roadsides, or in open woods. July-Aug. [C. mardandica of auth., 



not L.} C. hebecarpa Fern. 



4. Ovary strigose; petiolar gland ovoid; pods glabrous or sparsely hir- 

 tellous, the segments much shorter than broad; seeds plump, ellip- 

 soid or obovoid; roadsides and alluvial soil. July-Aug. [C. meds- 

 geri Shafer] C. mardandica L. 




162 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



2. Leaflets 4-6, obtuse; gland between the lowest pair of leaflets; pods 10-15 

 cm. long, 2-5 mm. wide; waste ground, occasional; native of the tropics. 



July-Sept C. tora L. 



1. Corolla irregular, the petals unequal; calyx-lobes acuminate; anthers all per- 

 fect; stipules persistent; leaves sensitive to the touch; leaflets 12-28. 



5. Flowers 2-4 cm. broad, slender-pedicelled; anthers 10, unequal; fields and 

 meadows, common. July-Sept. Partridge-pea. [C. chamaecrista of auth., 

 not L.; C. robusta Pollard} C. jasciculata Michx. 



5. Flowers 5-10 mm. broad, short-pedicelled; anthers 5, nearly equal; woods 

 and fields, Cass Co., and southw. July-Sept C. nictitans L. 



7. Cladrastis Raf. — Yellow-wood 



C. luted (Michx. f.) K. Koch. Rich woods, s. 111., rare. Alexander Co., R. 

 B. Miller in 1928. 



8. Baptisia Vent. — Wild Indigo 



1. Leaves glabrous; racemes bractless or the bracts minute; calyx 6-8 mm. long; 

 pods ellipsoid, 2-3 cm. long; prairie soil and open woods throughout 111., 

 common. June-July B. leucantha T. & G. 



1. Leaves pubescent; racemes conspicuously bracted; calyx 8-10 mm. long; pods 

 ovoid, 4-5 cm. long at maturity; prairie soil and open woods, throughout 

 III. May-June B. leiicophaea Nutt. 



9. Crotalaria L. — Rattle-box 

 C. sagtttahs L. Dry soil, locally throughout 111.; more common southw. 

 June-Sept. 



10. Lupin us L. — Lupine 



L. perennis L. Sandy soil, local; n.e. 111., Lake, Cook, Kankakee, Grundy, 

 and Ogle counties. May-June. 



11. Trifolium L. — Clover 



1. Flowers white, purple, or pink. 



2. Flowers short-pedicelled, becoming reflexed in age. 



3. Heads 2.5-3 cm. broad. 



4. Leaves pubescent; plants annual or biennial; woods and fields, local. 

 May-June. Buffalo Clover T. reflexum L. 



4. Leaves glabrous; plants perennial, producing runners; roadsides and 



open woods, occasional. May-July T. stolonijerum Muhl. 



3. Heads less than 2.5 cm. broad. 



5. Flowers white; stems creeping and rooting, the peduncles arising 



from near the ground; fields, roadsides, waste places, lawns, open 



woods, common; nat. from Eur. May-June. White Clover 



T. repens L. 



5. Flowers pink or purple-tinged; stems erect or ascending, not rooting 

 from the nodes; fields, roadsides, and waste places; nat. from Eur. 



June-Sept. Alsike Clover T. hyhridiim L. 



2. Flowers sessile or nearly so, not becoming reflexed. 

 6. Heads cylindrical; calyx-teeth plumose-pubescent. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 84. Leguminosae 163 



7. Corolla white, shorter than the calyx; gravelly soil, roadsides, fields, 



or open woods; nat. from Eur. June-Sept. Rabbit-foot Clover 



T. arvense L. 



7. Corolla crimson, longer than the calyx; cult, and occasionally spont. 

 in fields and waste places; introd. from Eur. June-July. Crimson 

 Clover T. incarnatum L. 



6. Heads subglobose or ovoid, 2-3 cm. in diameter; celyx sparsely pilose, 

 the teeth subulate; corolla magenta (or white), 12-15 mm. long; 

 leaflets usually with a pale mark; roadsides, fields, and waste places, 



common; nat. from Eur. May-Aug. Red Clover T. pratense L. 



1. Flowers yellow, shortly pedicellate, becoming reflexed in age. 



8. Leaflets sessile; stipules linear; heads 1-2 cm. in diameter; roadsides, fields, 



and open woods; nat. from Eur. June-July. Yellow Hop-clover 



T. agrariiim L. 



8. Terminal leaflet petiolulate; stipules ovate-lanceolate; heads 4-12 mm. in 

 diameter. 



9. Heads 20-40-flowered; standard distinctly striate; roadsides, fields, and 



waste places; nat. from Eur. June-Aug. Low Hop-clover 



T. prociimbens L. 



9. Heads 3-15-flowered; standard faintly striate; roadsides and waste 



places; nat. from Eur. June-July. Little Hop-clover 



T. dubium Sibth. 



12. Melilotus Hill — Sweet Clover 

 1 . Corolla yellow, 5-7 mm. long; standard about as long as the wing-petals; 

 pods 3-4 mm. long; waste places, fields, and roadsides; nat. from Eur. 

 June-Sept. Yellow Sweet Clover M. officinalis (L.) Lam. 



1. Corolla white, 3-4.5 mm. long; standard slightly longer than the wing-petals; 

 pods 2-3 mm. long; waste places and roadsides; nat. from Eur. May-Sept. 

 White Sweet Clover M. alba Desr. 



13. Medicago L. 



1. Flowers bluish purple, 7-9 mm. long; pods spirally coiled, pubescent; leaflets 

 oblanceolate, 1.5-3 cm. long; perennial; fields and roadsides, common; 

 nat. from Eur. May-Sept. Alfalfa M. saliva L. 



1. Flowers yellow, 2-3 mm. long; pods 1 -seeded, reniform, curved, reticulate, 

 pubescent, black when ripe; prostrate or ascending annual; fields and 



waste places, common; nat from Eurasia. May-July. Black Medic 



M. lupulina L. 



14. HOSACKIA Dougl. 

 (Acmispon Raf.) 

 H. americana (Nutt.) Piper. Dry soil, rare. Greene Co., McDonald; and 

 westw. June-Aug. 



15. Psoralea L. 



1. Leaves pinnately 1-3-foliolate; pods rugose-reticulate. 




164 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



2. Leaflets ovate, acuminate; pods 1 cm. long; stem 1-1.5 m. tall; river banks, 



not common. June-July. [^Orbexilum onobrychis (Nutt.) Rydb.} 



P. onobrychis Nutt. 



2. Leaflets elliptical; pods 4 mm. long; stem 30-60 cm. tall; wooded ridges 

 and slopes, s. 111., not common. June-July. [Orbexilum pedunctilatum 

 (Mill.) Rydb.} The plants of the Central States are less glandular 

 and have been named P. psoralioides var. eglandulosa (Ell.) F. L. 



Freeman P. psoralioides (Walt.) Cory 



1. Leaves digitately 3-5-foliolate; leaflets oblanceolate; pods about 8 mm. long, 

 not rugose-reticulate; dry soil, not common; McHenry, Kane, Cook, 

 Will, and Peoria counties. June-Oct. [Psoraliditwi floribundum (Nutt.) 

 Rydb.; P. floribunda Nutt.} P. tenuiflora Pursh 



16. Amorpha L. 



1. Leaflets 2-5 cm. long; shrubs 1.5-6 m. tall; pods usually 2-seeded, 6-8 mm. 



long; river banks and alluvial soil, locally throughout 111. May-June. 



False Indigo A. fruticosa L. 



1. Leaflets 9-18 mm. long; densely canescent shrubs less than 1 m. tall; pods 



1 -seeded, 3-4 mm. long; prairie soil and hillsides, locally throughout 111., 



except the s. counties. June-July. Lead-plant A. canescens Pursh 



17. Dalea Juss. 



D. alopecuroides Willd. Fields and roadsides, occasional. Aug. -Sept. 

 [Parosela dalea (L.) Britt.} 



18. Petalostemum Michx. — Prairie-clover 



1. Calyx-tube densely silky-velutinous; leaflets 3-9; corolla rose-purple, rarely 

 white; in sandy or gravelly soil along roads or in open woods, local. July- 



Aug. Purple Prairie-clover P. purpureutn (Vent.) Rydb. 



1. Calyx-tube glabrous. 



2. Leaflets 5-9; flowers white; in habitats similar to the preceding species, but 



of less frequent occurrence. June-Aug. White Prairie-clover 



P. candidum (Willd.) Michx. 



2. Leaflets 13-31; flowers rose-purple; river banks and gravelly soil, rare; Kan- 

 kakee Co., Hdl; Kane Co., G. D. F idler. July-Sept P. joliosum Gray 



19. Tephrosia Pars. 



{Cracca L.) 

 T. virginiana (L.) Pers. Goat's-rue. Dry sandy soil. June-July. 



20. RoBiNiA L. — Locust 



l.Tree 5-30 m. tall; twigs and petioles glabrous; flowers white, in pendulous 

 racemes; pods glabrous; commonly cult., and abundantly naturalized 



throughout 111.; native of e. U.S. May-June. Common Locust 



R. pseudo-acacia L. 



1. Shrub 0.3-3 m. tall; twigs and usually the petioles glandular-hispid; flowers 

 rose-purple, in erect racemes; pods hispid; cult., and occasionally spont.; 



native of the mts. of Va. and Ga. May-June. Bristly Locust 



_ R. hispida L. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 84. Leguminosae 165 



21. Wisteria Nutt. 



(Kraunhia Raf.) 

 1. Pods glabrous; pedicels 6-10 mm. long, glandular-pubescent; swampy woods, 

 s. III., rare. Known from Pulaski, Alexander, Pope, and St. Clair coun- 

 ties. June-July W. macrostachya Nutt. 



1. Pods velutinous; pedicels 1-3 cm. long, short- villous; cult.; native of China. 

 May-June. [PF. chinensis DC.} W. sinensis (Sims) Sweet 



22. Astragalus L. — Milk-vetch 



1. Corolla purplish blue, 8-10 mm. long; leaflets oval, 4-10 mm. long; calyx 

 minutely pubescent; pods glabrous, about 1.5 cm. long; dry soil, local. 

 Cook, Cass, and St. Clair counties. [^Holcophacos dis tortus (T. dC G.) 

 Rydb.] A. distortus T. & G. 



1. Corolla whitish or cream or greenish yellow, 1-2.5 cm. long; calyx pubescent, 

 the teeth subulate or deltoid. 

 2. Calyx-teeth subulate. 



3. Leaflets 1.5-4 cm. long; pods ellipsoid, glabrous; river banks and hill- 

 sides throughout III., but not common. June-Aug 



A. canadensis L. 



3. Leaflets 5-15 mm. long; pods ovoid, pubescent; prairies, Will and Ogle 

 counties. May-June A. plattensis Nutt. 



2. Calyx-teeth deltoid; leaflets 5-15 mm. long; pods glabrous, subglobose; 

 prairies, rare. Macoupin Co. (?), Andrews. [Geoprumnon trichocalyx 

 (Nutt.) Rydb.} A. trichocalyx Nutt. 



23. CoRONiLLA L. — Crown-vetch 



C. varia L. Roadsides and waste places, occasional; adv. from Eur. June- 

 Aug. 



24. Desmodium Desv. — Tick-clover 

 (Meibomia Heist.) 

 1. Pods conspicuously long-stipitate, the stipe 2-3 times the length of the 

 calyx; stipules small, inconspicuous, setaceous, deciduous. 

 2. Panicle on a leafy stem; fruiting pedicels 5-8 mm. long. 



3. Leaves scattered along the stem; corolla white, 5-6 mm. long; woods, s. 

 111. July-Sept D. pauciflorum (Nutt.) DC. 



3. Leaves clustered at the base of the peduncle; corolla rose-purple, 6-7 

 mm. long; rich woods, common. June-Aug. [D. acuminatum DC; 

 D. grandiflorum sensu Robins. 8C Fern., non DC; M. grandiflora 

 sensu auth., non Ktze.} D. glutinosum (Muhl.) Wood 



2. Panicle on a long leafless peduncle; fruiting pedicels 1-2 cm. long; corolla 

 rose-purple, 6-11 mm. long; leaflets oval or ovate, acute, glabrous or 



sparingly pubescent; woods, common. July-Aug 



D. nudiflorum (L.) DC. 



1. Pods short-stipitate or sessile. 



4. Stipules conspicuous, persistent, lanceolate to ovate, acuminate. 




166 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



5. Stems trailing, pilose; leaflets nearly orbicular, obtuse; stipules ovate- 

 lanceolate, ciliate; woods, s. 111., extending northw. to Clark and St. 



Clair counties. Aug.-Sept. [M. michaiixii Vail} 



D. rotundijolhim (Michx.) DC. 



5. Stems erect or ascending. 



6. Joints of the pods rhombic, longer than broad. 



7. Leaflets obtusish, ovate or oval, somewhat rough-pubescent on 

 both surfaces, pale and reticulate beneath, about the same length 



as the petiole; stem pubescent; open woods. July-Aug 



D. canescens (L.) DC. 



7. Leaflets acuminate, longer than the petiole. 



8. Leaves and stem glabrous; bracts of the inflorescence not ciliate; 



woods throughout 111., except the n. counties. July-Sept 



D. bracteosum (Michx.) DC. 



8. Leaves and stem glabrous; bracts of the inflorescence not ciliate; 



open woods. July-Aug D. longijolium (T. & G.) Smyth 



6. Joints of the pods oval; leaflets lanceolate or ovate-lanceolate, reticu- 

 late beneath, pilosulous; stem uncinate-pubescent; in woods and 

 along roads throughout 111. July-Aug D. illinoense Gray 



4. Stipules small, inconspicuous, setaceous, usually soon deriduous. 



9. Leaves sessile or nearly so, the leaflets linear or lanceolate, obtusish, 

 thickish, reticulate, pubescent beneath; stem puberulent; pods 1-3- 

 jointed; open woods. July-Sept D. sessilijolium (Torr.) T. & G. 



9. Leaves petioled. 



10. Pods distinctly stipitate, the stipe exceeding the calyx. 

 11. Stem and leaves glabrous or nearly so. 



12. Leaflets ovate or broadly oval, pale beneath; flowers pink, 9- 



14 mm. long; woods, chiefly in s. III. Aug.-Sept 



D. laevigatum Nutt. 



12. Leaflets elliptical-lanceolate; flowers violet-purple, 5-8 mm. 



long; open woods, common. July-Sept 



D. paniciilatum (L.) DC. 



11. Stem and leaves pubescent; flowers purple, 6-9 mm. long. 



13. Leaflets ovate, thick, coriaceous, velutinous beneath; wooded 



slopes and ridges, s. 111., not common. Aug.-Sept 



D. viridiflorurti (L.) Beck 



13. Leaflets elliptical or oval, appressed-pubescent beneath; dry 

 soil, usually in open woods. Aug.-Sept ...D. dillenii Darl. 



10. Pods short-stipitate or sessile, the stipe not exceeding the calyx- 

 lobes. 

 14. Flowers showy, 8-12 mm. long, in dense panicled racemes; joints 



of the pods 3-5; prairie soil. July-Sept 



D. canadense (L.) DC 



14. Flowers small, 2-6 mm. long, in loose panicled racemes; joints 

 of the pods 1-3. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 84. Leguminosae 167 



15. Leaflets scabrous, softly pubescent, pale green and reticulate 

 beneath, 2.5-5 cm. long; stem puberulent; corolla 5-6 mm. 

 long; sandy soil in open woods, chiefly in w. and s. 111. 



Aug.-Sept D. rigidum (Ell.) DC. 



15. Leaflets not scabrous, 1-2.5 cm. long, glaucous beneath; 

 corolla 2-4 mm. long. 

 16. Stem and leaves glabrous; wooded slopes and ridges, 

 local; known from Peoria, Menard, and Macoupin 



counties. July-Sept D. marilandicum (L.) DC. 



16. Stem pubescent; leaves more or less pubescent; open 

 woods in the s. half of the state. July-Sept. [D. obtu- 



sum (Muhl.) DC; M. ohtusa (Muhl.) Vail] 



D. ciliare DC. 



25. Lespedeza Michx. — Bush-clover 



1. Perennials with subulate stipules, minute bracts, and narrow calyx-lobes. 

 2. Corolla purple; flowers of two kinds, some without petals. 



3. Flower-clusters on slender peduncles that are conspicuously longer than 

 the subtending leaves. 

 4. Stems trailing; inflorescence capitate or spicate. 



5. Stems glabrous or finely appressed-pubescent; sandy soil in woods, 



local. June-Sept. Creeping Bush-clover L. repens (L.) Bart. 



5. Stems softly pubescent with spreading hairs; >vooded slopes and 

 ridges, s. 111., extending northw. to Perry and Wabash counties. 



July-Sept. Trailing Bush-clover L. procumbens Michx. 



4. Stems erect, sparsely appressed-pubescent; inflorescence loosely pa- 

 niculate; in oak woods throughout the state exrept in the n. coun- 

 ties. July-Sept L. violacea (L.) Pers. 



3. Flower-clusters sessile or nearly so. 



6. Leaflets densely velutinous beneath; woods, local. Aug.-Sept 



L. stuvei Nutt. 



6. Leaflets glabrous, or strigose beneath. 



7. Leaflets oval; sandy soil in woods, s. 111. Aug.-Sept 



L. intermedia (Wats.) Britt. 



7. Leaflets linear; sandy soil in woods throughout 111., except the n.w. 



counties. Aug.-Sept. Slender Bush-clover 



L. virginica (L.) Britt. 



2. Corolla white or yellowish white, with a purple spot on the standard; 

 flowers all alike. 

 8. Leaflets oblong or oval to suborbicular. 



9. Stem villous; peduncles conspicuously longer than the subtending 

 leaves; spikes cylindrical, dense, 1-3.5 cm. long; sandy soil on 

 wooded slopes and ridges, local; known in 111. from Lake, Cook, 



Jackson, Union, and Pope counties. Aug.-Sept 



L. hirta (L.) Hornem. 



9. Stem tomentose; peduncles not longer than the subtending leaves; 

 spikes subglobose; sandy soil along roads and in open woods 

 throughout 111. Aug.-Sept L. capitata Michx. 




168 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



8. Leaflets linear. 



10. Spikes dense, capitate; open woods in the n. half of the state. Aug.- 



Sept L. longijolia DC. 



10. Spikes slender, loose; prairie soil, rare; known in III. from Mc- 



McHenry and Winnebago counties. Aug.-Sept 



L. leptostachya Enge'm. 



1. Annuals with scarious ovate-lanceolate stipules and bracts; calyx-lobes as 

 broad as long; stems erect; flowers solitary or 2 or 3 in the axils; roadsides 



and fields; introd. from Asia. Aug. -Oct. Japanese Bush-clover 



L. striata (Thunb.) H. & A. 



26. Stylosanthes Sw. — Pencil-flower 



S. biflora (L.) BSP. Dry soil in woods, s. Ill,; known from Saline, Gal- 

 latin. Johnson, and Pope counties. June-Aug. 



27. ViciA L.— Vetch 



1. Flowers solitary or in pairs, axillary, nearly sessile; annuals. 



2. Flowers 2-2.5 cm. long; leaflets oblanceolate to oval; pods brown; fields, 

 and waste places, escaped from cult.; introd. from Eur. July- Aug. 

 Spring Vetch V. sativa L. 



2. Flowers 10-18 mm. long; leaflets linear to linear-oblong; pods black when 



mature; fields and waste places, escaped from cult.; introd. from Eur. 

 July-Aug. Common Vetch V. angustifolia (L.) Reich. 



1. Flowers in 3-40-flowered racemes on axillary peduncles. 



3. Flowers 1-2 cm. long. 



4. Racemes 15-40-flowered, dense, unilateral. 



5. Calyx gibbous at base; leaflets narrowly elliptical; flowers 14-18 mm. 

 long, crimson, fading to blue; pods 2.5-3.5 cm. long; seeds 3-4 

 mm. in diameter, dark brown; roadsides and fields, common; nat. 

 from Eur. June-Aug. Winter Vetch V. villosa Roth 



5. Calyx not gibbous; leaflets linear-oblong; flowers 9-12 mm. long, 



bluish-purple; pods 1.5-2 cm. long; seeds 2.5 mm. in diameter, 

 black; roadsides and fields, occasional; introd. from Eur. June- 

 Aug. Tufted Vetch V. cracca L. 



4. Racemes 3-20-flowered, loose; leaflets oval or elliptical. 



6. Corolla 1.5-2 cm. long, bluish purple; meadows and thickets, chiefly 



in the n. half of the state. June-July. American Vetch 



V. amcricana Muhl. 



6. Corolla about 1 cm. long, white; woods in the n. part of the state; 

 known from Lake, McHenry, Cook, and La Salle counties. May- 

 June. Carolina Vetch V. caroltn'iana Walt. 



3. Flowers 3-4 mm. long, pale bluish; pods 1-2-seeded; leaflets linear; waste 



places, occasional; nat. from Eur. May-Aug V. hirsuta (L.) Koch 



28. Lathyrus L.— Wild Pea 

 1. Flowers purple, or purplish to pink or white. 

 2. Leaflets 4-14. 



3. Stipules much smaller than the leaflets; corolla 1-L5 cm. long. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 84. Leguminosae 169 



4. Racemes 2-8-flowered; leaflets 4-8. 



5. Stem distinctly winged; leaflets linear to elliptical; flowers 1.5-2.5 

 cm. long; moist ground and open woods. May- July. [L. palustris 

 var. linearifolius Ser.} L. palustris L. 



5. Stem merely angled; leaflets elliptical to oval; flowers 10-15 nmi. 



long; moist ground and thickets. June-July 



L. myrtif alius Muhl. 



4. Racemes 10-24-flowered; leaflets 8-14, oval; stem 4-angled, puberu- 

 lent or glabrous; open woods and moist thickets, n. and e. III. 



May-June. [L. venosus var. intonsus Butters & St. John] 



L. venosus Muhl. 



3. Stipules broad, foliaceous, nearly as large as the adjacent leaflets; stem 

 glabrous; leaflets 6-10, thick, oval; racemes 6-10-flowered; flowers 

 about 2 cm. long; sandy soil near Lake Michigan, rare. June-Aug. 



Beach Pea. [L. japonicus Willd. var glaber (Ser.) Fern.} 



L. maritimus (L.) Bigel. 



2. Leaflets 2; stem and petioles winged; frequently cult, and sometimes spont. 



in waste places and along roads; introd. from Eur. Everlasting Pea 



L. lat if alius L. 



1. Flowers yellowish white or yellow; stipules large. 



6. Leaflets 4-6, ovate or broadly oval; corolla yellowish white; peduncles 2-5 

 cm. long; stem terete; woods, n. 111. May-July ...L. achroleucus Hook. 



6. Leaflets 2, lanceolate; corolla yellow; peduncles 5-10 cm. long; stem an- 

 gled; fields and waste places, occasional; adv. from Eur. July-Aug 



L. pratensis L. 



29. Apios Ludw. — Groundnut 



A. americana Medic. Woods and thickets. July-Aug. [^Glycine apias L.; 

 A. tuberosa Moench; A. apias (L.) MacM.] 



30. Phaseolus L. — Kidney Bean 



P. polystachyus (L.) BSP. Woods and thickets, s. III. July-Sept. 



31. Glycine L. — Soy Bean 



G. sa]a (L.) Sieb. 8i Zucc. Extensively cult., and sometimes spont.; native 

 of Asia. [Saja max Piper; G. max Merrill} 



32. ViGNA Savi 



V. sinensis (L.) Endl. Cow Pea. Cult., and occasionally spont.; native of 

 Asia. July-Sept. 



33. Strophostyles Ell. — Wild Bean 



1. Leaflets rhombic-ovate to 3-lobed; flowers 7-10 mm. long; calyx-tube 2-2.5 

 mm. long; pods 5-9 cm. long, strigose to nearly glabrous; seeds 5-8 mm. 

 long; sandy soil along roads or in open woods. July-Sept. \_S. angulasa 

 Ell.; S. missouriensis (Wats.) Small} S. helvola (L.) Britt. 




170 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



1. Leaflets lanceolate to elliptical; flowers 5-6 mm. long; calyx-tube 1-1.5 mm. 

 long; pods 2.5-3.5 cm. long, strigose; seeds 2.5-3 mm. long; river banks. 

 July-Sept. [5'. pauciflora (Benth.) Wats., not Phaseolus pauciflorus 

 Don^ S. leiosperma (T. & G.) Piper 



34. Clitoria L. — Butterfly Pea 



C. mariana L. Dry banks, s. 111. June-Aug. \Martiusia mariana (L.) 

 Small} 



35. Amphicarpa Ell. — Hog-peanut 



(Falcaia Gmel.) 



1. Stem with closely reflexed hairs or glabrate; leaflets thin; inflorescence sim- 

 ple, 1-8-flowered; pods pubescent on the margins; woods, common. Aug.- 

 Sept. [/I. monoica (L.) Ell.; Falcata comosa sensu Britt., not Glycine 

 comosa L.} A. bracteata (L.) Fern. 



1. Stem brownish hirsute-villous; leaflets firm; inflorescence branched, 7-17- 

 flowered; pods pubescent throughout; woods, common. Aug. -Sept. \_A. 



bracteata var. comosa (L.) Fern.; Falcata pitcheri (T. & G.) Ktze.} 



A. comosa (L.) G. Don 



36. Galactia p. Br.— Milk Pea 



G. inississippiensis (Vail) Rydb. Dry soil. Union, Johnson, and Gallatin 

 counties. July-Aug. 



85. Geraniaceae J. St. Hil. — Geranium Family 



1 . Leaves palmalely veined and lobed or divided; anthenferous stamens 10, rarely 5 



1 . Ceraniitm 



L Leaves pinnately veined and dissected; anthenferous stamens only 5 2. EroJnim 



1. Geranium L. — Cranesbill. Wild Geranium 



1. Petals 14-22 mm. long; plants perennial; moist woods, and along roads, 

 throughout 111. May-June G. maculatum L. 



1. Petals 2-10 mm. long; plants annual or biennial. 



2. Leaves palmately lobed; carpels attached to the styles; petals 2-7 mm. 

 long. 



3. Sepals awn-tipped (the tips 1-3 mm. long); seeds reticulate. 



4. Fruiting pedicels much longer than the calyx; beak of mature style- 

 column 4-6 mm. long; fields and open woods, occasional. June- 

 Aug G. bickncllii Britt. 



4. Fruiting pedicels shorter, or scarcely longer than the calyx; beak 



of mature style-column 1-2 mm. long; roadsides, fields, and open 

 woods. May-July G. carolintanum L. 



3. Sepals merely callus-tipped; seeds smooth or nearly so. 



5. Carpels pubescent, not rugose; style-column beakless; waste places; 



nat. from Eur. May-Aug G. piisilltim Burm. f. 



5. Carpels glabrous, rugose; beak of the style-column 1-2 mm. long; 

 waste places; nat. from Eur. May-July G. molle L. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 87. Linaceae 171 



2. Leaves 3 -divided; carpels deciduous from the styles; petals 8-10 mm. 



long; moist ground, occasional; adv. from Eur. June-Sept 



G. robertianum L. 



2. Erodium L'Her. 

 E. cicutarium (L.) L'Her. Storksbill. Waste places, occasional; nat. from 

 Eur. May-Aug. 



86. OxALlDACEAE Lindl. — Wood-sorrel Family 



1. OXALIS L. 

 {Xanihoxalis Small ; lonoxalis Small) 

 1. Flowers purple (rarely white), 14-20 mm. long; plants scapose, with a thick 

 bulb-like or scaly rhizome; woods, common. Apr.-June. Violet Wood- 

 sorrel O. yiolacea L. 



1. Flowers yellow; stems leafy; rhizomes slender. 



2. Stems creeping, rooting at the nodes, the pubescence of spreading hairs; 

 pedicels strigillose; a weed in greenhouses and gardens; native of Eur. 



[O. repens Thunb.] Creeping Wood-sorrel O. cornicu'ata L. 



2. Stems erect, or decumbent at the base. 



3. Pedicels and stems strigillose; capsules finely grayish-pubescent, abrupt- 

 ly pointed, the styles 1-2 mm. long; fruiting pe:!icels becoming de- 

 flexed but the capsules erect; common in fields, alo: g roads, or in open 



woods. May-Sept. Upright Yellow Wood-sorrel O. stricta L. 



3. Pedicels and stems with spreading hairs, or the latter nearly g'abrous; 

 capsules sparsely glandular-pilose to nearly glabrous, gradually 

 pointed, the styles 2-3 mm. long; fruiting pedicels ascending or 

 divergent. 

 4. Petals 3-10 mm. long; seeds about 1.5 mm. long, with nearly con- 

 tinuous ridges; roadsides and open woods, common. June-Nov. 

 [O. rufct Small; O. corniculata sensu Robins. &: Fern., non L.; O. 

 eiiropaea Jord. (?); O. europaea var. lanulosa Benke] Common 



Wood-sorrel O. cymosa Small 



4. Petals 12-16 mm. long; capsules 6-10 mm. long; seeds 2 mm. long, 

 the ridges discontinuous; woods, s.e. 111., near the Wabash River, 

 rare. Mt. Carmel, Schneck O. grandis Small 



87. Linaceae Dumort. — Flax Family 

 1. LiNUM L. — Flax 



(Catharlolimim Reichenb.) 

 1. Petals blue (or white), 1-1.5 cm. long; capsules 8-12 mm. in diameter. 

 2. Perennial; flowers 2-3 cm. in diameter; sepals obtusish, ciliate; occasional- 

 ly found as an escape from cult.; introd. from Eur. June-Aug 



L. perenne L. 



2. Annual; flowers 10-15 mm. in diameter; sepals acute, the inner often 

 ciliate; roadsides and waste places, occasional; introd. from Eur. June- 

 Aug L. usitatissimum L. 




172 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



1. Petals yellow, 4-8 mm. long; capsules 3-6 mm. in diameter. 



3. Styles distinct; leaves without dark stipular glands; false septa of the cap- 

 sule nearly complete, not ciliate; plants perennial. 

 4. Inner sepals minutely glandular-ciliolate; sandy soil, local. July-Aug. 



[L. medium var. texanum (Planch.) Fern.] 



L. medium (Planch.) Britt. 



4. Sepals entire. 



5. Outer sepals 3-3.5 mm. long at maturity; dry open woods, local. 



June- Aug L. vhginianum L. 



5. Outer sepals 2-2.5 mm. long at maturity; damp ground, s. III., rare. 



July-Aug L. striatum Walt. 



3. Styles united below; outer sepals 4-6 mm. long, lanceolate, acuminate, 

 strongly glandular-ciliolate; leaves with dark stipular glands; false septa 

 of the capsule incomplete, conspicuously ciliate; plants annual; dry soil, 

 local. July-Sept L. sidcatum Riddell 



88. Balsaminaceae Lindl. — Jewel-weed Family 



1. Impatiens L. — Jewel-weed 



1. Flowers orange, thickly red-dotted; spur strongly incurved; moist woods, 



common. June-Sept. Spotted Touch-me-not /. biflora Walt. 



1. Flowers pale yellow, sparingly red-dotted; spur bent at a right angle to the 



sac; moist woods, common. July-Sept. Pale Touch-me-not 



/. pallida Nutt. 



89. Limnanthaceae Lindl. 



1. Floerkea Willd. — False Mermaid 

 F. proserpinacoides Willd. Wet ground, local. Apr.-June. 



90. Zygophyllaceae Lindl. — Caltrop Family 



1. Flowers (in our species) 1-1.5 cm. in diameter; carpels five, several-ovuled, at 

 maturity bearing 2-4 prickles 1. Trlhiihis 



1. Flowers (in our species) 2-2.5 cm. in diameter; carpels ten, 1-ovuled. tuberculate. 

 not spiny 2. Kalhtroemia 



I. Tribulus L. — Caltrop 



T. terrestris L. Puncture-weed. Waste places and sandy soil, occasional; 

 nat. from s. Eur. June-Sept. 



2. Kallstroemia Scop. 



K. intermedia Rydb. Railroad yards, occasional; adv. from s. U.S. or trop. 



Am. Blue Island, near Chicago. Babcock- [K- maxima sensu auth., non T. &C 



G.] 



9L Rutaceae Juss. — Rue Family 



1. Leaves pinnate; branches often prickly; fruit of 1-5 two-valved follicles 



1 . ZanihoxXilum 



1 . Leaves trifoliolale; branches not prickly; fruit a 2-seeded. suborbicular s;"^-'-- 



2. Pielea 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 93. Polygalaceae 173 



1. Zanthoxylum L. 



Z.. americaniim Mill. Prickly-ash. Woods and thickets, common through- 

 out 111., except the s. counties. Apr. -May. 



2. Ptelea L. 



P. trifoliata L. Hop-tree. Wafer-ash. Along streams and at the edges of 

 woods, not uncommon. May-July. Plants with pubescent branchlets have been 

 named var. deamiana Nieuwl. [P. trifoliata var. mollis sensu auth., non T. 8C 



G.} 



92. SiMARUBACEAE DC. — Quassia Family 

 1. Ailanthus Desf. 

 A. altissima (Mill.) Swingle. Tree of Heaven. Waste ground and edges 

 of woods, common; native of China. June-July. [/I. glandulosa Desf.] 



93. Polygalaceae Reichenb. — Milkwort Family 

 1. Polygala L. — Milkwort 



1. Plants perennial or biennial, usually several-stemmed (except P. pauci- 

 folia) ; leaves alternate. 



2. Flowers 1-3, terminal, rose-purple to white, 1.5-2 cm. long; leaves oval, 

 near the summit of the stem, the lower scale-like; rhizomes slender, 

 bearing inconspicuous cleistogamous flowers; moist woods, n.e. 111., 



rare; without locality, Moffatt; Vasey. May-June. Fringed Polygala 



P. pauafolia Willd. 



2. Flowers several or many, 3-6 mm. long, in terminal racemes. 



3. Leaves lanceolate to ovate, acuminate, 5-20 mm. w'de; flowers greenish 

 white; racemes compact; wings orbicular-ovate, 2-3 mm. long; plants 

 perennial; cleistogamous flowers absent; wooded banks, or roadsides, 



locally throughout 111. May-Sept. Seneca Snakeroot P. senega L. 



3. Leaves linear-oblanceolate, acutish, 2-6 mm. wide; flowers rose-purple 

 to pink; racemes loose; wings obovate, 4-6 mm. long; plants biennial, 

 with small cleistogamous flowers usually present at base; sandy soil, 

 n. III. June-Aug P. polygama Walt. 



1. Plants annual, single-stemmed; leaves linear or linear-oblanceolate. 

 4. Racemes capitate, obtuse, more than 5 mm. thick. 

 5. Leaves alternate. 



6. Stem glaucous; leaves linear-subulate, distant; petals united into a 

 tube about 5 mm. long; wings linear, less than half the length of 



the keel; prairie soil, in the n. half of the state, rare. July-Sept 



P. incarnata L. 



6. Stem leafy, not glaucous; petals not united into a long tube; wings 

 oval, equalling or exceeding the keel; fields, meadows, and open 



woods. July-Sept. [P. viridescens L.} P. sanguinea L. 



5. Leaves in whorls of four, linear-oblanceolate; wings acuminate; sandy 



soil in the n. half of the state. July-Sept P. cniciata L. 



4. Racemes slender, cylindrical or linear, tapering, less than 5 mm. thick. 




174 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



7. Branches mostly opposite or whorled; racemes short-peduncled; flowers 

 green or greenish; dry soil throughout 111., except the s. counties. 

 July-Sept P. verticdlata L. 



7. Branches mostly alternate; racemes long-peduncled; flowers purplish or 



greenish purple; woods and fields, s. 111. June-Aug 



P. ambigua Nutt. 



94. EuPHORBiACEAE J. St. Hil. — Spurge Family 



I. Flowers not in an involucre; calyx of 3-5 sepals; sap watery. 



2. Pubescence of stellate hairs. 



3. Flowers in spikes or glomerules; ovary 3-(2-4)-loculed 1. Crolon 



3. Flowers scattered on the branchlels; ovary 1-loculed 2. Croionopsis 



2. Pubescence, if any, of simple hairs. 



4. Leaves serrate; stamens usually 8; styles many-cleft; bracts of the pistillate 



flowers cleft 3. Acalvpha 



4. Leaves entire; stamens usually 3; styles simple; bracts of the pistillate flowers 



not cleft - 4. Ph\^llanlhus 



1. Flowers in a cup-shaped calyx-like involucre; sepals rudimentary; sap milky. 



5. Leaves opposite, oblique at base 5. Chamaes\)ce 



5. Leaves not oblique at base, alternate or opposite. 



6. Inflorescences in a several-rayed umbel; stipules none 6. Euphorbia 



6. Inflorescences cymcse ; stipules gland-like 7. Poinsetlia 



I. Croton L. 



1 . Leaves serrate; staminate flowers with a 4-parted calyx, 4 petals, a 4-rayed 

 disk, and 8 stamens; pistillate flowers with a 5-parted calyx; styles 3, 



bifid; sandy soil, adv. from s. U.S. Aug. -Oct. Sand Croton 



C. glaiidulosiis L. 



1 . Leaves entire. 



2. Capsules clustered, erect, depressed-globose, 7-9 mm. in diameter; styles 



3, bifid or trifid; stamens 10-14; sandy soil, probably adv. from s. US. 



Aug. -Sept C. capitatiis Michx. 



2. Capsules mostly solitary, pendent, ovoid, 3-4 mm. long; style none, the 



stigmas 2, bifid; stamens 3-8; roadsides and fields, chiefly in the s. half 



of 111. July-Oct C. monanthogynus Michx. 



2. Crotonopsis Michx. 



1. Leaves lanceolate; fruit ovoid; fields and open woods, local. July-Sept 



C. elliptica Willd. 



1. Leaves linear-lanceolate; fruit ellipsoid; dry sandy soil, s. 111., rare. July- 

 Sept C. linearis Michx. 



3. AcALYPHA L. — Three-seeded Mercury 

 1. Leaves slender-petioled; pistillate bracts with lanceolate, acute lobes. 



2. Stem with short, curved hairs, or nearly glabrous; bracts of the pistillate 

 flowers 5-7- (or rarely 9-) -lobed, bearing a few whitish stipitate glands 

 (at least when young), or nearly glabrous; woods, fields, and roadsides, 



common. July-Oct. {_A. virginica sensu auth.^ex p.} 



A. rhomhoidea Raf. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 94. Euphorbiaceae 175 



2. Stem with straight spreading hairs in addition to the short curved ones; 

 bracts with 9-15 lobes, hispid-pubescent on the veins and margins, not 

 glandular; fields, roadsides, and wooded slopes, local. July-Oct. \_A. 

 digyneia Raf.] A. virginica L. 



1. Leaves short-petioled (petiole V8"/4 ^^^ length of the blade), elliptic-lanceo- 

 late to lanceolate, or linear; bracts with 9-11 ovate to deltoid teeth; stem 

 with short, curved hairs; woods, fields, and roadsides, chiefly in the s. 

 third of the state. June-Sept. [/I. gracilens var. fraseri (Muell. Arg.) 

 Weatherbyj ...' A. gracilens Gray 



4. Phyllanthus L. 



P. caroliniensis Walt. Sandy soil; Peoria, Menard, Macoupin, St. Clair, 

 and Wabash counties. May-Oct. 



5. Chamaesyce S. F. Gray 



{Euphorbia ex p.) 



1. Leaves entire; stems prostrate; whole plant glabrous. 



2. Leaves roundish-oval, 1-3 mm. long; sandy soil, local. July-Sept 



C. serpens (HBK.) Small 



2. Leaves oblong, longer than broad, 4-20 mm. in length. 



3. Seeds 2-3 mm. long; sandy soil. Lake and Cook counties. July-Sept 



C. polygonifolia (L.) Small 



3. Seeds 1.5 mm. long; sandy soil. June-Sept.; known from Jo Daviess, 

 Lee, Henry, Henderson, Mason, and Cass counties. First collected 



at Beardstown, Cass Co., by C. A. Geyer in 1842 



C. geyeri (Engelm.) Small 



1 . Leaves toothed, at least at the apex. 



4. Capsules glabrous; seeds wrinkled. 



5. Capsules 2 mm. long; leaves obliquely oblong-Ianceolate, often red- 

 marked, the larger ones 1-3 cm. long; stems erect or ascending; fields 

 and roadsides, common throughout 111. July-Sept. \_E. preslit Guss.; 

 E. nutans Lag.; E. hypericijolia sensu Am. auth., non L.; C. lansingii 

 Millsp.} Nodding Spurge C. maculata (L.) Small 



5. Capsules 1.5 mm. long; leaves linear-oblong, the larger ones 4-10 mm. 



in length; stems spreading or prostrate; sandy or gravelly soil, not 

 common; known from Cook, Lee, Henry, Peoria, and St. Clair coun- 

 ties. June-Sept C. glyptospermn (Engelm.) Small 



4. Capsules pubescent; stems prostrate, villous. 



6. Leaves usually somewhat pubescent beneath; seeds 0.8-0.9 mm. long, 



minutely pitted and inconspicuously tranversely rugose; cult, ground 

 and roadsides, common. July-Oct. [£. maculata of auth., not L.} 



Milk Spurge C. supina (Raf.) Moldenke 



6. Leaves glabrous beneath; seeds 1 mm. long, papillose, obscurely wrin- 

 kled; sandy soil, local. July-Sept C. humistrata (Engelm.) Small 



6. Euphorbia L. — Spurge 

 1. Glands of the involucres with petal-like appendages. 




176 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



2. Leaves not white-margined; plants perennial with a deep root; roadsides, 

 fields, and open woods, common throughout 111. June-Sept. [Titby- 

 malopsis corollata (L.) Small} E. corollata L. 



2. Upper leaves conspicuously white-margined; plants annual; waste ground, 



escaped from cult.; native westw. July-Sept. \Lepadena marginata 

 (Pursh) Nieuwl.} Snow-on-the-mountain E. marginata Pursh 



1. Glands of the involucres without petal-like appendages. 



3. Leaves entire. 



4. Plants perennial, with a rhizome; stems clustered; capsules granular; 

 seeds smooth (seldom developing) . 

 5. Leaves lanceolate to linear, 4-15 mm. wide; waste places; nat. from 

 Eur. June-Sept E. esula L. 



5. Leaves linear, 1-3 mm. wide; roadsides and cemeteries; nat. from 



Eur. May-Sept. Cypress Spurge E. cyparissias L. 



4. Plants annual or biennial; capsules smooth; seeds pitted. 



6. Seeds finely pitted, 1-1.5 mm. long; lobes of the capsules 2-crested; 



waste places; nat. from Eur. June-Sept E. peplus L. 



6. Seeds coarsely pitted, 2 mm. long; lobes of the capsules rounded; 



wooded slopes and gravelly soil, local. May-June 



E. commutata Engelm. 



3. Leaves serrulate. 



7. Leaves spatulate; capsules warty; seeds smooth; moist ground in the n. 



half of the state. May-June E. obtusa Pursh 



7. Leaves obovate; capsules smooth; seeds reticulate; waste places; nat. 



from Eur. June-Oct. Wart Spurge E. helioscopia L. 



7. PoiNSETTiA Graham 

 1. Leaves chiefly opposite; plants pubescent, dull green; glands of the involucres 



stipitate; roadsides and fields, probably adv. from w. U.S. July-Sept. 



P. dentata (Michx.) Small 



1. Leaves alternate; plants glabrous or nearly so, bright green; glands sessile; 

 roadsides and waste places. June- Aug P. beterophylla (L.) Small 



95. Callitrichaceae Lindl. — Water-starwort Family 

 1. Callitriche L. — Water Starwort 



1. Fruit short-peduncled; bracts absent; plants terrestrial, growing on moist 

 soil, local; known from Champaign, Macoupin, St. Clair, and Wabash 

 counties C. an stmt Engelm. 



1. Fruits sessile; plants aquatic or amphibious. 



2. Bracts present. 



3. Fruit oval, flat, longer than the styles; known from Cook, Menard, and 



St. Clair counties C. palustris L. 



3. Fruit obovate, convex, shorter than the styles; local, throughout 111 



C. beterophylla Pursh 



2. Bracts absent; leaves all linear, submerged; St. Clair Co 



C autiimnalis L. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 98. Anacardiaceae 177 



96. Celastraceae Lindl. — Staff-tree Family 



1 . Leaves opposite; flowers axillary, cymose or solitary; capsules 4-5-loculed, usually 

 lobed I . Euonvmus 



I . Leaves alternate; flowers in terminal racemes; capsules 3-Ioculed, subglobose 



- 2. Celastriis 



1. EUONYMUS L. 

 L Erect shrubs. 



2. Leaves petioled; flower-parts commonly in fours; capsules smooth; woods 



near streams, throughout III. May-July. Wahoo 



E. atropurpureus Jacq. 



2. Leaves nearly sessile; flower-parts commonly in fives; capsules rough- 

 warty; woods, rare and local. May E. americanus L. 



L Decumbent shrubs, rooting at the nodes; woods, local E. obovatus Nutt. 



2. Celastrus L. 



C. scandens L. Climbing Bittersweet. Rich soil, common. May-June. 



97. Aquifoliaceae DC. — Holly Family 



(.Leaves usually entire; sepals minute, deciduous; petals linear 1. Nemopanihus 



I. Leaves (in our species) toothed; sepals persistent; petals oval 2. Ilex 



I. Nemopanthus Raf. — Mountain Holly 

 N. mucronata (L.) Trel. Swamps, rare. Cook and La Salle counties. May. 



2. Ilex L.— Holly 



L Leaves obovate, rounded at the apex, crenate; calyx-lobes not ciliate;^ nutlets 

 ribbed; edges of ponds and swamps, in the counties bordering the Mis- 

 sissippi, Wabash, and Ohio rivers. May. Possumhaw. Swamp Holly 



/. decidiia Walt. 



L Leaves elliptical, acuminate, serrate; calyx-lobes ciliate; nutlets smooth; 



swamps, more frequent in the n. counties. Winterberry 



/. verticillata (L.) Gray 



98. Anacardiaceae Lindl. — Sumac Family 

 L Rhus L. 



(Toxicodendron Mill.; Schmalizia Desv.) 

 L Leaves with 7-31 leaflets. 

 2. Leaflets decurrent on the rachis, which is therefore conspicuously winged; 

 fruit red, pubescent; roadsides, fields, and open woods, s. 111., extend- 

 ing northwestw. to Pike Co., and northeastw. to Lawrence Co.; also in 



Kankakee Co. July-Aug. Shining Sumac. Dwarf Sumac 



R. copallina L. 



2. Leaflets not decurrent; rachis not winged. 



3. Leaflets serrate; fruit red, in terminal clusters. 




178 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



4. Twigs and leaves glabrous; along roads and fences, and in open 



woods, common throughout 111. June-July. Smooth Sumac 



R. glabra L. 



4. Twigs and petioles villous-hirsute; woods, n. III., extending southw. 

 to La Salle, Cass, Morgan, and Hancock counties, occasionally 

 introd. elsewhere June-July. {^R. hirta (L.) Sudw.} Staghorn 

 Sumac R. typhina L. 



3. Leaflets entire or nearly so; fruit glabrous, whitish or pale greenish, in 

 axillary panicles; plants poisonous to the touch; tamarack bogs and 

 swampy ground. Lake and Kankakee counties. June-July. Poison 

 Sumac R. vernix L. 



L Leaves with 3 leaflets. 



5. Flowers in loose axillary panicles, appearing after the leaves; fruit gla- 

 brous, greenish white; plants erect, trailing, or climbing, poisonous to 

 the touch; along fences and in woods, or on sand dunes, common. May- 

 July. [/?. toxicodendron of auth., not L.] Poison Ivy R. radicans L. 



5. Flowers in short dense panicled spikes, catkin-like before opening, appear- 

 ing before or with the leaves; fruit red, pubescent; foliage not poison- 

 ous, fragrant when bruised. 

 6. Flowers nearly sessile, appearing before the leaves; leaflets 2-6 cm. long, 

 rhombic-obovate to ovate, acute; petioles villosulous to nearly gla- 

 brous; gravelly or rocky banks locally throughout 111., except the n. 

 counties; more frequent southw. May. \R. canadensis Marsh.; R. 

 crenata of Rydb., not Thunb.; Schmaltzia jormosa Greene; S. illino- 



ensis Greene] Fragrant Sumac R. aromatica Ait. 



6. Flowers on pedicels 2-3 mm. long, on leafy twigs; leaflets 1-2.5 cm. 

 obtusish, crenately few-lobed or -toothed above the middle; petioles 

 puberulent or tomentulose; sandy banks and dunes; known from 

 Cook, Jo Daviess, Mason, and Hancock counties; also n. Ind. May. 



[^Schmaltzia arenarta Greene, Leaflets 1:130. 1905] 



R. arenaria (Greene) n. comb. 



99. Staphyleaceae DC. — Bladdernut Family 

 1. Staphylea L. 



S. trifolia L. American Bladdernut. Moist woods and thickets, common. 

 Apr.-May. 



100. Aceraceae Lindi. — Maple Family 



1. Acer L. — Maple 



1. Leaves simple, palmately lobed; floral disk present; anthers ellipsoid, not 

 apiculate. 

 2. Leaves silvery whitish on the lower surface; flowers i" dense sessile clus- 

 ters, appearing before the leaves. 



3. Leaves 5-lobed, the lobes serrate or cleft or parted; petals none; ovary 

 tomentose; samaras divergent, pubescent; chiefly in alluvial soil, com- 

 mon. Mar. -Apr. Silver Maple A. saccharinum L. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 102. Rhamnaceae 179 



3. Leaves 3-5-lobed, the lobes unequally crenate-serrate; petals 5; ovary 

 glabrous; samaras incurved, glabrous at maturity. 

 4. Leaves glabrous or nearly so on the lower surface at maturity; ma- 

 ture twigs glabrous; samaras 18-25 mm. long, the wing 6-8 mm. 



wide; woods, local. Mar. -Apr. Red Maple A. rubrum L. 



4. Leaves permanently tomentose beneath; twigs more or less pubescent 

 at maturity; samaras 3.5-6 cm. long, the wing 1-2 cm. broad at the 

 middle; swamps, rare, s. Ill A. drummondii H. & A. 



2. Leaves not silvery-white beneath; flowers corymbose, unfolding with the 

 leaves. 



5. Leaves flat, 3-5-lobed, the lobes coarsely dentate, more or less glabrous; 

 stipules absent; woods, common. Apr. -May. [/I. barbatum Michx.; 

 A. saccharophorum K. Koch.; Saccharodendron barbatum NieuwI.} 

 Sugar Maple A. saccharum Marsh. 



5. Leaves with drooping sides, usually with 3 main lob^s, the lobes acumi- 

 nate, entire or undulate or obtusely toothed; lower surface yellowish 

 green and softly pubescent, at least along the veins, varying to nearly 

 glabrous in age; stipules often present, large, enclosing the buci; 

 woods, local. May. Black Maple A. nigrum Michx. f. 



1. Leaves 3-7-foliolate; flowers dioecious, drooping, appearing before the leaves; 

 anthers linear, apiculate; disk none; petals none; alluvial soil, common. 



Apr. -May. [Negundo nuttallii (NieuwI.) Rydb.] Box-elder 



A. negundo L. 



101. HiPPOCASTANACEAE T. Sc G. — Horse-chestnut Family 

 1. Aesculus L. — Horse-chestnut 



1. Ovary and capsule soft-spiny; flowers 12-18 mm. long, finely pubescent, 

 greenish yellow; stamens exserted; calyx campanulate, 6-8 mm. long; 

 woods, common. Apr.-May. Ohio Buckeye A. glabra Willd. 



1 . Ovary and capsule smooth; flowers about 3 cm. long, reddish purple or yel- 

 lowish; stamens included; woods, s. 111. Apr.-May. Yellow or Sweet 

 Buckeye A. octandra Marsh. 



102. Rhamnaceae Dum. — Buckthorn Family 



1. Leaves pinnately veined; flowers greenish yellow; fruit a drupe 1. Rhamnus 



1 . Leaves triple-veined ; flowers (in our species) white, fragrant; fruit a capsule 



2. Ceanolhus 



1. Rhamnus L. — Buckthorn 

 1 . Winter buds scaly. 



2. Leaves opposite or subopposite, ovate, abruptly acute; twigs rigid, often 

 spine-like; flowers usually 4-merous; petals present; drupe with 3 or 4 

 nutlets; roadsides and edges of woods, occasional in n. III.; nat. from 

 Eurasia. May-June R. cathartica L. 



2. Leaves alternate; native shrubs 1-2 m. tall; twigs not at all spine-like. 




180 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



3. Leaves elliptical, serrulate, pubescent beneath; twigs puberulent; flowers 

 4-merous; petals present; drupe with 2 nutlets; alluvial soil, bluffs, 

 river banks, the common species in 111. May R. lanceolate Pursh 



3. Leaves oval or obovate, strongly veined, glabrous, crenate-serrate; twigs 

 glabrous; flowers 5-merous; petals none; drupe with 3 nutlets; 

 wooded swamps, n. 111., in Lake and Peoria counties. Alder Buck- 

 thorn R. alnifolia L'Her. 



L Winter buds naked; leaves alternate; flowers 5-merous; shrubs or small trees 

 3-10 m. tall. 



4. Leaves serrate or serrulate; flowers in peduncled cymes, the pedicels pu- 

 bescent; ralyx-Iobes lanceolate, acuminate; drupe 8-10 mm. in diameter, 

 with 3 nutlets; wooded slopes, s. 111., rare; known from Jackson and 



Gallatin counties. May-June. Carolina Buckthorn 



R. caroliniana Walt. 



4. Leaves entire or undulate; flowers fascicled; pedicels glabrous; calyx-lobes 

 ovate, acute; drupe 6-8 mm. in diameter, with 2 nutlets; woods and 

 roadsides, nat. from Eurasia. Known in 111. from Lake, Cook, Sanga- 

 mon, and Champaign counties. May-June. Alder Buckthorn 



R. fratigula L. 



2. Ceanothus L. 



1 . Leaves ovate, acute; seeds smooth; thickets and open woods, coinmon. June- 

 July. New Jersey Tea C. americanus L. 



1. Leaves elliptic-lanceolate; seeds pitted; sandy soil in the n. third of III., not 

 common. May-June C ovatus Desf. 



103. Vitaceae Lindl. — Grape Family 



1 . Leaves simple, or pinnately compound. 



2. Inflorescence longer than broad; petals united in a cap, falling away without sep- 

 arating; pith interrupted at the nodes; fruit edible; leaves simple, palmately 



lobed or dentate 1. Vilis 



2. Inflorescence broader than long; petals separate, spreading; pith not interrupted at 



the nodes; fruit not edible 2. Ampelopsis 



1. Leaves palmately compound with usually 5-leaflets 3. Parihenocissiis 



1. Vitis L. — Grape 



1. Mature leaves grayish arachnoid-pubescent beneath. 



2. Twigs terete or nearly so, glabrate; fruit glaucous, about 1 cm. in diam- 

 eter; woods, thickets, and river banks in the n. two-thirds of the state. 

 June- July. [V. bicolor LeConte] Summer Grape ...V. aestivalis Michx. 



2. Twigs distinctly angular, permanently pubescent; fruit black, 6-8 mm. in 



diameter; woods and stream banks. June-July. Winter Grape 



V . cmerea Engelm. 



1. Mature leaves green beneath, short-pubescent along the veins, or nearly 

 glabrous. 



3. Leaves coarsely dentate or slighdy 3-lobed; fruit glaucous; in woods and 



along fences, common. May-June. [V . cordifolia Lam.] Frost Grape .... 

 V. vulpina L. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 105. Malvaceae 181 



3. Leaves sharply 3-5-lobed. 



4. Lobes acuminate, the sinuses rounded; fruit black, not glaucous; alluvi- 

 al soil in the s., e., and n.e. parts of the state. June-July. Catbird 

 Grape V. palmata Vahl 



4. Lobes and sinuses acute; fruit glaucous; alluvial soil throughout 111. 



May-June. [K. vulpina of auth., not L.} Riverbanlc Grape 



V. riparia Michx. 



2. Ampelopsis Michx. 



1. Leaves simple, ovate, serrate or slightly 3-lobed; woods, thickets, and along 

 fences, s. 111., extending northw. along the river valleys to Hancock and 



Wabash counties. June-July. \Cissus ampelopsis Pers.} Racoon-grape 



A. cordctta Michx. 



1. Leaves bipinnate, the leaflets ovate, toothed; moist woods, s. III., known 

 from Alexander, Pulaski, Union, and Jackson counties. July- Aug. l_A. bi- 



pinnata Michx.; Vit'ts arborea L.; Ctssus stans Pers.} Pepper-vine 



A. arborea (L.) Koehne 



3. Parthenocissus Planch. 



(Psedera Neck.) 

 1. Leaflets dull above, pale beneath; tendrils with 5-8 branches ending in ad- 

 hesive tips; cymes usually crowded into terminal panicles; fruit 5-7 mm. 

 in diameter, 1-3-seeded; plants high-climbing; woods, and along fences, 

 common. June-July. Virginia Creeper P. quinquefolia (L.) Planch. 



1. Leaflets somewhat glossy above, scarcely paler beneath; tendrils with 3-5 

 branches, usually without adhesive disks; cymes solitary; fruit 8-10 mm. 

 in diameter, 3-4-seeded; plants usually low and trailing; thickets and along 

 fences, local; chiefly in the n. half of the state. June- July. [P. vitacea 

 (Knerr) Hitchc] Woodbine P. inserta (Kern.) K. Fritsch 



104 Tiliaceae Juss. — Linden Family 



1. Tilia L. — Linden 

 1 . Leaves glabrous beneath except for tufts of hairs in the axils of the lateral 

 veins, coarsely serrate, abruptly short-acuminate; woods, common. June- 

 July. [T. glabra Vent.} American Linden. Basswood T. americana L. 



1. Leaves tomentose beneath, finely serrate, gradually short-acuminate; woods, 

 s. 111. June-July. White Basswood T. helerophylla Vent. 



105. Malvaceae Neck. — Mallow Family 



1. Calyx subtended by an involucre of bracts. 

 2. Bracts 2 or 3. 



3. Flowers pink or purple; leaves not linear. 



4. Petals obcordate; stigmas linear; leaves roundish in outline, obtusely lobed 



or rarely dissected; carpels I -seeded I. Malva 



4. Petals obtuse or truncate at the apex. 



5. Leaves triangular-hastate; stigmas linear; carpels 1 -seeded 3. Callirhoe 



5. Leaves 5-7-lobed, maple-hke in appearance; stigmas capitate; carpels 2- or 

 3-seeded 6. Sphaeralcea 




182 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



3. Flowers yellow; leaves linear; stigmas capitate; carpels I -seeded.. .3. Malvasinim 

 2. Bracts 6-9. 



6. Stigmas linear; carpels I -seeded 2. Althaea 



6. Stigmas capitate; carpels united into a 5-valved capsule 9. Hibiscus 



1. Calyx without bracts. 



7. Petals yellow; flowers perfect; leaves not lobed. 



8. Leaves less than 3 cm. broad, ovate-lanceolate, serrate, and \vith a small tubercle 



at the base; petals less than 1 cm. long; carpels 5, each 1 -seeded 7. Sida 



8. Leaves 6-30 cm. broad, cordate, acuminate, velvety-pubescent, long-petioled; 



petals 10-15 mm. long; carpels 12-15, each several-seeded 8. Abuiilon' 



7. Petals white; plants dioecious; leaves orbicular, palmately 7- 1 I -lobed; carpels 

 8-10, rugose-reticulate, each 1 -seeded 4. Napaea 



I. Malva L.— Mallow 



L Petals not more than twice as long as the sepals. 



2. Leaves crisped on the margins; carpels reticulate; stem stout, erect, 0.5-2 

 m. tall; escaped from cult.; native of Eur. July-Sept M. crispa L. 



2. Leaves not crisped. 



3. Stems erect; petals 5 mm. long; carpels 8-11, more or less pubescent 

 and rugose on the back; weed in waste places, native of Eur. July- 

 Aug. [M. pHsilla With.} Round-leaved Mallow ..M. rotundifolia L. 



3. Stems prostrate or ascending; petals 10-12 mm. long; carpels 12-15, 

 pubescent; waste places, adventive from Eur. May-Sept. [M. rotun- 

 difolia of auth., not L.} M. neglecta Wallr. 



1. Petals 3-8 times as long as the sepals. 



4. Leaves 3-7-lobed; petals purple; carpels wrinkled; occasional in waste 

 places as a garden escape. Aug. -Sept M. sylvestris L. 



4. Leaves deeply dissected; petals pink; carpels pubescent; roadsides, escaped 

 from cult.; native of Eur. June. Musk Mallow M. moschata L. 



2. Althaea L. Hollyhock 

 A. rosea Cav. Roadsides and waste ground; native of China. 



3. Callirhoe Nutt. — Poppy Mallow 



1. Leaves triangular or halberd-shaped, crenate; plants stellate-pubescent; car- 

 pels pubescent, not rugose; petals 2-2.5 cm. long; sandy soil, rare. June- 

 Sept C. triangidata (Leavenw.) Gray 



1. Leaves round-cordate, palmately 5-7-parted; plants glabrous, or sparingly 

 pubescent at the base; carpels rugose, scarcely pubescent; petals 1.5-2 cm. 

 long; dry gravelly soil, rare. Peoria (Brendel, McDo7iald) , where prob- 

 ably adv C. digitata Nutt. 



4. Napaea L. — Glade Mallow 

 N. dioica L. Alluvial soil, local, throughout the n. half of III. July-Aug. 



5. Malvastrum Gray 



(Sidopsis Rydb.) 

 M. angustuDi Gray. Dry ground, rare. La Salle Co. July-Aug. [Sidopsis 

 hispida (Pursh) Rydb.; S phaeralcea angusta (Gray) Fern.} 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 106. Hypericaceae 183 



6. Sphaeralcea St. Hil. 



S. remota (Greene) Fern. Kankakee Mallow. On an island in the Kanka- 

 kee River; also in western Virginia; not otherwise known. June-July. 



7. SiDA L. 

 S. spinosa L. Prickly Sida. Fields and waste ground, common; native of 

 Trop. Am. July-Oct. 



8. Abutilon Mill. — Indian Mallow 



A. theophrasti Medic. Velvet-leaf. Butterprint. Fields and roadsides, com- 

 mon; native of India. Aug. -Oct. 



9. Hibiscus L. — Rose Mallow 



1. Stems 1-2 m. tall; native species. 



2. Leaves glabrous throughout; muddy shores of streams and ponds locally 



throughout 111., except the n. counties. July-Oct H. mditaris Cav. 



2. Leaves pubescent at least beneath. 



3. Leaves glabrous or nearly so on the upper surface; borders of streams, 



ditches, and ponds, rare; n.e. 111. July-Aug H. moscheutos 



3. Leaves velvety-pubescent above; shores of ponds and streams, chiefly in 

 the s. half of the state. Aug.-Oct H. lasiocarpos Cav. 



1. Stem 10-40 cm. tall; leaves 3-7-lobed; plants annual; roadsides, fields, and 



waste places; adv. from s. Eur. Aug.-Oct. Flower-of-an-hour 



H. trioniim L. 



106. Hypericaceae Lindl. — St. John's-wort Family 



I. Petals yellow. 



2. Sepals 4, in unequal pairs, the outer pair larger and bract-like; petals 4 



1. Ascyrum 



2. Sepals 5; petals 5. 



3. Leaves with ordinary flat blades, not reduced to scales 2. H\)pericum 



3. Leaves scale-like or subulate 3. Sarolhra 



1. Petals pink or greenish purple; sepals 5; leaves oval 4. Triadenum 



1. ASCYRUM L. 



A. multicaule Michx. Thickets, s. 111. July-Aug. [_A. crux-andrae and A. 

 hypericoides of auth., not L.j St. Andrew's Cross. 



2. Hypericum L. — St. John's-wort 



1. Stamens numerous (15-40). 



2. Shrubs, 0.5-1.5 m. tall. 



3. Styles 5; capsules ovoid, 6-9 mm. long; flowers 2-3 cm. broad; sandy 

 soil, local; known from Lake, Cook, and Livingston counties; also 

 in St. Clair and Pope counties. June-Aug. Kalm's St. John's-wort .... 

 H. kalmianum L. 



3. Styles 3; capsules ellipsoid, 11-13 mm. long; flowers 1.5-2 cm. broad; 



moist woods. July-Aug. Shrubby St. John's-wort H. prolificurn L. 



2. Herbs, rarely shrubbly at base. 



4. Petals not at all black-dotted. 




184 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



5. Flowers 4-6 cm. broad, the petals 2-2.5 cm. long; capsules 1.5-2 cm. 

 long; cyme few-flowered; stamens united into 5 sets; styles 5; 

 banks of streams, locally throughout III., except the s. counties. 



July-Aug. Giant St. John's-wort H. ascyron L. 



5. Flowers 1-2 cm. broad, the petals 6-10 mm. long; capsules 4-6 mm. 



long; stamens distinct. 



6. Stems somewhat woody at base; sepals oval or ovate-lanceolate, 



plane or nearly so; capsules unilocular, ovoid, 4-6 mm. long; 



seeds rugulose and pitted; roadsides, open woods, river banks, 



throughout 111. June-Aug. \H. cistifolium of auth., not Lam.} 



H. sphaerocarpum Michx. 



6. Stem herbaceous throughout, from a slender, creeping, stolonifer- 

 ous base; sepals lanceolate, the margins more or less revolute; 

 capsules incompletely 3-5-loculed by the projecting placentae; wet 



ground, s. 111., rare. July-Aug H. adpressum Bart. 



4. Petals black-dotted, at least along the margin. 



7. Flowers 1.5-2.5 cm. broad; petals black-dotted along the margin; 

 sepals lanceolate; leaves linear or oblong, 1-2 cm. long, 2-8 mm. 

 wide, numerous, pellucid-dotted; stem with numerous basal sterile 

 shoots; roadsides and fields, common; adv. from Eur. June-Aug. 



Common St. John's-wort H. perforatum L. 



7. Flowers 8-15 mm. broad; petals with several lines of black dots; 

 sepals ovate; leaves oval, 2-8 cm. long, 8-16 mm. wide, conspicu- 

 ously black-dotted; roadsides and open woods. July-Aug. [H. 



pseudo-maculatum Mack. & Bush} H. punctatum Lam. 



1. Stamens few (5-20); flowers small, the petals 3-6 mm. long. 



8. Capsules 3-3.5 mm. long; sepals linear, obtusish; leaves oval, obtuse, 5- 



veined; plants often diffusely branched; moist soil, local. July-Sept 



H. vnitdum L. 



8. Capsules 4-6 mm. long; sepals narrowly lanceolate, acuminate; branching 



strict, erect. 



9. Leaves elliptic-lanceolate, 3-7-veined, acutish at the apex, somewhat 



rounded at the clasping base, 3-10 mm. wide; sepals 5-6 mm. long, 



nearly equalling the capsule; moist ground, rare; n.e. 111., e.xtending 



southwestw. to Peoria Co. July-Aug H. majiis (Gray) Britt. 



9. Leaves linear or linear-oblanceolate, obtusish, 1-3-veined, slightly ta- 

 pered at the sessile base, 1-3 mm. wide; sepals 2.5-3 mm. long, notice- 

 ably shorter than the capsule; moist sandy soil, rare; known from 

 Kankakee and Cook counties. July-Sept H. canadense L. 



3. Sarothra L. — Pineweed 

 1. Leaves scale-like, 2-3 mm. long; capsules much longer than the sepals; 



flowers 4-8 mm. in diameter, nearly sessile; sandy soil, local. Aug. -Oct. 



[Hypericum gentiarioidcs (L.) BSP.} S. gentiaiioides L. 



1. Leaves subulate, 5-20 mm. long; capsules about as long as the sepals; flowers 



10-12 mm. in diameter, pedicelled; sterile soil in the s. half of the state. 



July-Sept. [Hypericum drummondii (Grev. & Hook.) T. & G.} 



S. drumvwndu Grev. & Hook. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 107. Cistaceae 185 



4. Triadenum Raf. — Marsh St. John's-wort 



T. virginicum (L.) Raf. Swamps, local. July-Sept. [^Hypericum virginicum 



L-] 



107. Cistaceae Lindl. — Rockrose Family 



l.Low shrubs; leaves subulate; petals 5, yellow, fugacious; styles slender, elongate 



I. Hudsonia 



1. Herbs; leaves not subulate. 



2. Petals 5, yellow, fugacious; style short; pubescence stellate 2. Helianthemum 



2. Petals 3, greenish or red, persistent; style none; pubescence not stellate 3. Lechea 



1. Hudsonia L. 



H. tomentosa Nutt. Sandy soil, local. Jo Daviess, Lee, and Fulton coun- 

 ties. May-July. 



2. Helianthemum Mill. — Frostweed 



(Crocanlhemum Spach) 



1. Petaliferous flowers 5-12, pale yellow, in a short terminal cymose raceme, 

 their capsules 3-5 mm. in diameter; seeds reticulate; sandy soil in open 



woods, local. June-July. [H. majus sensu Biclcn., non (L.) BSP.] 



H. bicknellii Fern. 



1. Petaliferous flowers solitary (or rarely 2), bright yellow, their capsules 6-9 

 mm. in diameter; seeds papillose; in similar habitats. June. [Lechea major 



L.; Cistus canadensis L.; H. majus (L.) BSP.} 



H. canadense (L.) Michx. 



3. Lechea L. — Pinweed 



1. Stem with spreading (villous) pubescence; leaves of the basal shoots oval; 

 stem leaves oval, 10-25 mm. long, 6-12 mm. wide; sandy soil. July-Aug. 

 L. villosa Ell. 



l.Stem with appressed (strigose) pubescence, or sometim*'^ nearly glabrous. 



2. The narrow outer sepals longer than the inner ones. 



3. Stem 25-70 cm. tall; leaves narrowly elliptical; sandy soil. July-Aug 



L. minor L. 



3. Stems usually 10-20 cm. tall; leaves linear; sandy or sterile soil in 



woods. July-Aug. [L. tenuifolia var. occidentalis Hodgdon] 



L. tenuifolia Michx. 



2. The narrow outer sepals shorter than or equalling the inner ones. 



4. Plants pale green, finely canescent; panicle strict, virgate; sandy soil. 



July-Aug L. stricta Leggett 



4. Plants dark green, more or less pubescent, but not canescent. 



5. Panicle strict, virgate; capsules globose, 2-3 mm. in diameter; sandy 

 soil, rare. July-Aug L. intermedia Leggett 



5. Panicle-branches spreading; capsules ellipsoid, 1-1.5 mm. in diam- 

 eter; sandy soil, n.e. 111.; known from Winnebago, Lake, Cook, 

 Kankakee, and Iroquois counties. July-Aug. £L. moniliformis 

 Bickn.] L. leggettii Britt. & Hollick 




186 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



108. Violaceae DC. — Violet Family 



1. Corolla merely gibbous at the base; sepals not auncled; stamens united into a sheath 

 I . Hvihanihiis 



1. Corolla spurred; sepals more or less auncled at the base; stamens distinct or slightly 

 cohermg 2. Viola 



1. Hybanthus Jacq. — Green Violet 



H. concolor (Forst.) Spreng. Moist ravines and rich woods.. Apr. -June. 

 [Cubelium concolor (Forst.) Raf}. 



2. Viola L. — Violet 



1 . Plants acaulescent, or without manifest stems at flowering time, the leaves 

 and pedicels arising directly from the rhizome or from stolons. 



2. Rhizome short, thick, stout (3-10 mm. in diameter); petals violet to 

 white. 



3. Leaves more or less lobed or dissected. 

 4. Leaves dissected into narrow divisions. 



5. Petals all glabrous within, lilac, or the upper two dark violet; 

 style clavate, beakless, oblique at apex; plants without cleisto- 

 gamous flowers; prairies and borders of woods, locally through- 

 out III. Apr.-June. Bird-foot Violet V . pedata L. 



5. Lateral petals hirsute within; corolla violet; style capitate, with a 



conical beak on the lower side; plants producing cleistogamous 

 flowers; prairies or dry open woods, locally throughout 111., ex- 

 cept the s. counties. May. Prairie Violet V . pedatifida Don 



4. Leaves usually lobed or cleft; plants producing cleistogamous flowers. 



6. Leaves all 5-11-lobed or -parted; woods and prairie soil, n. 111., e.x- 



tending southw. to Peoria and Kankakee counties. Apr. -May. 

 [K. papilionacea )^ pedatifida ?; V. palmata sensu auth.; V. 



perpensa Greene] X ^- bernardi Greene 



6. Leaves usually of two kinds, the earliest and latest not lobed, the 

 others 5-7-parted; woods, s. 111., extending northw. to Macon 

 and Peoria counties. May. [V . triloba var. dilatata Brainerd] .... 

 V . falcata Greene 



3. Leaves merely crenate-serrate, not lobed. 



7. Leaves ovate-cordate to reniform or deltoid. 

 8. Leaves glabrous or nearly so. 



9. Hairs of the lateral petals not clavate; cleistogamous flowers on 

 short prostrate or ascending pedicels. 

 10. Leaves ovate-cordate to reniform, acute or obtuse; flowers 

 violet-purple (except albinos) . 

 11. Leaf-blades obtuse or obtusish, broadly cordate or reni- 

 form at maturity; spurred petal glabrous or nearly so 

 within; cleistogamous flowers on short prostrate pedi- 

 cels; capsules 10-15 mm. long; seeds dark brown; 

 woods and roadsides, common throughout III. Apr.- 

 May. Butterfly Violet V. papilionacea Pursh 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 108. Violaceae 187 



11. Leaf-blades acutish, narrowly cordate, usually longer than 

 broad; spurred petal hirsute within; cleistogamous 

 flowers on ascending pedicels; seeds light brown; moist 

 soil, not common; known from Cook, Henry, and 



Macon counties. May-June V. affinis Le Conte 



10. Leaves deltoid, acuminate; petals lilac; spurred petal gla- 

 brous within; open woods. Apr.-May 



V. missouriensis Greene 



9. Hairs of the lateral petals conspicuously clavate-capitate; cleis- 

 togamous flowers on slender erect pedicels; wet ground, not 



common. May-June. Marsh Blue Violet V. cucuUata Ait 



8. Leaves decidedly pubescent; petals violet or lavender, rarely white; 

 sepals ciliolate; woods, common throughout 111. Apr.-May. 



Downy Blue Violet V. sororia Willd. 



7. Leaves sagittate-lanceolate. 



12. Leaves glabrous or nearly so; open woods. Apr.-May. Arrow- 

 leaved Violet V. sagittata Ait. 



12. Leaves pubescent; hillsides, not common; known from Cook, Lee, 



Stark, and Grundy counties. Apr.-May. [V . ovata Nutt.] 



V. fimbriatula Sm. 



2. Rhizome slender (1-2 mm. in diameter); plants usually stoloniferous. 

 13. Flowers small, white, the lower petals purple-veine:'; style not 

 hooked; seeds brown or black; native species. 

 14. Leaves tapering or truncate at base. 



15. Leaves lanceolate or elliptical-lanceolate, several times as long 

 as broad and usually less than 2 cm. wide, tapering at the 

 base; borders of swamps, local. May-June. Lance-leaved 



Violet V. lanceolata L. 



15. Leaves ovate, not more than twice as long as wide, usually 

 more than 2 cm. broad, truncate at base; borders of swamps; 

 known from Cook and Kankakee counties. May-June. Prim- 

 rose Violet V. primulifolia L. 



14. Leaves cordate, glabrous; pedicels usually somewhat longer than 

 the leaves; springy ground, n. 111., rare. Apr.-May. [V. blanda 



of auth., not Willd.] Smooth White Violet 



V. pallens (Banks) Brainerd 



13. Flowers large (1-2 cm. broad), violet, or sometimes white, very fra- 

 grant; style hooked; leaves broadly ovate, cordate, crenate, finely 

 pubescent; stolons rooting at the nodes; seeds cream colored; road- 

 sides and waste places, occasional; introd. from Eur. and often cult. 



Apr.- June. Sweet Violet V. odorata L. 



1. Plants caulescent at flowering time; flowers axillary. 

 16. Plants perennial; stipules small, toothed or entire. 

 17. Petals yellow. 



18. Plants nearly glabrous; basal leaves usually present at flowering 

 time; seeds 2-2.5 mm. long; woods, common. Apr.-May. [F. 



scabriuscida Schw.] Common Yellow Violet 



V . eriocarpa Schw. 




188 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



18. Plants decidedly pubescent; basal leaves usually absent at flower- 



ing time; seeds 2.6-3 mm. long; moist woods, rare. Apr. -May. 



Downy Yellow Violet V. pubescetis Ait. 



17. Petals violet or white. 



19. Stipules entire, scarious; petals violet or white; woods, rare. Apr.- 



June. Canada Violet V. canadensis L. 



19. Stipules dentate or fimbriate. 



20. Petals creamy white; sepals ciliolate; upper leaves acute; stip- 

 ules 1.5-2.5 cm. long; alluvial soil, common. Apr.-June. 



Cream Violet V. striata Ait. 



20. Petals pale violet; sepals glabrous; leaves obtuse; stipules 

 usually less than 1.5 cm. long; woods. Cook Co., A. Chase. 



Apr. -May. Dog Violet V. conspersa Reichenb. 



16. Plants annual; stipules large, pectinate; style enlarged at the hollow apex. 

 21. Upper leaves entire or nearly so; flowers 7-10 mm. long; petals twice 

 the length of the sepals; sandy soil in fields and open woods, com- 

 mon. Apr.-June. Wild Pansy V. rafinesqiin Greene 



21. Upper leaves crenate-serrate. 



22. Petals shorter than or barely exceeding the sepals; fields and road- 

 sides, occasional; adv. from Eur. May-July. Field Pansy 



V . arvensis Murr. 



22. Petals much longer than the sepals; occasionally found as an 



escape from cult.; native of Eur. Garden Pansy 



V. tricolor L. 



109. Passifloraceae Dum. — Passion-flower Family 



1. Passiflora L. — Passion-flower 



1. Leaves deeply 3-5-lobed, the lobes serrate; flowers subtended by a conspicu- 

 ous involucre of 3 bracts; petals lavender or whitish; dry soil, s. 111. 



May-July P. incarnata L. 



1. Leaves obtusely 3-lobed above the middle, the lobes entire; flowers without 

 an involucre; petals greenish yellow; thickets, s. HI., extending northw. to 

 Pike and Wabash counties. May-July P. lutea L. 



110. Cactaceae Lindl. — Cactus Family 

 1. Opuntia Mill. — Prickly-pear 



O. rafinesquii Engelm. Sandy soil, locally abundant; known from Lake, 

 Cook, Mason, Adams, Jackson, Union, Johnson, and Pope counties. [(?) O. 

 humijiisa Raf.] 



111. Thymeleaceae Reichenb. — Mezereum Family 

 1. DiRCA L. 

 D. pahistris L. Leatherwood. Woods and thickets, local. Apr.-May. 



112. Elaeagnaceae Lindl. — Oleaster Family 

 1. Shepherdia Nutt. 

 S. canadensis L. Canadian Buffalo-berry. Dry bluffs and banks or ravines, 

 near L. Michigan; Lake Forest, HAl in 1904; Glencoe, G. D. Fuller in 1943. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 115. Onagraceae 189 



113. Lythraceae Lindl. — Loosestrife Family 



I. Flowers regular; petals equal. 



2. Flowers small, axillary, solitary or few. 



3. Calyx-tube campanulate or hemispherical, not striate. 

 4. Petals 4; calyx-tube with appendages in the sinuses. 



5. Flowers solitary, sessile, axillary; capsules 4-loculed, septicidal I. Rotala 



5. Flowers usually more than I in each axil; capsules 2-4-loculed, irregularly 



dehiscent 2. Ammannia 



4. Petals absent; calyx-tube without appendages 3. Peplis 



3. Calyx-tube cylindrical, striate; petals 5-7, usually 6 4. LythTum 



2. Flowers large (2 cm. in diameter), in axillary clusters, trimorphous; petals usually 5; 



plants semi-shrubby 5. Decodon 



1. Flowers irregular and unsymmetrical ; petals unequal; plants glandular-pubescent.... 

 - ...6. Cuphea 



1. Rotala L. 

 R. ramosior (L.) Koehne. Wet ground, throughout 111. July-Sept. 



2. Ammannia L. 



A. cocc'mea Rottb. Muddy banks and shores, locally common throughout 

 111. July-Aug. 



3. Peplis L. — Water-purslane 



{Didiplis Raf.) 

 P. diandra Nutt. Wet ground or shallow water, rare. June-Aug. Known 

 from Cook, Hancock, Henderson, Menard, Wabash, and St. Clair counties. 

 lAmmannia nuttallii Gray; D. diandra (Nutt.) Wood} 



4. Lythrum L. — ^Loosestrife 

 L. alatum Pursh. Meadows and moist ground, common June-Aug. 



5. Decodon J. F. Gmel. — Swamp Loosestrife 



D. verticillatus (L.) Ell. Swamps, not common; known in III. from Lake, 

 Cook, Woodford, and Mason counties. 



6. Cuphea P. Br. — Waxweed 



C. petiolata (L.) Koehne. Dry soil, throughout 111., except the n.w. coun- 

 ties. July-Oct. 



114. Melastomaceae R. Br. — Melastoma Family 

 1. Rhexia L. — Meadow-beauty 

 R. virginica L. Moist sand-barrens, or in peaty soil, locally throughout III.; 

 known from Cook, Kankakee, La Salle, Mason, Cass, and Richland counties. 

 July-Sept. 



115. Onagraceae Dum. — Evening-primrose Family 



I. Flowers with 4 petals (rarely 0) ; sepals 4-6 (rarely apparently only 2) ; stamens 4-12. 

 2. Fruit a many-seeded capsule. 



3. Seeds with a tuft of silky hairs; flowers (in our species) not yellow 



I . Epilobium 



3. Seeds without hairs. 



4. Hypanthium scarcely or not at all extended beyond the ovary. 



5. Stamens 8-12, in two series _ 2. Jiissiaea 



5. Stamens 4 3. Ludmgia 




190 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



4. Hypanthium conspicuously extended beyond the ovary into a tube 



4. Oenothera 



2. Fruit indehiscent, deciduous; flowers pink 5. Caiira 



1. Flowers with 2 notched white petals, 2 sepals, and 2 stamens; fruit indehiscent, 

 obovoid, with hooked bristly hairs 6. Circaea 



1. Epilobium L. — Willow-herb 



1. Petals 1-2 cm. long; stigma 4-Iobe(d; edges of woods and burned-over 

 ground, local; known from Lake, McHenry, Cook, and La Salle counties. 



June-Aug. Fireweed [Chamaeiierion spicatum (Lam.) S. F. Gray} 



E. angustifolium L. 



1. Petals 3-8 mm. long; stigmas entire. 

 2. Leaves lanceolate, denticulate. 



3. Seeds beakless, 1-1.5 mm. long; coma reddish brown; moist ground, 

 local. Aug. -Sept E. coloration Muhl. 



3. Seeds short-beaked, 0.5-1 mm. long; coma whitish; moist ground, not 



common; chiefly in the n. and w. parts of the state. July-Sept 



E. adenocaulon Haussk. 



2. Leaves linear, or linear-lanceolate, mostly entire. 



4. Stems, leaves, and capsules copiously soft-pubescent with short, straight 



hairs; leaves mostly 4-8 mm. wide; petals 7-8 mm. long; seeds 2 mm. 

 long; wet ground, rare. Lake Co., Gleason & Shobe 162; Woodford 

 Co., June 1889, McDonald; McHenry Co., Vas^y. July-Sept. [£. 



niolle sensu Torr., non Lam.; E. dcnsiim Raf.] E. strictum Muhl. 



4. Stem, leaves, and capsules crisp-puberulent; leaves 1-4 mm. wide; petals 

 3-5 mm. long; seeds 1.5 mm. long; wet ground, rare; known from 

 Lake, Peoria, and Mason counties. Aug. -Sept. \_E. Imeare Muhl., 



nom. illegit.; E. densiirn sensu auth., non Raf.] 



E. leptophyllum Raf. 



2. JussiAEA L. — Primrose-willow 



1. Plants creeping or floating; petals 5; capsule cylindrical; leaves elliptical, 

 tapering to a slender petiole; muddy banks, or in water, not common; 

 chiefly s. 111. July-Aug /. diffusa Forsk. 



1. Plants erect; petals 4; capsules clavate, 4-angled; leaves lanceolate, decur- 

 rent; wet ground, rare; s. III. July-Sept /. decurrens (Walt.) DC. 



3. LuDWiGiA L. — False Loosestrife 



1. Petals yellow, equalling or exceeding the sepals; leaves alternate; flowers 

 peduncled; capsules opening by terminal pores; swamps. June-Sept. Seed- 

 box _L. ahernjfolia L. 



1. Petals small, greenish, or absent; flowers sessile. 



2. Leaves opposite, ovate or oval; muddy shores and ditches, local. July- 



Aug. [Isnardia palustris L.] L. palnstris (L.) Ell. 



2. Leaves alternate. 



3. Capsules cylindrical; stem glabrous; bractlets minute; swamps, s. 111., 



rare. Massac Co. July-Sept L. glandulosa Walt. 



3. Capsules subglobose or turbinate; leaves lanceolate or linear. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 115. Onagraceae 191 



4. Stem glabrous; bractlets subulate; capsules longer than the calyx-lobes; 



muddy shores, local. July-Sept L. polycarpa Short & Peter 



4. Stem pubescent; bractlets minute, or none; capsules not longer than 



the calyx-lobes; muddy shores, s. 111., rare.July-Sept 



L. sphaerocarpa Ell. 



4. Oenothera L. — Evening-primrose 

 1. Leaves not linear-filiform; stigma 4-lobed. 



2. Calyx-lobes reflexed; stamens equal in length; flowers more or less noctur- 

 nal; petals yellow; capsules terete or round-angled; plants biennial or 

 annual. 

 3. Capsules lanceloid-cylindrical, 4-7 mm. thick at maturity, slightly ta- 

 pering from a thickish base; flowers many, in a terminal spike; leaves 

 repand-denticulate; petals 1-2 cm. long, obovate; dry soil, common. 



June-Oct. Common Evening-primrose O. biennii L. 



3. Capsules linear-cylindrical, 2-3 mm. thick, essentially uniform in diam- 

 eter throughout. 

 4. Upper and median leaves remotely denticulate to entire; flowers 

 many, in a terminal spike; petals 12-25 mm. long, rhombic-ovate; 

 capsules 1-2 cm. long, strigose; sandy soil, local, chiefly in the n. 

 half of 111., but extending southw. near the Mississippi R. June- 

 Sept. [^Raimannia rhombipetala (Nutt.) Rose} 



O. rhombipetala Nutt. 



4. Upper and median leaves sinuately dentate or pinnatifid; flowers few, 

 axillary; petals 5-12 mm. long, obovate; capsules 2-3 cm. long, 

 pilose; sandy soil, chiefly in the s. half of the state, extending 

 northw. to Peoria Co. May-July [RaitJiannia laciniata (Hill) Rose; 



O. sinuata L.] O. laciniata Hill 



2. Calyx lobes erect or ascending, cohering in pairs; stamens unequal in 

 length, the alternate ones somewhat longer; flowers diurnal; capsules 4- 

 angled; plants perennial. 

 5. Petals yellow; capsules 4-winged; leaves entire or denticulate. 

 6. Stem erect; petals 1.2-2.5 cm. long; capsules 1.5-2 cm. long. 



7. Capsules sparsely pilose, the hairs glandless; leaves lanceolate, 

 hirsute on both surfaces; stem pilose; roadsides and fields, not 

 infrequent. June-Oct. [O. pratensis (Small) B. L. Robins.; 

 Kneiffia pratensis Small} Common Sundrops ...O. pilosella Raf. 

 7. Capsules with a few gland-tipped hairs; leaves linear-oblanceolate, 

 strigose; stem short-pubescent; dry soil, rare; Karnak, Pulaski 



Co., McDougall [O. fruticosa sensu auth., non L.} 



O. tetragona Roth 



6. Stem decumbent, strigilose; petals 5-7 cm. long; hypanthium 5-15 

 cm. long; capsules 5-8 cm. long, 4-6 cm. wide; sandy or rocky soil, 

 rare, s.w. 111.; St. Clair Co., Muljord; Washington Co., Vasey 



[Megapteriutn missouriense (Sims) Spach} 



O. missouriensis Sims 



5. Petals white or pink, 2.5-4 cm. long; buds nodding; capsules 4-angled 

 and ribbed, canescent-strigose, stipitate; leaves dentate to pinnatifid. 




192 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



puberulent; roadsides, occasional; native w. of the Mississippi R. 

 June-July. [Hartmannia speciosa (Nutt.) Small] White evening- 

 primrose O. speciosa Nutt. 



1. Stem-leaves linear-filiform; stigma shallowly lobed; petals 3-4 mm. long; 

 capsules ellipsoid, sessile, 4-angled, 4-6 mm. long; sandy soil, s. 111., rare; 

 known from Jackson and Johnson counties. May-June. [^Kneiffia linifolta 



(Nutt.) Spach; Peniophylliun linifoliutn (Nutt.) Pennell} 



O. linifolia Nutt. 



5. Gaura L. — Butterfly-weed 

 1. Petals 2-3 mm. long; anthers oval, attached near the middle; fruit fusiform, 

 4-nerved, glabrous, 6-8 mm. long; roadsides, rare; adv. from w. U.S. 

 June-July G. parvi flora Dougl. 



1. Petals 7-9 mm. long; anthers linear, attached near the base; fruit 4-angled, 



pubescent, 5-6 mm. long; fields and open woods. July-Sept 



G. biennis L. 



6. CiRCAEA L. — Enchanter's-nightshade 



1. Stem 30-60 cm. tall; leaves shallowly undulate-dentate, usually rounded at 

 the base; fruit 2-Ioculed, 4 mm. long at maturity; woods, common. June- 

 July. [C. lutettana of auth., not L.J C. latifolia Hill 



l.Stem 10-30 cm. tall; leaves sharply dentate, mostly cordate; fruit 1-locuIed, 

 2 mm. long; moist banks and ravines in deep woods, n. 111. Lake BluflF, 



Hill; Elgin, Vasey; Jo Daviess Co., Pepoon & Moffatt. June-July 



_ C. alpina L. 



116. Haloragidaceae R. Br. — ^Water-milfoil Family 

 1 . Leaves whorled (rarely subopposile or alternate). 



2. Leaves (at least the immersed ones) pmnately dissected; stamens 4-8; fruit 4-lobed 

 1. M\!riophyllum 



2. Leaves entire, linear; flowers perfect; stamen I; sepals and petals none; fruit 1- 

 loculed -..2. Hippuris 



1. Leaves alternate, dentate or pectinate-pinnatifid ; stamens 3-4; fruit 3-angled 



3. Proserpinaca 



1. Myriophyllum L. — Water-milfoil 



1. Carpels rounded and smooth on the back. 

 2. Floral leaves (bracts) entire or denticulate. 



3. Leaves verticillate in fours or fives; lakes and slow streams, n.c. 111. \M. 



exalbescens Fern.} M. spicatum L. 



3. Leaves chiefly scattered, or absent from the flowering stems; muddy 



shores and shallow water, rare M. hiiniilc (Raf.) Morong 



2. Floral leaves pinnatifid or pectinate; leaves verticillate in threes and fours; 

 lakes and slow streams, local M. verticillatum L. 



1. Carpels 2-keeled and roughened on the back; stamens 4. 



4. Floral leaves (bracts) ovate or lanceolate, serrate; ponds and slow 



streams, local M. hcterophylluni Michx. 



4. Floral leaves linear, pectinate; ditches and muddy shores, chieflv in w. 111. 



[M. scabratum Michx.] M. pinnatum (Walt.) BSP. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 117. Cornaceae 193 



2. HiPPURlS L. — Mare's-tail 



H. vulgaris L. Ponds and streams, rare. Known from Lake and McHenry 

 counties. June-Aug. 



3. Proserpinaca L. — Mermaid-weed 

 P. palustris L. Ponds and slow streams, n.e. 111. Known from Lake, Cook, 

 and Du Page counties. July-Sept. 



117. Cornaceae Link — Dogwood Family 



1 . Flowers 4-merous, perfect; leaves opposite (except Cornus alfernifolia) I. Cornus 



1 . Flowers 5-merous, polygamous; leaves alternate 2. A/pssa 



1. Cornus L. — Dogwood 



(SviJa Opiz) 



1. Flowers cymose or paniculate, without an involucre; stone of the fruit sub- 

 globose. 



2. Leaves alternate; woods, usually near streams, chiefly in the n. two-thirds 



of the state. May-June. Alternate-leaved Dogwood 



C. alternifolia L. f 



2. Leaves opposite. 



3. Lower surface of blades pale, strigose, strigillose, or glabrescent, the 

 trichomes wholly appressed. 

 4. Leaves pale and microscopically farinose or pulverulent beneath. 

 5. Young twigs strigillose to glabrous. 



6. Mature twigs bright red; cyme dense, flat-topped; stone com- 

 pressed; swampy ground, local. June-July. Red-osier Dogwood 



C. stolonifera Michx. 



6. Mature twigs gray or brown; cyme loosely-flowered, convex; 



stone subglobose, not compressed; along roads, and in low 



ground along streams, common. May-June. [C. paniculctta 



L'Her.; C. femina Mill.} Gray Dogwood ..C. racemosa Lam. 



5. Young twigs tomentulose; moist ground, common. May-June. [C. 



amotnum sensu auth., non Mill.] Pale Dogwood 



_.-C. obliqua Raf. 



4. Leaves green beneath, not at all farinose, low woods, chiefly s. 111. 



June C stricta Lam. 



3. Lower surface of blades with loose, partly spreading pubescence, at 

 least on the veins. 

 7. Leaves roundish-ovate, woolly pubescent beneath at maturity; woods, 

 n. 111., extending southw. to Kankakee and La Salle counties. May. 



[C. circinata L'Her.] Round-leaved Dogwood C. rugosa Lam. 



7. Leaves lance-ovate. 



8. Leaves finely pubescent above; lake shores, n. 111. May-June. 



Bailey's Dogwood C. baileyi Coult. & Evans 



8. Leaves scabrous above; moist ground on roadsides or along 

 streams, common. May-June. Rough-leaved Dogwood. [C. as- 

 perifolia of auth., not Michx.] C drummondi C. A. Mey. 




194 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



1. Flowers capitate, with an involucre; stone ellipsoid. 



9. Tree; dry woods, local; more common southw. Apr.-May \Cynoxylon 



floridum (L.) Raf.} Flowering Dogwood C. florida L. 



9. Herb or subshrub; woods, n. 111., known from Lake, Cook, Ogle, and La 

 Salle counties. May-June. [Chamaeper'icltmenum canadense (L.) 

 Aschers. & Graebn.] Bunchberry C. canadensis L. 



2. Nyssa L. — Tupelo 



L Leaves entire; pistillate flowers 2-several together; fruit ovoid, 8-12 mm. 

 long; rich soil, chiefly s. and s e. 111., but also in Cook and Kankakee 

 counties. May. Most of the specimens examined belong, apparently, to 

 the var. carolimana (Poir.) Fern. Black Gum N. sylvatica Marsh. 



1. Leaves more or less dentate with 1 or more large angular teeth, or entire; 

 pistillate flower solitary; fruit ellipsoid, 1.5-3 cm. long; swamps and low 

 woods, s. 111., northw. to Crawford Co. Tupelo Gum N. aquatica L. 



118. Araliaceae Vent. — Ginseng Family 



1 . Leaves alternate; carpels 5; fruit black 1. Aralia 



I. Leaves usually three in a whorl; carpels 2 or 3 ; fruit red or yellowish 2. Panax 



1. Aralia L. 



1. Shrub or small tree, prickly; woods, s. 111. July-Aug. Hercules'-club 



A. spmosa L. 



1. Herbs. 



2. Umbels numerous; woods, local. July-Aug. American Spikenard -... 



A. racemosa L. 



2. Umbels 2-7. 



3. Plant leafy-stemmed, prickly or bristly; woods, rare. June-July. Bristly 



Aralia A. hispida Vent. 



3. Plant acaulescent, not bristly; moist ground in woods, chiefly in the n. 

 half of the state. May-June. Wild Sarsaparilla A. midicaulis L. 



2. Panax L. — Ginseng 



1. Leaflets sessile, obtuse; berry yellow; rhizome globose; woods; May-June. 

 Not definitely known to occur in III., but to be expected in this state 

 since it has been collected in n.w. Ind. Dwarf Ginseng P. trijoliiim L. 



1. Leaflets petiolulate, acuminate; berry red; rhizome fusiform; rich woods. 

 July-Aug. Ginseng P. qianqnefolium L. 



119. Umbelliferae B. Ju.ss. — Parsley Fainily 



1. Leaves simple, rigid, parallel-veined, remotely bristly on the margins; inflorescence 



capitate 1. Ervngiiim 



1 . Leaves compound; inflorescence umbellate. 



2. Ovary and fruit with straight or curved bristles or prickles. 



3. Ovary and fruit with straight bristles; fruit much longer than wide; leaves ter- 

 nately decompound with lanceolate or ovate, toothed leaflets; flowers (in our 

 species) white; roots aromatic 5. Osmorniza 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 119. Umbelliferae 195 



3. Ovary and fruit with hooked or barbed bristles. 



4. Plants glabrous; leaves palmately 3-7-foliolate ; ovary and fruit with hooked 



bristles 4. Sanicula 



4. Plants pubescent; leaves pinnately decompound. 



5. Ovary and fruit with hooked bristles; rays of the umbel short 3. Torilis 



5. Ovary and fruit with barbed bristles; rays long 2. Daiicus 



2. Ovary and fruit not at all bristly or prickly (rarely tuberculate) . 

 6. Fruit 2-4 times longer than wide; flowers white. 



7. Leaves trifoliolate with ovate leaflets; mvolucels none 6. Cr^piolaenia 



7. Leaves ternately compound, the leaflets pinnatifid; involucels present 



10. Chaerophyllum 



6. Fruit less than twice as long as wide. 



8. Leaves palmately or ternately divided. 



9. Leaves copiously soft-pubescent; umbels 15-30 cm. broad; outer petals 



larger, 2-cleft 23. Heracleum 



9. Leaves usually glabrous; none of the petals enlarged. 



10. Plants annual; leaves divided into filiform segments; flowers white; fruit 



ovoid, tuberculate, 1 mm. long II. Spermolepis 



10. Plants perennial; leaf -segments broader; fruit not tuberculate. 



II. Central flower and fruit of the umbellet sessile; flowers yellow; fruit 



flattened laterally, the ribs filiform 12. Zizia 



I I. Central flower and fruit not sessile. 



12. Plants tall, with elongated roots; involucre absent or inconspicuous. 

 13. Leaflets not entire. 



14. Flowers yellow; calyx-teeth prominent; fruit slightly 

 flattened dorsally, the ribs strongly winged.... 18. Thaspiitm 

 14. Flowers white; calyx-teeth small or obsolete. 



15. Leaves finely divided; plants of wet ground 



24. Conioselinum 



15. Leaves not finely divided 21. Angelica 



13. Leaflets entire; plants glaucous and glabrous 13. Taenidia 



12. Plants small, with a tuber, flowering early in spring; anthers 



purple; petals not mflexed at the tip; involucre present 



7. Erigenia 



8. Leaves pinnately divided. 



16. Involucre present, conspicuous; flowers white. 



17. Stem mottled with purple; leaflets ovate or lanceolate, incised or ser- 

 rate; ribs of the fruit prominent; oil-tubes none 14. Conium 



17. Stem net purple-marked. 



18. Leaflets filiform 15. Plilimnium 



18. Leaflets linear to lanceolate or ovate. 



19. Leaflets regularly and sharply serrate to the base. 



20. Fruit with slender inconspicuous filiform ribs; stylopodium 



conical; oil-tubes numerous and contiguous 9. Deriila 



20. Fruit with equal, prominent corky ribs; stylopodium 



depressed; oil-tubes 1-3 in each interval 16. Sium 



19. Leaflets remotely and irregularly dentate usually only above the 

 the mi(Sdle, or entire 25. Oxvpolis 



16. Involucral bracts none, or few and soon deciduous. 

 21. Flowers white; fruit scmev.hat flattened laterally. 



22. Leaflets serrate 17. Cicula 



22. Leaflets not serrate 8. Eulophus 



21. Flowers yellow; fruit flattened dorsally. 



23. Leaf-segments filiform; slender annuals 19. Aneihum 



23. Leaf-segments broader. 



24. Stem terete; fruit with thick corky margin, obscure ribs, and 

 numerous oil-tubes; plants perennial 20. Polylaenia 



24. Stem grooved; fruit with filiform dorsal ribs, thin wings, and 

 solitary oil-tubes; stout biennial 22. Pastinaca 




196 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



1. Eryngium L. — Rattlesnake-master 



E. yuccifolium Michx. Meadows, roadsides, and prairie soil, common. 

 July-Aug. 



2. Daucus L. — Carrot 



D. carota L. Carrot. Fields and waste places, very common; nat. from Eur. 

 July-Nov. 



3. ToRlLiS Adans. — Hedge Parsley 



7 . japomcus (Houtt.) DC. Waste ground and edges of woods, occasion- 

 al; nat. from Eur. [T. anthriscus (L.) Gmel.} 



4. Sanicljla L. — Sanicle 



1. Styles longer than the bristles of the fruit, recurved. 



2. Petals greenish white; sepals subulate; fruit sessile, 6 mm. long; woods, 



local. May-June S. mardcindica L. 



2. Petals yellowish green; sepals oval or lanceolate; fruit pedicellate, 3 mm. 



long; woods, common. May-June 5. gregaria Bickn. 



1. Styles shorter than the bristles; fruit 3-6 mm. long; woods, local. June-Sept. 

 S. canadensis L. 



' 5. OsMORHiZA Raf. — Sweet Cicely 



{IVashinglonia Raf.) 



1. Styles and stylopodium 1-1.5 mm. in length, not longer than the petals; 



stems and petioles villous; woods, common. May-June 



O. claytoni (Michx.) Clarke 



1. Styles and stylopodium 2-4 mm. long, e.xceeding the petals; stem and peti- 

 oles glabrous or pubescent; woods, common. May-June. \0. longistylis 



var. villicaiilis Fern.; O. longistylis var. brachycoma Blake} 



O. longistylis (Torr.) DC. 



6. Cryptotaenia DC. — Honewort 

 C. canadensis (L.) DC. Woods, common throughout 111. June-July. 



7. Erigenia Nutt. — Harbinger-of -spring 



E. bulbosa (Michx.) Nutt. Woods, locally throughout 111., except the n.w. 

 counties. Mar. -May. 



8. EuLOPHus Nutt. 



(PcrideriJia Reichenb.) 

 E. americanus Nutt. Thickets and edges of woods, local; apparently absent 

 from the n. counties, and from the s. part of the state. July. 



9. Berula Hoffm. 

 /). pusdla (Nutt.) Fern. Swamps, not common. Known in 111. from Peoria, 

 Woodford, Tazewell, and Mason counties; also Kane Co. July-Sept. [B. erccta 

 sensu Cov., non Sium crcctiim Huds.} 



10. Chaerophyllum L. — Chervil 

 C. procumbcns (L.) Crantz. Moist ground, common. Apr. -May. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 119. Umbelliferae 197 



11. Spermolepis Raf. 



S. inermis (Nutt.) Mathias & Constance. Sandy soil, occasional. \_S. 

 patens (Nutt.) B. L. Robins.] 



12. ZiziA Koch — Golden-alexanders 



1. Basal leaves ternately divided; fruit ellipsoid, 3.5-4 mm. long at maturity; 



roadsides, fields, meadows, open woods, common. May-June 



Z.- aurea (L.) Koch 



1. Basal leaves ovate or suborbicular, deeply cordate, crenate; fruit oval, 3 mm. 

 long. Ringwood, McHenry Co., Vasey in 1858. [Thaspium trijoliatti7n 

 (L.) Gray, var. apterum Gray; Z. cordata sensu auth., non (Walt.) Koch 

 Z.- aptera (Gray) Fern. 



13. Taenidia Drude 



T. integernma (L.) Drude. Woods and thickets, common throughout 111. 

 May- June. 



14. CoNlUM L. — Poison-hemlock 



C. maculatum L. Waste places, nat. from Eur. June-July. 

 15. Ptilimnium Raf. — Bishops-weed 



(Discopleura DC.) 



1. Involucral bracts or some of them pinnately cleft or parted; calyx-teeth 

 minute; fruit 2-3 mm. long, ovate, acute; marshy ground, s. 111., rare. 

 June-Oct P. captlldceu7n (Michx.) Raf. 



1. Involucral bracts entire, linear, short; calyx-teeth prominent; fruit 1-1.5 mm. 



long, ovate-orbicular, obtuse; swamps, rare. May-Sept 



'. P. nuttallii (DC.) Britt. 



16. SlUM L. — Water-parsnip 

 S. cicutaefoliuni Gmel. Wet ground, locally throughout 111. June-Aug. 



17. Cicuta L. — Cowbane 



1. Leaflets narrowly linear; axils of the upper leaves bearing bulblets; swamps, 

 in the n. half of the state. July-Sept C. bulbijera L. 



1. Leaflets lanceolate; axils of the leaves never bearing bulblets; swamps and 

 wet meadows, locally throughout III. June-Aug C. maculata L. 



18. Thaspium Nutt. — Meadow-parsnip 



1. Flowers deep yellow; stem glabrous; basal leaves either cordate or ternate; 

 woods and river banks, common. May-June. [Thaspium trijoliatum var. 

 flavum Blake; Zizia syhatica Benke in Rhodora 35:45. 1943; T. aureum 

 sensu auth., non (L.) Nutt.] T. sylvaticum (Benke) n. comb. 



1. Flowers pale yellow or cream; stem puberulent at the nodes; leaves 1-3- 



ternate; woods near streams, local. May-June 



T. barbinode' (Michx.) Nutt. 




198 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



19. Anethum L. — Dill 



A. graveolens L. Waste ground, escaped from cult.; native of Eur. July- 

 Sept. 



20. Polytaenia DC. 



{Pleiolaenia C. & R.) 

 P. nuttallii DC. Prairie Parsley. Dry soil, locally throughout III. May-June. 



21. Angelica L. — Angelica 



l.Stem pubescent; fruit roundish, pubescent, 4 mm. broad; oil-tubes several, 



distinct; dry soil, s. 111. July. [A. villosa (Walt.) BSP., not Lag.] 



A. venenosa (Greenw.) Fern. 



l.Stem glabrous; fruit ellipsoid, 6 mm. long, glabrous; oil-tubes continuous; 

 river banks, local. June A. atropiirpiirea L. 



22. Pastinaca L. — Parsnip 



P. sativa L. Roadsides, fields, and waste places, very common; nat. from 

 Eur. June-Aug. 



23. HeracleUiM L. — Cow-parsnip 



H. latiatum Michx. Wet ground, local, throughout the n. two-thirds of 

 the state. June-Aug. 



24. Conioselinum Fisch. — Hemlock-parsley 

 C. chinense (L.) BSP. Wet ground, rare. Aug. -Sept. 



25. OxYPOLls Raf. 

 O. rigidior (L.) Raf. Swamps, local. Aug. -Sept. 



120. Ericaceae DC. — Heath Family 



1 . Ovary superior. 



2. Plants saprophytic, without chlorophyll, white, pink, or tawny, turning black in 



drying 3. Monotropa 



2. Plants with ordinary green foliage. 

 3. Corolla polypetalous. 



4. Leaves alternate or somewhat whorled; filaments dilated 1. Clumaphila 



4. Leaves all basal ; filaments subulate 2. Pxirola 



3. Corolla sympetalous. 



5. Leaves entire. 



6. Erect shrubs; fruit a capsule. 



7. Leaves short-petioled, deciduous, not revolute-margined ; flowers large, 

 showy, somewhat irregular: anthers awnless 4. Rhododendron 



7. Leaves sessile or nearly so, revolute-margined, evergreen, pale beneath; 



flowers small, white, nodding; anthers awned 5. Andromeda 



6. Trailing shrubs; leaves petioled. 



8. Blades cordate at the base; corolla salverform; fruit a capsule.... 7. JEpigaea 

 8. Blades cuneate at the base; corolla urceolate; fruit a drupe 



9. Arcioslaphxilos 



5. Leaves denticulate or serrate. 



9. Leaves resinous-dotted beneath; flowers in terminal leafy-bracted racemes; 



fruit a capsule 6. Chamaedaphne 



9. Leaves not resinous-dotted; flowers axillary; berries red 8. Caallhcria 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 120. Ericaceae 199 



I. Ovary inferior; fruit a berry; shrubs. 



10. Corolla sympetalous, urceolate or ovoid; erect shrubs; fruit black or bluish. 



I 1 . Leaves resinous-dotted; ovary lO-loculed; drupe with 10 nutlets 



10. Ca^lussacia 



II . Leaves not resinous-dotted; ovary 4-5-loculed; fruit a many-seeded berry 



1 I. Vaccinium 



10. Corolla deeply 4-cleft, the lobes reflexed; flowers nodding on slender pedicels; 

 trailing shrubs with small evergreen leaves; berries red, acid 12. Oxvicoccus 



1. Chimaphila Pursh — Pipsissewa 



L Leaves lanceolate, whitish-variegated, acute or acuminate; flowers few (1-5); 

 dilated portion of the filaments villous; dry woods, n.e. III., rare. June- 

 Aug. Spotted Wintergreen C. ynaculata (L.) Pursh 



1. Leaves oblanceolate, green throughout, obtuse or acutish; flowers several 

 (2-8) ; dilated portion of the filaments merely ciliate; dry woods, n.e. 111., 

 rare. June-Aug. [C. nmbellata of auth., not Nutt.; C. umbellata var. 

 cisatlantica Blake] C. corymbosa Pursh 



2. Pyrola L. — Wintergreen 



1 . Style curved downward. 



2. Petals greenish white; leaves oval, thin; woods, n. 111., rare; known from 

 Jo Daviess, Ogle, Lee, McHenry, and Cook counties. June-Aug. 



Shinleaf P. elliptica Nutt. 



2. Petals pink or purple; leaves orbicular, coriaceous, the blades mostly 

 shorter than the petioles; swamps and bogs, rare. McHenry Co., Vasey. 



June. Bog Wintergreen P. ultginosa Torr. 



1. Style straight; petals greenish white; leaves oval; raceme 1 -sided; woods, 

 rare. Cook Co., Babcock- June-Aug P. secunda L. 



3. MONOTROPA L. 



1. Flower solitary; plants glabrous, waxy-white or pink (drying black); stvle 

 shorter than the ovary, glabrous; rich woods, rare or local throughout 111. 

 June-Aug. Indian Pipe M. umflora L. 



1. Flowers several; plants pubescent, tawny or reddish; style longer than the 

 ovary, pubescent; saprophytic on humus in woods, rare. June-Aug. Elk 

 Grove, Cook Co., G. Pearsall 8333. Pinesap. [M. hypopitys sensu Gray, 

 non L.; M. hypopitys var. rubra (Torr.) Farw.; Hypopitys lanuginosa 

 (Michx.) Nutt.} M. lanuginosa Michx. 



4. Rhododendron L. 



{Azalea L.) 

 R. roseum (Loisel.) Rehd. Pink Azalea. Rocky woods, rare. Union Co. 

 May. [/I. nudtflora sensu auth., non L.; R. canescens sensu auth., non Sweet; 

 A. prionophylla Small} 



5. Andromeda L. — Bog-rosemary 

 A. glaucophylla Link. Bogs, rare. McHenry and Lake counties. May-June. 

 \_A. polifolia of auth., not L.} 




200 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



6. Chamaedaphne Moench — Leatherleaf 

 C. calyculata (L.) Moench. Swamps and bogs, Lake Co. May. 



7. Epigaea L. — Trailing Arbutus 

 E. repens L. Woods, rare. "Illinois," without definite locality, Vasey. 



8. Gaultheria L. — Creeping Wintergreen 

 G. procumbens L. Checkerberry. Woods, rare. June-Aug. Cook Co.: Glen- 

 coe, Aug. 8, 1873, P. Blatchford; Elk Grove, Aug. 4, 1943, G. Pear sail. 



9. Arctostaphylos Adans. — Bearberry 



A. uva-ursi (L.) Spreng. Kinnikinnick. Woods and dunes, local; known 

 from Lake, Cook, Ogle, and Peoria counties. May-June. 



10. Gaylussacia HBK. 



G. baccaia (Wang.) K. Koch. Black Huckleberry. Rocky woods and hill- 

 sides, chiefly in n. 111. May-June. 



11. Vaccinium L. 



(Cyianococcus Rydb.) 

 1. Shrubs mostly 2-10 m. tall. 



2. Leaves glossy above, coriaceous, the margins narrowly revolute, usually 

 bearing a few small glands; anthers 2-awned; berries black, inedible; 

 open woods, s. 111. May-June. Farkleberry. [^Batodendroii arboretim 

 (Marsh.) Nutt.] V. arboreiim Marsh. 



2. Leaves not glossy, entire or ciliolate-serrulate, acute; anthers awnless; 



berries glaucous; swamps and bogs, n.e. 111. May-June. Highbush Blue- 

 berry V . corymbosiim L. 



l.Low shrubs usually less than 1 m. tall. 



3. Twigs densely pubescent; leaves entire, lanceolate, pubescent; shrubs 20- 



60 cm. tall; moist ground, rare, n. 111. May-June. Canada Blueberry 



V . canadense Richards. 



3. Twigs glabrous, or more or less puberulent in lines, rugulose; leaves 

 mostly serrulate with bristle-tipped teeth. 



4. Leaves lanceolate or elliptical, sometimes glaucous beneath; shrubs 20- 

 40 cm. tall; sandy soil or in open woods, Kankakee, La Salle, and 

 Cook counties. May-June. \V . pennsylvanicum sensu Lam., non 



Mill.; V. nigrum (Wood) Britt.] Low-bush Blueberry 



V. angustifolium Ait. 



4. Leaves oval; shrubs up to 1.5 m. tall; sandy soil in open woods, locally 



throughout 111., except the n. counties. May-June. Hill Blueberry 



V. vacdlans Kalm 



12. OxYCOCCUS Hill Cranberry 



1. Leaves ovate-lanceolate, or elliptic-lanceolate (broadest near the base), 

 acute or acutish; pedicels mostly terminal, the bracts attached near the 

 middle; fruit 6-9 mm. in diameter, globose, usually spotted; bogs, n. 111., 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 121. Primulaceae 201 



rare. May-July. \^Vacciniu7n oxycoccus L.} Small Cranberry 



...O. palustris Pers. 



1. Leaves elliptical (broadest near the middle), obtuse; pedicels mostly lateral, 

 the bracts attached above the middle; fruit 1-2 cm. in diameter, longer 

 than broad, not spotted; bogs, n. 111. June-Aug. [K. macrocarpon Ait.] 

 Large Cranberry O. macrocarpus (Ait.) Pers. 



121. Primulaceae Vent. — Primrose Family 



1 . Lobes of the calyx and corolla erect or spreading, not reflexed. 

 2. Plants small scapose, acaulescent, terrestrial. 



3. Corolla-tube equalling or exceeding the calyx; plants perennial 1. PnTnula 



3. Corolla-tube shorter than the calyx; annuals 2. Androsace 



2. Plants with leafy stems. 



4. Plants aquatic; immersed leaves pectinate 3. Holtonia 



4. Plants not aquatic; leaves entire. 

 5. Leaves alternate. 



6. Flowers solitary, axillary, sessile; capsule circumscissile 4. Cenlunculus 



6. Flowers in axillary racemes; capsules opening by 5 valves 5. Samolus 



5. Leaves mostly opposite or whorled. 



7. Flowers white; leaves mostly near apex of stem 6. Trientalts 



7. Flowers yellow or scarlet; stems leafy. 



8. Flowers scarlet (rarely white); capsules circumscissile; plants annual 



7. Anagallis 



8. Flowers yellow; capsules dehiscent by valves; plants perennial 



8. Lys'ivnachla 



1. Corolla-lobes reflexed; stamens exserted, connivent, forming a cone; leaves all basal 

 9. Dodecalheon 



1. Primula L. — Primrose 



P. mistdssinka Michx. Limestone cliffs, Jo Daviess Co., rare. Apple River, 

 Pepoon 272, G. N. Jones & G. D. Fuller 16351. Corolla-lobes pale lavender, 

 the throat yellow. May-June. [P. mistassinica var. noveboracensis Fern.] 



2. Androsace L. 

 A. occidentalis Pursh. Sandy soil, local. April. 



3. HOTTONIA L. 



H. inflata Ell. American Featherfoil. In shallow water, s. 111., rare. June- 

 Aug. 



4. Centunculus L. — Chaffweed 



C. minimus L. Moist ground, chiefly in the w. and s. counties. May-Sept. 



5. Samolus L. — Brookweed 



5. parviflorus Raf. Wet soil, throughout III., except the n. counties. June- 

 Aug. [S. floribiindus HBK.; S. " pauctflorus" Deam] 



6. Trientalis L. — Star-flower 



T. borealis Raf. Woods and thickets, n.e. III.; known from Lake and Cook 

 counties. June-July. [T. americana Pursh] 




202 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



7. Anagallis L. — Pimpernel 



A. arvensis L. Waste places, occasional; nat. from Eurasia and Africa. 

 June-Aug. 



8. Lysimachia L. — Loosestrife 



(Sleironema Raf.) 

 1. Leaves gland-dotted (sometimes obscurely so). 



2. Plants more or less pubescent; corolla not dark-streaked. 



3. Calyx 4-5 mm. long, often dark-margined; flowers in terminal leafy 

 panicles; roadsides and waste places, occasional; adv. from Eur. July- 

 Sept. Cook Co., Moffatt in 1906, Worthington in 1931; Antioch, 

 Lake Co., G. N. Jones 16509 L. vulgaris L. 



3. Calyx 7-10 mm. long, not dark-margined; flowers in axillary whorls; 



roadsides and waste places, occasional; adv. from Eur. June-July. 



Chicago, Worthington in 1933 L. punctata L. 



2. Plants glabrous or nearly so. 



4. Stem erect; leaves lanceolate or elliptical; corolla with purple streaks or 



dots. 

 5. Leaves usually whorled; flowers axillary; fields and open woods. June- 

 July. Known from Cook and Ogle counties. Whorled Loosestrife 



L. quadrifolia L. 



5. Leaves mostly opposite. 



6. Flowers in terminal racemes; corolla-lobes lanceolate; wet soil. 

 June-July. Known from Cook, Ogle, and Henderson counties. 



Swamp-candle L. terrestris (L.) BSP. 



6. Flowers in small head-like axillary spikes; corolla-lobes linear; wet 

 ground or shallow water in the n. third of the state. May-June. 



[Naumburgia thyrsiflora (L.) Duby] Tufted Loosestrife 



L. thyrsiflora L. 



4. Stem trailing; leaves opposite, roundish; flowers axillary; corolla not 

 purple-marked; moist ground, common; nat. from Eur. May-July. 



Moneywort L. nummularia L. 



1. Leaves not gland-dotted; stem erect; flowers nodding, on slender axillary 

 pedicels. 

 7. Leaves lanceolate to ovate, pinnately veined. 



8. Upper leaves broadly lanceolate to ovate, the long petioles conspicu- 

 ously ciliate; moist ground, common. June-Aug. Fringed Loosestrife 



L. ciliata L. 



8. Leaves elliptical-lanceolate, short-petioled; woods and thickets, common. 



June-Aug L. lanceolata Walt. 



7. Leaves linear, 1-veined, not ciliate; moist ground, locally throughout 111. 

 June-Aug. [L. longijolia Pursh] L. quadnflora Sims 



9. DoDECATHEON L. — ^Shooting-star 



1 . Leaves oblanceolate, tapering into the petiole. 



2. Mature capsules ellipsoid, thick-walled, reddish brown; anthers 7-10 mm. 

 long; corolla lilac to white; leaves often reddish at base; meadows, often 

 along railroads, throughout 111. May-June D. nieadia L. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 125. Oleaceae 203 



2. Mature capsules cylindrical, thin-walled, light brown; anthers 5-7 mm. 

 long; corolla rose-purple; leaves pale bluish green, not reddish at base; 

 bluffs of the Mississippi River in s. Wise, and Minn., and n.e. Mo., 



and therefore to be expected in the Driftless Area of n.e. Ill 



D. aniethystinutn Fassett 



1 . Leaves broadly ovate, abruptly contracted at the base; corolla dark purple; 

 rich woods and rocky ledges, s. 111., rare; Makanda, Jackson Co., G. H. 

 French in 1871; Union Co., French in 1873; s. 111. (without definite local- 

 ity), Seymour D. frenchii (Vasey) Rydb. 



122. Sapotaceae Reichenb. — Sapodilla Family 

 1. BUMELIA Sw. 



1. Leaves, pedicels, and calyces glabrous or nearly so; clusters many-flowered; 



moist thickets, s. 111., in Hardin, Pope, Pulaski, and Alexander counties. 



June-Aug. Southern Buckthorn B. lycioides (L.) Gaertn. f. 



1. Leaves (beneath), pedicels, and calyces tomentose; clusters 6-12-flowered; 



woods and thickets; reported from s. III., but no authentic 111. specimens 



seen. June-July. Woolly Buckthorn B. lanuginosa (Michx.) Pers. 



123. Ebenaceae Vent. — Ebony Family 

 1. DiOSPYROS L. 

 D. virginiana L. Persimmon. Woods, locally throughout 111., except the 

 n.w. counties. May-June. 



124. Styracaceae A. DC. — Storax Family 



1. Ovary superior; fruits subglobose, drupaceous I. Slyrax 



1. Ovary inferior; fruit nut-like, elongate, winged 2. Halesia 



1. Styrax L. — Storax 

 S. americana Lam. Swamps and banks of streams, s. III. Apr.-May. 



2. Halesia Ellis — Silverbell Tree 

 H. Carolina L. Woods, and along streams, s.e. 111., rare. Apr.-May. 



125. Oleaceae Lindl. — Olive Family 



1. Leaves compound; fruit a samara I. Fraxinus 



I. Leaves simple; fruit a drupe 2. Foresiiera 



1. Fraxinus L. — Ash 



1. Petioles velvety-pubescent; calyx evident on the fruit; wing of the samara 



extending down the sides; twigs terete, pubescent when young. 



2. Samara 2.5-5 cm. long, 5-7 mm. wide, the body terete; calyx 1-2 mm. 



long; leaflets serrate or entire, acute at the base; leaf-scars nearly 



straight at the top; moist ground, local. Red Ash. [F. darlingtonlana 



Britt.l F. pennsylvanica Marsh. 




204 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



2. Samara 5-7 cm. long, about 1 cm. wide, the body flattened; calyx 3-6 



mm. long; leaflets usually entire, the lower surface light green; leaf- 

 scars deeply notched at the top; wet ground, locally in s. 111., and 

 northw. to St. Clair, Richland, and Lawrence counties. Pumpkin Ash. 



[F. profunda (Bush) Britt.] F. tomentosa Michx. f. 



1. Petioles glabrous or nearly so; twigs glabrous. 



3. Calyx evident on the fruit; body of the samara terete or nearly so; 



leaflets 5-9, commonly 7, usually more or less petiolulate; twigs terete. 

 4. Wing of the samara almost entirely terminal; leaflets ovate-lanceolate 

 or oval, entire or nearly so, glabrous beneath or pubescent; leaf- 

 scars deeply notched at the top; woods, common throughout 111. 

 White Ash. This species has sometimes been mistaken for F. bilt- 



moreajia Beadle, which apparently does not occur in III. 



_ F . americana L. 



4. Wing extending down the sides of the samara; leaflets elliptic-lanceo- 



late, usually serrate, acuminate at each end, glabrous; leaf-scars near- 

 ly straight at the top; low woods, and along roads, common. Green 



Ash F. laiiceolata Borkh. 



3. Calyx none or minute; body of the samara flattened, the wing decurrent; 

 leaflets 7-11. 



5. Twigs terete; leaf -scars vertically oval; lateral leaflets sessile; flowers 



polygamous; wet ground, local. Black Ash. \F. famhucifolia Lam.] 



F. nigra Marsh. 



5. Twigs usually prominently quadrangular; leaf-scars lunate; lateral leaf- 

 lets shortly petiolulate; flowers perfect; woods, local; chiefly through 

 central 111. Blue Ash F. quadrangulata Michx. 



2. Forestiera Poir. 



{Adelia P.Br.) 



F. acuminata Poir. River banks and swamps, s. 111.; extending northw. to 

 Wabash and Lawrence counties, and in w. III. to Fulton Co. Apr. -May. 



126. Gentianaceae Dum. — Gentian Family 



1 . Leaves not scale-like. 



2. Leaves opposite. 



3. Style filiform, mostly deciduous; anthers becoming twisted or revolute at maturity. 



4. Corolla salverform; stigmas roundish I. Ceniaurium 



4. Corolla rotate; stigmas linear 2. Sahaiia 



3. Style short or none; anthers straight; corolla funnelform or salverform, without 



glands 3. Ccntiana 



2. Leaves whorled; stem 1-3 m. tall; anthers straight; corolla rotate, with 4 lobes and 

 1 or 2 nectariferous glands for each lobe 4. Frasera 



1. Leaves (at least the lower) reduced to scales; stem slender or filiform. 



5. Calyx-lobes 4; corolla 3-4 mm. long; leaves all reduced to scales 5. Darionia 



5. Calyx-lobes 2; corolla about 1 cm. long; upper leaves normal 6. Oholaria 



1. Centaurium Hill — Centaury 

 C. pulchellum (Sw.) Druce. Wet ground, nat. from Eur. June-Sept. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 128. Apocynaceae 205 



2. Sabatia Adans. 

 S. angularis (L.) Pursh. Rose-pink. Moist soil, local. July-Aug. 



3. Gentian A L. — Gentian 



1. Annuals; corolla without plaits or teeth in the sinuses. 

 2. Corolla-lobes fringed or dentate; flowers 3-5 cm. long. 



3. Leaves lanceolate or ovate-lanceolate, with rounded or subcordate bases; 

 corolla-lobes conspicuously fringed all around the summit, scarcely 

 fringed on the sides; low ground, n. 111., rare. Sept. -Oct. Fringed 



Gentian G. crinita Froel. 



3. Leaves linear or linear-lanceolate; corolla-lobes shortly fringed or 

 merely dentate at the summit, fringed on the sides; meadows, n.e. 



111., rare. Aug.-Oct. Small Fringed Gentian G. procera Holm 



2. Corolla-lobes with entire or rarely denticulate margins; flowers 1-2.5 cm. 



long; dry soil. Aug.-Oct. Stiff Gentian G. quinquefolia L. 



1. Perennials; corolla with membranous toothed or lobed plaits in the sinuses. 



4. Margins of leaves and calyx-lobes scabrous or ciliate; corolla usually blue. 



5. Anthers separate or merely connivent; dry ground in the n. half of the 



state, rare. Aug.-Oct. Downy Gentian G. puberula Michx. 



5. Anthers cohering in a ring or short tube. 



6. Corolla-lobes distinct, longer than or equalling the plaits; wet ground, 



n.e. 111., rare. Aug.-Oct. Soapwort Gentian G. saponaria L. 



6. Corolla-lobes none or minute, the plaits very broad; moist ground, 



rare. Aug.-Oct. Closed Gentian G. andrewsii Griseb. 



4. Margins of leaves and calyx-lobes smooth or nearly so; corolla yellowish 

 white; moist soil, rare. Aug.-Oct. Yellowish Gentian ....G. flavida Gray 



4. Frasera Walt. 



F. carolinensis Walt. American Columbo. Dry ground, rare; known from 

 Cook, Coles, and Crawford counties. June-Aug. 



5. Bartonia Muhl. 



B. vlrginica (L.) BSP. Yellow Bartonia. Moist ground, n. 111., rare. Kan- 

 kakee, Hill in 1873; Oregon, Ogle Co., Waite in 1885. 



6. Obolaria L. 



O. virginica L. Pennywort. Woods and thickets, s. 111., rare. Pulaski Co., 

 Fricke; Cobden, Earle. 



127. Menyanthaceae G. Don — Buckbean Family 



1. Menyanthes L. — Buckbean 

 M. trijoliatd L. In bogs, and shallow water, Lake, Cook, McHenry, and 

 Peoria counties. May-June. 



128. Apocynaceae Lindl. — Dogbane Family 



1. Leaves alternate; flowers in terminal corymbiform cymes; corolla salverform, purple 

 1. Amsonia 




206 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



1. Leaves opposite. 



2. Leaves not evergreen ; flowers not solitary or blue. 



3. Climbing plants; corolla funnelform, yellowish; flowers fragrant 



2. Trachelospermiim 



3. Erect plants; corolla campanulate or cylindrical, pink or whitish 3. Apoc\inum 



2. Leaves evergreen; stems trailing; flowers solitary, axillary, blue ..4. Vinca 



I. Amsonia Walt. 



A. tabernaemontana Walt. Moist ground, locally throughout 111., except 

 the n. counties. May-June. [^Amsonia amsonia (L.) Britt.; Tabernaemontana 

 amsonia h.; A. salicijolia Pursh}. 



2. Trachelospermum Lem. 



T. difforme (Walt.) Gray. Moist woods and along streams, s. III., rare. 

 Union Co., Brendel. June-July. 



3. Apocynum L. — Dogbane 



L Leaves drooping or spreading, pubescent; corolla 2-3 times as long as the 

 calyx; roadsides and open woods, common. June-Sept. Spreading Dog- 

 bane A. androsae77iijoliitm L. 



L Leaves ascending; corolla only slightly longer than the calyx. 

 2. Leaves and inflorescence glabrous or nearly so. 



3. Leaves short-petioled, elliptical, acute at apex, narrowed at base; corolla 

 nearly white; roadsides, fields, open woods, common. June- Aug. [A. 



alburn Greene} Hemp Dogbane A. camiabinum L. 



3. Leaves subsessile or sessile, oval or ovate, obtuse or acutish, the lower 

 rounded, truncate, or subcordate and often clasping at base; corolla 

 greenish white; roadsides and fields, more common than the preced- 

 ing. June-Aug. [A. hypencijolmm Ait.] A. sibir'tcum Jacq. 



2. Leaves and inflorescence pubescent; roadsides and fields, common 

 throughout 111. June-Aug. Velvet Dogbane A. pubescens R. Br. 



4. Vinca L. — Periwinkle 

 V . minor L. Roadsides, woods, cemeteries; nat. from Eur. May-June. 



129. AscLEPlADACEAE Lindl. — Milkweed Family 



L Stem erect or decumbent, not twining. 

 2. Corolla-lobes reflexed. 



3. Hoods of the crown each with a small incurved horn within 1. Asclcpias 



3. Hoods without a horn; flowers greenish 2. Aceralcs 



2. Corolla-lobes erect-spreading; hoods prominently crested within 3. Asclcpiodora 



I . Stem twinmg. 



4. Corolla-lobes erect 4. Ampclanms 



4. Corolla-lobes spreading 5. Conolobus 



\. AscLEPiAS L. — Milkweed 



L Flowers orange or yellow; plants hirsute; sap watery; umbels cymose, termi- 

 nal, many-flowered; leaves lanceolate, acute, alternate or a few opposite; 

 follicles tomentulose, 7-15 cm. long, 1-1.5 cm. thick; roadsides or open 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 129. Asclepiadaceae 207 



woods, common. June-Aug. Butterfly-weed [/I. deciimbens L.} 



...A. tuber osa L. 



1. Flowers not orange or yellow; plants not hirsute; sap milky. 



2. Leaves narrowly linear, mostly in whorls of 4-6; flowers white; follicles 

 erect, glabrous, narrowly lanceoloid, 6-9 cm. long, on erect pedicels; 

 roadsides, or sandy soil in fields and open woods, common. June-Aug. 



Horsetail Milkweed A. verticillata L. 



2. Leaves not narrowly linear. 



3. Leaves sessile or clasping, opposite; plants glabrous, pale green, some- 

 what glaucous. 

 4. Follicles smooth; umbel solitary, terminal. 



5. Leaves elliptical, cordate-clasping, wavy-margined, obtuse, mucron- 

 nulate, 7-15 cm. long; corolla pale greenish purple, 8-9 mm. 



long; sandy soil along roads and in open woods. June-July 



A. amplexicaiilis Sm. 



5. Leaves lanceolate to ovate-lanceolate, sessile, flat, acute or obtusish, 

 3-7 cm. long, the margins minutely roughened; flowers greenish 



white; dry ground, rare. Peoria, Brendel; McDonald 



A. meadit Torr. 



4. Follicles somewhat echinate toward the apex with a few short blunt 

 processes, glabrous, 8-13 cm. long, ovoid or lanceoloid; umbels 

 terminal and lateral; leaves obtuse, mucronulate, elliptical, the 

 margins flat; prairie soil, or along roads, extending southw. to Ma- 

 coupin and Coles counties. July-Aug. Smooth Milkweed 



A. sullivantii Engelm. 



3. Leaves manifestly petioled. 



6. Leaves pubescent beneath; fruiting pedicels deflexed. 



7. Follicles tomentose, 2-3 cm. thick, warty with soft-spinulose subu- 

 late processes; flowers lavender and green; roadsides, fields, and 

 woods, common. June-Aug. Common Milkweed ....A. syriaca L. 

 7. Follicles smooth, less than 2 cm. thick. 



8. Corolla-lobes dark purple, 8-10 mm. long; hoods red or purple; 

 follicles 9-12 cm. long; leaves 10-20 cm. long; sandy soil, 

 along roads, and in open woods, local. June-July. Purple Milk- 

 weed A. purpurascens L. 



8. Corolla-lobes greenish white tinged with purple, 4-5 mm. long; 

 hoods yellowish; follicles 6-8 cm. long; leaves 5-8 cm. long; 

 open woods, rare. Cook Co., Babcock A. ovalifolia Dec. 



6. Leaves glabrous or nearly so. 



9. Fruiting pedicels erect; leaves lanceolate, acuminate; corolla-lobes 

 3-5 mm. long. 

 10. Flowers rose-purple, rarely whitish; leaves all opposite; moist 

 ground, roadsides, ditches, or in woods, common. July-Aug. 



Swamp Milkweed A. incarnata L. 



10. Flowers pink or white; leaves thin. 



11. Flowers pink; median leaves usually whorled; seeds with a 




208 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



coma; dry woods, chiefly in w. and s. III. May-June 



A. quadrijolia Jacq. 



11. Flowers white; leaves all opposite; seeds usually without a 



coma; wet ground in woods, rare. June-Aug 



A. pereimis Walt. 



9. Fruiting pedicels deflexed; corolla-lobes 6-8 mm. long. 



12. Umbel loose, the pedicels drooping, 2.5-5 cm. long; leaves thin, 

 elliptic-lanceolate, acuminate; corolla-lobes obtusish, greenish, 

 the hoods white or pink; stem 1-1.5 cm. tall; woods. June- 

 July. Poke Milkweed {A. exaltata (L.) Muhl.J 



A. phytolaccoides Pursh 



12. Umbel compact, the pedicels erect or ascending, 1-2 cm. long; 

 leaves oval, firm, obtuse and mucronate, or acute; corolla- 

 lobes white, acute, the hoods purplish; stem 30-90 cm. tall; 

 sandy soil, not common; s. 111., extending northw. to Wabash 



and St. Clair counties. June-July. White Milkweed 



- A. variegata L. 



2. Acerates Ell. — Green Milkweed 



1. Umbel solitary, terminal; plants hirsute; leaves lanceolate, acutish; stem 10- 

 30 cm. tall; dry ground, n. 111., rare. June-Aug A. lanuginosa Nutt. 



1. Umbels several; plants puberulent or glabrate; stem 30-90 cm. tall. 



2. Umbels peduncled; leaves alternate, linear-lanceolate, acuminate; hoods 

 entire; roadsides and fields. July- Aug. [_A. floridana of auth., not 



(Lam.) Hitchc] -A. htrtella Pennell 



2. Umbels sessile; leaves chiefly opposite. 



3. Leaves lanceolate; umbels many-flowered; pedicels pubescent; hoods 



entire; roadsides and fields, local. June-Aug 



A. viridi flora (Raf.) Eaton 



3. Leaves linear; umbels 10-15-flowered; pedicels puberulent; hoods 3- 

 toothed; dry upland woods, Quincy, Adams Co., Rev. R. Brinker 

 3495 [Asclepias stenophylla Gray] A. angustifolia (Nutt.) Dec. 



3. ASCLEPIODORA Gray 



A. viridis (Walt.) Gray. Dry soil, s.w. 111., not common; known from 

 Randolph, Perry, and Marion counties. June-July. 



4. Ampelamus Raf. 



A. albidus (Nutt.) Britt. Bluevine. River banks and thickets, or along 

 fences, chiefly in the s. half of the state, but extending northw. at least to Pike 

 and Champaign counties. July-Aug. [^Gonolobus laevis sensu auth., non Michx.j 



5. GoNOl.OBUS Michx. — Climbing Milkweed 



{() do nlo.'tie l^liana Alexander) 



1. Flowers greenish yellow; pedicels glabrous; follicles angular, smooth, gla- 

 brous; along fences and in open woods. June-July. [V^incetoxicum gono- 

 carpoi Walt.} G. gonocarpos (Walt.) Perry 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 130. Convolvulaceae 209 



1. Flowers reddish purple; pedicels pubescent; follicles pubescent, muricate; 

 woods, s. 111., not common. July-Aug. '[Vincetoxicum obhquiim (Jacq.) 

 Britt.; Matelea obliqua (Jacq.) Woodson] G. obliquus (Jacq.) R. Br. 



130. Convolvulaceae Vent. — Morning-glory Family 



1. Plants with chlorophyll and normal leaves, not parasitic. 



2. Style 2-cleft; flowers small; leaves narrow, sessile or short-petioled I. Slyl'tsma 



2. Style undivided. 



3. Calyx with a pair of subtending bracts (these in one species some distance 



below the calyx) 2. Convolvulus 



3. Calyx not subtended by a pair of bracts. 



4. Stamens and style exserted ; corolla salverform 3.Quamoclii 



4. Stamens and style included; corolla funnelform or campanulate 4. Ipomoea 



I. Plants leafless, parasitic, twining; corolla small 5. Cuscuta 



1. Stylisma Raf. 



^5". pickeringit (M. A. Curtis) Gray. Sandy prairie, rare; Oquawka, Aug. 

 10, 1873, H. N. Patterson. [Breweria pickeringit (M. A. Curtis) Gray; Bo- 

 namia pickeringit (M. A. Curtis) Gray}. 



2. Convolvulus L. — Bindweed 



1. Corolla 3-5 cm. long; calyx closely subtended and enclosed by two large 

 bracts. 



2. Plants erect, ascending, or decumbent, finely pubescent; petioles about 

 one quarter the length of the blades; dry sandy or rocky soil, local. 

 June-Aug. Dwarf Bindweed C. spithamaeus L. 



2. Plants twining or trailing; petioles longer. 



3. Leaves triangular-hastate or sagittate; flowers single. 

 4. Leaves hastate, the basal lobes angled. 



5. Leaves and stems glabrous or nearly so; peduncles usually longer 

 than the petioles; roadsides, and along fences, common. June- 

 Aug. [C. septum of auth., not L.} American Bindweed 



C. americanus (Sims) Greene 



5. Leaves and stems pubescent; peduncles usually not longer than the 



petioles, more or less wing-angled, often 2 in each axil; local, and 



in similar habitats. June-Aug C. fraterniflorus Mack. 8C Bush 



4. Leaves sagittate, the basal lobes rounded. 



6. Plants glabrous or glabrate; peduncles longer than the petioles; an 



occasional weed in cult, ground and waste places; introd. from 

 Eur. June-Aug. European Bindweed C. sepium L. 



6. Plants copiously soft-pubescent; peduncles usually not exceeding 

 the leaves; waste places, occasional; native of e. and s.e. U.S.; 

 on railroad ballast, Diamond L., Lake Co., Gates in 1907. Trail- 

 ing Bindweed C. repens L. 



3. Leaves narrowly hastate; flowers double, pink; plants pubescent; waste 



places, occasional; native of Asia. Japanese Bindweed 



C. japoniciis Thunb. 




210 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



1. Corolla about 2 cm. long; bracts small, attached some distance below the 

 flower; fields and waste places, common; nat. from Eur. June-Sept. Field 

 Bindweed C. arve7isis L. 



3. Qu AMOCLIT Moench — Red Morning-glory 



Q. coccinea (L.) Moench. Fields and roadsides, occasional; native of trop. 

 Am. July-Oct. 



4. Ipomoea L. — Morning-glory 



(Pharbttis Choisy) 



1. Calyx-lobes obtuse, glabrous, elliptical, 1.5-2 an. long; corolla 5-8 cm. long, 

 white, the tube purple within; leaves ovate, cordate; stem glabrous; cap- 

 sules ovoid, 2-4-seeded; seeds hairy; root perennial, often large; fields, 

 thickets, and waste places throughout 111. June-Sept. Wild Sweet-potato 



/. pandurata (L.) G. F. W. Mey. 



1. Calyx-lobes acute or attenuate, pubescent; s':cm pubescent; capsules globose; 

 seeds glabrous; plants annual. 

 2. Calyx-lobes elliptical or lanceolate, acute or acuminate. 



3. Calyx 10-12 mm. long, the lobes ciliate, acuminate; corolla 1.5-2.5 cm. 

 long, white; leaves entire or 3-angled; fields and along streams, s. III., 

 extending northw. to Peoria and Hancock counties. July-Oct. Small- 

 flowered Morning-glory /. laciinosa L. 



3. Calyx 12-16 mm. long, hirsute toward the base; corolla 5-7 cm. long, 

 purple, pink, variegated, or white; leaves ovate, cordate, rarely 3- 

 lobed; fields and waste places; native of trop. Am. Aug. -Oct. Com- 

 mon Morning-glory /. purpurea (L.) Roth 



2. Calyx-lobes linear-lanceolate, attenuate, copiously hirsute below, 1.5-2.5 

 cm. long; corolla 2.5-4 cm. long, purple; leaves 3-lobed; fields and 

 waste ground; native of trop. Am. July-Oct. Ivy-leaved Morning-glory 

 /. hederacea Jacq. 



5. CUSCUTA L. — Dodder 

 1. Sepals separate. 



2. Flowers cymose, pedicelled; scales short; bracts entire; on various herbs, 



s. 111. Aug.-Sept C. cuspidata Engelm. 



2. Flowers sessile in dense clusters; bracts serrulate. 



3. Styles as long as the ovary; bracts few, broad, appressed; parasitic on 



various shrubs and herbs. July-Oct C. covipacta Juss. 



3. Styles longer than the ovary; bracts numerous, narrow, their tips re- 

 curved; chiefly on Solidago, Aster, Helianthus, and other genera of 

 Compositae C. glonicrata Choisy 



1 . Sepals united below into a synsepalous calyx. 

 4. Flowers nearly sessile. 

 5. Corolla-scales fimbriate. 



6. Flowers 1.5 mm. long; calyx-lobes overlapping, forming angles at the 

 sinuses; seeds depressed-globose, 1 mm. long; on various herbs and 

 shrubs. lune-Oct. fC. arvensis Beyr.] C. pentagona Engelm. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 131. Polemoniaceae 211 



6. Flowers 2-3 mm. long; calyx-lobes not overlapping; seeds ovoid, 1.5 



mm. long; parasitic on various herbs. June-Oct 



C. campestris Yuncker 



5. Corolla-scales obsolete; calyx-lobes acutish; on Polygonum and other 



herbs. Aug. -Oct C. polygonorum Engelm. 



4. Flowers distinctly short-pedicelled. 

 7. Corolla-lobes with incurved tips. 



8. Scales ovate, fimbriate; capsule enclosed by the corolla; on herbs and 

 low shrubs, chiefly Compositae and Leguminosae; known from St. 

 Clair and Wabash counties C. indecora Choisy 



8. Scales obsolete; withered corolla remaining at the base of the cap- 



sule; parasitic on hazel (Corylus) and other shrubs, and on 



various herbs. Aug. -Oct C. coryli Engelm. 



7. Corolla-lobes spreading or recurved. 



9. Scales small, irregularly fimbriate; capsule depressed-globose; on vari- 



ous herbs and shrubs. Aug. -Oct C. cephalanthi Engelm. 



9. Scales long, fimbriate toward the apex; capsule ovoid; parasitic on a 



number of different species of herbs and shrubs. July-Oct 



_..C. gronovii Willd. 



131. Polemoniaceae DC. — Phlox Family 



1 . Leaves opposite, simple, entire; corolla salverform 1. Phlox 



1 . Leaves alternate. 



2. Leaves simple, entire (our species); corolla salverform; stamens straight; plants 



annual 2. Collomia 



2. Leaves pinnate; corolla tubular-campanulate ; stamens declined; plants perennial 

 (our species) 3. Polemonium 



1. Phlox L. — Phlox 



1. Stem erect or ascending, 30-120 cm. tall; corolla-lobes entire or notched. 

 2. Lobes of the calyx not longer than the tube. 



3. Calyx-lobes subulate; panicle pyramidal; leaves often 3 cm. broad; 

 alluvial soil; extending northw. to Vermilion, Champaign, and Ful- 

 ton counties. July-Sept. Garden Phlox P. paniculata L. 



3. Calyx-lobes lanceolate; leaves usually less than 2 cm. broad. 



4. Flowers in an elongated panicle; stem often purple-streaked; moist 

 woods along streams; known from Bureau, Stark, and Champaign 



counties. June-Aug. Sweet-william Phlox P. mactdata L. 



4. Flowers in corymbiform cymes; stem green; roadsides and open 



woods, common. May-July. Smooth Phlox P. glabernma L. 



2. Lobes of the calyx longer than the tube. 



5. Upper leaves linear or linear-lanceolate; stem erect or nearly so, with- 

 out decumbent sterile leafy shoots; sandy soil in open woods and 

 along roads, common. May-Aug. Downy Phlox. [P. argillacea Clute 



& Ferris] P. pdosa L. 



5. Upper leaves lanceolate or elliptical; stem decumbent at base, bearing 

 sterile leafy shoots; moist woods, common. Apr -June. Blue Phlox 

 P. divaricata L. 




212 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



1. Stem diffuse, much-branched, 10-20 cm. long; corolla-lobes bifid. 



6. Corolla-lobes cleft to about the middle; calyx-lobes somewhat longer than 

 the tube; plants puberulent; sandy soil, not uncommon. Apr. -June. 

 Sand Phlox P. bifida Beck 



6. Corolla-lobes lobed at apex; calyx-lobes shorter than the tube; plants gla- 

 brous; limestone cliffs, s. 111., rare; known from Jackson, Union, and 

 Alexander counties. Apr. -May P. stellaria Gray 



2. COLLOMIA Nutt. 



C. linearis Nutt. Dry sandy soil, local; adv. from the West. May-Aug. 

 Known in 111. from Cook, Henry, and Rock Island counties. 



3. POLEMONIUM L. 



P. reptans L. Thickets and open woods, locally throughout 111. May-June. 



132. Hydrophyllaceah Lindl. — Waterleaf Family 



1 . Leaves not entire. 



2. Flowers solitary; stamens included I. Ellisia 



2. Flowers in scorpioid cymes or loose racemes. 



3. Corolla-lobes convolute in the bud; placentae dilated, enclosing the ovules and 



seeds; plants perennial or biennial, with long-petioled basal leaves 



2. H^drophvllum 



3. Corolla-lobes imbricated in the bud; placentae not dilated merely forming ridges 

 on the wall of the ovary; plants (in our species) annual (or biennial) with 

 leafy stems, but no conspicuous basal leaves 3. PhacAia 



1 . Leaves entire 4. HvJrolea 



1. Ellisia L. 



E. nyctelea L. Woods, thickets, cult, ground, and waste places, common 

 throughout 111. May. 



2. Hydrophyllum L. — Waterleaf 



1. Leaves pinnately divided; calyx without appendages between the lobes; 



plants perennial. 



2. Stem glabrous or strigilose; leaf-segments 5-7, acuminate; calyx-lobes 



linear, strigilose on the back, ciliate; corolla pale lavender; moist woods, 



common. May-June H. virgiuianum L. 



2. Stem retrorsely hirsute; leaf-segments 9-13, obtusish; calyx-lobes lanceo- 



late, short-pubescent, and hispidulous; corolla white; woods, local. May- 

 June H. macrophylltim Nutt. 



1. Leaves (at least the upper ones) palmately 5-9-lobed. 



3. Pedicels glabrous or nearly so; calyx-appendages minute or none; corolla 



white; plants perennial; woods, local. June-July H. canadetisc L. 



3. Pedicels rather copiously pilose-hispid; calyx with reflexed appendages 

 (1-2 mm. long) between the lobes; corolla lavender; plants biennial; 

 woods, common. May- June. [^Decemnim appendicidatuvi (Michx.) 

 Brand] M. appendiadalnui Michx. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 133. Boraginaceae 213 



3. Phacelia Juss. 

 1. Stamens longer than the corolla, the filaments pilose; corolla blue, about 1 

 cm. long, appendaged within, the lobes entire; inflorescence glandular, 

 loosely many-flowered; plants biennial; moist thickets and along streams, 



s. 111. Apr.-June P. bipinnatifida Michx. 



1. Stamens not longer than the corolla, the filaments glabrous; corolla without 



appendages; inflorescence not glandular; plants annual. 



2. Corolla about 4 mm. long, the lobes entire; calyx-lobes pubescent on the 



back; racemes 2-5-flowered; reported from Mt. Carmel, Wabash Co., 



by Schneck, and by Gleason from Fall Creek, Adams Co. [P. covillei 



Wats.} P. ranunculacea (Nutt.) Constance 



2. Corolla 6-7 mm. long, the lobes fringed; calyx-lobes glabrous on the back, 

 the margins ciliate; racemes 10-20-flowered, strongly 1 -sided; moist 



woods and thickets, usually in alluvial soil, local. May-June 



P. purshii Buckl. 



4. Hydrolea L. 



H. affinis Gray. Wet ground in woods, or in shallow ponds, s. 111., rare; 

 Union Co., Bre7idel in 1860; Pulaski Co., Brendel in 1860; "S. 111." Vasey. 

 June-Aug. 



133. Boraginaceae Lindl. — Borage Family 



I. Plants glabrous; corolla blue, tubular-funnelfcrm ; nutlets wrinkled when dry 



4. Meriensta 



1. Plants pubescent. 



2. Upper leaves long-petioled ; flowers small, white, in 1 -sided spikes; style terminal 



1. Heliolroplum 



2. Upper leaves sessile or short-petioled ; flowers pedicelled ; style arising between the 

 lobes of the ovary. 

 3. Racemes bractless. 



4. Leaves small; corolla salverform, the tube very short; nutlets smooth 



5. M^osolis 



4. Leaves large, usually more than 2 cm. wide; plants tall and coarse. 



5. Nutlets wrinkled 8. Symphytum 



5. Nutlets prickly 2. Cvnoglossum 



3. Racemes bracteate, each flower borne in the axil of a bract. 

 6. Flowers regular. 



7. Stem-leaves petioled; nutlets with prickles 3. Lappula 



7. Stem-leaves sessile; nutlets not prickly. 



8. Corolla salverform, the lobes rounded, spreading; style included 



6. Lithospermum 



8. Corolla tubular, the lobes erect, acute; style long-exserted.... 7. OnosmoJ/um 

 6. Flowers blue, more or less irregular; stamens exserted 9. Echium 



1. Heliotropium L. — Heliotrope 

 H. indicum L. Waste places, occasional in the s. half of the state; adv. 

 from India. June-July. 



2. Cynoglossum L. — Hound's-tongue 



l.Stem pilose; plant biennial; lower leaves spatulate; inflorescence many- 

 flowered, leafy; corolla reddish or white; pastures and waste places, com- 

 mon; nat. from Eur. June. Common Hound's-tongue C. officinale L. 




214 American Midland Naturalist MoNOGRAprf No. 2 



1. Stem hispidulous; plant perennial; lower leaves oval; inflorescence few- 

 flowered, leafless; corolla blue; woods, s. 111. May. Wild Comfrey 



C. virgmianum L. 



3. Lappula Moench — Stickseed 

 (Hacl(elia Opiz) 



1. Basal leaves ovate or cordate; flowers white; fruit globose, the nutlets prick- 

 ly all over the back; woods and thickets throughout III. July-Sept 



L. virginiana (L.) Greene 



1. Basal leaves spatulate; flowers blue; fruit pyramidal, the nutlets prickly only 



along the margins; waste places; nat. from Eur. June-July 



L. echinata Gilib. 



4. Mertensia Roth 

 M. virginica (L.) Link. Bluebells. Woods, common. Apr. -May. 



5. Myosotis L. — Forget-me-not 

 1. Calyx strigose. 



2. Corolla 6-9 mm. broad; calyx-lobes shorter than the tube; wet ground, 



occasional; escaped from cult.; introd. from Eur. May-Sept 



M. scorpioides L. 



2. Corolla 3-5 mm. broad; calyx-lobes about equalling the tube; n.w. Ind., 



but no 111. specimens seen M. laxa Lehm. 



1 . Calyx-tube with uncinate or glandular pubescence, at least toward the base; 

 corolla 2-3 mm. broad. 



3. Fruiting pedicels longer than the calyx; reported from Cook Co. by 



Pepoon M. arvensis (L.) Hill 



3. Fruiting pedicels not longer than the calyx. 



4. Calyx-lobes equal; corolla blue; nutlets about 1 mm. long; waste places, 



occasional; nat. from Eur -M. micrantha Pall. 



4. Calyx-lobes unequal; corolla white. 



5. Fruiting calyx 4-5 mm. long, bearing few hooked hairs; nutlets about 

 1.5 mm. long; stem 5-30 cm. tall; sandy soil in open woods and 

 fields. May-July. [M. virginica of auth., doubtfully Lycopsis vir- 

 ginica L.} M. verna Nutt. 



5. Fruiting calyx 5-7 mm. long, with many hooked hairs; nutlets 2-2.5 

 mm. long; stem 30-50 cm. tall; rich soil in woods, s. 111., not 

 common. May-June M. macrosperma Engelm. 



6. Lithospermum L. — Gromwell 



1. Perennials; corolla yellow; nutlets white, smooth, glossy. 

 2. Corolla greenish yellow, 4-5 mm. long. 



3. Leaves lanceolate, acute; nutlets ovoid, 3 mm. long; corolla longer than 



the calyx; waste ground, occasional; nat. from Eur. May-Aug 



L. officinale L. 



3. Leaves ovate, acuminate; nutlets globose-ovoid, 4 mm. long; corolla 



shorter than the calyx; dry soil. May-June L. latifo'inni Michx. 



2. Corolla bright yellow or orange, 1-2 cm. long. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 134. Verbenaceae 215 



4. Corolla-lobes erose-denticulate, the tube 1.5-3 cm. long; later flowers 

 cleistogamous, smaller; leaves linear; prairie soil, chiefly in n.e. III., 

 but extending southw. along the valley of the Illinois R. May-July. 



[L. incisum Lehm.; L. linear ijolium Goldie} 



L. angustifolium Michx. 



4. Corolla-lobes entire, the tube less than 1.5 cm. long; flowers all com- 

 plete; leaves lanceolate. 

 5. Stems and leaves hispid-pubescent; corolla light yellow, pubescent 

 within at base; nutlets 3.5-4 mm. long; sandy soil. May-July. [L. 



gmelini and L. carolinense of auth.} L. croceum Fern. 



5. Stems and leaves soft-pubescent; corolla orange yellow, glabrous 



within; nutlets 2.5-3 mm. long; sandy soil. Apr. -June 



L. canescens (Michx.) Lehm. 



1. Annual; corolla white; nutlets gray, wrinkled and pitted; waste places and 

 fields; nat. from Eur. May-Aug L. arvense L. 



7. Onosmodium Michx. — False Gromwell 

 1. Leaves and stems shaggy-pubescent; stems 90-120 cm. tall; nutlets with a 

 slight constriction or rim at base; dry banks and fields, local. June-July 



O. hispidissimum Mack. 



1. Leaves and stems grayish-pubescent with mostly appressed hairs; stems 40-60 

 cm. tall; nutlets rounded at base, not at all constricted; hillsides, bluffs, 

 and thickets, w. 111., local. June-July O. occldentale Mack. 



8. Symphytum L. — Comfrey 

 S. officinale L. Roadsides and waste places, occasional; introd. from Eur. 

 Urbana, Champaign Co., Waite; Algonquin, McHenry Co., Nason. 



9. EcHiuM L. 

 E. vulgare L. Blueweed. Waste places, roadsides, and fields; nat. from 

 Eur. June-Aug. 



134. Verbenaceae J. St. Hil. — Verbena Family 



1. Corolla 5-lobed. nearly regular; calyx tubular; fruit splitting into 4 nutlets 



I . Verbena 



1. Corolla 4-lobecl and 2-lipped; calyx short, 2-cleft; fruit splitting into 2 nutlets.. 



2. P/ip/a 



1. Verbena L. — Vervain 

 1. Flowers 1.5-2.5 cm. long; bracts shorter than the calyx; leaves incisely lobed 

 or toothed; open woods, occasional. Menard Co., and southw. May-Aug. 



V. canadensis (L.) Britt. 



1. Flowers 4-10 mm. long. 



2. Bracts longer than the flowers; stems decumbent, hirsute; roadsides and 



waste places. June-Sept. [V. bracteosa Michx.} 



V. bracteata Lag. & Rodr. 



2. Bracts shorter than the flowers; stem erect; spikes slender or filiform. 

 3. Corolla white; spikes filiform; calyx in fruit 2 mm. or less in length; 

 leaves serrate; roadsides and open woods, common. [V . urticaefolia 




216 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



var. leiocarpa Perry & Fern ] Said to hybridize with V. bracteata, V. 



hastata, and V. stricta. White Vervain V. urticaejolia L. 



3. Corolla blue; spikes slender; fruiting calyx more than 2 mm. long. 

 4. Plants densely soft-pubescent; leaves oval or ovate, serrate; calyx 4-5 

 mm. long; nutlets ellipsoid, 2.5 mm. long; roadsides and fields, 



common. June-Sept. Hoary Vervain V. stricta Vent. 



4. Plants glabrous, or sparsely rough-pubescent. 



5. Leaves lanceolate, acuminate, petiolate, the petioles 1-2 cm. long; 

 calyx 2-3 mm. long; nutlets smooth, 1.5-2 mm. long; roadsides 



and open woods, common. July-Sept. Blue Vervain 



V. hastata L. 



5. Leaves linear to oblanceolate, obtuse, sessile or nearly so; calyx 

 3-4 mm. long; nutlets reticulate, 3 mm. long; roadsides and 

 fields. June- Aug. \V . angustifolia Michx.} Said to hybridize 

 with V. stricta, V. hastata, and V. bracteata. Narrow-leaved 

 Vervain V. simplex Lehm. 



2. Phyla Lour. — Frog-fruit 



{Lippia Houst.) 



P. lanceolata (Michx.) Greene. River banks, shores, along ditches, and in 

 wet meadows, common. June-Sept. 



135. Labiatae B. Juss. — Mint Family 

 (Menthaceae L. F. Ward) 



1. Corolla nearly regular, almost equally 5- (or 4-) lobed. 

 2. Leaves entire or essentially so; plants glandular-puberulent. 



3. Stamens included or only slightly exserted; calyx nearly equally 5-toothed 



2. Isanihus 



3. Stamens long-exserted and strongly upcurved; calyx with 3 long and 2 short teeth 



3. Trichosiema 



2. Leaves serrate, crenate, or pinnatifid. 



4. Fertile stamens 2; plants inodorous 26. Lvcopiis 



4. Fertile stamens 4; plants strongly aromatic 27. Mentha 



I. Corolla very irregular. 



5. Calyx with a small crest or callosity on the upper side, 2-lipped: stamens 4 



4. Sciilellaria 



5. Calyx not crested. 



6. Flowers in compact axillary whorls, or in terminal heads or capitate clusters. 

 7. Bracts broad, conspicuous; corolla 2-3.5 cm. long; flowers in dense head-like 



clusters; calyx tubular, equally 5-toothed, I5-nerved; stamens 2 



18. Monarda 



7. Bracts smaller; corolla shorter. 



8. Stem corymbosely branched, stiffly erect; flower-heads clustered; leaves 

 linear, lanceolate, or ovate; calyx nearly regular, 5-toothed, IO-13-nerved 



24. Pxicnanibemitm 



8. Stem simple or with few branches. 



9. Calyx with 10 recurved teeth; corolla white, 5-6 mm. long; leaves ovate, 



petioled, crenate, rugose; stem canescent 5. Marruhiiitn 



9. Calyx with fewer than 10 teeth. 



10. Stamens strongly exserted beyond the corolla; flowers in dense terminal 

 heads or spikes 6. Agastache 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 135. Labiatae 217 



10. Stamens not strongly exserted. 



1 1 . Calyx-teeth rigid, spine-tipped; corolla 6-10 mm. long 



13. Leonurus 



1 1 . Calyx-teeth not spine-tipped. 



12. Corolla 12-24 mm. long 14. Lamium 



12. Corolla 7-12 mm. long. 



13. Calyx not 2-lipped. the 5 teeth nearly equal. 



14. Leaves coarsely crenate-denate ; corolla whitish, 7-9 mm. 

 long; stem copiously finely pubescent 7. Nepela 



14. Leaves entire; corolla purple; stem puberulent 



2 1 . Satureia 



13. Calyx 2-lipped, the teeth conspicuously unequal. 



15. Stem erect or ascendmg. 



16. Stem glabrous or sparsely pubescent; flowers in dense 



terminal bracted spikes; stamens 4. 



1 7. Leaves entire or sparingly crenate; floral bracts 



ciliate; calyx reticulate-veiny, somewhat 10- 



nerved 12. Prunella 



17. Leaves coarsely sharply serrate; floral bracts 



pectinate; calyx 13-I5-nerved 



10. Dracocephalum 



16. Stem hirsute; calyx 13-nerved. 



18. Leaves 2-10 cm. long; stamens 2, exserted 



1 7. BlephiUa 



18. Leaves 5-10 mm. long; stamens 4 



22. CUnopodium 



15. Stems prostrate, the flowering branches erect or ascend- 

 ing, pubescent; leaves oval, obtuse, entire, short- 

 petioled, 6-15 mm. long; calyx 2-lipped, the linear 

 teeth ciliate; stamens 4; corolla purplish.. ..23. Thymus 

 6. Flowers in racemes or spikes, or solitary or few in the axils of the leaves. 



19. Calyx deeply 4-cleft; corolla greenish yellow, 3-4 cm. long; flowers solitary, 

 axillary; leaves thin, palmately veined, the blade shorter than the petiole 



1 1 . S\^nandra 



19. Calyx 5-toothed or 2-lipped; corolla smaller. 



20. Leaves reniform, crenate, petioled; stems trailing; flowers blue, axillary 



8. Clecoma 



20. Leaves not reniform. 



21. Flowers 4-6 mm. long. 



22. Leaves linear or lanceolate, entire or sparingly serrate; stamens 2 

 19. Hedeoma 



22. Leaves ovate, coarsely dentate; stamens 4 29. Perilla 



21. Flowers more than 6 mm. long. 



23. Corolla with the upper lip apparently obsolete; stamens erect, 



exserted; flowers in long racemes 1. Teucrium 



23. Corolla conspicuously bilabiate. 

 24. Leaves toothed. 



25. Flowers in loose terminal panicles; corolla light yellow; 



fertile stamens usually only 2; calyx 2-lipped 



28. Collinsonia 



25. Flowers not in loose terminal panicles. 

 26. Calyx nearly equally 5-toothed. 



27. Flowers 1.5-3.5 cm. long; spikes continuous, loosely 



flowered; fertile stamens 4 9. Physosiegia 



27. Flowers 1-1.5 cm. long. 



28. Fertile stamens 2, long-exserted ; plants very 



aromatic; corolla purple; stem glabrous 



25. Cunila 



28. Fertile stamens 4, not long-exserted; spikes com- 

 posed of interrupted whorls 15. Slachys 




218 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



26. Calyx 2-lipped. 



29. Fertile stamens 2; corolla purplish 16. Salvia 



29. Fertile stamens 4; corolla white 20. Melissa 



24. Leaves entire; calyx 2-lipped; corolla purple, 8-10 mm. long, 

 puberulent; stamens 4 22. Clinopodium 



1. Teucrium L. 



1 . Calyx and upper part of stem canescent-puberulent with short, somewhat 

 curved, glandless hairs; corolla 1.5 cm. long; moist ground, common. 

 June- Aug _T. canadense L. 



1. Calyx and upper part of stem short-villous with straight, often somewhat 

 glandular hairs; corolla 1 cm. long; moist ground, locally in the n. two- 

 thirds of the state. July-Sept. [T. boreale Bickn.] T. occidentale Gray 



2. Isanthus Michx. 



/. hrachiatus (L.) BSP. False Pennyroyal. Gravelly or sandy soil along 

 roads or in fields or open woods, local. Aug. -Sept. 



3. Trichostema L. 



T. dichotoma L. Bluecurls. Sandy soil in open woods, rare. Ottawa, La 

 Salle Co., Seymour in 1882; "S. 111.," without definite locality, Vasey. Aug.- 

 Sept. 



4. Scutellaria L. — Skullcap 



1. Flowers in axillary or terminal racemes. 



2. Flowers 6-7 mm. long; plants glabrous throughout or puberulent above; 



moist ground, common. July-Sept S. lateriflora L. 



2. Flowers 12-25 mm. long. 



3. Stem-leaves cordate; stem puberulent or short-pilose; corolla puberu- 

 lent, 2-2.5 cm. long; woods, locally throughout 111. June-July. [S. 

 cordifolia Muhl., nom. subnud.; S. versicolor Nutt.} . S. ovata Flill 

 3. Stem-leaves not cordate. 



4. Calyces short-pilose, the hairs gland-tipped; corolla 12-14 mm. long, 

 puberulent or nearly glabrous; wooded slopes, s. 111. June-July. [S. 



ptlosa of Michx., not Hill; S. pdosa var. hirstita Gray} 



S. ovalifolia Michx. 



4. Calyces canescent, not glandular; corolla 18-20 mm. long, puberu- 

 lent; woods, throughout 111., except the n. counties. June-Sept. [S. 



puhescens Muhl., nom. nud.; S. canescetjs Nutt.} 



S. incana Spreng. 



1. Flowers solitary in the axils of the leaves. 



5. Flowers 16-22 mm. long; wet ground, chiefly in the n. half of the state. 



June-Sept. \_S. galericulata of Am. auth., not L.} 



S. epdohiifolia A. Fiamilt. 



5. Flowers 5-10 mm. long. 



6. Leaves entire or nearly so; nutlets wingless; rhizomes moniliform. 

 7. Pubescence of stem and pedicels spreading. 



8. Leaves gland-dotted beneath; wooded bluffs, local. May-July 



S. parvula Michx. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 135. Labiatae 219 



8. Leaves not glandular; wooded slopes and ridges, local. May- June 



S. ans trails Epling 



7. Pubescence of stem and pedicels appressed; wooded slopes and 

 ridges, local. May-June. [5. parvula sensu auth., ex p., non 



Michx.; S. parvula var. ambigiia Fern.; S. leonardi Epling} 



S. ambigua Nutt. 



6. Leaves coarsely crenate; stem glabrous or sparingly pubescent; nutlets 



winged; rhizomes slender; woods, local. May-June 



S. nervosa Pursh 



5. Marrubium L. 



M. viilgare L. Common Horehound. Waste places, roadsides, fields, and 

 open woods, common; nat. from Eur. June-Oct. 



6. Agastache Clayton — Giant Hyssop 

 1. Stem glabrous or puberulent; corolla cream or greenish yellow; roadsides, 

 fields, and open woods, common. Aug.-Oct A. nepetoides (L.) Ktze 



1. Stem finely hirsute; corolla purple; sandy soil in open woods and along 

 roads, infrequent. Aug.-Sept A. scrophidariaefolia (Willd.) Ktze 



7. Nepeta L. 



N. cataria L. Catnip. Pastures, roadsides, waste places, and open woods, 

 common; nat. from Eur. June-Sept. 



8. Glecoma L. 



1. Flowers 16-22 mm. long; waste ground, occasional; nat. from Eur. Peoria, 

 Brendel; Naperville, Du Page Co., Kienholz in 1915. \Nepeta hederacea 

 (L.) Trev.} G. hederacea L. 



1. Flowers 10-15 mm. long; a weed in waste places, lawns, along roads, and in 

 moist open woods; nat. from Eur. Apr.-June. [^Nepeta glechoma var. 

 parviflora Benth.] G. heterophylla Waldst. & Kit. 



9. Physostegia Benth. — False Dragonhead 

 1. Corolla 18-22 mm. long; anthers 1.3-1.6 mm. long; calyx campanulate; 



leaves oblanceolate or lanceolate, thin; alluvial soil, local. Aug.-Oct. 



P. speciosa Sweet 



1. Corolla 2.5-3.5 cm. long; anthers 2 mm. long; calyx tubular-campanulate; 

 leaves mostly linear-lanceolate, firm; prairie soil, often along railroads, 

 local. July-Oct. [P. angustifolia Fern.} P. virginiana (L.) Benth. 



10. Dracocephalum L. — Dragonhead 



{Moldav'ica Adans.) 



D. parviflorum Nutt. Dry soil, rare. Athens, E. Hall; Wady Petra, V. H. 

 Chase. May-Aug. 



11. Synandra Nutt. 



S. hispidula (Michx.) Britt. Wooded ravines, s. 111., not common. Jack- 

 son Co., Clinton. May- June. 




220 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



12. Prunella L. — Selfheal 



P. vulgaris L. Carpenter-weed. Roadsides, waste places, fields, and open 

 woods, common. June-Oct. 



13. Leonurus L. — Motherwort 



1. Calyx much shorter than the corolla; lower leaves palmately 3-5-lobed; corol- 

 la purple, pubescent within, 9-10 mm. long; waste places, fields, roadsides, 

 and open woods, common; nat. from Eur. May-Aug L. cardiaca L. 



1. Calyx as long as the corolla; lower leaves coarsely toothed; corolla pink, 

 glabrous within, 7-8 mm. long; waste places, occasional; nat. from Eur. 

 June-Sept L. marrubiastrum L. 



14. Lamium L. — Dead-nettle 



1. Upper leaves sessile or clasping; early flowers cleistogamous; cult, ground 

 and waste places; nat. from Eur. Mar. -May. Henbit ...L. amplexicaule L. 

 1. All the leaves short-petioled. 



2. Corolla 2-2.5 cm. long; leaves marked with a whitish blotch; waste places, 

 occasional; nat. from Eur. Naperville, Moffatt in 1897; Geneva, Hig- 



gins. May-July L. maculatum L. 



2. Corolla 12-18 mm. long; leaves not blotched; waste places, occasional; 

 nat. from Eur. Apr. -May L. purpureum L. 



15. Stachys L. — Hedge-nettle 



1. Stem glabrous, or hispidulous on the angles. 



2. Leaves sessile or nearly so; angles of the stem retrorsely hispid. 



3. Calyx glabrous, or with a few bristles toward the base; leaves nearly 

 glabrous, lance-linear, narrowed at the base; moist ground, chiefly 

 in the n. half of 111. July-Aug. \_S. atnbigua (Gray) Britt., not Sm.} 



S. aspera Michx. 



3. Calyx villous; leaves lanceolate, pubescent; moist ground, not common. 

 July. [S. aspera sensu auth., non Michx.; S. tenuijolia var. aspera 



Fern.] S. hispida Pursh 



2. Leaves petioled; stem glabrous or merely with a few bristles on the angles; 

 calyx glabrous or nearly so at maturity; moist ground, common. July- 

 Sept. S. tenuijolia Willd. 



1. Stem retrorsely pubescent on the sides as well as the angles; leaves lanceo- 

 late, sessile or nearly so; calyx hirsute; moist ground, common. June-Sept. 

 [>S. palustris var. homotricha Fern.; S. anihigua sensu Epling, non Sm.] 

 S. homotricha (Fern.) Rydb. 



16. Salvia L. — Sage 



1. Corolla 1.5-2.5 cm. long; leaves mostly basal, lyrate-lobed or pinnatifid; 

 stem-leaves few, reduced; dry ground, rare; s. III. May- June ...S. lyrata L. 



1. Corolla 8-12 mm. long; stem more or less leafy, the leaves oval to linear, 

 entire to remotely serrate, 2-8 cm. long; dry gravelly soil, Peoria, Stark, 

 Cook, and Wabash counties; adv. from w. U.S. July-Sept. \S. lanceae- 

 folia Poir.; S. lanceolata Willd.] S. reflexa Hornem. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 135. Labiatae 221 



17. Blephilia Raf. 



1. Leaves nearly sessile, cuneate at base, nearly odorless; bracts ovate; woods; 

 apparently absent from the n.w. counties. May-July ...B. ciliata (L.) Raf. 



1 . Leaves petioled, rounded or subcordate at base, and with a strong pepper- 

 mint odor; woods. June-Sept B. hirsuta (Pursh) Torr. 



18. MoNARDA L. — Bergamot Mint 



1. Heads (flower-clusters) solitary and terminal on the stem or branches; 

 stamens longer than the upper lip of the corolla. 



2. Leaves sessile or nearly so; calyx-lobes 2.5-4 mm. long; corolla pale pur- 

 plish or white, the lower lip spotted; roadsides, pastures, and open 

 woods in the s. half of 111. May-June M. bradburiana Beck 



2. Leaves distinctly petioled; calyx-lobes 1-2 mm. long. 



3. Corolla lilac-purple, 2-3.5 cm. long; stem often branched; fields, open 



woods, and roadsides, common. June-Aug. \M. fistulosa var. mollis 



(L.) Benth.} M. fistulosa L. 



3. Corolla white or yellowish white, 2-2.5 cm. long; stem usually simple; 



woods, local, chiefly in the s. and centr. counties. June-Aug 



M. clinopodia L. 



1. Heads in several verticillate glomerules; corolla yellowish, the upper lip 

 purple-spotted; stamens included; bracts yellowish and purple; sandy soil, 



local. Aug.-Sept. Our plants belong to subsp. rtllicaulis Pennell 



..M. punctata L. 



19. Hedeoma Pers. 



1. Leaves serrate; calyx with the upper lip triangular; dry soil in fields, along 



roads, and in open woods, common. July-Oct. American Pennyroyal 



H. pulegioides (L.) Pers. 



1. Leaves entire; calyx-teeth subulate; sandy soil in open woods, chiefly in the 

 n. part of the state. June-July. Rough Pennyroyal H. hispida Pursh 



20. Melissa L. — Bee Balm 

 M. officinalis L. Waste places, occasional; introd. from Eur. June-Aug. 



21. Satureia L. — Savory 

 S. hortensis L. Summer Savory. Waste places, introd. from Eur.; an occa- 

 sional garden escape. Peoria, Brendel. "Spreading in a field near Naperville. 

 Seen in '97, '98, 1900 (Umbach) ." (Pepoon) No recent specimens seen. 



22. Clinopodium L. — Basil 



(Calamintha Moench) 

 1 . Plants pubescent; leaves ovate. 



2. Flowers sessile in capitate clusters 2-3 cm. in diameter; floral bracts seta- 

 ceous, villous; roadsides, fields, waste places, occasional; adv. from Eur. 

 \^Satureia vulgaris (L.) Fritsch] C. vulgare L. 




222 American Midland Naturalist Monogra^'H No. 2 



2. Flowers few, in numerous loose, peduncled, axillary cymes; bracts minute; 

 waste places, occasional; introd. from Eur. \_S. nepeta (L.) Scheele} .... 



C. nepeta (L.) Krze 



1. Plants glabrous; leaves linear, entire, sessile or nearly so; flowers 1-5 in the 

 axils; plants often with short, basal, sterile stolons bearing oval leaves 

 purplish beneath; rocky woods, or sandy ground, local; n.e. 111., extending 

 southw. to Kankakee and La Salle counties. June-Aug. [^Satureia glabra 

 (Nutt.) Fern.] C. glabrum (Nutt.) Ktze 



23. Thymus L. — Thyme 



T. serpyllum L. Roadsides and old fields and gardens, occasional; introd. 

 from Eur. July-Aug. 



24. Pycnanthemum Michx. — Mountain Mint 



{Koellia Moench) 



1 . Leaves ovate to ovate-lanceolate. 



2. Upper leaves whitish; calyx-teeth and bracts pubescent and usually with 

 long bristles; roadsides, fields, and open woods, s. 111., northw. to 



Jackson and Gallatin counties. July-Sept 



-P. pycnanthemoides (Leavenw.) Fern. 



2. Upper leaves not whitish; calyces and bracts canescent; s. 111., northw. to 



Marion Co. Aug.-Sept P. mcantim (L.) Michx. 



L Leaves lanceolate to linear-lanceolate or linear. 



3. Stem glabrous throughout (or rarely with a few minute curved hairs); 



leaves linear; calyx-lobes subulate-lanceolate; dry soil in open woods, 



along roads, and in fields, common. June-Sept 



P. flexuosum (Walt.) BSP. 



3. Stem pubescent. 



4. Stem short-pubescent on the angles; leaves linear-lanceolate, glabrous 



or nearly so; moist ground in woods and along roads. July-Sept 



P. virginianum (L.) Dur. dC Jacks. 



4. Stem copiously short-pilose throughout, or at least above the middle; 

 leaves elliptic-lanceolate, finely pubescent, at least on veins beneath; 



sandy soil along roads and in open woods, common. July-Sept 



P. pilosiim Nutt. 



25. CUNILA L. 

 C. origanoides (L.) Britt. Stone Mint. Wooded ridges, s. III. Aug.-Oct. 



26. Lycopus L. — Water Horehound 



L Calyx-teeth lanceolate, shorter than or equalling the mature nutlets; leaves 

 serrate, not incised; plants stoloniferous. 

 2. Base of plant and stolons lacking tubers; nutlets sharply muricate on top, 



L7-2 mm. long at maturity; wet ground, not infrequent. July-Oct 



L. virginicus L. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 135. Labiatae 223 



2. Base of rhizome and tips of stolons often bearing a tuber; nutlets smooth 



or merely rugulose on top, 1-1.5 mm. long when mature; moist ground 

 in the n. part of the state, extending southw. to Stark Co. Aug. -Sept. 



L. uniflorus Michx. 



1 . Calyx-teeth subulate, much longer than the nutlets. 



3. Leaves merely coarsely serrate; corolla twice the length of the calyx; wet 



ground, locally throughout 111., except the n. counties. Aug. -Sept 



L. rubellus Moench 



3. Leaves (at least the lower) more or less incised or sinuately pinnatifid; 



corolla slightly longer than the calyx; wet ground, common. July-Sept. 

 [L. siniiatus Ell.} L. americanus Muhl. 



27. Mentha L.— Mint 



1. Whorls of flowers mostly in terminal spikes. 

 2. Leaves sessile. 



3. Stem finely canescent; calyx pubescent; corolla white, about 4 mm. 

 long; roadsides and waste places, occasional; introd. from Eur. Fay- 

 ette Co., Louise Odell in 1940 M. alopecuroides Hull 



3. Stem and calyx glabrous or nearly so; corolla pale pink, 2-2.5 mm. 

 long; moist ground, occasional; introd. from Eur. July-Sept. Spear- 

 mint M. spicata L. 



2. Leaves short-petioled, lanceolate, acute; stem glabrous; calyx-tube gla- 

 brous, the teeth ciliolate; corolla 4 mm. long; waste places and along 

 roads; nat. from Eur. July-Sept. Peppermint M. piperita L. 



1. Whorls of flowers all axillary. 



4. Calyx-tube glabrous, the teeth ciliate; stem sparsely pubescent; leaves oval; 



corolla deep pink, 2.5 mm. long; moist ground, not common; introd. 



from Eur. Aug.-Oct M. gentilis L. 



4. Calyx-tube more or less pubescent. 



5. Leaves ovate, rounded at the base; stem and leaves pubescent; waste 



places, occasional; introd. from Eur. July-Sept. Field Mint 



M. arvensis L. 



5. Leaves lanceolate, cuneate at the base; native species. 



6. Stem villous; leaves pubescent; moist ground, rare. Lake Co., Gleas- 

 07i & Shobe; McHenry Co., Nason. [M. arvensis var. canadensis 



(L.) Briquet] M. canadensis L. 



6. Stem glabrous on the sides, sparsely retrorsely pubescent on the 

 angles; leaves nearly glabrous; moist ground, common throughout 



111. July-Sept. [M. arvensis var. glabrata (Benth.) Fern.} 



M. glabrior (Hook.) Rydb. 



28. COLLINSONIA L. 



C. canadensis L. Richweed. Woods, s. 111., rare. July-Sept. 



29. Perilla L. 



P. frutescens (L.) Britt. Roadsides and waste places, rare; adv. from Asia. 

 Known in 111. from Jackson, Union, Alexander, and Wabash counties. 




224 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



136. Solan ACEAE Pers. — Nightshade Family 



1. Trailing or climbing shrubs; leaves entire; fruit a berry 1. L^cium 



I. Herbs, usually erect, rarely climbing. 

 2. Fruit enclosed in the inflated calyx. 



3. Flowers purple or blue; calyx split to the base 2. Nicandra 



3. Flowers yellowish, usually with a purplish center; calyx merely toothed, not split 



3. Ph\)salis 



2. Fruit not enclosed in an inflated calyx. 



4. Corolla rotate; fruit a berry 4. Solanum 



4. Corolla funnelform, 6-20 cm. long; fruit a more or less prickly capsule 



- 5. Datura 



1. Lycium L. 



L. halimifolium Mill. Matrimony-vine. Occasional about old dwellings and 

 along roads, escaped from cult.; native of Eurasia. May -July. 



2. Nicandra Adans. — Apple of Peru 



N. physalodes (L.) Pers. Fields and waste places, occasional; native of 

 Peru. July-Sept. {^Physalodes physalodes (L.) Britt.} 



3. Physalis L. — ^Ground-cherry 



1. Stems and leaves glabrous, or puberulent. 



2. Pedicels nearly as long as the flowers; calyx-lobes lanceolate; plants peren- 

 nial with a horizontal rhizome. 

 3. Pedicels upwardly strigilose; anthers 3 mm. long; fruiting calyx ovoid, 

 nearly filled with the berry, scarcely impressed at the base; cult, 

 ground and roadsides, common. June-Sept. [P. Philadelphia Lam. 



(?)] Smooth Ground-cherry P. subglabrata Mack. & Bush 



3. Pedicels retrorsely or spreading-hispidulous; anthers 2 mm. long; fruit- 

 ing calyx pyramidal-ovoid, obtusely 5-angled, deeply impressed at the 

 base; cult, ground and roadsides, common. May-July. [P. lanceolata 



of auth., not Michx.J Virginia Ground-cherry P. virginiana Mill. 



2. Pedicels much shorter than the flowers, glabrous or puberulent; calyx-lobes 

 deltoid-ovate; anthers 3 mm. long; plants annual; waste places and cult, 

 ground, occasional; native of s.w. U.S. and Mex. Thornton, Hill in 

 1865; Wheaton, Moffatt in 1898. Tomatillo P. ixocarpa Brot. 



1. Stems and leaves viscid-pubescent. 



4. Corolla 15-25 mm. in diameter; anthers 3-4 mm. long; plants perennial 

 with a horizontal rhizome; sandy or alluvial soil, or in cult, ground and 

 along roads, common. June-Sept. [P. virginiana of auth., not Mill.^ .... 



P. hcterophylla Nees 



4. Corolla 5-10 mm. in diameter; anthers 1-2 mm. long; annuals with fibrous 

 roots. 

 5. Leaves ovate, subentire at base; stem sharply angled; fields, waste places, 



and along roads, local. June-Oct P. puhcsccns L. 



5. Leaves cordate, oblique, sinuately toothed to the base; stem obtusely 



angled; alluvial soil, chiefly w. of the Illinois R. July-Sept 



P. pruinosa L. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 137. Scrophulariaceae 225 



4. SoLANUM L. — Nightshade 



1. Plants more or less prickly; pubescence of stellate hairs. 



2. Flowers lavender or white, 1.5-2 cm. in diameter; berry not enclosed by 

 the calyx; plants perennial; fields, roadsides, waste places, or in open 

 woods, common. June-Sept.. Horse-nettle S. carolinense L. 



2. Flowers yellow, 2-2.5 cm. in diameter; berry enclosed by the prickly calyx; 



plants annual; cult, ground and roadsides, common; native of w. U.S. 



Buffalo-bur. \_Androcera rostrata (Dunal) Rydb.} 



S. rostratum Dunal 



1. Plants not prickly or stellate-pubescent. 



3. Plants perennial, climbing or twining; flowers purple or white; berries 



scarlet, poisonous; moist ground, common; nat. from Eur. June-Oct. 



Deadly Nightshade S. dulcamara L. 



3. Plants annual, erect or spreading; flowers white. 



4. Leaves pinnatifid; berries 1-1.5 cm. in diameter; an occasional weed in 

 cult, ground or waste places. Cook Co., Mojfatt; Carroll Co., Clin- 

 ton. June-Sept S. triflomm Nutt. 



4. Leaves entire or sinuate; berries 5-8 mm. in diameter; roadsides, river 

 banks, and cult, ground; nat. from Eur. (?) June-Oct. Black Night- 

 shade S. nigrum L. 



5. Datura L. 



1. Corolla 6-10 cm. long; plants glabrous or nearly so; leaves angle-toothed; 

 waste places and cult, ground, not uncommon; nat. from Asia. July-Oct. 

 Jimson-weed D. stramonium L. 



1. Corolla 10-20 cm. long; plants glandular-pubescent; leaves entire or undu- 

 late; waste places, not common; nat. from trop. Am. July-Sept 



D. metel L. 



137. Scrophulariaceae Lindl. — Figwort Family 



{Rhinanihaceae Pennell) 



1. Anther-bearing stamens 5; corolla rotate; leaves alternate 1. Verbascum 



1. Anther-bearing stamens 4 or 2. 



2. Corolla spurred at base; stamens 4; capsules opening by one or more slits or pores 



near the apex 6. Linaria 



2. Corolla not spurred; capsules 2-4-valved. 



3. Fifth sterile stamen present: either elongated, or represented by a scale or small 

 gland on the upper side of the corolla-tube. 

 4. Sterile stamen elongated. 



5. Flowers in a dense spike; seeds winged; anthers woolly; leaves serrate, 

 petioled; plants glabrous 2. Chelone 



5. Flowers in a terminal panicle or raceme; seeds wingless 3. Penslcmon 



4. Sterile stamens represented by a small gland or scale on the upper inner side 



of the corolla. 



6. Corolla maroon or purplish green; leaves petioled, sharply serrate or dentate; 



perennials 4. Scrophularia 



6. Corolla blue, pink, or white; upper leaves sessile; annuals 5. ColUnsia 



3. Fifth sterile stamen absent. 

 7. Fertile stamens 2. 




226 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



8. Calyx 5-parted; two stamens anther-beaiing, and two sterile, or the latter 

 sometimes absent. 

 9. Corolla purplish; calyx without bracts; sterile filaments 2-forked, slightly 

 exserted 7. Lindernia 



9. Corolla whitish oi yellow; calyx (in our species) subtended by a pair 



of sepal-like bracts; sterile filaments simple, included or lacking 



8. Cratiola 



8. Calyx 4-parted; stamens 2, both fertile. 



10. Leaves mostly in whorls of 3-6, rarely opposite; corolla tubular-funnel- 



form 13. Veronicaslrum 



10. Leaves opposite or alternate. 



1 1 . Leaves, at least the lower, opposite; corolla rotate, 4-lobed, blue or 



white 14. Veronica 



I 1 . Leaves alternate, mostly basal; in our species the corolla 2-lipped, 

 and the flowers greenish yellow, in a terminal spike; basal leaves 



ovate 1 5. Svnthvris 



7. Stamens 4, all fertile. 



12. Stamens not inclosed in the upper lip of the corolla. 

 13. Corolla distinctly bilabiate. 



14. Calyx 5-angled, 5-toothed; leaves serrate 9. Mimulus 



14. Calyx 5-parted, not angled. 



15. Leaves entire (in our species) 10. Dacopa 



15. Leaves not entire. 



16. Leaves pinnatifid; sepals distinct or nearly so, linear 



1 1. Leucospora 



16. Leaves toothed or incised; calyx campanulate, 5-lobed.... 



12. Mazus 



13. Corolla with a spreading, slightly unequally 5-lobed limb. 



17. Corolla somewhat campanulate or rotate; anthers 2-loculed. 

 18. Anthers pubescent; style slender. 



19. Corolla yellow; capsule acute or acuminate; leaves 

 petioled, pinnatifid (in our species) ; plants parasitic 



on the roots of oak trees 16. Aiireolaria 



19. Corolla purple, pink, or white; capsule obtuse, mucronate; 



leaves sessile, linear to filiform 17. Cerardia 



18. Anthers glabrous; style short; corolla yellow; leaves mostly 



pinnatifid, the upper alternate, lanceolate 18. Dasisioma 



17. Corolla salverform; anthers 1-lcculed; flowers in an elongated 



spike 19. Biichnera 



12. Stamens included in the upper lip of the corolla. 



20. Anther-sacs dissimilar, unequal ; leaves alternate, cleft or lobed (in our 



species) 20. Caslilleja 



20. Anther-sacs alike, parallel. 



21. Leaves pinnately lobed and crenate; floral bracts not spinulose- 



toothed 2 1 . Pedicularis 



21. Leaves entire; floral bracts spinulose-toothed 22. Mclampvriim 



1. Vf.RBASCUM L. — Mullein 



L Plants densely tomentose; flowers in a dense spike; leaves strongly decurrent; 

 fields, roadsides, waste places, common; nat. from Eur. June-Aug. Com- 

 mon Mullein V. thapsus L. 



L Plants glabrous below, glandular above; flowers racemose; corolla white or 

 yellow; roadsides and pastures, common; nat. from Eur. June-Aug. Moth 

 Mullein V. blattaria L. 



2. Chelone L. — Turtlehead 



L Corolla white or tinged with pink; sepals obscurely ciliolate; sterile filament 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 137. Scrophulariaceae 227 



green; wet ground in woods, local; chiefly in the n. two-thirds of the state. 

 July-Oct. [C. imifolia (Cofeman) Pennell ex Rydb.; C. glabra var. elon- 

 gata Pennell & Wherry] C. glabra L. 



1. Corolla rose-purple; sepals ciliolate; sterile filament whitish; low woods, in 

 the s. and w. counties, local. Aug. -Oct. [C. obliqua var. speciosa Pennell 

 & Wherry] C. obliqua L. 



3. Penstemon Mitch. — Penstemon 



1. Plants more or less glandular or pubescent, at least on the calyces and pedi- 

 cels; corolla 1.5-3 cm. long; leaves denticulate or entire. 

 2. Stem pubescent or puberulent. 



3. Corolla violet-purple, 2.5-3 cm. long, the lobes whitish; stem pubescent; 



bluffs, and dry woods and thickets, local. May-June 



P. hirsutus (L.) Willd. 



3. Corolla white, lined with purple within; stem puberulent. 



4. Corolla 2-2.5 cm. long, the throat narrow, flattened, narrowly ridged 

 within, the anterior lobes projecting beyond the posterior ones; dry 



woods, local. May-June P. pallidus Small 



4. Corolla 1.5-2 cm. long, the throat inflated, only slightly ridged with- 

 in, the anterior lobes scarcely exceeding the posterior ones; near 



Mt. Carmel, Schneck P- deamii Pennell 



2. Stem glabrous below the inflorescence. 

 5. Inflorescence open, paniculate. 



6. Corolla white or tinged with purple; calyx-lobes lanceolate to ovate; 

 sandy soil in fields and thickets, and open woods. May-July. Fox- 

 glove Penstemon P. digitalis Nutt. 



6. Corolla purple; calyx-lobes linear-lanceolate, attenuate; alluvial soil 



and wooded slopes. May-July P. calycosus Small 



5. Inflorescence narrow, interrupted; corolla white or purplish; calyx-lobes 

 ovate, acuminate, 3-4 mm. long, glandular; sandy soil in open woods. 

 May-July P. tubaeflorus Nutt. 



1. Plants glabrous throughout and somewhat glaucous; leaves entire; corolla 

 4-5 cm. long, lavender; sandy soil. May-June. Henderson Co., Patterson 

 P. grandiflorus Nutt. 



4. SCROPHULARIA L. — FigWOrt 



1. Corolla dull; sterile stamen brownish purple; capsules ovoid, glossy, 4-7 mm. 



long; woods, throughout 111. July-Sept S. marilandica L. 



1. Corolla glossy; sterile stamen greenish yellow; capsules subglobose, dull, 7-9 



mm. long; open woods, throughout 111., except the s. counties. June. \_S. 



leporella Bickn.] S. lanceolata Pursh 



5. COLLINSIA Nutt. 

 C. verna Nutt. Blue-eyed Mary. Moist woods. Apr.-May. 



6. LiNARIA L. 

 1. Flowers in terminal racemes; plants glabrous. 



2. Corolla yellow, 2-3 cm. long; calyx-lobes ovate; roadsides and fields; nat. 




228 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



from Eur. May-Sept. Butter-and-Eggs L. vulgaris Mill. 



2. Corolla blue or white, 10-12 mm. long; calyx-lobes lanceolate; sandy soil. 



May-June _L. canadensis (L.) Dum.-Cours. 



1. Flowers axillary; plants glandular or pubescent; corolla 5-10 mm. long. 



3. Leaves linear-spatulate to linear; stem erect, glandular; calyx-lobes linear; 



roadsides and waste places, adv. from Eur. May-Aug. {^Chaenorrhiniim 



minus (L.) Lange} L. minor (L.) Desf. 



3. Leaves hastate; stem prostrate, pubescent; calyx-lobes lanceolate; waste 

 ground, nat. from Eur. Sangamon Co., G. D. Fuller & G. M. Link 



567. June-Sept. \^Kickxia elatine (L.) Dumort.} 



_L. elatine (L.) Mill. 



7. Lindernia All. 



{Il^santhes Raf.) 



L. dubia (L.) Pennell. Moist ground, often along streams, ditches, and 

 ponds, locally abundant throughout III. July-Sept. [/. anagallidea (Michx.) 

 Raf.; /. attenuata (Muhl.) Small; /. dubia (L.) Barnh.} 



8. Gratiola L. 



1. Corolla golden yellow, 10-15 mm. long; sterile filaments 2, slender; capsule 

 3 mm. long; seeds brown; leaves entire or remotely denticulate; plants 

 perennial, with rhizomes; wet ground, rare. Forest Park, Cook Co., Sey- 

 mour. [G. aurea Muhl.] G. lutca Raf. 



1. Corolla light yellow or white, 6-12 mm. long; sterile filaments minute or 

 none; capsules 3-7 mm. long; seeds yellow; leaves repand to serrate; an- 

 nuals with fibrous roots. 

 2. Pedicels slender, 1-2.5 cm. long in fruit, equalling or exceeding the leaves; 

 plants glandular-puberulent; capsules ovoid; wet ground and borders of 



ponds, not uncommon. May-Aug. [G. virginiana of auth., not L.l 



G. ncglecta Torr. 



2. Pedicels stouter, usually shorter than the leaves, less than 1 cm. long; 

 plants glabrous; capsules globose; shores and ditches, less common than 

 the preceding. May-June. [G. sphaerocarpa Ell.] G. virginiana L. 



9. MiMULUS L. — Monkey Flower 



1. Corolla violet; stem erect; leaves lanceolate to oval. 

 2. Leaves sessile, clasping; pedicels longer than the calyx; along streams, not 



uncommon. July-Sept M. ringens L. 



2. Leaves short-petioled; pedicels shorter than the calyx; wet ground, 



throughout 111., except the n. counties. July-Sept M. alatus Soland. 



1. Corolla yellow; stems slender, creeping; leaves suborbicular; wet ground in 

 the n. half of the state. June-Sept. [M. glabratus var. fremontii (Benth.) 

 Grant; M. jamesii T. & G.] M. gcyeri Torr. 



10. Bacopa Aubl. 



(Ihuhantlu'liiim HBK.; Macuillanua Raf.) 



B. rotundifolia (Michx.) Wettst. Water Hyssop. Margins of ponds, local. 

 July-Sept. [Bramta rotundifolia (Michx.) Britt.] 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 137. Scrophulariaceae 229 



11. Leucospora Nutt. 



L. multijida (Michx.) Nutt. Sandy soil near streams, throughout III., ex- 

 cept the n. counties. July-Oct. [Conobea multijida (Michx.) Benth.] 



12. Mazus Lour. 



M. japonicus (Thunb.) Ktze. Waste ground, or in lawns; adv. from e. 

 Asia. Chicago, G. D. Fuller in 1943. [M. rugosus Lour.} 



13. Veronicastrum Fabr. 



(Leptandra Nutt.) 



V. virginicum (L.) Farw. Culver-root. Meadows and thickets, common. 

 July- Aug. [^Veronica virginica L.] 



14. Veronica L. — Speedwell 



1. Flowers in racemes; perennials with rhizomes. 

 2. Racemes in the axils of the leaves. 



3. Capsules pubescent; stems and leaves pubescent; blades oval, serrate, 



short-petioled; waste ground; nat. from Eur. May-Sept 



V. officinalis L. 



3. Capsules glabrous (or with a few gland-tipped hairs); stems and leaves 

 glabrous or sparsely glandular-puberulent; plants of wet soil. 

 4. Leaves linear or linear-lanceolate, entire or remotely denticulate; cap- 

 sules much broader than long, notched at both ends, much shorter 



than the pedicels; along ditches and ponds. June-Aug 



V. scutellata L. 



4. Leaves lanceolate to ovate, serrate or crenate; capsules nearly or- 

 bicular. 

 5. Leaves short-petioled; plants glabrous throughout; swampy ground 



in the n. half of the state, rare. June-Aug 



V. americana (Raf.) Schw. 



5. Leaves sessile, clasping; plants minutely glandular, at least in the 



inflorescence; ditches and sloughs. June-Sept V. connata Raf. 



2. Racemes terminal; leaves ovate or oval, entire or obscurely crenate, gla- 

 brous; capsules puberulent, orbicular, obcordate, 3-4 mm. broad; road- 

 sides, fields, or lawns; nat. from Eurasia. May-June ....V. serpyllifolta L. 



1. Flowers solitary in the axils of the upper leaves; plants annual. 



6. Leaves oblanceolate or spatulate to linear, entire or shallowly toothed, 

 glabrous; corolla whitish, 2-3 mm. in diameter; capsules emarginate, 3-4 

 mm. broad, the style not more than 0.5 mm. long; stem glabrous or 

 with gland-tipped trichomes; fields, gardens, and roadsides, common. 



May-June. [F. xalapensis HBK.} V . peregrina L. 



6. Leaves ovate or oval, serrate or dentate, pubescent; corolla blue; capsules 



obcordate. 



7. Pedicels shorter than the leaves; corolla 2-3 mm. broad; capsules 3-4 



mm. broad; lawns, fields, and waste places, common; nat. from Eur. 



Apr. -June V. arvensis L 




230 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



7. Pedicels as long as the leaves or longer; corolla about 1 cm. in diam- 

 eter; capsules 7-8 mm. broad; an occasional weed in lawns and waste 

 ground; nat. from Eur. Apr. -Aug. [V. tournefortii sensu C. C 

 Gmel., non Schmidt; V. buxbaumii Tenore; V. byzantina (Sm.) 

 BSP.] V. persicd Poir. 



15. Synth YRis Benth. 



(Bessevia Rydb.) 

 S. biillii (Eaton) Heller. Sandy or gravelly soil, n.w. 111., extending 

 southw. to Henderson Co.; also in Cass and Menard counties. May-June. [5. 

 hoiightoniana Benth.} 



16. AuREOLARiA Raf. — False Foxglove 

 (Dasvstoma Benth.) 

 1. Plants perennial, not glandular; corolla 3-5 cm. long; seeds winged. 



2. Plants glabrous or nearly so; stem glaucous; sandy soil in open woods. 

 Aug. -Sept. [D. virginica ex p. sensu Britt.; D. qiiercifolia (Pursh) 



Benth.; Gerardia virginica of auth., not Rhinanthus virgimciis L.] 



A. flara (L.) Farw. 



2. Plants grayish puberulent; open woods. July-Oct. [A. grandi flora pulchra 

 Pennell] A. grandiflora (Benth.) Pennell 



1. Plants annual, more or less glandular; corolla 2-3 cm. long; capsules ellip- 

 soid, 1-1.5 cm. long; seeds wingless; dry open woods, n.e. 111., rare. Aug.- 

 Sept. [/I. pedicularia intercedens Pennell} A. pedicularia (L.) Raf. 



17. Gerardia L. 



(Agalinis Raf.) 



1. Leaves auriculate at base, lanceolate; flowers 1.5-2 cm. long, nearly sessile; 

 anthers of the shorter filaments smaller; fields and open woods. Aug.- 

 Sept. [Tomanthera aiincidata (Michx.) Raf.; Otophylla auriculata 

 (Michx.) Small} G. auriculata Michx. 



1. Leaves linear, entire, not auriculate; anthers uniform. 



2. Pedicels of the flowers less than twice the length of the calyx. 



3. Capsules ellipsoid, 8-10 mm. long; calyx-teeth triangular-lanceolate; 

 corolla 18-25 mm. long; leaves scabrous; gravelly or sandy soil, local- 



Aug. -Sept ...G. aspera Dougl. 



3. Capsules subglobose, 3-6 mm. long; calyx-teeth subulate, short. 



4. Flowers 2-3 cm. long; moist sandy soil. Aug. -Oct G. purpurea L. 



4. Flowers 14-18 mm. long; moi.st ground. Aug. -Sept 



G. paupercula Gray 



2. Pedicels of the flowers more than twice the length of the calyx. 



5. Leaves linear to linear-lanceolate, flat; moist ground, and on wooded 

 slopes, local. Aug. -Oct. Somewhat variable, and several varieties 



have been described G. tetiuifolia Vahl 



5. Leaves filiform-linear, the margins revolute. 



6. Stem strict, simple or few-branched, striatc-angled, the angles minute- 

 ly scabrellous; dry sandy soil, local. Aug. -Sept 



G. skinneriana Wood 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 138. Lentibulariaceae 231 



6. Stem usually much-branched, nearly terete (at least below), smooth or 



nearly so; wooded slopes and ridges, local. Aug.-Oct 



G. gatt'tngeri Small 



18. Dasistoma Raf. 



D. macrophylla (Nutt.) Raf. Mullein Foxglove. Dry soil in woods near 

 streams; often parasitic on the roots of Aesculus. July- Aug. 



19. BUCHNERA L. 



B. americana L. Blue Hearts. Sandy soil, rare. July-Sept. Chicago, Bab- 

 cock; Menard Co., Hall. 



20. Castilleja Mutis — Indian Paint Brush 



1. Plants perennial, 10-30 cm. tall; bracts green; corolla yellowish white, 4-5 

 cm. long; gravelly or sandy soil, n. 111.; known from Winnebago, Mc- 

 Henry, Lake, and Du Page counties. June-Aug C. sessiliflora Pursh 



1. Plants annual or biennial, 30-60 cm. tall, bracts scarlet or yellowish; corolla 

 green, 2-2.5 cm. long; moist ground, throughout 111., except the most 

 southerly counties. May-June C. coccinea (L.) Spreng. 



21. Pedicularis L. 



1. Stem glabrous or nearly so, 60-90 cm. tall; leaves opposite, nearly sessile, 

 shallowly lobed; spikes 5-10 cm. long; lower lip of the corolla 10-12 mm. 

 long, nearly as long as the upper; capsules ovoid, scarcely longer than the 

 calyx; swampy ground. Aug.-Oct P. lanceolata Michx. 



1. Stem pubescent, 10-30 cm. tall; leaves alternate, petioled, deeply lobed; 

 spikes 10-20 cm. long; lower lip of the corolla about 8 mm. long, much 

 shorter than the upper; capsules lanceoloid, about three times as long as 

 the calyx; sandy soil in open woods. May P. canadensis L. 



22. Melampyrum L. 



M. lineare Desr. Moist ground, rare. June-Aug. Cook Co., Moffatt. [M. 

 americanum Michx.} 



138. Lentibulariaceae Lindl. — Bladderwort Family 



1. Utricularia L. — Bladderwort 



1. Pedicels recurved in fruit. 



2. Flowers 1-2 cm. long, the spur conspicuous, slightly curved upward; ponds 

 and slow streams, chiefly in the n. half of the state; the common spe- 

 cies in 111. July- Aug. \U. vulgaris var. americana Gray; U. macrorhiza 

 Le Conte} U. vulgaris L. 



2. Flowers 4-6 mm. long; spur short, blunt, almost obsolete; lake shores or 



stagnant water. Lake Co., Hill; Ringwood, Vasey U. minor ^■^\g%^^ 



1. Pedicels erect or ascending in fruit; spur evident. y V>* ^ 



3. Stems slender, elongated, creeping in the mud or floating. y^^ 





LIB 




232 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



4. Leaf-segments capillary; upper lip of the corolla equalling the lower; 

 lake shores or shallow water, n.e. III.; also in St. Clair and Jackson 

 counties. Aug.-Oct U. gibba L. 



4. Leaf-segments linear, flat, often minutely serrulate; upper lip of the 

 corolla about half the length of the lower; shallow water. July-Aug. 



Peoria, Brendel; Waukegan, Hill U. intermedia Hayne 



3. Stems short, submerged in the mud; leaves rarely seen; corolla L5-2 cm. 

 broad, the subulate spur 7-12 mm. long, pointing downward; lake 

 shores and peat bogs, rare. Lake Co., Hill; Cook Co., Pear sail in 1943. 

 July-Aug. [Stomoisia cornuta (Michx.) Raf.} Horned Bladderwort 

 U . cornuta Michx. 



139. Orobanchaceae Lindl. — Broomrape Family 



I. Flowers of 2 kinds, the lower cleislogamous and fertile, the upper complete but usually 



sterile; stamens included; branches slender, ascending, simple 1. Epifagus 



1. Flowers all perfect and complete. 



2. Flowers in a thick scaly spike; stamens exserted; plants glabrous 2. Conopholis 



2. Flowers solitary or racemose; stamens included; plants glandular-puberulent 



- 3. Orobanche 



1. Epifagus Nutt. 



(Eptphegus Spreng. ; Lepiamniitm Raf.) 

 E. virginiana (L.) Bart. Beech-drops. Parasitic on the roots of beech trees. 

 Sept.-Oct. 



2. Conopholis Wallr. — Squaw-root 



C. americana (L.f.). Wallr. In wooded ravines, parasitic on the roots of oak 

 trees, not common. Cook Co., Hill; Vermilion Co., G. N. Jones 13346. 



3. Orobanche L. — Broomrape 

 (Thalesia Raf.; Aphyllon Gray) 

 1. Flowers numerous, sessile or short-stalked, spicate or racemose. 



2. Calyx 4-lobed, the lobes triangular-ovate, about as long as the tube; 

 flowers subtended by 1 large and 2 small bracts; raceme loosely flow- 

 ered; stem branched; parasitic on roots of herbaceous plants; adv. or 

 nat. from Eur O. ramosa L. 



2. Calyx 5-cleft, the lobes linear-lanceolate, 7-8 mm. long, longer than the 



tube; flowers subtended by 1 or 2 bracts; spikes terminal, dense; stem 

 simple; parasitic on various plants, including Ambrosia, Artemisia, and 

 other Compositae in sandy soil, not common. Aug. -Sept. [Myzorrkiza 



ludoviciana (Nutt.) Rydb.} O. ludoviciana Nutt. 



1. Flowers few or solitary on bractless scapes; calyx 5-cIeft. 



3. Flowers 3-15; calyx-lobes triangular-lanceolate, shorter than the tube; para- 



sitic on Artemisia and other Compositae in sandy soil, local. Savanna, 

 Carroll Co., July 10, 1909, H. C. Cowles O. fasciculata Nutt. 



3. Flower solitary; calyx-lobes subulate, longer than the tube; parasitic on 

 various plants, not common. May-June. [Anoplanthiis uniflorns (L.) 

 Endl.} O. uniflora L. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 142. Acanthaceae 233 



140. Bignoniaceae Pers. — Trumpet-creeper Family 

 I . Trees ; leaves simple, ovale. 



2. Leaves opposite; stamens 4; capsules ovoid; pith chambered or hollow 



1. PauloTunia 



2. Leaves usually in whorls of 3 ; stamens 2 ; capsules long-cylindrical ; pith continuous 



2. Calalpa 



1. Climbing or trailing shrubs; leaves compound; anther-bearing stamens 4. 



3. Leaflets 2. entire; leaves with a tendril; pods flat 3. Dignonia 



3. Leaflets 7-11, serrate; leaves without a tendril; pods cylindrical 4. Campsts 



1. Paulownia Sieb. & Zucc. 



P. tomentosa (Thunb.) Steud. Princess Tree or Paulownia. Cultivated; 

 native of China; sometimes apparently spontaneous in s. 111. Golconda, Pope 

 Co., G. N. Jones 12012, 12013. [P. imperialis Sieb. & Zucc] 



2. Catalpa Scop. 



1. Leaves long-acuminate, inodorous; panicles few-flowered, about 15 cm. long; 

 corolla about 6 cm. in diameter, the lower lobe emarginate; capsules about 



1.5 cm. thick; s. 111.; often planted elsewhere. June-July 



C. speciosa Warder 



1 . Leaves abruptly acuminate, with an unpleasant odor; panicles many-flow- 

 ered, 20-25 cm. long; corolla 4-5 cm. in diameter, the lower lobe entire or 

 nearly so; capsules 5-8 mm. thick; commonly planted; native of s.e. U.S. 

 C. bignonioides Walt. 



3. BiGNONIA L. 



B. capreolata L. Cross-vine. Alluvial soil, s. III. May. \^Anisostichus capre- 

 olata (L.) Bureau] 



4. Campsis Lour. — Trumpet-creeper 



C. radicans (L.) Seem. Open woods throughout III., except the n. counties. 

 June-Aug. [Bignonid radicans L.; Tecoma radicans (L.) Juss.] 



141. Martyniaceae Link — Unicorn-plant Family 



1. Martynia L. — Unicorn-plant 



M. louisianica Mill. River banks and waste ground, local. July-Sept. [M. 

 proboscidea Glox.] 



142. Acanthaceae J. St. Hil. — Acanthus Family 



I. Plants growing in water or along muddy shores; leaves linear-lanceolate; corolla dis- 

 tinctly 2-lipped; fertile stamens 2 \. Dianihera 



1. Plants of drier ground; leaves wider; corolla nearly regular; fertile stamens 4 



2. RuelUa 



1. Dianthera L. — Water-willow 



D. americana L. Common along muddy shores of streams. June-Aug. 




234 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



2. ruellia l. 

 1. Flowers sessile or nearly so. 



2. Stem hirsute; calyx lobes linear-filiform, 0.5-1 mm. wide, exceeding the 

 capsule; leaves nearly sessile; roadsides and open woods, common 



throughout 111. June-Aug. Hairy Ruellia R. ciliosa Pursh 



2. Stem glabrous or puberulent; calyx-lobes linear-lanceolate, 2-4 mm. wide, 



about equalling the capsule; leaves petioled; alluvial soil throughout the 



state except the n. counties. June-July. Smooth Ruellia ...R. strepens L. 



1. Flowers on slender peduncles bearing a pair of leaf -like bracts at the apex; 



stem puberulent; calyx-lobes subulate-filiform, shorter than the capsule; 



dry open woods, s. 111. June-Aug. Stalked Ruellia ...R. peduticulata Torr. 



143. Phrymaceae Schauer — Lopseed Family 



1. Phryma L. — Lopseed 

 P. leptostacbya L. Alluvial soil in woods, common. June-Aug. 



144. Plantaginaceae Lindl. — Plantain Family 



1. Plantago L. — Plantain 



1. Leaves ovate, oval, lanceolate or spatulate, not linear. 



2. Leaves narrowed at the base; veins free to the base. 

 3. Spikes cylindrical. 



4. Capsules 4-18-seeded; corolla-lobes spreading or reflexed in fruit; 



leaves ovate or oval; plants perennial. 



5. Capsules ellipsoid, 4-5 mm. long; sepals elliptic, acutish, 2.5-3 mm. 



long; seeds 1.5-2 mm. long; leaves glossy green, the petioles 



usually purplish at base; waste places, roadsides, lawns, fields, 



and open woods, very common. June-Sept. Common Plantain 



P. riigelii Dene. 



5. Capsules ovoid, about 3 mm. long; sepals oval, obtuse, 1.5 mm. 

 long; seeds 0.6-0.7 mm. long; leaves dull green; waste places in 

 cities, not common; probably adv. from Eur.; known in III. from 

 Chicago, Hill, Moffatt, and Peoria, Brendel, McDonald. Broad- 

 leaved Plantain P. major L. 



4. Capsules 2-seeded, ellipsoid, 2 mm. long, circumscissile at the middle, 

 tipped with the persistent corolla; seeds yellowish brown, concave 

 on one side, 1.5 mm. long; sepals pubescent, scarious-margined; 

 leaves spatulate or obovate; plants annual or biennial; fields and 



roadsides, not infrequent. May-July P. virginica L. 



3. Spikes ellipsoid; leaves lanceolate; seeds 2, hollowed on the inner sur- 

 face; waste places, roadsides, fields, lawns, very common; nat. from 

 Eur. May-Sept. Buckhorn Plantain P. lanceolata L. 



2. Leaves, or some of them, cordate at base; veins branching from the mid- 

 rib; spikes cylindrical; capsules 2-4-seeded, 4-5 mm. long; along ditches, 

 local. May-July. Heart-leaved Plantain P. cordata Lam. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 145. Rubiaceae 235 



1 . Leaves linear. 



6. Capsules 4-seeded; calyx-lobes erect and converging over the top of the 

 capsule; stamens 2; fields, roadsides, and open woods, chiefly in the s. 



half of the state. Apr.-May P. pusitla Nutt. 



6. Capsules 2-seeded; calyx-lobes spreading or reflexed in fruit, not closed 

 over the top of the capsule. 

 7. Bracts much longer than the flowers; fields, roadsides, and open woods, 



common. June-Aug. Bracted Plantain P. aristata Michx. 



7. Bracts not longer than the flowers; sandy soil in fields and along roads, 

 n. 111., local. May-Aug P. piirshii R. &: S. 



145. Rubiaceae B. Juss. — Madder Family 



1. Shrubs; leaves opposite or whorled; flowers in dense globose heads 2. Cephalanlhus 



I. Herbs. 



2. Leaves opposite. 



3. Flowers axillary, sessile or nearly so. 



4. Plants pubescent; fruit separating into 2 or 3 indehiscenf carpels 4. Diodia 



4. Plants glabrous; fruit a capsule of 2 carpels, one dehiscent, the other inde- 



hiscenl 5. Spermacoce 



3. Flowers pedicellate, cymose or solitary. 



5. Plants trailing; leaves evergreen, cordate at base; fruit a pair of united red 



drupes 3. Mitchella 



5. Plants erect; leaves not as above; fruit a capsule 1. Homlonia 



2. Leaves apparently in whorls of 4-8 6. Calium 



1. HousTONiA L. — Bluets 



1. Flowers cymose; stems 10-50 cm. tall; plants perennial. 



2. Calyx-lobes much exceeding the capsule, and about twice as long as the 

 calyx-tube; stem-leaves lanceolate to linear-lanceolate; open rocky woods, 

 local; chiefly in the centr. and s. parts of III., but also in Will and La 

 Salle counties; May-July. [H. purpurea var. calycosa Gray; H. pur- 

 purea of III. reports} H. lanceolata (Poir.) Britt. 



2. Calyx-lobes slightly if at all exceeding the capsule, about as long as the 



calyx-tube; stem-leaves linear or linear-oblanceolate; thin soil on wooded 

 ridges and slopes, rare; s. 111., northw. to Jackson, Williamson, and 

 Saline counties. May-July H. longijolia Gaertn. 



1. Flowers solitary; stems very slender, 1-5 (-10) cm. tall. 



3. Pedicels mostly 2-5 cm. long; flowers with a yellow center; plants peren- 



nial with a filiform rhizome; fields andopen woods, local; known from 



Cook, Kankakee, St. Clair, and Johnson counties. Apr.-June 



H. caerulea L. 



3. Pedicels mostly 0.5-2 cm. long; flowers without a yellow center; plants 

 annual; dry ground, rare. Apr.-May. Truro, Knox Co., May 10, 1908, 

 V. H. Chase 1632 H. minima Beck 



2. Cephalanthus L. — Buttonbush 



C. occidentalis L. Along streams and lake shores, and in swamps, common 

 throughout III. June-Aug. 




236 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



3. MiTCHELLA L. — Partridge-berry 



M. repens L. Woods, local; known from Cook, La Salle, Clark, Jackson, 

 Johnson, and Pope counties. May-July. 



4. DiODiA L. 

 (Dioddla Small) 

 D. teres Walt. Rough Buttonwecd. Fields, roadsides, and open woods, 

 chiefly in centr. and s. 111. July-Aug. 



5. Spermacoce L. 



S. glabra Michx. Smooth Buttonweed. Muddy shores, river banks, and wet 

 ground in woods in the s. and w. counties. July-Aug. 



6. Galium L. — Bedstraw 

 1 . Ovary and fruit uncinate-hispid, or at least puberulent. 

 2. Leaves cuspidate, 1 -veined, 6-8 in each whorl. 



3. Leaves narrowly oblanceolate to linear; stems long, weak, reclining, 

 retrorsely hispidulous; corolla white; plants annual; woods and 



thickets, very common; nat. from Eur. May-June. Goose-grass 



G. aparine L. 



3. Leaves narrowly oval; corolla greenish white; plants perennial; damp 



woods. June-Aug. Sweet-scented Bedstraw G. trijlorum Michx. 



2. Leaves not cuspidate, 4 in each whorl. 



4. Leaves narrowly lanceolate, or linear, glabrous or nearly so, or the 



margins and midveins scabrous; flowers white, numerous in a ter- 

 minal panicle; in sandy or rocky soil along roads or in woods and 

 thickets, or occasionally in bogs; n. III. May-July. Northern Bed- 

 straw G. boreale L. 



4. Leaves oval, more or less pubescent. 



5. Leaves 1 -veined, or obscurely 3-veined at base, oval; flowers greenish 

 purple, pedicelled, paniculate; fruit 3-4 mm. in diameter; woods, 



chiefly in the w. and s. counties. June-Aug G. pilosutn Ait. 



5. Leaves 3-veined, oval-lanceolate; flowers greenish yellow, puberulent, 

 sessile or nearly so, in few-flowered cymes; fruit 2-3 mm. in diam- 

 eter; woods. May-July. Wild-licorice G. circaezcms Michx. 



L Ovary and fruit glabrous or nearly so; leaves 1 -veined; corolla white. 

 6. Leaves cuspidate, 5-7 (usually 6) in each whorl. 



7. Leaves linear, 1-2 mm. wide, the margins sparsely antrorsely short- 

 ciliolate or nearly smooth; stems clustered, nearly smooth, 15-30 cm. 

 tall; dry woods, common. June-July G. coucinnuni T. &. G. 



7. Leaves narrowly elliptical-oblanceolate, 2.5-4 mm. wide, the margins 



retrorsely scabrellous; stems reclining or trailing, retrorsely scabrous 

 on the angles, 0.5-2 m. long; swamps and thickets, n. 111. July-Aug. 



Rough Bedstraw G. asprellum L. 



6. Leaves blunt, linear or linear-spatulate. 



8. Corolla 4-lobed, the lobes acute; leaves mostly in fours; stem erect; 



pedicels smooth; moist ground, common. May-June. [G. tinctorium 

 sensu auth., non L.] G. obtusum Bigel. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 146. Caprifoliaceae 237 



8. Corolla 3-Iobed, the lobes obtuse; leaves of the main stem mostly in 

 sixes and fives; stems diffuse, slender. 

 9. Pedicels smooth, straight, 2-6 mm. long; flowers in twos and threes; 



wet ground, rare; n.e. 111. May-Sept. [G. claytoni Michx.] 



G. tmctorium L. 



9. Pedicels scabrous, usually arcuate, 5-10 mm. long; flowers solitary; 

 swamps and bogs, rare. July-Aug G. trifidum L. 



146. Caprifoliaceae Vent. — Honeysuckle Family 



I. Plants trailing; leaves roundish or oval, crenate, evergreen; flowers nodding in pairs; 

 fruit ovoid, indehiscent, 1 -seeded 4. Linnaea 



1 . Erect or climbing shrubs, or herbs. 

 2. Shrubs with erect or twining stems. 



3. Leaves pinnate; fruit berry-like, 3-5-seeded 1. Sambucus 



3. Leaves simple. 



4. Flowers in compound cymes; fruit a 1 -seeded drupe 2. Viburnum 



4. Inflorescence otherwise. 



5. Leaves not serrate; fruit a berry or drupe. 



6. Flowers regular or nearly so; fruit a berry-like drupe with 2 nutlets 



3. Sympboricarpos 



6. Flowers mostly irregular; fruit a few — many-seeded berry 5. Lonicera 



5. Leaves serrate; flowers yellow; fruit a capsule 6. Diervilla 



2. Herbs; flowers axillary; leaves connate or sessile; fruit a drupe 7. Triosleum 



1. Sambucus L. — Elder 



1. Inflorescence flat-topped, 10-40 cm. broad; fruit black (rarely greenish yel- 

 low) ; pith white; moist ground along roads, in woods, or along streams 



and lakes, common throughout 111. June-July. Common Elder .. 



S. canadensis L. 



1. Inflorescence ovoid, 4-5 cm. broad; fruit bright red (rarely yellow); pith 

 brown; moist rocky woods, rare; known from Cook and La Salle counties. 

 Apr. -May. Red Elder. [S. racemosa of auth., not L.} ...S. pubens Michx. 



2. Viburnum L. — Viburnum 

 1. Leaves not lobed. 



2. Leaves serrate or serrulate, the veins curving and anastomosing before 

 reaching the margin; petioles flat or channelled and somewhat mar- 

 gined; cymes sessile or nearly so. 

 3. Winter buds scurfy- punctate, usually somewhat glossy; blades thin, 

 acute or acuminate. 

 4. Blades abruptly acuminate, sharply serrate; wet ground, chiefly in the 



n. half of the state. May-June. Nannyberry V. lentago L. 



4. Blades acute or obtuse at the apex, serrulate with incurved teeth; 

 petioles glabrous or nearly so; moist woods, common. May-June. 



Blackhaw. [F. bushii Ashe} V. prunifolium L. 



3. Winter-buds dull, porous, puberulent; blades firm, obtusish; petioles 

 more or less reddish-tomentulose; wooded ravines, s. 111., rare. Foun- 

 tain Bluff, Cranwill; Gallatin Co., Mattoon. May. Southern Black- 

 haw V. rufdtdum Raf. 




238 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



2. Leaves coarsely dentate, the veins straight, ending in the teeth; petioles 

 not margined; cymes peduncled. 



5. Leaves short-petioled, the petioles not more than 1 cm. long; blades 

 usually with 7-10 teeth on each side; fruit ellipsoid, the stone flat- 

 tened, sulcate on both sides. 

 6. Lower surface of leaves softly pubescent over the whole surface; 

 woods and river banks, n. 111., not common; known from Lake, 

 Cook, Du Page, McHenry, Winnebago, and Jo Daviess counties. 

 May-June. [V. villosuyn Raf. not Sw.; V. pubescens of auth., not 



Pursh; V. affine var. hypomalacum Blake] 



V . rafinesquianum Schult. 



6. Lower surface of leaves glabrous, except on the veins or in their axils; 

 woods and thickets, locally throughout the n. half of the state 

 from Vermilion and Peoria counties northw. May-June. [F. pu- 

 bescens var. affine (Bush) Rehd.; V. rajinesquiajium var. affine 

 (Bush) House] V. affine Bush 



5. Leaves longer-petioled, the petioles 1-2.5 cm. long; blades usually with 

 10-15 teeth on each side; fruit globose-ovoid, the stone deeply sulcate 

 ventrally, the back rounded; woods, rare. [F. pubescens var. deamii 

 Rehd.; V . pubescens var. indianense Rehd.; V . dentatum var. deamii 

 (Rehd.) Fern.] V. dentatum L. 



1. Leaves palmately veined, usually 3-lobed. 



7. Young twigs glabrous; petioles glabrous and with a pair of glands; mar- 

 ginal flowers of the cyme neutral, with enlarged flat corollas; fruit red; 

 moist woods, chiefly in the n. half of the state. May-June. American 



Cranberry-bush. [V . opulus var. americanuyn (Mill.) Ait.] 



V . trdobum Marsh. 



7. Young twigs pubescent; petioles pubescent, glandless; cyme with all the 

 flowers alike and perfect; fruit black; dry woods, chiefly in the n e. 

 counties. May-June. Maple-leaved Viburnum V. acerijolium L. 



3. Symphoricarpos Duham. — Snowberry 



1. Corolla 5-9 mm. long; fruit white or greenish white. 



2. Stamens and style included; twigs and leaves glabrous; petioles 2-4 mm. 

 long; corolla 5-7 mm. long; style 2 mm. long, glabrous; fruits white, 

 the larger ones 12-15 mm. in diameter; native of w. N. Am. and com- 

 monly planted for ornament, but scarcely established in 111. Garden 

 Snowberry. \_S. racemosus of auth., not Michx.; S. racemosus var. 

 laevigatus Fern.] S. rivularis Suksd. 



2. Stamens and style shortly exserted; twigs puberulent; leaves pubescent; 

 petioles 4-10 mm. long; corolla 6-9 mm. long; style 4-8 mm. long, 

 pilose or glabrous; fruits pale greenish white, 6-8 mm. in diameter; dry 

 soil, n. 111., rare, extending southw. to Kankakee and Hancock counties. 



June-July. Wolfberry S. occidentalis Hook. 



1. Corolla 3-4 mm. long; fruit red (rarely whitish), ellipsoid, glaucous, 5-7 

 mm. long; stamens and style included; style 2 mm. long; petioles 2-4 mm. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 146. Caprifoliaceae 239 



long; river banks and woodland pastures, common. July. Coralberry. 

 Buckbrush. [6". vulgaris Michx.] S. orbiculatus Moencb 



4. LiNNAEA L. — Twinflower 

 L. americana Forbes. Winnetka, Cook Co., Vasey. Possibly now extinct in 

 III. [L. borealis L. var. americatia (Forbes) Rehd.] 



5. LoNlCERA L. — Honeysuckle 



(Xp/o5(eo;7 Adans.) 



1. Erect shrubs; leaves opposite, not connate-perfoliate; berries red. 



2. Corolla pink or white; leaves ovate-lanceolate, glabrous; berries united at 

 base; often planted and sometimes escaped from cult.; native of Asia. 

 May-June. Tatarian Honeysuckle L. tatarica L. 



2. Corolla yellowish white; leaves elliptical, ciliate; berries not united; moist 



woods, rare, Cook and Lake counties. Apr. -June. American Fly Honey- 

 suckle. [L. ciliata Muhl.J L. canadensis Marsh. 



1. Plants twining or trailing. 



3. Flowers in terminal clusters; upper leaves connate-perfoliate. 

 4. Corolla 2-lipped, the upper lip 4-lobed, the lower entire. 



5. Corolla greenish yellow, the tube somewhat gibbous. 



6. Corolla-tube 6-10 mm. long; filaments hirsute at base; leaves green 

 above, glaucous beneath; rocky soil, local; known from Lake, 

 Cook, La Salle, and Sangamon counties. May-June. Glaucous 



Honeysuckle [L. glauca Hill} L. dioica L. 



6. Corolla-tube 10-14 mm. long; filaments nearly glabrous; leaves 

 glaucous on both sides; woods; the common honeysuckle in 111. 

 May-June. Sullivant's Honeysuckle [L. parviflora Lam.; L. 



sullivantii Gray} L. prolijera (Kirsch.) Rehd. 



5. Corolla bright yellow or orange, its slender tube not gibbous; rocky 



woods, occasional. Apr.-May. Yellow Honeysuckle 



L. flava Sims 



4. Corolla red, tubular, the short limb nearly equally 5-lobed; cult, and 



sometimes escaped. May-Oct. Trumpet Honeysuckle 



L. sempervirens L. 



3. Flowers in pairs from the upper axils, white or pink, turning yellow, 2.5- 

 4 cm. long, fragrant; leaves ovate or oval, not connate-perfoliate; young 

 branches villous; escaped from cult, and occasionally spontaneous; in- 



trod. from Asia. May-July. Japanese Honeysuckle 



L. japonica Thunb. 



6. DiERViLLA Mill. — Bush Honeysuckle 



D. lonicera Mill. Rocky woods in n. 111., extending southw. to Kankakee 

 and La Salle counties. May-June. 



7. Triosteum L. — Horse-gentian 



1. Principal leaves with broadly dilated connate-perfoliate bases; corolla pur- 

 plish or dull red, 12-15 mm. long; sepals finely and evenly pubescent; 




240 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



stem softly short-pubescent, the hairs 0.5 mm. long; woods and thickets. 



May-June _ T. perfoliatur72 L. 



1. Principal leaves narrowed to the sessile bases. 



2. Leaves ovate or oval; sepals finely and evenly pubescent; fruit 8-15 mm. 

 in diameter; corolla purplish-red. 

 3. Stem glandular-puberulent and hirsute; sandy soil in open woods, centr. 



and n. III. May-June T. aurantiacum Bickn. 



3. Stem rather sparsely hirsute with somewhat reflexed non-glandular 



hairs 1-2 mm. long; rich woods, local. May-June 



T. illinoense (Wieg.) Rydb. 



2. Leaves lanceolate or oblanceolate; stem hirsute, not glandular; sepals cili- 

 ate, otherwise glabrous; corolla greenish yellow; fruit 6-7 mm. in diam- 

 eter; alluvial soil, s. 111., not common. May T. angustifoliuttJ L. 



147. Valerianaceae Batsch — Valerian Family 



1. Perennial, strong-smelling, mostly tall herbs; some of the leaves pinnatifid; calyx- 

 lobes becoming pappus-like; fruit l-loculed 1. Valeriana 



I. Annual, dichotomously branched low herbs; leaves not pinnatifid; sepals minute or 

 lacking; fruit 3-loculed 2. Valerianella 



1. Valeriana L. — Valerian 



1. Corolla 1-2 cm. long; basal leaves cordate; stem-leaves thin, with 3-7 ovate, 

 toothed leaflets; root fibrous; woods and alluvial banks, chiefly in the s. 



part of the state, extending northw. to Vermilion Co. May-June 



V. paiiciflora Michx. 



1. Corolla 4-5 mm. long; basal leaves spatulate; stem-leaves pinnately parted 

 into 3-7 lanceolate or linear divisions; root fusiform; wet ground, in Lake, 

 McHenry, and Du Page counties. May-June. [V . edulis of auth., not 

 Nutt.] V. ctliata T. 8C G. 



2. Valerianella Mill. 



1. Corolla blue, 1.5-2 mm. long; bracts ciliate, obtuse; fruits 2-4 mm. long, 

 laterally coinpressed, obliquely rhomboidal, wider than long, the dorsal 

 side of the fertile cell with a thick corky mass; waste places and cult, 

 ground, occasional; introd. from Eur. Corn-salad. \_V. lociista (L.) 



Betcke] V. olitoria (L.) Poll. 



1. Corolla white or pinkish; bracts acute, usually not ciliate; fruit longer than 

 wide; native species. 

 2. Fertile carpel of the fruit narrower than the combined width of the diver- 

 gent sterile carpels; corolla 3-4 mm. long. 

 3. Fruit 3-3.5 mm. long, 3 mm. wide; sterile carpels divergent, the fruit 



becoming saucer-shaped. Ottawa, La Salle Co., Skeels 



V. patcllaria (Sulliv.) Wood 



3. Fruit 2 mm. long, 1.5-2 mm. wide; sterile carpels inflated, curved to- 

 gether at the ends, forming a deep cavity; moist ground, not com- 

 mon. May-June. Kankakee Co., Hill 



V . nmhilicata (Sulliv.) Wood 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 150. Campanulaceae 241 



2. Fertile carpel of the fruit equalling or exceeding the width of the sterile 

 carpels. 



4. Corolla 3-4 mm. long, the tube as long as the limb; blades of the 

 rosette-leaves oval, abruptly petioled; moist ground in the n. part of 

 the state, not common. May-June. Kankakee Co., Hill in 1873; La 

 Salle Co., Greenman, Lansing, & Dixon 134; Joliet, Hill in 1907 

 V. intermedia Dval 



4. Corolla 1.5-2 mm. long, the tube shorter than the limb; rosette-leaves 

 spatulate; moist ground, chiefly in the s. half of 111., local. May-June. 

 Johnson Co., Schneck; Jackson Co., Gleason in 1903; St. Clair Co., 

 Eggert; Madison Co., McDonald in 1904 V. radiata (L.) Dufr. 



148. DiPSACACEAE Lindl. — Teasel Family 

 1. DiPSACUS L. — Teasel 



D. iylvestris Huds. Roadsides, fields, pastures, and waste places, common; 

 nat. from Eur. July-Sept. 



149. CucuRBlTACEAE B. Juss. — Gourd Family 



1. Corolla large, yellow, 6-15 cm. long; stem trailing 1. Cucurbita 



1. Corolla greenish white, small, less than 6 cm. long. 



2. Stem and leaves glabrous; fruit an inflated usually 4-seeded pod dehiscing at the 



apex and burstmg irregularly 2. Echinocvsiis 



2. Stem and leaves more or less pubescent; fruits indehiscent, 1 -seeded, usually 3-10 

 together 3. Sicpos 



1. Cucurbita L. 



C. foetidissima HBK. Missouri Gourd. Dry ground, usually along rail- 

 roads; adv. from w. of the Mississippi R.; Chicago, Moffatt in 1896; Sanga- 

 mon Co. G. D. Fuller in 1941. [Pepo foetidissima (HBK.) Britt.} 



2. EcHiNocYSTis T. &: G. 



E. lobata (Michx.) T. dC G. Wild Balsam- apple. Alluvial soil, and waste 

 places, local. July-Sept. {^Micrampelis lobata (Michx.) Greene} 



3. SiCYOS L. 



S. angulatus L. Alluvial soil, and in fields, throughout 111., except the n.w. 

 counties. July-Sept. 



150. Campanulaceae Juss. — Bellflower Family 



1. Leaves petioled or tapering at the base; flowers in a terminal inflorescence 



I. Campanula 



I. Leaves sessile, clasping, cordate; flowers axillary, solitary, sessile 2. Specularia 



1. Campanula L. — Bellflower 



1. Flowers in spikes or racemes. 



2. Corolla rotate; style declined; capsule clavate, with apical pores; moist 

 woods, common throughout 111. June-Sept. [Campanulastrum ameri- 

 canum (L.) Small] C. americana L. 




242 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



2. Corolla campanulate; style straight; capsule globose, opening by basal 



pores; roadsides and waste places, escaped from cult.; introd. from Eur. 



June-Sept C. rapunculoides L. 



1. Flowers in loose panicles, or solitary; corolla campanulate. 



3. Corolla 5-12 mm. long; leaves all linear or narrowly lanceolate; plants 



of wet ground. 

 4. Leaves linear; corolla blue, 8-12 mm. long; marshy ground, wet mead- 

 ows, and lake shores, not common; n. 111.; Lake Co., Gleason & 



Shobe in 1906. July-Aug C. uliginosa Rydb. 



4. Leaves lanceolate; corolla white, 5-8 mm. long; wet meadows, local, 



chiefly in the n. half of the state. June-July C. aparinoides Pursh 



3. Corolla 12-20 mm. long; basal leaves ovate or cordate; plants of sandy 

 or rocky places; n. 111., not common. June-Aug. [C. rotundifolia of 

 auth., not L.} C. intercedens Witasek 



2. Specularia Fab. — Venus' Looking-glass 

 S. perfoliata (L.) A. DC. Dry sandy soil, common. May-June. 



151. LoBELIACEAE Dum. — Lobelia Family 



1. Lobelia L. — Lobelia 



1. Corolla red (rarely pink or white), 3-4 cm. long; wet ground, not uncom- 

 mon. July-Oct. Cardinal-flower L. cardmalis L. 



1. Corolla blue or whitish. 

 2. Corolla 1-2.5 cm. long. 



3. Corolla 2-2.5 cm. long; anthers glabrous at the tip; wet ground through- 

 out 111. Aug.-Oct L. siphilitica L. 



3. Corolla 1-1.5 cm. long; anthers pubescent at the tip; wet ground, s. 111. 



Aug.-Oct L. puberula Mich.x. 



2. Corolla 6-10 mm. long. 



4. Leaves linear; wet meadows, local. July-Sept L. k<ilmii L. 



4. Leaves oblanceolate to ovate. 



5. Stem densely long-pubescent; capsule wholly inferior, inflated; open 



woods, locally throughout III. June-Oct L. inflata L. 



5. Stem glabrous or nearly so 



6. Sepals distinctly auricled at the base; dry soil, locally throughout 



111. June-Aug L. leptostachys A. DC. 



6. Sepals not auricled; dry sandy soil, common. July-Aug 



L. spicata Lam. 



152. CoMPOSiTAE Adans. — Composite Family 

 {CarJuaccac Ncclc; Cichoriaccac Reichenb.; Amhrosiaceae Reichenb.) 



1. Heads composed of ray- and disk-flowers, or of disk-flowers only; juice not 

 milky (e.xcept in Ccica'tcr) Series I. Tuhuliflorac, p. 243 



1. Heads composed wholly of perfect flowers with ligulate corollas; herbs usual- 

 ly with milky juice; leaves alternate or sometimes all basal 



Series II. Ligidiflorae, p. 246 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 152. Compositae 243 



Series I. Tubuliflorae DC. 



1 . Pappus of capillary bustles. 



2. Heads radiate (i.e., the outer flowers of the head with strap-shaped corollas). 



3. Rays yellow (whitish in one species of Solidago). 



4. Bracts in one series, about equal in length (a few short basal ones sometimes 

 present) ; pappus single. 



5. Leaves opposite, dissected into linear lobes; bracts bearing 3-7 conspicuous 



glands; pappus of 8-15 scales, each dissected into 5-10 bristles 



38. Dvssodia 



5. Leaves alternate and basal; bracts glandless; pappus of numerous capillary 



bristles 47. Senecio 



4. Bracts in several series, very unequal, overlapping. 



6. Heads numerous, small; pappus single 12. Solidago 



6. Heads few, large, solitary, or corymbose. 



7. Leaves serrate, large; pappus single; stem 1-2 m. tall, usually simple 



19. Inula 



7. Leaves entire or nearly so; pappus double; stem 30-60 cm. tall, branched 



I 1 . Chnsopsis 



3. Rays not yellow. 



8. Bracts in 3-5 series; rays broad, few 14. Asler 



8. Bracts usually in 1 or 2 series; rays usually narrow and numerous 



15. Ertgeron 



2. Heads rayless (or apparently so), the flowers usually all tubular. 

 9. Flowers white or whitish, or cream-color. 

 10. Leaves pnckly. 



1 1 . Heads 1 -flowered, in capitate clusters 49. Echinops 



1 I. Heads many-flowered, distinct 50. Cirsium 



10. Leaves not prickly. 

 12. Bracts scarious. 



13. Leaves mostly basal, spatulate or obovate, the stem-leaves small; plants 

 perennial, sloloniferous, dioecious or polygamous 17. Anlenriaria 



13. Leaves all or mostly cauline; plants annual or biennial, not stolon- 



iferous or dioecious; all the flowers fertile, the central ones perfect, 



surrounded by pistillate ones 18. CnaphaliuTn 



12. Bracts not scarious. 



14. Bracts with tips hooke*! ; coarse biennial weeds with large ovale 



leaves; heads globose 48. Arctium 



14. Bracts not hooked. 



15. Principal bracts in only one series (often with a few small bractlels 

 at the base of the head). 

 16. Pappus scabrous; flowers all perfect; plants perennial, with 

 milky sap 45. Cacalia 



16. Pappus smooth; marginal flowers pistillate, the disk-flowers 



perfect; plants annual, with watery sap and strong odor 



46. Erechtiles 



15. Bracts in more than one series. 



17. Leaves all or mostly opposite or whorled (or some of the upper 



ones alternate) 6, Eupaiorium 



17. Leaves alternate. 



18. Bracts striate, imbricated in 3 or more equal series; pappus 

 plumose; achenes striate, nearly terete; leaves minutely 



resinous-dotted 8. Kuhnia 



18. Bracts not striate, in 1-3 series; achenes flattened; pappus 

 merely scabrous; leaves not resinous-dotted. 

 19. Heads racemose; outer bracts foliaceous; pappus copi- 



ious, of soft bristles; achenes terete 



species of 14. Aster 




244 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



19. Heads paniculate; bracts all narrow, not foliaceous; 



pappus-bristles short, brittle; achenes compressed 



species of 15. Erigeron 



9. Flowers pink, purple, blue, or yellow (rarely white). 



20. Stems twining; leaves opposite, triangular-hastate; flowers pink 7. Mil^ama 



20. Stems not twining. 



21. Leaves opposite or whorled, not prickly; flowers purple, blue, or white.... 



6. Eupalorium 



21. Leaves alternate or basal. 

 22. Leaves prickly. 



23. Heads 1 -flowered, in capitate clusters 49. Echinops 



23. Heads many-flowered, distinct. 



24. Pappus bristles plumose 50. Cirsium 



24. Pappus bristles not plumose 51. Carduus 



22. Leaves not prickly. 



25. Bracts of the involucre pectinate, or tipped with a rigid spine 



51 . Centaiirea 



25. Bracts neither pectinate nor with a rigid spine. 



26. Bracts with hooked tips; coarse biennial weeds with large ovate 

 chiefly basal leaves; heads globose; flowers purple (rarely 



white) ; receptacle bristly 48. Arclium 



26. Bracts not hooked; receptacle not bristly. 



27. Flowers yellow; bracts in 1 series 47. Senecio 



27. Flowers not yellow; bracts imbricated in 2-several series. 

 28. Pappus bristles plumose or barbellate; heads in long 



racemes or spikes; leaves narrow, entire, rigid 



9. Lialris 



28. Pappus bristles not plumose. 



29. Pappus (in our species) double, the outer bristles 

 short; heads many-flowered, in corymbose cymes; 



bracts imbricated in several series 4. Vernonia 



29. Pappus bristles approximately the same length, not in 

 two series. 

 30. Heads 2-5-nowered, aggregated into dense clus- 

 ters subtended by foliaceous bracts; flowers all 



perfect and alike; bracts 8 5. Elephanlopus 



30. Heads many-flowered, corymbose; flowers of 2 

 kinds in the same head; bracts imbricated; 

 plants camphor-scented 16. Pluchea 



1. Pappus not of capillary bristles, either of rigid awns, small chaffy scales, or reduced 

 to a mere crown, or entirely lacking. 

 3L Heads radiate. 



32. Rays yellow. 



33. Pappus of 2-6 awns or bristles. 



34. Leaves all or mostly opposite or whorled; bracts not hooked. 



35. Terrestrial or marsh plants with one kind of leaves; achenes flat or 



angled 33. Bidens 



35. Partly submerged aquatics with the submerged leaves finely dis- 

 sected; achenes terete 34. McgaloJonta 



34. Leaves alternate; bracts often gummy, with recurved or hooked ti[)s.-.. 



10. CrinJelia 



33. Pappus none, or of few short teeth or scales. 

 36. Leaves all or mostly opposite or whorled. 



37. Achenes thick, not at all, or scarcely flattened. 



38. Leaves thin, deeply angulate-lobed or lyrate-pinnatifid ; rays 



small or none 20. Polymnia 



38. Leaves thick, entire or serrate; rays conspicuous. 



39. Bracts obtuse; ray-flowers pistillate, fertile, papery and per- 

 sistent on the achene 23. Heliopsis 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 152. Compositae 245 



39. Bracts acute or acuminate; ray-flowers neutral, deciduous.... 



.29. Helianlbus 



37. Achenes flattened. 



40. Rays numerous; bracts thick, in several rows; coarse herbs with 



resinous sap; disk flowers perfect but sterile 21. Silphium 



40. Rays mostly 8; bracts in two series; disk flowers fertile 



32. Coreopsis 



36. Leaves alternate or basal. 



41. Leaves or some of them deeply lobed or divided; stem not winged. 

 42. Receptacle conical to columnar. 



43. Achenes flattened, broad-margined or winged 27. Ralibida 



43. Achenes 4-sided, not at all margined or winged 



25. Rudhec}(ia 



42. Receptacle flat or convex ; achenes flattened, 2-winged, notched 



at the apex 2l. Silphium 



41. Leaves serrate or entire. 



44. Stems scapose; leaves all basal, spatulate, entire 36. Aclinea 



44. Stems leafy. 



45. Stems more or less winged by the decurrent bases of the 

 leaves (except Helenium tenuifolium). 

 46. Rays 3-lobed, 10-18; pappus of 5-8 acuminate or aristate 



scales 37. Helenium 



46. Rays entire or emarginate; pappus of 1-3 subulate awns. 



47. Heads several to many, corymbose; rays 2-8 



30. Actinomeris 



47. Heads solitary or few; rays 8-15 31. Verbesina 



45. Stems not winged. 



48. Receptacle conical; pappus a mere crown, or none; disk 



flowers purple 25. Rudbeclfia 



48. Receptacle flat or convex; pappus of 2 deciduous, trans- 

 lucent scales or awns; disk flowers yellow or brownish 

 29. Helianihus 



32. Rays not yellow. 



49. Leaves opposite; ray-flowers small, white. 



50. Leaves angulate-lobed, thin, dilated at the base; plants glandular- 

 pubescent; corolla-tube of the ray-flowers pubescent 20. Pol^mnia 



50. Leaves serrate. 



51. Leaves ovate, petioled 28. Calinsoga 



51. Leaves lanceolate, sessile 24. Eclipta 



49. Leaves alternate. 



52. Leaves dissected or incised; bracts scarious. 



53. Rays 4-6, short; heads numerous 39. Achillea 



53. Rays 10-30; heads fewer. 



54. Leaves cut into filiform divisions; receptacle chaffy 



40. Anihemis 



54. Leaves incised or coarsely and irregularly toothed 



42. Chrysanthemum 



52. Leaves entire to serrate or dentate. 



55. Receptacle conical or columnar; rays purple, reflexed 



26. Echinacea 



55. Receptacle fiat or convex; rays spreading, white or pink. 



56. Leaves entire, lanceolate; rays many, lilac or white... 13. 5o//onia 

 56. Leaves ovate, dentate; rays 5, white, short 22. Parthenium 



31. Heads rayless. 



57. Flowers green or greenish. 



58. Staminate and pistillate flowers in the same head, or flowers all perfect. 

 59. Heads few or solitary; receptacle conical; bracts short, oval, obtuse, 

 scarious; leaves finely dissected, with pineapple odor when crushed.... 

 41. Matricaria 




246 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



59. Heads numerous, in spikes, racemes, or panicles. 



60. Heads in long terminal bracted spikes; receptacle bristly or chaffy; 



leaves opposite, or the upper alternate, entire or serrate 1. /va 



60. Heads in panicles or racemes; receptacle smooth; leaves alternate, 



mostly lobed or incised; plants bitter aromatic 44. Artemisia 



58. Staminate and pistillate flowers in separate dissimilar heads; involucre of 

 the pistillate heads woody or spiny. 

 61. Pistillate heads 1 -flowered; fruit an achene with 4-8 tubercles or straight 



teeth 2. Ambrosia 



61. Pistillate heads forming an ovoid bur covered with more or less hooked 

 prickles 3. Xanthnim 



57. Flowers yellow (or yellowish) or white. 



62. Flowers and bracts bright white; bracts petal-like, scarious-margined ; leaves 



alternate; stem woolly-pubescent; heads corymbose 35. H'^menopappus 



62. Flowers yellow or yellowish; bracts green. 



63. Heads numerous, in flat-topped corymbs; leaves alternate, pinnately 



dissected; plants bitter-aromatic 43. Tanaceiiim 



63. Heads few; leaves opposite. 



64. Pappus none; achenes thick, not flattened; disk-flowers perfect but 



sterile; plants glandular-pubescent 20. Polvmuia 



64. Pappus of 2-4 awns or teeth; achenes flattened; disk-flowers fertile; 

 plants not glandular 33. Bidens 



Series II. Liguliflorae DC. 



65. Pappus none; low glaucescent branching annual herbs with alternate clasping entire 



or lobed leaves, and few small long-peduncled heads of yellow flowers 



53. Serinia 



65. Pappus present. 



66. Pappus composed of scales, or of scales and bristles. 



67. Flowers yellow; pappus double, the outer of short thin scales, the inner of 

 bristles 55. Krigia 



67. Flowers blue (sometimes white or pink) ; pappus a short crown of numerous 



small chaffy scales 56. Cichorium 



66. Pappus consisting wholly of capillary bristles. 



68. Pappus plumose; leaves entire, grass-like; flowers yellow or purple 



54. Tragopogon 



68. Pappus not plumose. 



69. Heads usually several on each stem; leaves not all basal. 



70. Achenes more or less flattened; leaves usually lobed and often some- 

 what soft-prickly. 



71. Achenes narrowed at the apex, or beaked; flowers blue or yellow 

 57. Lactuca 



71. Achenes truncate, not teaked ; flowers yellow 58. Sonchus 



70. Achenes cylindric or prismatic. 



72. Flowers whitish or purjilish; heads jjendenl 59. Prcnanthcs 



72. Flowers yellow; heads erect. 



73. Achenes beakless 60. Hicracium 



73. Achenes t'lliform-beaked 62. Pyrrhopappiis 



69. Heads solitary; leaves all basal; flowers yellow. 



74. Achenes not muricate, 10-nerved; leaves (in our species) entire 



61. Agoseris 



74. Achenes muricate near the apex, 4-5-nerved; leaves lobed 



63. Taraxacum 




Jones: hLORA of Illinois, 152. Compositae 247 



Tribe 1. Ambrosieae 

 1. IvA L. — Marsh-elder 



1. Heads in bracted spikes; stem hispid; fields and roadsides. Aug.-Oct 



/. altata Willd. 



1. Heads spicate-paniculate; stem puberulent; roadsides and fields. July-Seot. 



Horseweed. [Cyclachaena xanthifolia (Nutt.) Fresen.} 



I. xanthifolia Nutt. 



2. Ambrosia L. — Ragweed 

 1. Leaves pinnatifid or bipinnatifid. 



2. Leaves petioled, bipinnatifid; fruit with 5-7 sharp tubercles; plants annual; 

 fields and waste places, common. Aug.-Oct. Common Ragweed [A. 

 artemisiifolia L.} A. elatior L. 



2. Leaves sessile, pinnatifid; fruit with unarmed or with blunt tubercles; 



plants perennial with a slender rhizome; roadsides and waste places, 

 adv. from w. U.S. Western Ragweed. July-Oct. [A. psilostachya sensu 



Gray, non DC.} A. coronopifolia T. dC G. 



L Leaves 3-5-lobed or undivided; plants annual. 



3. Leaves opposite, 3-5-Iobed, or entire; stem stout, 1-4 m. tall; staminate 



heads peduncled; fruit with 5-7 sharp tubercles; fields and waste places, 



common. July-Oct. Giant Ragweed A. trifida L. 



3. Leaves chiefly alternate, lanceolate, hastately toothed at base; stem 30-90 

 cm. tall, rough-hirsute; staminate heads sessile, the upper lobe of the 

 involucre elongate, hispid; fruit with 4 teeth at the top; fields and waste 

 places, chiefly in the s. half of 111., extending northw. to Menard Co. 

 A. bidentata Michx. 



3. Xanthium L. — Cocklebur 



1 . Leaves lanceolate, acute at each end, white-canescent beneath, each with a 

 3-parted spine at the base; waste ground, introd. from trop. Am. Aug.- 

 Oct. Spiny Cocklebur X. spinosum L. 



1. Leaves cordate or ovate, the axils without spines. 



2. Body of the fruit and its prickles glandular and more or less hispidulous; 

 waste places, cult, ground, and river banks. Aug.-Oct. [X. italicum of 



auth., not Mor.; X. saccharatum sensu Widder, ex p.} 



X. commune Britt. 



2. Body of fruit and its prickles merely glandular to glandular-puberulent, 

 or nearly glabrous; waste places, fields, and along rivers. Aug.-Oct. [X. 

 canadense of auth., not Mill.; X. pungens Wallr.; X. glabratum Britt.; 

 X. americanum of auth., (?) not Walt.} X. pennsylvaniaim Wallr. 



Tribe 2. Vernonieae 



4. Vernonia Schreb. — Ironweed 



1 . Leaves glabrous beneath or merely puberulent. 



2. Leaves glabrous, linear-lanceolate, punctate beneath; inflorescence dense, 



fastigiate; moist ground, locally throughout 111. July-Aug 



V. fasciculata Michx. 




248 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



2. Leaves elliptic-lanceolate, puberulent beneath; inflorescence loose, the 



branches spreading; woods, fields, and roadsides throughout 111. July- 



Oct V. altissima Nutt. 



1 . Leaves pubescent beneath. 



3. Bracts appressed, acute or obtuse; roadsides, pastures, and open woods, 



common. July-Sept. [V. illinoensis Gleason} V. missurica Raf. 



3. Bracts with acuminate, squarrose tips; open woods, local; chiefly in the s. 

 half of the state. July-Sept V. baUwini Torr. 



5. Elephantopus L. — Elephant's-foot 



E. carolinianiis Willd. Sandy soil in woods, and along roads, s. 111., extend- 

 ing northw. to Wabash and St. Clair counties. Aug. -Sept. 



Tribe 3. Eupatorieae 

 6. Eupatorium L. 

 L Leaves whorled. 



2. Stem green; leaves thin, sparsely puberulent on the veins beneath, not 

 rugose; inflorescence convex; heads mostly 5-7-flowered, the corollas 

 pinkish; woods throughout 111. July-Aug. Joe-pye Weed. [E. trijoliafum 

 L.; E. falcatum Michx.} E. purpureum L. 



2. Stem purplish or speckled with purplish; leaves thickish, rugose, rather 



copiously short-pubescent beneath; inflorescence flattish-topped; heads 

 mostly 9-15-flowered, the corollas rose purple; moist ground, more fre- 

 quent in the n. half of the state. July-Sept. [E. purpureum sensu auth., 



non L.] E. maculatum L. 



1 . Leaves opposite, or the upper alternate. 



3. Flowers white (rarely purplish); receptacle flat. 



4. Leaves connate-perfoliate, lanceolate, attenuate, crenate-serrate, rugose- 

 reticulate, pubescent beneath; wet ground, common. Aug. -Oct. Bone- 

 set E. perjoliatum L. 



4. Leaves not connate-perfoliate. 



5. Stem pubescent; leaves lanceolate, 3-nerved, grayish-puberulent. 



6. Leaves conspicuously petioled, sharply serrate; heads 4-6 mm. high, 

 7-15-flowered; moist ground, common. Aug. -Oct. Late Boneset 

 E. serotinum Michx. 



6. Leaves sessile or nearly so, sparingly toothed above the middle, or 



entire; heads 6-8 mm. high, about 5-flowered; woods near 



streams, and along roads. Aug. -Oct. Tall Thoroughwort 



E. altisshnum L. 



5. Stem glabrous or nearly so; leaves all opposite. 



7. Leaves sessile, lanceolate, pinnately veined, serrate; heads about 5- 



flowered; woods, local. Aug. -Oct. Upland Boneset 



E. sessilifolium L. 



7. Leaves petioled, ovate, triple-nerved, coarsely dentate; heads 10-30- 

 flowered; woods, common. July-Sept. White Snakeroot. [E. 



ageratoides L.f.; E. urticaefolium Reich.} E. rugosutn Houtt. 



3. Flowers bluish; receptacle conical; leaves ovate, petiolate, crenate-dentate. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 152. Compositae 249 



more or less puberulent; moist ground in the s. half of the state, extend- 

 ing northw. to Adams and Champaign counties. July-Oct. Mist Flower 

 E. coelestinum L. 



7. MiKANIA Willd. 



M. scandens (L.) Willd. In alluvial soil, occasional. Aug. -Sept. 



8. KuHNiA L. — False Boneset 



K. eupatorioides L. Prairie soil, often along roads, common. Aug. -Oct. 

 \K. suaveolens Fresen.} 



9. LiATRis Schreb. — Blazing-star 

 (Lacinaria Hill) 



1. Pappus evidently plumose; heads few, racemose, cylindrical, 15-60- flowered, 

 1.5-2 cm. high. 

 2. Stems and leaves glabrous or nearly so; bracts glabrous on the back, thin, 

 appressed, the inner ones mucronate; roadsides, prairie soil, or on hill- 

 sides, throughout 111. except the s. counties. Aug.-Sept 



L. cylindracea Michx. 



2. Stems and leaves pubescent; bracts pubescent, lanceolate, acuminate, firm, 



rigid, more or less squarrose; dry soil, s. III., extending northw. to St. 



Clair and Wabash counties [L. hirsuta Rydb.} 



L. squarrosa (L.) Willd. 



1. Pappus barbellate or scabrous; heads numerous in elongate spikes. 



3. Heads ellipsoid, 3-15-flowered. 



4. Rachis of spike crisp-pubescent; bracts ciliate, acute, the tips spreading; 



prairies, rare. July-Aug. [L. pycnostachya of auth., not Michx.] 



L. bebbiana Rydb. 



4. Rachis of spike glabrous; bracts obtusish, appressed; prairies and inter- 



dunal flats, chiefly in the n. part of 111. July-Sept 



L. spicata (L.) Willd. 



3. Heads hemispherical or campanulate, 15-45-flowered; bracts oval or sub- 

 orbicular, erose; rachis of inflorescence pubescent; roadsides, prairies, 

 and open woods. Sept. -Oct. White-flowered plants occur. [L. scariosa 

 of auth., not L.} L. aspera Michx. 



Tribe 4. Astereae 

 10. Grindelia Willd. — Gumweed 



G. squarrosa (Pursh) Dunal. Waste ground, fields, and roadsides, occa- 

 sional; adv. from w. U.S.; known in 111. from Cook, La Salle, Henry, and 

 Fayette counties. July-Aug. 



11. Chrysopsis Nutt. — Golden-aster 

 C. yillosa (Pursh) Nutt. Sandy soil, locally in the w. half of the state 

 from Lee Co. to St. Clair Co. June-Sept. 



12. Solidago L. — Goldenrod 



(Euihamia Nutt.; Oligoneuron Small) 

 1. Heads distinctly pedicellate; ray-flowers usually fewer than the disk-flowers; 

 receptacle pitted; leaves not punctate. 




250 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



2. Heads in panicles, racemes, or axillary clusters; bracts of the involucre 

 not longitudinally striate. 



3. Heads in small axillary clusters or short racemes. 

 4. Stem pubescent; achenes glabrous at maturity. 



5. Rays cream color or nearly white; involucres 3-5 mm. high; wooded 



slopes and ridges, local. Aug.-Oct. White Goldenrod 



S. bicolor L. 



5. Rays orange-yellow; involucres 5-6 mm. high; wooded slopes and 



ridges, rare. La Salle Co S. hispida Muhl. 



4. Stem glabrous; achenes puberulent; leaves sharply serrate. 



6. Stem more or less glaucous, terete; leaves sessile, lanceolate; woods, 



throughout 111., except the w. and n.w. counties. Aug.-Oct. 



Wreath Goldenrod S. caesia L. 



6. Stem angled, not glaucous; leaves ovate, the petioles winged; 

 woods, throughout 111. Aug.-Oct. [S. flexicaulis L.] Broad- 

 leaved Goldenrod S. latijolia L. 



3. Heads mostly in terminal panicles or racemes. 



7. Branches of the panicle spreading or recurved, the heads distinctly 

 secund. 



8. Stem glabrous or nearly so (rarely sparsely villosulous) . 

 9. Branches of the inflorescence pubescent. 

 10. Stem terete. 



11. Leaves pinnately veined, oval or elliptical, thin, serrate, 

 sparsely hirsute along the veins beneath, the lower with 

 margined petioles; racemes few, divergent, slender; rays 

 1-6; wooded slopes and ridges, common. Aug.-Oct. 

 Elm-leaved Goldenrod S. ulwifolia Muhl. 



11. Leaves (at least the median and lower) more or less 

 distinctly 3-ribbed, lanceolate, sessile, sharply serrate, 

 glabrous on both sides or sparingly hirsute or hirtellous 

 on the veins beneath, the margins scabrous; inflores- 

 cence a dense pyramidal panicle; rays 7-15; moist 

 ground, common. Aug.-Oct. [S. gigantea Ait.; ^V. gi- 



gantea var. leiophylla Fern.} Late Goldenrod 



_ S. serotina Ait. 



10. Stem sharply angled; leaves oval or lanceolate, thick, gla- 



brous beneath, strongly scabrous above, serrate or entire, 

 acute; heads 15-20-flowered, the involucres 3-4.5 mm. 

 high; bracts obtuse; wet ground. Aug.-Oct. Spreading 



Goldenrod S. patula Muhl. 



9. Branches of the inflorescence glabrous or merely hirtellous. 



11. Panicles usually longer than broad, the branches erect or 



ascending; heads 4-6 mm. high; rays 2-8; bogs and 

 swamps, local; known from Cook, Kane, La Salle. Peoria, 

 and Woodford counties. Aug.-Sept. \S. tieglecta T. & G.; 



S. uliginosa of auth., not Nutt.} Swamp Goldenrod 



S. uniligulata (DC) Porter 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 152. Compositae 251 



11. Panicles usually as broad as long, pyramidal, the branches 



becoming elongated and recurved; rays 8-13. 



12. Heads about 5 mm. high; plants strongly stoloniferous; 



prairie soil, local; July-Sept. [5'. moritura Steele; S. 



missouriensis of auth., not Nutt.] Prairie Goldenrod 



S. glaberrima Martens 



12. Heads about 3 mm. high; plants not strongly stolonifer- 

 ous; roadsides, fields, and open woods. June-Aug. 



Early Goldenrod S. juncea Ait. 



8. Stem hirsute or puberulent (or glabrous toward the base); 

 branches of the inflorescence pubescent. 

 13. Leaves with 1 principal vein (i.e., not plainly 3-ribbed, the lateral 

 veins, if present, weak). 

 14. Stem more or less hirsute, or the lower part almost gla- 

 brous; leaves lanceolate or elliptic-lanceolate, sharply 

 serrate, sessile or nearly so, more or less rugulose, scaber- 

 ulous above, short-hirsute on the veins beneath; moist 

 ground, rare. Aug.-Oct. \_S. altissima of auth., not L.} 

 Rough-leaved Goldenrod S. rugosa Mill. 



14. Stem grayish puberulent; leaves oblanceolate, crenate- 



dentate or entire, puberulent on both sides, the lower 

 long-petioled; fields, roadsides, sand dunes, and open 

 woods, common. Aug.-Oct. [S. longipetiolata Mack. 



& Bush] Field Goldenrod S. nemoralis Ait. 



13. Leaves (at least the median and lower) more or less plainly 



3-ribbed, two of the lateral veins becoming prominent (often 



only slightly so in the upper leaves.) 



15. Leaves broadly oval or ovate, sharply serrate, puberulent; 



blufTs, cliffs, or rocky woods, s.w. III.; known from Cal- 

 houn, Jersey, and Jackson counties. Sept.-Oct. Drum- 



mond's Goldenrod S. drummondii T. & G. 



15. Leaves lanceolate or oblanceolate. 



16. Leaves oblanceolate or elliptical, dentate-crenate, the 

 upper smaller, entire; outer bracts oval, obtusish, 

 firm; rays 3-7, short; stem 30-100 cm. tall; bluffs and 



dry soil, local. Aug.-Oct. Rough Goldenrod 



S. radula Nutt. 



16. Leaves lanceolate, acuminate or acute, sharply serrate or 

 entire; bracts linear-lanceolate, thin; rays 9-15; in- 

 volucre 2.5-4 mm. high; stem 1-3 m. tall; moist rich 

 soil, chiefly along roads, and in thickets and woods, 

 common. Aug.-Oct. \^S. gilvocanescens sensu auth.; S. 



canadensis sensu auth., non L.] Tall Goldenrod 



S. altissima L. 



7. Branches of the panicle ascending or erect; heads not secund; achenes 

 glabrous; sandy or gravelly soil, or in dry open woods. Aug.-Oct. 



[5'. rigidiuscula (T. & G.) Porter.} Showy Goldenrod 



S. speciosa Nutt. 




252 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



2. Heads in dense terminal compound corymbiform cymes (Oltgoneuron 

 Small). 

 17. Leaves oval or elliptical, scabrous on both sides, crenate; stem pubes- 

 cent or puberulent throughout; prairie soil, mostly along roads, 

 throughout 111., except the s. counties. Aug. -Sept. Rigid Goldenrod 



S. rigida L. 



17. Leaves lanceolate or linear, glabrous; stem glabrous, or puberulent 

 above. 

 18. Inflorescence pubescent or puberulent; stem leaves entire, recurved, 

 somewhat conduplicate, sheathing at the base; moist ground. 



Aug.-Sept. Riddell Goldenrod S. riddellii Frank 



18. Inflorescence, as well as the rest of the plant, glabrous; leaves flat; 



moist ground. Aug.-Sept. Ohio Goldenrod 



- S. ohioensis Riddell 



1. Heads sessile or subsessile, in flat-topped corymbs; ray- flowers more numer- 

 ous than the disk-flowers; receptacle fimbriolate; leaves punctate (Eu- 

 thamia Nutt.). 

 19. Stem, leaves, and peduncles hirtellous; leaves distinctly 3-5-veined; moist 



ground. Aug. -Oct. [S. graminijolia var. nuttallii (Greene) Fern.] 



S. hirtella (Greene) Bush 



19. Stem glabrous; leaves glabrous, 1 -veined or obscurely 3-veined, the mar- 

 gins scaberulous. 



20. Heads sessile, 3-7 in each glomerule; moist soil. Aug. -Oct 



S. media (Greene) Bush 



20. Heads nearly all shortly pedicellate, usually solitary; prairie soil, n. 

 III., not common. Aug.-Sept S. remota (Greene) Friesner 



13. BoLTONiA L'Her. 



1. Leaves lanceolate to oblanceolate, 0.5-2 cm. wide, the upper smaller; disk 

 5-8 mm. broad; alluvial soil, river banks, or wet ground in woods, locally 

 throughout 111. Aug. -Oct B. asteroides (L.) L'Her. 



1. Leaves linear, 1-5 mm. wide, those of the branchlets subulate; disk 3-5 mm. 

 broad; dry soil, s. 111., rare; St. Clair Co., Breiidel; Jackson, Marion, and 

 Washington counties, Vasey B. diffusa Ell. 



14. Aster L. — Aster 



1. Lower leaves cordate or subcordate, long-petioled, serrate. 



2. Upper leaves cordate-clasping; stem pubescent, divaricately branched 

 above; heads numerous; involucres 5 mm. high; bracts pubescent, green- 

 tipped; rays 8-15, pale blue or violet, 6-10 mm. long; dry soil, open 



woods and thickets, rare. Sept. -Oct A. undidatus L. 



2. Leaves not clasping. 



3. Involucral bracts and peduncles glancular-pubcrulent; rays 12-16, pale 

 purple, 10-14 mm. long; bracts green-tipped; open woods, in the n. 



half of 111. Aug.-Sept. Large-leaved Aster A. macrophyllns L. 



3. Involucres and peduncles not glandular. 



4. Bracts of the involucre puberulent or pubescent. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 152. Compositae 253 



5. Rays white, 7-15, narrow, 1 cm. or more in length; heads few, 

 large, 1-1.5 cm. high; bracts obtuse, appressed, puberulent, ciH- 

 ate; leaves sharply serrate, scabrous on both sides; wooded bluffs, 

 rare. Starved Rock, Thone. Aug.-Oct A. furcatus Burgess 



5. Rays usually purple; leaves entire or slightly dentate. 



6. Bracts short-hirsute, recurved, lanceolate, acuminate; rays 30-45; 

 bluffs and rocky woods, Peoria and Woodford counties and 



southw. to the Mississippi R. Sept. -Oct 



A. anomalus Engelm. 



6. Bracts erect; rays 10-15; leaves often glabrous or nearly so above, 

 finely and sparingly pubescent beneath; banks and dry open 

 woods, local. Aug.-Oct A. shortii Lindl. 



4. Bracts glabrous or nearly so; rays 8-15, usually blue, 6-8 mm. long. 

 7. Leaves firm, all entire or nearly so; involucres 6-7 mm. high, tur- 

 binate, the bracts linear- spatulate, imbricate in several series, 

 with green, abruptly acute tips; sandy soil, and in open woods, 

 local. Sept.-Oct A. azureus Lindl. 



7. Leaves thin, nearly all sharply serrate. 



8. Involucres 4-6 mm. high, the bracts obtuse or obtusish, ap- 

 pressed; stem glabrous or nearly so; dry woods, not infrequent 

 throughout 111. Aug.-Oct A. cordif alius L. 



8. Involucres 6-10 mm. high, the bracts acute or acuminate. 



9. Stem densely and finely pubescent; tips of the bracts ap- 

 pressed; dry open woods, local; apparently absent from the 



s. counties. Sept.-Oct. \_A. hirtellus Lindl.] 



A. drummondii Lindl. 



9. Stem glabrous or nearly so; tips of the bracts spreading; dry 



woods, common and variable. Aug.-Oct 



A. sagittifolius Wedem. 



1 . Lower leaves neither cordate at the base nor long-petioled. 



10. Stem-leaves clasping or auricled at the base. 

 11. Stem pubescent throughout. 

 12. Leaves essentially entire. 



13. Heads large; leaves strongly clasping. 



14. Stem hirsute; involucre 8-10 mm. high, the bracts loose, 

 spreading; roadsides and moist ground, common. Aug.- 

 Oct. New England Aster A. novae-angliae L. 



14. Stem hispidulous; involucres 6-7 mm. high, the bracts 

 appressed, pubescent on the back; open woods, local; 



chiefly in the s. part of the state. Aug.-Oct 



A. patens Ait. 



13. Heads small; involucre 6 mm. high; stem hirsute; wooded 



bluffs, local. Aug. -Sept A. oblongijolius Nutt. 



12. Leaves, at least the lower, sharply toothed; bracts glabrous; in- 

 volucre 8-10 mm. high; moist ground; local. Aug.-Oct 



A. puniceus L. 




254 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



1 1 . Stem glabrous, or the upper part pubescent in lines. 

 15. Stem-leaves toothed; rays purple (rarely white). 



16. Leaves oblanceolate, acuminate, sharply serrate, abruptly con- 

 tracted into winged entire auriculate-clasping petioles; 

 moist ground, often along streams or ditches, Fulton, 



Peoria, and Henry counties. Sept. -Oct 



_../4. prenanthoides Muhl. 



16. Leaves lanceolate, toothed, sessile, those of the branches 

 smaller and entire; moist ground, n.e. 111., extending s.w. to 



Menard Co. Aug. -Oct A. lucidulus (Gray) Wieg. 



15. Leaves entire or nearly so, lanceolate or oblanceolate, glabrous 

 and glaucous, the margins scabrous; sandy soil in woods, usual- 

 ly near streams. Aug. -Oct. Smooth Aster A. laevis L. 



10. Leaves not clasping. 



17. Rays present, conspicuous; plants perennial. 



18. Leaves densely appressed silvery-silky on both sides; rays violet; 



sandy soil, often in open woods, local. Sept.-Oct 



_ A. sericeiis Vent. 



18. Leaves not silvery-silky. 



19. Heads not in flat-topped corymbs. 



20. Involucre conspicuously turbinate, 10-12 mm. high, the 

 bracts linear-spatulate, obtuse, appressed, rounded on 

 the back, imbricated in 5 or 6 series, their tips green 

 only at the apex; rays violet-blue; prairie soil, local; 

 chiefly in the s. part of the state, but extending northw. 



to Christian and Fulton counties. Sept.-Oct 



A. turbiriellus Lindl. 



20. Involucre hemispherical to campanulate; bracts not round- 

 ed on the back. 

 21. Involucres 3-7 mm. high. 



22. Bracts (at least the outer) bristly-ciliate, the tips 

 recurved; heads small, densely clustered. 

 23. Rays white. 



24. Stem with spreading or slightly reflexed 

 hairs; bracts (at least the outer) hispidu- 

 lous on the back; dry ground, prairie soil, 

 often along roads, common. Sept.-Oct. 

 [/I. multiflorus of auth., ex p. not Ait. 

 A. ericoides var. prostrates (Ktze) 



Blake] A. exiguus (Fern.) Rydb. 



24. Stem with appressed or ascending short 

 hairs, or the lower part glabrous; bracts 

 smooth or nearly so on the back; in habi- 

 tats similar to the preceding, but less 

 common; chiefly in the n. half of 111. 

 July-Oct. [A. 7ntdtiflorus Ait.; A. stricti- 

 caulis Rydb.] A. ericoides L. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 152. Compositae 255 



23. Rays light blue (or pink), about 5 mm. long; 

 stem pubescent; leaves linear, entire, 2-5 mm. 

 wide, hirsutulous, cuspidate; heads numer- 

 ous; involucres 4-5 mm. high; moist ground, 

 rare. Sept. Chicago, Benke; Peoria, McDon- 

 ald, Brendel. [A. ericoides X novae-angliae] 

 X ^- arnethystinus Nutt. 



22. Bracts glabrous (or finely ciliolate), appressed; 

 heads larger. 

 25. Heads solitary at the ends of short leafy 

 branchlets arranged along the upper side of 

 wand-like branches. 

 26. Outer bracts and uppermost leaves mucron- 

 ate; leaves of the flowering branchlets ap- 

 pressed or ascending; rays white; road- 

 sides, fields, and open woods, common 

 throughout HI. Aug. -Oct. [A. ericoides 

 of auth., not L.; A. ericoides var. platy- 

 phyllus T. &: G.; A. ericoides var. villosus 

 T. & G.; A. pdosus var. platyphyllns (T. 



& G.) Blake; A. glabellus Nees} 



A. pilosus Willd. 



26. Bracts obtusish, the tips soft and thin; leaves 



of the flowering branchlets spreading; rays 

 pale purple or white; moist sandy soil, 



rare. Aug. -Sept. Bushy Aster 



A. dumosiis L. 



25. Heads paniculate or racemose. 



27. Heads large, 15-25 mm. in diameter; rays 



6-12 mm. long. 

 28. Leaves narrowly linear, entire, scabrous- 

 margined; rays white; wet ground and 

 in bogs, rare. Aug.-Sept. Lake Co., 

 Hill; Peoria, Brejidel [/I. junceus 



sensu auth., non Ait.] 



A. junciformis Rydb. 



28. Leaves lanceolate to linear-lanceolate. 

 29. Rays usually bluish purple; leaves 

 firm, thickish, rough; bracts acute; 

 moist soil, local. Sept. -Oct. [_A. 



praealtus Poir., nom. illegit.] 



A. salicifolitis Lam. 



29. Rays usually white; leaves thin, 

 smooth (except the margins) ; 

 bracts acuminate; moist ground, 

 especially along roads, local. Sept.- 

 Oct A. paniculatus Lam. 




256 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



27. Heads smaller, 7-14 mm. in diameter; rays 

 2-6 mm. long, lavender or white. 

 30. Heads in a narrow or open panicle. 



3 1 . Leaves finely pubescent beneath, pu- 

 berulent above, oblanceolate, or 

 lanceolate, frequently serrate; road- 

 sides, fields, river banks, common 

 throughout 111. Sept. -Oct. [A. 

 missouriensis of Britt., not A. niis- 



surtenus (Nutt.) Ktze} 



A. pantotrichus Blake 



3 1 . Leaves glabrous beneath, more or 



less scabrous above, entire or spar- 

 ingly serrate; moist woods, local. 

 Sept. -Oct. [A. tradescanti ex p. of 

 auth.j A. interior Wieg. 



30. Heads unilaterally racemose. 



32. Leaves lanceolate or oblanceolate, 



serrate; involucres 4-5 mm. high; 

 rays 10-12, white or bluish; woods, 



common. Sept. -Oct 



A. latertflorus (L.) Britt. 



32. Leaves linear, denticulate or entire; 

 involucres 3-4 mm. high; rays 15- 

 25, white; fields, woods, and road- 

 sides, local. Sept. -Oct 



A. vimineus Lam. 



21. Involucres 8-10 mm. high; bracts linear-lanceolate, 

 keeled, appressed, imbricate in 4-5 series; rays 10-15, 

 violet or rarely white, 8-10 mm. long; leaves numer- 

 ous, linear, entire, sessile, 1 -nerved, rigid, usually 

 ciliolate; sandy soil in woods in the n. half of the 

 state. Sept.-Oct. [lonactis linariijolius (L.) Greene] 

 A. linariijoliits L. 



19. Heads in flat-topped corymbs; rays white or whitish; involu- 

 cres 4-5 mm. high. 



33. Leaves rigid, Hnear-lanceolate, acute; rays about 8 mm. 

 long; achencs glabrous; pappus simple; sandy soil, Lake, 

 Mchlenry, Du Page, Cook, and Kankakee counties; also 

 Menard Co., Hall. Aug. -Sept. [A. ptarmkoides var. lii- 

 tcscens (Lindl.) Gray; Unamia lutacens (Lindl.) 

 Rydb.] A. ptarmicotdci (Nees) T. & G. 



33. Leaves lanceolate, acuminate, not rigid; rays 4-6 mm. long; 

 achenes slightly pubescent; pappus double; moist ground 

 in the n. half of the state, local. Aug. -Oct. [Docllingeria 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 152. Compositae 257 



umbellata (Mill.) Nees] Flat-top Aster 



A. umbellatus Mill. 



17. Rays none; plants annual; heads campanulate, 8-12 mm. broad; 

 involucre 4-6 mm. high; pappus copious, soft; achenes appressed- 

 pubescent; leaves linear, entire, sessile, ciliolate, acutish; roadsides 

 and waste ground, local; adv. from the West. Cook Co., Moffatt, 

 Hill, Agnes Chase. July-Sept. \_A. angustus sensu auth., non Nees; 

 Brachyactis angustus (Lindl.) Britt.j A. brachyactis Blake 



15. Erigeron L. — Fleabane 



(Lepiilon Raf.) 



1. Rays conspicuous, longer than the pappus. 



2. Leaves clasping; rays lilac or purple; plants perennial. 



3. Stem simple; rays 50-75; involucre glandular-puberulent; open woods, 

 common. April-June E. pulchellus Michx. 



3. Stem branched above; rays 150-200; involucre hirsute, not glandular; 



open woods, roadsides, and fields, common. May-June 



E. philadelphicus L. 



2. Leaves not at all clasping; rays white or pink-tinged; plants annual or 

 biennial. 



4. Stem-leaves linear or narrowly lanceolate, finely pubescent, usually 



entire; involucre hirsutulous; basal leaves spatulate; roadsides, fields, 

 or dry open woods, chiefly in the n. half of the state. May-July. \E. 



ramosus sensu (Walt.) BSP., non Raf.} Daisy Fleabane 



E. strigosus Muhl. 



4. Stem-leaves lanceolate, ciliate, sparsely hirsute or glabrous, irregularly 

 sharply toothed, or the upper ones entire; involucre glabrous or with 

 a few hairs; basal leaves ovate, coarsely dentate, long-petioled, usually 

 absent at flowering time; fields, roadsides, waste places, and open 



woods, common throughout 111. June-Oct. Whitetop 



E. annuus (L.) Pers. 



1. Rays inconspicuous, scarcely, if at all, exceeding the pappus. 



5. Rays purplish; involucre about 2 mm. high; stem diffusely or divaricately 



branched; leaves all linear, entire; dry soil, local. June-Sept 



E. divaricatus Michx. 



5. Rays white; involucre 3-4 mm. high; stem strict; lower leaves spatulate. 

 toothed; common weed in cult, ground and along roads. Aug. -Oct. 

 Horseweed E. canadensis L. 



Tribe 5. Gnaphalieae 



16. Pluchea Cass. — Marsh Fleabane 



P. camphorata (L.) DC. Swamps and sloughs, not common; s. III. July- 

 Oct. [P. petiolata Cass.; P. viscida (Raf.) House.} 




258 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



17. Antennaria Gaertn. — Everlasting 



1. Rosette leaves comparatively small, usually less than 3 cm. long, 1 -ribbed, 

 or indistinctly 3-ribbed. 



2. Rosette leaves obovate, abruptly contracted below the middle into a petiole- 

 like base; roadsides and open woods. May-June ....A. neodtoica Greene 



2. Rosette leaves cuneate-spatulate, gradually tapering to the sessile base; dry 



soil on open wooded slopes. Apr.-May A. neglecta Greene 



1. Rosette leaves larger, distmctly 3-ribbed, 3-12 cm. long. 



3. Upper surface of leaves dark green and glabrous or nearly so from the 



beginning; dry soil in open woods and on bluffs. Apr.-May 



A. parl'mi'i Fern. 



3. Upper surface of leaves tomentose, tardily glabrate in age. 



4. Heads small, the involucres of the pistillate plants 5-7 mm. high; 



wooded slopes, common. Apr.-May A. plantaginijolia Hook. 



4. Heads larger, the involucres of the pistillate plants 8-10 mm. high. 



5. Rosette leaves rhombic-obovate, widest at or below the middle, usual- 

 ly acutish at the apex; pastures and open woods, common. Apr.- 

 May A. fallax Greene 



5. Rosette leaves spatulate or obovate, widest above the middle, rounded 



at the apex. Cook Co. [A. occidentalis of auth., not Greene} 



A. munda Fern. 



18. Gnaphalium L. — Cudweed 



1. Heads in cymose or paniculate clusters; pappus-bristles not united. 

 2. Stems 30-90 cm. tall, simple below; bracts white; achenes smooth. 



3. Leaves not decurrent; plants not glandular; outer bracts obtuse; fields, 

 roadsides, and open woods, common. Aug. -Oct. Sometimes mistaken 

 for Anaphalis margaritacca (L.) B. & H., which is not known to 



occur in 111. [G. polyccphaluni Michx.} G. obttisifolium L. 



3. Leaves decurrent; stem glandular-pubescent; bracts acute; sandy soil in 



woods and fields, rare. July-Sept G. macounii Greene 



2. Stems 5-25 cm. tall, diffusely branched near the base; bracts brownish; 



achenes scabrous; dried mud, and along ditches, local. June-Aug 



G. iiliginosuni L. 



1. Heads in a narrow spike-like panicle; pappus-bristles united at base, falling 

 away in a ring; leaves glabrate above; fields and open woods, local. May- 

 July G. piirpureum L. 



Tribe 6. Iniileae 



19. Inula L. — Elecampane 



7. helcnmm L. Roadsides, fields, and open woods, occasional; introd. from 

 Eur. July-Aug. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 152. Compositae 259 



Tribe 7. Heliantheae 

 20. PoLYMNiA L. — Leafcup 



I.Rays white, inconspicuous, 2-5 mm. long; leaves pinnately lobed; achenes 

 3-5 mm. long, angular; woods, common. June-Nov P. canadensis L. 



I.Rays yellow, 1.5-2 cm. long; leaves palmately lobed; achenes 6-8 mm. long, 

 black, flattened; woods and thickets, s. 111. July-Sept P. uvedalia L. 



21. SiLPHIUM L. 

 1. Stem 1-3 m. tall, leafless or nearly so; leaves large, cordate, dentate, long- 



petioled; prairie soil, common. July-Sept. Prairie-dock 



S. terebinthinaceum Jacq. 



1. Stem leafy throughout. 



2. Leaves pinnately parted, large, alternate; prairie soil, common. July-Aug. 



Compass-plant S. laciniatum L. 



2. Leaves toothed or entire, chiefly opposite. 



3. Leaves merely sessile, 7-10 cm. long; stem nearly terete; prairie soil, often 

 along railroads, common. July-Aug. [^. integrijolium var. deamii 

 Perry]. Occasional plants with some of the leaves whorled have been 

 mistaken for S. trifoliatum L., which is not known to occur in III. 



Rosin-weed S. integrifoliion Michx. 



3. Leaves connate-clasping, perfoliate, 20-60 cm. long; stem sharply 4- 



angled; alluvial soil, common. July-Aug. Cup-plant 



S. perfoliatum L. 



22. Parthenium L. 



P. integrijolium L. American Feverfew. Prairie soil, common. July-Sept. 



23. Heliopsis Pers. 



H. helianthoides (L.) Sweet. Open woods, and along roads, common. 

 July-Aug. [H. scabra Dunal] 



24. Eclipta L. 

 E. alba (L.) Hassk. Shores, sloughs, and fields, throughout III., except the 

 n. counties. July-Sept. 



25. RuDBECKiA L. — Coneflower 



1. Peduncles glabrous; disk greenish yellow; rays 2.5-5 cm. long, soon droop- 

 ing; lower leaves pinnately parted, the upper 3-lobed or entire; stem 1.5- 



3 cm. tall, glabrous; alluvial soil, common. July-Sept. Goldenglow 



R. laciniata L. 



1. Peduncles more or less pubescent; disk brown or purple; stem 30-150 cm. 



tall. 



2. Chaff of the receptacle acuminate, glabrous; lower leaves, or some of 



them, 3-lobed or 3-parted, the upper lanceolate, entire or serrate; rays 



8-12, orange-yellow, 1.5-2.5 cm. long; woods, locally throughout III. 



Aug.-Oct. Brown-eyed Susan R. triloba L. 



2. Chaff obtuse or acutish, puberulent toward the tip. 




260 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



3. Stem (at least the upper part) tomentulose or puberulent; leaves thick, 

 tomentulose beneath, the lower ones, or some of them, deeply 3-lobecl 

 or 3-parted; rays 15-20, 2-3 cm. long; prairie soil, or in open woods, 



local. Aug. -Sept. Fragrant Coneflower R. subtomentosa Pursh 



3. Stem strigose or hirsute; leaves merely toothed, or entire. 



4. Leaves irregularly coarsely dentate, or serrate; stem hirsute; rays 2-4 

 cm. long; plants perennial; moist ground, rare. Wabash Co., H. 



Shearer R. sulltvantii Boynton & Beadle 



4. Leaves denticulate or entire. 



5. Stem sparsely strigose; rays orange-yellow, 1-L5 cm. long; stigmas 

 obtuse; pappus a minute crown; plants perennial; dry open 

 woods, s. 111., rare. Herod, Pope Co., July 29, 1898, G. P. 



Clinton. Orange Coneflower R. fulgida Ait. 



5. Stem hirsute; rays bright yellow, 2-3.5 cm. lor.g; stigmas subulate; 

 pappus none; plants annual or biennial; fields, roadsides, and 



open woods, common. June-Aug. Black-eyed Susan 



R. hirta L. 



26. Echinacea Moench 



{Brauneria Necker) 

 1. Leaves ovate to lanceolate, serrate or dentate, or the uppermost entire; stem 



usually branched above; woods and thickets, not common. July-Aug. 



Purple Coneflower E. purpurea (L.) Moench 



1. Leaves oblanceolate or narrowly elliptical, entire; stem simple; prairie soil, 



local. June-July. Pale Coneflower E. pallida (Nutt.) Britt. 



27. Ratibida Raf. 



(Lepachps Raf.) 



1. Rays spatulate-elliptical, 2.5-5 cm. long; disk subglobose to short-ellipsoid, 

 shorter than the rays, becoming 1-2 cm. long and 1-1.5 cm. thick in fruit; 

 stigmas subulate; roadsides and prairie soil, common throughout III. July- 

 Aug. Drooping Coneflower R. pinnata (Vent.) Barnh. 



I.Rays oval, 1.5-2 cm. long; disk cylindrical, equalling or e.xceeding the rays, 

 becoming 2.5-4 cm. long and 7-10 mm. thick in fruit; stigmas short, ob- 

 tuse; along railroads, occasional; adv. from w. U.S.; Cook Co., W. D. 

 Barnes in 1898; Taylorville, Andrcn's in 1898; Peoria, McDonald in 1904 

 R. columnijera (Nutt.) Woot. & Standi. 



28. Galinsoga Ruiz &: Pavon 



G. ciliata (Raf.) Blake. Peruvian Daisy. Waste places, cult, ground, road- 

 sides; nat. from trop. Am. First collected in III. at Chicago by Moffatt in 

 1891, now common throughout 111. June-Sept. [G. parviflora var. hispida 

 DC.} 



29. Hhlianthus L. — Sunflower 

 1. Plants perennial. 



2. Stem scape-like; leaves mostly near the base of the stem, oval, long- 

 petioled, the upper ones bract-like; sandy soil in the n. part of the state. 

 July-Sept. [H. illinocnsis Gleason] H. occidentalia Riddell 




JoNcS: Flora of Illinois, 152. Compositae 261 



2. Stem usually leafy to the inflorescence. 



3. Heads small, 1.5-3 cm. broad, the rays about 1 cm. long, the disk 5-8 

 mm. broad; leaves lanceolate, acuminate, serrate, petiolate, more or 

 less scabrous on both surfaces; stem glabrous or nearly so; sandy soil 



in open woods, local, s. 111. Aug.-Oct H. microcephalus T. & G. 



3. Heads large, 4-8 cm. in diameter, the rays 2-4 cm. long. 



4. Bracts oval, acutish or obtuse, usually glabrous on the back, closely 

 and evenly ciliolate, shorter than the disk, erect, closely appressed; 

 disk usually purple-brown; leaves lanceolate, thick, scabrous, nar- 

 rowed at the base; sandy or prairie soil, locally abundant. July- 

 Sept. [W. scaberrimus Ell.; H. subrhotnboideus Rydb.} Prairie 



Sunflower H. rtgidiis (Cass.) Desf. 



4. Bracts lanceolate or linear-lanceolate, acuminate; disk-flowers yellow. 

 5. Leaves sessile or subsessile. 



6. Stem hirsute or hispidulous; leaves ascending. 



7. Stem villous-hirsute; leaves finely and densely grayish pubes- 

 cent on both surfaces, ovate or ovate-lanceolate, acute, 3- 

 veined above the slightly clasping base, all opposite; bracts 

 copiously pubescent; heads solitary or few; rays 2-3 cm. 



long; prairie soil, locally abundant. Aug. -Sept 



H. mollis Lam. 



7. Stem more or less hispidulous or scabrous; leaves lanceolate or 



ovate-lanceolate, acuminate; heads several, panicled. 



8. Leaves lanceolate, hirsutulous beneath, faintly 3-veined from 



the cuneate, somewhat ciliate base; rays 1-2 cm. long, pale 



yellow; moist ground, local. Peoria, Brendel; Woodford 



Co., McDonald H. giganteus L. 



8. Leaves ovate-lanceolate, finely and rather copiously grayish 

 short-pubescent beneath, the lateral veins confluent some- 

 what below the middle; rays 2.5-4 cm. long, bright yel- 

 low; roadsides and fields, not common. Sangamon Co., E. 



Hall in 1860; Kankakee Co., G. N. Jones 



H. doronicoides Lam. 



6. Stem glabrous or nearly so, glaucous, slender; leaves divaricate, 

 lanceolate, acuminate, 3-veined from the rounded base, sca- 

 brous on both sides; roadsides and open woods, local. July- 

 Sept W- divaricatus L. 



5. Leaves manifestly petioled. 



9. Stem smooth or nearly so, glaucous. 



10. Leaves triple-veined from near the base, chiefly opposite, at 

 least below the inflorescence, abruptly contracted into mar- 

 gined petioles. 

 11. Leaves lanceolate, shallowly serrate to entire, firm, the 

 lower surface hirsutulous or glaucous; roadsides and 

 open woods, common. July-Sept. [H. arenicola E. E. 

 Wats.; H. jormosus E. E. Wats.; H. leontnus E. E. 

 Wats.} H. strumosus L. 




262 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



1 1 . Leaves ovate-lanceolate, thin, conspicuously coarsely reg- 

 ularly serrate-dentate, the lower surface glabrous, sca- 

 brous, or puberulent; dry woods, local. July-Oct 



H. decapetalus L. 



10. Leaves 1 -veined or inconspicuously 3 -veined, the upper alter- 

 nate, remotely denticulate or nearly entire, the lower ones 

 opposite, coarsely serrate, all elongate-lanceolate, acumi- 

 nate, scabrous above, finely shortly whitish pubescent 

 beneath; peduncles strigose; stem 2-4 m. tall; prairie soil, 

 roadsides, borders of fields, common. Aug. -Oct. [H. m- 



stahilis E. E. Wats.] H. grosseserratus Martens 



9. Stem scabrous or hispidulous; leaves triple-veined from near the 

 base, chiefly opposite below the inflorescence. 

 12. Lower surface of leaves hispidulous or short-hirsute; stem 



hirsute; roadsides and fields, local. Aug. -Sept 



H. hirsutiis Raf. 



12. Lower surface of leaves rather copiously canescent-puberu- 

 lent; stem hirsutulous or antrorsely scabrous-strigilose; 

 rhizome short, often tuberous-thickened at apex; alluvial 

 soil, common. July-Oct. [H. subcanescens (Gray) E. E. 

 Wats.; H. mollissimus E. E. Wats.} Jerusalem Artichoke 



H. tuberosus L. 



1. Plants annual; leaves chiefly alternate; disk usually brownish purple; stem 

 hispid or strigose. 



13. Leaves lanceolate, usually entire; stem 30-90 cm. tall; disk 1.5 cm. broad; 

 bracts lanceolate, densely scabrous; sandy soil, roadsides, waste places, 



occasional; probably adv. from w. U.S. Aug. -Sept 



H. petiolaris Nutt. 



13. Leaves ovate, dentate; stem 1-4 m. ta'l; disk 2.5-4 cm. broad; bracts 

 ovate-lanceolate, ciliate and hispid; fields and roadsides, and often 

 cult.; native w. of the Mississippi R. Aug. -Sept. Garden Sunflower .... 

 H. annnus L. 



30. Actinomeris Nutt. 



A. alternijolia (L.) DC. Yellow Ironweed. Alluvial soil and along roads, 

 common. July-Sept. \^Verbesina alternijolia (L.) Britt.} 



31. Verbesina L. 



V. helianthoidei Michx. Open woods and along roads, throughout 111., 

 except the n. counties. June-July. 



32. Coreopsis L. 



1. Leaves simple, entire or palmately cleft or divided; achenes wing-margined; 

 plants perennial. 

 2. Leaves entire, or rarely with 1 or 2 lateral lobes. 



3. Leaves mostly near the base of the stem; heads long-peduncled. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 152. Compositae 263 



4. Plants glabrous, except the ciliate bases of the leaves; sandy soil. 



June-July C. lanceolata L. 



4. Plants pubescent; limestone ridges, Lockport, Hill in 1899; known 



also from Cook, Peoria, and Cass counties. [C. lanceolata var. 



villosa Michx.] C. crassifolia Ait. 



3. Stem leafy; plants pubescent; roadsides, fields, and woods, s. III. Pope 

 Co., Clinton in 1898; St. Clair Co., Brendel in 1850; Jackson Co., 

 Brendel, Gleason C. pubescens L. 



2. Leaves palmately cleft or divided, or the uppermost entire. 



5. Leaves petioled, 3 -divided into elliptic-lanceolate segments; heads many; 

 stem 1-3 m. tall; rays entire; pappus none; open woods and along 

 roads. Aug.-Sept. Tall Tickseed C. tripteris L. 



5. Leaves sessile, rigid, 3-cleft at or below the middle, the lobes linear- 

 oblong; heads few or solitary; stem 30-90 cm. tall; rays mostly 3- 

 toothed; pappus of 2 short teeth, or none; roadsides and open woods. 

 June-July C. palmata Nutt. 



1. Leaves or most of them 1-2-pinnately parted. 



6. Heads 4-6 cm. broad; rays 1.5-2 cm. long, yellow throughout; disk yellow; 

 achenes broadly winged; pappus of 2 short scales; plants perennial; 

 roadsides and waste places, occasional; adv. from w.-centr. U.S. June- 

 Aug C. grandi flora Hogg 



6. Heads 1.5-3 cm. broad; rays 8-12 mm. long, crimson-brown at base or 

 throughout; disk brownish purple; achenes linear, wingless; pappus a 

 mere border, or absent; plants annual; roadsides and waste places, 



escaped from cult.; native westw. and southw. June-Aug 



C. tinctoria Nutt. 



33. BiDENS L. — Beggar-ticks 



1. Rays inconspicuous or none. 



2. Leaves pinnately parted or dissected. 



3. Achenes linear-fusiform, with 3 or 4 short, retrorsely barbed awns; rays 

 yellowish white; roadsides and open woods, chiefly in the s. half of 

 111., but extending northw. to Champaign and Hancock counties. 



Aug.-Sept. Spanish Needles B. bipinnata L. 



3. Achenes flat, 2-awned. 



4. Outer bracts 10-16; achenes brown; involucres 10-20 mm. high; road- 

 sides, fields, and woods, chiefly in the n. half of the state. Aug.- 



Oct B. viilgata Greene 



4. Outer bracts 4-8; achenes black. 



5. Involucres 5-7 mm. high; awns of the achenes upwardly barbed; 



wet ground, rare. Aug.-Oct B. discoidea (T. & G.) Britt. 



5. Involucres 10-15 mm. high; awns downwardly barbed; roadsides, 

 fields, and open woods. Aug.-Oct B. frondosa L. 



2. Leaves simple, lanceolate, toothed or lobed, sessile or petioled; awns of 

 the pappus 3 or 4. 




264 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



6. Outer bracts 4 or 5, rarely much exceeding the disk; achenes angled 4- 

 6 mm. long; corollas 5-toothed; stamens exserted; wet ground 

 throughout 111. Sept. -Oct B. connata Muhl. 



6. Outer bracts 6-8, foliaceous, exceeding the disk; achenes flat, 7-9 mm. 

 long; corollas 4-toothed; stamens included; wet ground throughout 

 111. Sept.-Oct B. comosa (Gray) Wieg. 



I.Rays present, conspicuous. 



7. Leaves simple, oblanceolate to linear-lanceolate, acuminate, serrate, con- 

 nate at the base; heads nodding in fruit; achenes cuneate, 4-angled, the 

 4 awns retrorsely barbed; wet ground, chiefly in the n. half of the 

 state. July-Oct. [B. gracilenta Greene; B. glaucescens Greene; B. lepto- 

 poda Greene; B. prionophylla Greene; B. filarnentosa Rydb.; B. elliptica 



(Wieg.) Gleason] B. cerniia L. 



7. Leaves pinnately parted or dissected; achenes flat. 



8. Outer bracts 8-10, ciliolate or glabrous, not exceeding the inner; (awns 

 sometimes only 0.5 mm. long). 

 9. Achenes obovate; moist ground along roads, or in swales and fields 



throughout 111., except the n.w. counties. Aug. -Oct 



B. aristosa (Michx.) Britt. 



9. Achenes cuneate; moist ground throughout 111. July-Oct. [5. tricho- 

 sperma (Michx.) Britt.} Plants with narrow leaf-segments have 



been named B. coronata var. tenuiloba (Gray) Sherff 



B. coronata (L.) Britt. 



8. Outer bracts 12-20, coarsely hispidulous, mostly longer than the inner; 

 swampy ground, not common; known from Cook, Kankakee, La 

 Salle, Henry, and Henderson counties. July-Sept. [5. involucrata 

 sensu Britt., non Phil.] B. polylepis Blake 



34. Megalodonta Greene — Water-marigold 



M. beckii (Torr.) Greene. Ponds and slow streams, rare. Aug. -Sept. 

 Known in 111. from Lake and Cook counties [Bidens beckii Torr.} 



Tribe 8. Helenieae 



35. Hymenopappus L'Her. 



H. scabiosaeus L'Her. Open sandy woods, rare. Mason, Cass, and Kanka- 

 kee counties. May-June. [H. carolinensis (Lam.) Porter}. 



36. Actinea Juss. 



(Picradeiiia Hook.) 



A. herbacea (Greene) B. L. Robins. Dry gravelly banks, .stony fields, and 

 limestone hills, near Joliet, Will Co., Hill, May 9, and 27, 1902, June 8, 1907; 

 H. C. Corvles, May 13, 1906; Manito, Mason Co., /. Voss. Also in Ottawa 

 Co., Ohio, and s. Ontario, Canada. [Tetraneuris herbacea Greene; Actinella 

 icaposa var. glabra Gray}. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 152. Compositae 265 



» 



37. Helenium L. — Sneezeweed 



1. Leaves lanceolate to elliptical, more or less decurrent on the angular stem; 

 rays 1-2 cm. long; plants perennial. 



2. Disk yellow; leaves lanceolate or oblanceolate, mostly dentate; ray-flowers 

 fertile; low meadows, and along ditches, streams, and ponds, common. 

 [H. latifolitim Mill.; H. canaliculatum Lam.; H. altissimum Link ex 

 Rydb.} Aug.-Oct H. dutumnale L. 



2. Disk brownish-purple; leaves linear-lanceolate, mostly entire; ray-flowers 

 neutral, often brownish purple at base; roadsides, meadows, and pas- 

 tures, chiefly in the s. part of the state. [H. polyphylliim Small]. July- 

 Sept - H. nudiflorum Nutt. 



1. Leaves narrowly linear, numerous, entire, not decurrent; rays 6-10 mm. long; 

 disk yellow; plants annual; moist ground, s. 111., rare; Jackson Co., Gleas- 

 on'in 1900. Aug.-Oct H. tenuijoliutn Nutt. 



38. Dyssodia Cav. 



(Dochera Willd.) 



D. papposa (Vent.) Hitchc. Roadsides and fields. Sept. -Oct. 



Tribe 9. Anthemideae 



39. Achillea L. — Yarrow 



A. 77iillefoliU777 L. Roadsides, fields, lawns, etc., very common; nat. from 

 Eur. May-Aug. Rays sometimes pink. 



40. Anthemis L. 



1. Rays 10-18, white; achenes not flattened. 



2. Chaff of the receptacle subulate, stiff, subtending only the inner flowers; 



rays neutral; achenes sparsely glandular-tuberculate, 1-1.5 mm. long; 



plants annual, ill-scented when fresh; fields and waste places, common; 



nat. from Eur. May-Sept. \Maruta cotula (L.) DC] Dog- fennel or 



Mayweed A. cotula L. 



2. Chaff membranous or absent; rays fertile. 



3. Chaff broad, obtuse, or absent; achenes obtusely 3-angled, 1-1.5 mm. 

 long; plants perennial, tomentulose, pleasantly aromatic; cult., and 

 occasionally spont.; introd. from Eur. June -Aug. Garden Chamomile 

 A. nobilis L. 



3. Chaff linear-lanceolate, cuspidate; achenes 10-ribbed, 1.5-2 mm. long; 

 plants annual; fields and waste places, nat. from Eur. May-Aug. 

 Field Chamomile A. arvensis L. 



I.Rays 20-30, yellow, pistillate; achenes 4-angled and somewhat compressed: 

 chaff lanceolate, acuminate, rigid; plants perennial, pubescent; fields and 

 waste places, escaped from cult.; introd. from Eur. June-Sept. [Cota tmc- 

 toria (L.) J. Gay] A. tinctoria L. 




266 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



41. Matricaria L. 



M. matricarioides (Less.) Porter. Pineapple-weed. Roadsides, farmyards, 

 and waste places, not uncommon; adv. or nat. from the Pacific Coast. May- 

 Aug. \_M. suaveoleris (Pursh) Buch.} 



42. Chrysanthemum L. 



1. Heads 3-5 cm. broad, few or solitary; rays 20-30; fields, roadsides, and waste 

 places, common; nat. from Eur. May- Aug. [Leucanthemu?n vulgare 

 Lam.; C. leiicanthemuni var. pinnatifidum Lecoq. & Lamotte} Ox-eye 

 Daisy C. leucanthemiun L. 



L Heads 5-15 mm. broad, corymbose; rays 10-15, or absent; waste places, es- 

 caped from cult.; nat. from Eur. Sept. -Oct. [Balsamita inajor Desf.; C. 

 balsamita var. tanacetoides Boiss.} C. balsamita L. 



43. Tanacetum L. — Tansy 

 T. vulgare L. Waste places, escaped from cult.,, nat. from Eur. July-Sept. 



44. Artemisia L. — Wormwood 

 1. Leaves or their divisions linear to filiform, glabrous, or nearly so, green. 

 2. Bracts of the involucre glabrous; heads 2-3 mm. broad; disk-flowers sterile. 

 3. Leaves simple, all entire, or the lower trifid; plants perennial; prairie 



soil, rare. July-Sept. Lee Co., Vasey [A. cernua Nutt.} 



A. dracunculoides Pursh 



3. Leaves 1-3-pinnately divided; plants biennial; sandy soil in the n. part 



of the state, local. July-Sept A. caudata Michx. 



2. Bracts tomentulose; heads 3-4 mm. broad; disk-flowers fertile; leaves 1-3- 

 pinnately parted; plants perennial, shrubby, often cult., and sometimes 



persisting; introd. from Eur. Aug. -Sept. Southernwood 



A. abrotanum L. 



1. Leaves or their divisions lanceolate to linear. 



4. Plants more or less whitish-tomentose; perennials. 

 5. Leaves lanceolate or the uper linear. 



6. Leaves regularly serrate, lanceolate, acuminate, green above, whitish- 

 tomentose beneath; alluvial soil in the n. half of the state, rare. 

 Aug.-Sept A. serrata Nutt. 



6. Leaves entire or few-toothed, tomentose on both sides, but usually 



less so above; along railroads and river banks; adv. from w.- 



centr. U.S. Aug.-Sept. [A. ludoviciana of auth., not Nutt.] 



A. gnaphalode^ Nutt. 



5. Leaves all pinnatifid. 



7. Leaves green and glabrate above, the lobes acute; heads 3-4 mm. 



high; receptacle glabrous; waste places, occasional; escaped from 



cult.; introd. from Eur. July-Oct A. vulgaris L. 



7. Leaves canescent on both sides, the lobes obtuse; heads very numer- 

 ous, about 2 mm. high; receptacle glabrous; roadsides and waste 

 places, occasional; escaped from cult.; introd. from Eur. July-Sept. 

 Common Wormwood or Absinth A. absinthium L. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 152. Compositae 267 



4. Plants glabrous, annual or biennial. 



8. Heads 2-3 mm. high; leaf-divisions laciniate-dentate; plants biennial; 



cult, ground, waste places, or along railroads, in the n. half of the 



state. Aug. -Oct. Biennial Wormwood A. biennis Willd. 



8. Heads 1.5-2 mm. high; leaf-segments 1-3 mm. long; plants annual; 



roadsides and waste places, occasional; nat. from Eur. Aug. -Oct. 



Annual Wormwood A. annua L. 



Tribe 10. Senecioneae 

 45. Cacalia L. — Indian-plantain 



(Mesadenia Raf.) 



1. Heads 20-30-flowered; bracts 12-15; receptacle flat; leaves hastate, dentate; 



woods, local. July-Aug. [Synosma suaveolens (L.) Britt.} 



C. suaveolens L. 



1. Heads 5-flowered; bracts 5; receptacle raised in the center to a conical point. 

 2. Leaves thin, reniform or flabellate, lobed or sinuately dentate. 



3. Leaves green on both sides; stem grooved; woods. July-Sept. [C. reni- 



formis Muhl.} C. muhlenbergii (Sch.-Bip.) Fern. 



3. Leaves glaucous beneath; stem terete; open woods. July-Sept 



C. atiiplicijolia L. 



2. Leaves thick, oval, entire or denticulate, green on both sides; wet marly 

 soil, local. June-Aug C. tuberosa Nutt. 



46. Erechtites Raf. 



E. hieracijolid (L.) Raf. Fireweed. In moist woods, recently burned clear- 

 ings, along roads, or in bogs, local. Aug.-Oct. 



47. Senecio L. — Ragwort 



1. Basal leaves dentate or entire, the median stem-leaves often pinnatifid; 

 plants perennial. 

 2. None of the leaves cordate; basal leaves obovate or elliptical. 



3. Leaves and stems more or less floccose, tardily glabrate; involucre 

 5-7 mm. high; achenes hispidulous on the angles; prairie soil, and 



in dry ground in oak woods, local. May-June S. plattensis Nutt. 



3. Leaves glabrous or nearly so; stem glabrous, or slightly floccose when 

 young; involucre 4-5 mm. high. 

 4. Basal leaves obovate or suborbicular; achenes glabrous; bluffs and 

 open woods, not common. Apr.-June. {_S. rotundus (Britt.) 



Small} S. obovatus Muhl. 



4. Basal leaves oblanceolate; achenes often hispidulous on the margins; 



roadsides and open woods. May-June. [5. balsamitae Muhl.} 



S. pauperculus Michx. 



2. Basal leaves more or less cordate or subcordate, long-petioled, mostly 



glabrous; wet ground. Apr.-June. \_S. semicordatus Mack. & Bush} 



..S. aureus L. 




268 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



1. Leaves all pinnatifld or coarsely sinuate-dentate; plants annual. 



5. Rays conspicuous; bracts not black-tipped; fields, s. 111. May-June. [5. 

 lobatus Pers.] Butterweed S. glabettiis Poir. 



5. Rays none; bracts often black-tipped; cult, ground and waste places, occa- 

 sional; nat. from Eur. June-July. Groundsel S. vulgaris L. 



Tribe 11. Cynareae 



48. Arctium L. — Burdock 



1. Involucre 1-2 cm. broad; inner bracts not exceeding the €owers; heads race- 

 mose; petioles hollow, not deeply furrowed; waste places, common; nat. 

 from Eur. July-Sept. Common Burdock A. minus (Hill) Bernh. 



1. Involucre 2.5-3 cm. broad; inner bracts equalling or exceeding the flowers; 

 heads corymbose; petioles solid, deeply furrowed; waste places, occasional; 

 nat. from Eur. July-Oct. Great Burdock A. lappa L. 



49. EcHiNOPS L. — Globe-thistle 



E. sphaerocephalus L. Roadsides and waste places, occasional; introd. from 

 Eur. Apparently established in Kankakee Co., near Manteno, July 14, 1938, 

 Steyermark & Standley 1726. 



50. CiRSiUM Hill — Thistle 



1. Heads large, more than 2 cm. in diameter; flowers all perfect; plants bien- 

 nial. 

 2. Leaves bristly on the upper surface, grayish arachnoid beneath, strongly 

 decurrent; bracts of the involucre all spine-tipped; flowers violet-purple; 

 fields, roadsides, and waste places, common; nat. from Eur. July-Aug. 



Bull Thistle [C. lanceolatum (L.) Hill] .- 



C. vtilgare (Savi) Airy-Shaw 



2. Leaves not bristly on the upper surface; outer involucral bracts spine- 

 tipped, the inner acuminate, soft, or all the bracts spineless. 

 3. Leaves white-tomentose beneath. 



4. Leaves pinnately parted into linear lobes, persistently white-tomen- 

 tose on both sides; flowers cream color; sand dunes near Lake 

 Michigan. June-July. Beach Thistle ...C. pitcheri (Torr.) T. & G. 

 4. Leaves pinnately lobed or merely toothed. 



5. Leaves pinnately lobed, the margins revolute; rich soil along roads, 

 in fields, or in woods, throughout III., common. Aug. -Sept 



Field Thistle C. discolor (Muhl.) Spreng 



5. Leaves merely toothed, or shal lowly lobed, the margins flat 



woods, locally throughout 111. Aug. -Sept. Tall Thistle 



C. altissimum (L.) Spreng 



3. Leaves not white-tomentose. 



6. Heads 5-10 cm. broad; stem stout, 30-60 cm. tall; bracts spine 

 tipped and with a prominent glutinous midvein; gravelly soil, n 

 111., extending southw. to Kankakee, Peoria, and Adams counties 

 June-July. Hill's Thistle C. hillit (Canby) Fern 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 152. Compositae 269 



6. Heads 2-3 cm. broad; stem 1-2.5 m. tall; bracts without prickle- 

 points; wet ground, chiefly in the n. half of 111. Aug. -Sept. Swamp 



Thistle C. muticum Michx. 



1. Heads smaller, 1.5-2 cm. high and 1-1.5 cm. in diameter; flowers dioecious; 

 perennials with spreading rhizomes; leaves glabrous or nearly so. 

 7. Leaves deeply pinnately lobed; fields and waste places; nat. from Eur. 



June-Aug. Canada Thistle C. arvense (L.) Scop. 



7. Leaves entire or slightly lobed; occasional in fields and waste places; nat. 

 from Eur. June-Aug. [C. arvense var. integrifolmm Wimm. & Grab.} 

 C. setonun (Willd.) Bieb. 



51. Carduus L. 



C. nutans L. Musk Thistle. An occasional weed in waste places; introd. 

 from Eur. June-Sept. 



52. Centaurea L. — Star-thistle 

 1. Bracts of the involucre not spiny. 



2. Lower bracts pectinate or fringed to the middle or below; leaves entire or 



toothed. 



3. Bracts lanceolate, pale, without dilated tips; flowers blue, purplish, 



pink, or white, the marginal ones enlarged; plants annual; waste 



places, escaped from cult.; native of Eur. July-Sept. Bachelor's 



Button C. cyanus L. 



3. Bracts with abruptly dilated tips; flowers rose-purple; plants perennial. 

 4. Flowers all alike, discoid, not enlarged; bracts regularly pectinate- 

 fringed; fields and roadsides, occasional; adv. from Eur. July-Sept. 



Black Knapweed C. Jiigra L. 



4. Marginal flowers enlarged, showy; bracts irregularly lacerate to entire; 

 fields and roadsides, occasional; adv. from Eur. June-Sept. Brown 



Knapweed C. jacea L. 



2. Lower bracts pectinate only near the dark-colored tip; leaves coarsely den- 

 tate to pinnatifid; flowers rose-purple, the marginal ones radiant; plants 



perennial; waste ground, occasional; adv. from Eur. Aug.-Oct 



C. vochinensis Bernh. 



1. Bracts of the involucre tipped with a rigid spine; plants annual. 



5. Flowers purple; stem wingless; heads sessile; waste places, occas'onal; adv. 



from Eur. June-Oct C. calcitrapa L. 



5. Flowers yellow; stem winged by the decurrent leaf-bases; heads peduncled; 

 waste places, occasional; adv. from Eur. July-Sept. Barnaby's Thistle 

 C. sols tit talis L. 



Tribe 12. Cichorieae 

 53. Serinia Raf. 

 S. oppositijolia (Raf.) Ktze. Moist sandy soil, s. 111. Mar.-Apr. 



54. Tragopogon L. — Oyster Plant. Salsify 

 1. Flowers yellow. 




270 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



2. Bracts 8-9, equalling or shorter than the flowers; peduncles scarcely or not 

 at all thickened below the head; roadsides and fields, common; nat. 



from Eur. May-Aug. Yellow Goat's-beard T. pratensis L. 



2. Bracts 10-13, longer than the flowers; peduncles conspicuously thickened 



below the head; waste places, occasional; introd. from Eur. June 



T. diibius Scop. 



1. Flowers purple; bracts longer than the flowers; peduncles thickened below 

 the head; roadsides and fields, occasional; nat. from Eur. June-Aug. Vege- 

 table Oyster T. porrifolius L. 



55. Krigia Schreb. 



(^Adopogon Necker; Cynthia D.Don) 

 1. Plants perennial; pappus of 10-15 minute scales, and 15-20 long bristles. 

 2. Plants with a solitary head on a leafless scape; involucre 10-15 mm. high; 

 plant bearing a small globose tuber; open woods in the s. half of 111., 

 northw. to Fayette Co. Apr. -May. [C. dandelion (L.) DC; A. dande- 

 lion (L.) Ktze] K. dandelion (L.) Nutt. 



2. Plants with 1-3 clasping stem-leaves, and several heads; involucre 8-10 

 mm. high; plant without a tuber; wooded slopes and ridges. May-Sept. 

 [K. amplexicaults Nutt.; C. virgmica (L.) D.Don; A. virginicum (L.) 



Ktze} K. biflora (Walt.) Blake 



1. Plants annual; pappus of 5-7 short rounded scales and an equal number of 

 longer bristles; scapes slender, each with one head; leaves basal; involucre 

 6-8 mm. high; dry soil in fields and open woods, chiefly in the valleys of 

 the Illinois and Wabash rivers. May-July. [_A. carolinianum (Walt.) 

 Britt.] K. yirgmtca (L.) Willd. 



56. CiCHORlUM L. — Chicory 



C. intybus L. Roadsides and fields, common; nat. from Eur. June-Nov. 

 There are occasional white-flowered plants. 



57. Lactuca L. — Lettuce 



1. Achenes filiform-beaked; pappus white; flowers pale yellow. 



2. Heads 6-8-flowered; achenes light brown, 5-7-nerved but not transversely 

 rugulose; leaves pinnatifid (or merely spinulose-denticulate in f. integri- 

 jolia Bogenh.), tending to turn edgewise in a vertical position, the 

 margins and midribs spinulose; stem 30-90 cm. tall; fields, waste places, 



and roadsides, common; nat. from Eur. July-Sept. Prickly Lettuce 



L. scariola L. 



2. Heads 12-20-flowered; achenes dark brown, 1-3-nerved, transversely 

 rugulose; stem 1-3 m. tall; native species. 

 3. Leaves entire to pinnatifid, not spinulose-toothed. 



4. Leaves sinuately pinnatifid, or the upper entire; open woods, and 



roadsides, common. Junc-Aug. Wild Lettuce L. canadensis L. 



4. Leaves all unlobed, lanceolate, entire or denticulate; woods and road- 

 sides. June-Aug. \ L. intcgrijolia Bigel.] L. sagittijolia EH. 



3. Leaves spinulose-toothed, the midvein somewhat setose on the lower 

 surface; prairie soil, rare. July. Wady Petra, Stark Co., V. H. Chase 




Jones: Flora of Illinois, 152. Compositae 271 



743; without locality, Vasey. Western Lettuce 



L. ludoviciana (Nutt.) DC. 



1 . Achenes not filiform-beaked. 

 5. Pappus white; flowers blue. 



6. Leaves oval, coarsely and unevenly dentate; achenes 4 mm. long; 



woods, throughout 111., except the n.w. counties. Aug. -Sept 



L. vtllosa Jacq. 



6. Leaves lyrate-pinnatifid, the terminal segment larger, triangular; achenes 



5-6 mm. long; woods. July -Sept L. jloridana (L.) Gaertn. 



5. Pappus brown; flowers cream or bluish; leaves pinnatifid or merely sinu- 

 ate; alluvial soil in woods, common. Aug.-Sept. [L. spicata of auth.} 

 L. biennis (Moench) Fern. 



58. SoNCHUS L. — Sow-thisde 



1. Plants perennial, with rhizomes; heads 4-5 cm. in diameter, the flowers bright 

 yellow; involucre 1.5 cm. high; achenes 2.5-3 mm. long, striate and papil- 

 lose; fields and waste places; nat. from Eur. July-Sept. Field Sow-thistle 



S. arvensis L. 



1. Plants annual; heads 1-2.5 cm. in diameter, pale yellow; involucre 1 cm. 

 high; achenes 2-2.5 mm. long. 

 2. Leaves runcinate-pinnatifid, scarcely prickly, the terminal segment com- 

 monly large and triangular; upper leaves clasping by an acute, sagittate 

 base; achenes longitudinally striate and papillose; fields and waste 

 places; nat. from Eur. June-Nov. Common Sow-thistle ...S. oleraceus L. 

 2. Leaves toothed or more or less curled or lobed, harshly prickly, the basal 

 auricles rounded; achenes longitudinally ribbed, otherwise smooth; 

 fields and waste places; nat. from Eur. May-Aug. Spiny Sow-thistle 

 S. asper (L.) Hill 



59. Prenanthes L. 



(^Nabalus Cass.) 

 1. Involucre glabrous. 



2. Heads 5-7-flowered; pappus straw-colored; plants not glaucous; oak 

 woods, local; apparently absent from the w. part of the state. Aug.- 

 Sept P. altissima L. 



2. Heads 8-12-flowered; pappus reddish brown; plants glaucous; woods, n. 



111., southw. to Peoria Co. Aug.-Sept P. alba L. 



1. Involucre pubescent. 



3. Heads 12-16-flowered; basal leaves oblanceolate. 



4. Stem glabrous; upper leaves clasping; flowers purplish; moist ground, 



throughout 111., except the s.w. part. Aug.-Sept 



P. racemosa Michx. 



4. Stem hirsute; leaves not clasping; flowers cream; prairie soil. Aug.-Sept. 

 P. aspera Michx. 



3. Heads 20-3 5 -flowered; basal leaves deltoid; stem glabrous or puberulent; 

 flowers cream; banks of streams, locally throughout 111., but apparently 

 absent from the n. counties. Aug. -Oct P. crepidinea Michx. 




272 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



60. Hieracium L. — Hawkweed 



1. Plants with stolons and slender rhizomes; leaves oblanceolate, hirsute, all 

 basal; flowers orange; heads 1.5-2.5 cm. broad; fields and meadows, occa- 

 sional, nat. from Eur. Lake Co. June-July. Orange Hawkweed 



H. aurantiacum L. 



1. Plants with short stout erect rhizomes; stolons none; flowers yellow; native 

 species. 

 2. Heads medium or small, 1-2 cm. in diameter; leaves entire or denticulate. 

 3. Leaves and lower part of stem densely long villous-hirsute with brown- 

 ish or whitish hairs 1-2 cm. long; achenes fusiform; fields and open 



woods, local. July-Sept H. longipilum Torr. 



3. Leaves and stem with shorter pubescence. 



4. Inflorescence leafy-bracted, the heads 40-50-flowered, on stout pedun- 

 cles; achenes columnar, truncate; dry woods and fields, local. Aug.- 



Sept. Rough Hawkweed ti. scabrum Michx. 



4. Inflorescence not leafy-bracted, the heads 15-20-flowered, on slender 

 peduncles; achenes fusiform; dry soil in woods, local. July-Sept. 

 -.H. gronovii L. 



2. Heads large, 2.5-4.5 cm. in diameter; leaves dentate; stem leafy; dry 

 woods and thickets in the n. counties. Aug. -Sept. Canada Hawkweed 

 H. canadense Michx. 



61. Agoseris Raf. 



A. cuspidata (Pursh) D. Dietr. Dry soil in the n. half of the state, local. 

 May-June. [Troximon cuspidatum Pursh; Notbocalais cuspidata (Pursh) 

 Greene]. 



62. Pyrrhopappus DC. — False Dandelion 



P. carolinianus (Walt.) DC. Dry soil, s. 111., extending northw. to Wa- 

 bash and Jefferson counties. May-June. 



63. Taraxacum (Haller) Ludw. — Dandelion 



1. Achenes greenish brown, the beak 8-10 mm. long, 2-3 times longer than the 

 body; heads usually 3-5 cm. in diameter, 150-200-flowered, the flowers 

 orange-yellow; outer involucral bracts reflexed; leaves sinuate to coarsely 

 pinnatifid, the terminal lobe large; waste places, fields, roadsides, lawns, 

 etc., very common; nat. from Eur. Mar. -Nov. Common Dandelion. 



[Leontodon taraxacum L ; L. vulgare Lam.; 7. officinale Weber] 



T. vulgare (Lam.) Schrank 



1. Achenes red or reddish brown, the beak 5-7 mm. long, less than twice the 

 length of the body; heads 2-3 cm. in diameter, 70-90-flowered, the flowers 

 sulphur-yellow; bracts ascending or spreading; leaves deeply pinnatifid, the 

 terminal lobe small; waste places, less frequent than the preceding; nat. 

 from Eur. May-June. Red-seeded Dandelion. [T. erythrospernnim 



Andrz.; Leontodon erythrosperniuni (Andrz.) Eichw.] 



T. laeyigalnm (Willd.) DC. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 



273 




274 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



GLOSSARY 



AcAULESCENT. Stemless or apparently so. 



AcHENE. A small, dry, hard, unilocular, indehiscent, 1 -seeded fruit in which the peri- 

 carp and seed-coat are not fused. 

 AciCULAR. Needle-shaped. 

 AcTINOMORPHlc. Radially symmetrical; regular; capable of being divided vertically 



into similar halves through two or more planes. 

 Acuminate. Tapering at the apex, and ending in a point or angle of about forty-five 



degrees. 

 Acute. Sharp-pointed; ending in a point or angle of about ninety degrees. 

 Adnate. United with a dissimilar part, as the calyx-tube to the ovary, or stamens to 



the corolla, etc. 

 Adventive (adv.). Transient, not native or fully naturalized. 

 Alternate. Any arrangement of leaves or ether parts not opposite or whorled; placed 



singly at different heights on the axis or stem. 

 Annual. Of one year's growth; a plant that completes its life-cycle in one season. 

 Annular. In the form of a ring. 

 Annulus. a ring of thick-walled cells partly surrounding the sporangium of seme 



ferns. 

 Anther. The pollcn-beanng part of the stamen. 

 Antheriferous. Anther-bearing. 



Anthesis. The time at which a flower opens; or the act of expansion of a flower. 

 Apetalous. Without petals. 



Apmyllopodic. With the basal leaves rudimentary or bladeless, as in species of Carex. 

 Apiculate. With a small point or apiculus. 

 Apopetalous. Having the corolla composed of several distinct petals; equivalent to 



the more common term polvpelalous. 

 Aquatic. Living in water; said of plants which live in water, either floating at the 



surface or completely submerged. 

 Anastomosing (veins). Connecting by cross-veins and forming a network. 

 ANDROCiNOUS. With both staminate and pistillate flowers in the same inflorescence, in 



Carex, with the staminate flowers above the pistillate. 

 Arachnoid. Cobwebby; with fine, grayish, entangled hairs. 

 Arcuate. Curved or bent like a bow. 



Areola. A small angular space marked upon a surface; the meshes of cellular tissue. 

 Aril. An appendage or an outer covering of a seed, growing out from the hilum or 



funiculus; sometimes it appears as a pulpy covering. 

 Aristate. Awned; tipped by a bristle. 



Ascending. Growing somewhat obliquely and curving upward. 

 Attenuate. Tapering to a narrow point. 

 AuRICULATE. With ear-shaped appendages (auricles) ; said of leaves having a pair 



of short obtuse projections at base. 

 Awn. a bristle-like appendage. 



AxiAi. (axile). With the [)lacentae in the axis or center of the ovary. 

 Axil. The upper angle formed by a leaf or branch with the stem. 

 Axillary. Situated in an axil. 



Barbellate. With small fine barbs or bristles. 



Basifixed. Attached or fixed by the base, as an anther upon the filament. 



Beak. A narrowed or prolonged tip; applied particularly to fruits and carpels. 



Berry. A many-seed fruit, in which the entire pericarp except the thin outer skin 



(epicarp) is succulent. 

 Biconvex. Convex on both sides; doubly convex, as a lens; lenticular. 

 BiDENTATE. Having two teeth. 

 BiDENTULATE. Minutely bidentate. 

 Biennial. Of two years' duration; a plant requiring two growing seasons to complete 



its life cycle. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 275 



Bifid. Two-cleft. 



Bilabiate. Two-lipped, referring especially to the corolla (or calyx). 



BiPlNNATE. Twice pinnate. 



BiPlNNATlFID. Twice pinnatifid, that is, having the primary divisions of the leaves again 

 pinnatifid. 



Bract. A reduced or more or less modified leaf, usually subtending a flower or a 

 cluster of flowers. 



Bractlet. a small bract, particularly if borne on a secondary axis, as on a pedicel or 

 even on a petiole; a bracteole. 



Branchlet. a small branch or twig. 



Bulb. A short thick bud or modified stem, usually underground, bearing fleshy scale- 

 like leaves that are stored with reserve food. 



Bulbous. Resembling a bulb. 



Bundle-scars. Scars left in leaf-scars at time of leaf-fall by the breaking of the 

 vascular bundles that pass from the stem mto the petiole. 



Caducous. Falling off early, or prematurely, as the sepals of the poppy; in distinction 



from deciduous, or persistent. 

 Calyx. The outer perianth of the flower; a collective term for the sepals. 

 Campanulate. Bell-shaped. 



Cancellate. Marked like lattice, with lines crossing each other. 

 Canescent. With gray or whitish pubescence. 

 CAPlLLAR"i". Fine, slender, hair-like. 



Capitate. Aggregated in a dense or compact head-like cluster. 

 Capsule. A dry dehiscent fruit composed of two or more carpels. 

 Carpel. A simple pistil or a member of a compound pistil; the ovulifeious organ of a 



flower. 

 Catkin. A bracteate, spike-like inflorescence bearing staminate or pistillate apetalous 



flowers ; the catkin falls as a whole. 

 Caudate. Having a tail-like appendage. 

 Cauline. Pertaining or belonging to the stem. 

 Cespitose. Growing in tufts; forming mats. 



Chaff. A small thin scale or bract; particularly on the receptacle of the Compositae. 

 Chartaceous. Papery; having the texture of writing paper. 



Chlorophyll. The green coloring matter of plants, occurring chiefly in chloroplasts. 

 CiLlATE. Bearing cilia, a marginal fringe of hairs. 

 CiLiOLATE. Minutely ciliate. 

 Cinereous. Ash-colored; light gray. 



Clasping (leaf). With the base partly or completely surrounding the stem. 

 Clavate. Club-shaped; gradually thickened upward. 

 Claw. The narrowed base of the petals of some flowers. 

 Cleistogamous (flowers). Small, closed, self-pollinated flowers, as in some violets and 



other plants; they are often underground. 

 Climbing. Said of plants that ascend by means of tendrils, or by twining the stem or 



petiole around a support, or sometimes by other means. 

 Coma. The hairs at the end of some seeds, as in Epilobium, or Asclepias. 

 Complete (leaf). One consisting of blade, petiole, and stipules. 

 Compound (leaf). One composed of two or more leaflets on a common petiole or 



rachis. 

 Concolored. Of one color throughout; not variegated. 

 Conduplicate. Folded together lengthwise. 



Connate. Similar parts fused together, e.g., a pair of leaves united by their bases. 

 Convolute. Rolled up longitudinally. 

 Cordate. Heart-shaped. 

 Coriaceous. Of leathery texture. 



Corm. a short, erect, often globose underground stem. 

 CoRMOSE. Resembling a corm. 



Corolla. The inner cycle of the perianth, composed of petals. 

 Corymb. A flat-topped or convex indeterminate inflorescence with the pedicels arising 



from different points on the axis, the outer flowers opening first. 




276 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



Corymbose (corymbiform). Like a corymb. 



Creeping (stem). Growing along the surface of the ground and rooting from the nodes. 



Crenate. Toothed with rounded shallow teeth. 



Crenulate. Finely crenate. 



CucULLATE. Hooded, or hood-shaped. 



CuNEATE. Wedge-shaped; broad at one end and tapering to a point at the other. 



Cuspidate. Sharp-pointed; ending in a sharp point or cusp. 



Cyme. A convex or flat flower-cluster of the determinate type, the central flowers 



opening first. 

 Cymose. Arranged in cymes; cyme-like. 



Deciduous. Falling off at maturity, or at the end of the season. 



Declined. Bent downward or aside; applied to stamens or style when turned to one 



side of the flower. 

 Decompound. More than once compound. 

 Decumbent (stem). Reclining, but with apex ascending. 

 Decurrent (leaf). Extending down the stem below the insertion. 

 Deflexed. Deflected, or turned abruptly downward. 

 Dehiscent. Splitting open along definite lines at maturity. 

 Deltoid. Triangular, shaped like the Greek letter /\, as in the leaves of species of 



poplar. 

 Dentate. Coarsely toothed, with the teeth directed outward. 

 Denticulate. Minutely dentate. 

 Determinate (inflorescence). One in which the terminal flower is the oldest and 



therefore the first to open, the order of flowering proceeding from the top down- 

 ward. 

 Diadelphous. Having the stamens united by their filaments in two sets, as in almost 



all papilionaceous flowers. 

 Diffuse. Loosely spreading or branching. 

 Dimorphous. Occurring in two forms. 



Dioecious. Having the staminate and pistillate flowers on different plants. 

 Discoid. Resembling a disk; a discoid head (in Compositae) is one without ray-flowers. 

 Disk. A development of the receptacle about the base of the pistil ; the common 



receptacle of the heads of Compositae. 

 Dissected. Divided into many narrow segments. 



Distinct. Separate; not united with parts of the same series; not connate. 

 Divaricate. Spreading; widely divergent. 

 Divided. Separated to the base or to the midvein. 

 Drupe. A succulent mdehiscent fruit with a bony, usually one-seeded endocarp; a 



stone-fruit, like a plum. 

 Drupelet. A little drupe, such as the individual carpels which together form the 



blackberry and similar fruits. 



EcHINATE. Beset with prickles or bristles. 



Ellipsoid. A solid body elliptical m longitudinal section. 



Elliptical. Having the form of an ellipse; nearly oblong. 



Emarginate. Deeply notched at the apex. 



Endocarp. The inner layer of the pericarp. 



Entire. With smooth margins, not toothed or lobed. 



EpigyNOUS. Borne on the ovary; applied to petals and stamens when the ovary is 



inferior. 

 Epipetalous. Borne upon the corolla. 

 Episepalous. Borne upon the calyx. 

 Equitant. Said of conduplicate leaves which alternately enfold each other as in Iris, 



the upper part of the leaf being flat and vertical. 

 Erose. With jagged margin, as if gnawed. 

 Evanescent. Passing away; soon disappearing. 

 Evergreen. Remaining green in Its dormant season; applied to plants whose leaves 



are green throughout the year. 

 Exfoliating. Peeling off in thin layers. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 277 



E.XSERTED. Prolonged beyond the surrounding organs, as stamens from the corolla; 



not included. 

 ExsTlPULATE. Lacking stipules. 



Falcate. Sickle- or scythe-shaped. 



Farinose. Covered with mealy powder. 



Fascicle. A compact cluster or bundle. 



Fastigiate. With stems or branches erect and close together. 



Ferruginous. Rust-colored. 



Filament. The stalk of a stamen, usually bearing an anther at its apex. 



Filiform. Thread-like; slender and terete. 



Fimbriate. Fringed. 



FlMBRlLLATE. Minutely fringed. 



Flabellate. Fan-shaped. 



Flexuous. Having a more or less zigzag form. 



Floccose. With tufts of soft woolly hairs. 



Floret. Individual flower of Compositae and grasses. 



FoLlACEOUS. Having the form or texture of a leaf; leafy. 



Follicle. A simple, dry dehiscent fruit, producing several or many seeds and com- 

 posed of one carpel, which splits along one suture. 



Free. Said of floral organs which are not united with other floral organs. 



Fugacious. Falling or withering away very early; ephemeral. 



Funnelform. Said of a corolla with the tube gradually widening upward into the 

 spreading limb. 



Fusiform. Spindle-shaped, narrowed toward the ends from an enlarged middle. 



Geniculate. Bent abruptly like a knee. 



Gibbous. Swollen on one side. 



GlabraTE. Nearly glabrous, or becoming glabrous. 



Glabrous. Not hairy; free from epidermal hairs. 



Glandular. Bearing glands or gland-like appendages or trichomes. 



Glaucescent. Becoming glaucous. 



Glaucous. Covered with a "bloom"; bluish white or bluish gray. 



Glomerule. An inflorescence condensed in the form of a small head or cluster. 



Glume. A chaff -like bract; particularly one of the two empty bracts at the base of 



the spikelet in grasses, or the single bract of sedges. 

 Glutinous. Sticky; mucilaginous; covered with a sticky exudate. 

 Grain. A dry, unilocular, 1 -seeded, indehiscent, superior fruit of grasses, in which 



the thin pericarp is adherent throughout to the seed; a caryopsis. 

 Granular, Granulose. Composed of or appearing as if covered with minute grains. 

 Gynecandrous. Having staminate and pistillate flowers in the same spikelet, as in 



sedges, the upper flowers pistillate and the lower staminate. 



Halberd-shaped. Hastate. 



Hastate. Halberd-shaped; like an arrowhead, but with the basal lobes pointing out- 

 ward nearly at right angles. 



Head. A type of inflorescence in which numerous small flowers are crowded upon a 

 common receptacle; the inflorescence or capitulum of Compositae; a compact 

 inflorescence. 



Herb. A plant that has no perennial woody stem above ground, thus distinguished 

 from a shrub or tree. 



Hirsute. Pubescent with rather coarse or stiff hairs. 



HiRSUTULOUS. Slightly hirsute. 



HiRTELLOUS. Minutely hirsute. 



Hispid. Beset with rigid hairs or bristles. 



HispiDULOUS. Minutely hispid. 



Hyaline. Thin and translucent. 



HypaNTHIUM. The cup-shaped or tubular receptacle on which the perianth and the 

 stamens are inserted. 



Hypogynium. a structure supporting the ovary in some sedges. 




278 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



Hypogynous. Borne on the receptacle beneath the ovary; said of stamens and petals. 



Imbricate. Overlapping, as shingles on a roof. 



Incised. Sharply and more or less deeply and irregularly cut. 



Included. Not at all exserted or protruded, as stamens not projecting from the corolla. 



Indehiscent. Not opening regularly. 



Indurate. Hardened. 



Indusium. The covering of the sori of some ferns. 



Inferior. Said of an ovary when the other floral parts appear to be inserted upon it. 



Inflorescence. The arrangement of the flowers on the stem. 



Internode. The portion of the stem between two nodes. 



Introduced. Brought mtentionally from another country or region. 



Involucel. a secondary involucre; that subtending the umbellets in the umbelliferae. 



Involucre. A whorl or group of bracts surrounding or subtending a single flower, or 



the collection of bracts aggregated at the base of an inflorescence, as the heads 



of Compositae, or in the umbels of Umbelliferae. 

 Involute. A type of vernation, in which the margins are rolled inward or toward the 



upper side. 

 Irregular (flower). See Zygomorphic. 



Keel. A central dorsal ridge like the keel of a boat; the structure formed by the 

 two lower united petals of a papilionaceous flower; the midvein of a compressed 

 floral bract m grasses and sedges. 



LaciNIATE. Cut into narrow pointed lobes. 



Lanceolate. Lance-shaped; much longer than broad, widening above the base, and 



tapering to the apex. 

 Lanceoloid. a solid body lanceolate in longitudinal section. 

 Leaflet. One of the blades of a compound leaf. 

 Legume. The fruit of certain Leguminosae, a pod formed from a simple pistil, and 



dehiscent along both sutures. 

 Lemma. The lower of the two bracts enclosing the flower in grasses. 

 Lenticular. Lentil-shaped, that is, with the shape of a biconvex lens. 

 Ligulate. Provided with or resembling a ligule. 

 Ligule. a thin, often scarious projection from the top of the leaf-sheath in grasses 



and similar plants; the principal part of the corolla of ray-florets in numerous 



Compositae; the membranous structure on the adaxial surface of the leaf of 



Isoeies and Selaginella. 

 Linear. Long and narrow with nearly parallel margins. 

 Lip. Either of the divisions of a bilabiate corolla; the peculiar upper (apparently 



lower) petal in orchids. 

 LocULE. One of the cavities or compartments of a pistil or anther. 

 Lobe. Any part or segment of an organ; specifically, a part of a petal, calyx, or leaf 



that represents a division to about the middle. 

 Loment. a jointed legume, usually constricted between the seeds, and at maturity 



breaking transversely into 1 -seeded, indehiscent segments. 

 Lunate. Crescent- or half-moon-shaped. 

 Lyrate. Lyre-shaped; descriptive of a pinnatifid leaf having a large, rounded terminal 



lobe, and the lateral lobes becoming gradually smaller toward the base. 



Megaspore. The larger of two kinds of spores of a plant, usually giving rise to a 



female gametophyfe. 

 Membranous. Thin, soft, pliable, sometimes more or less translucent. 

 Microspore. The smaller of two kinds of spores of a plant, usually giving rise to a 



male gametophyte. 

 MiCROspoROPllYLL. A sporophyll that bears microspores. 



MoNADELPllOUS. Said of stamens when the filaments are united into one tube. 

 MoNILlFORM. Resembling a string of beads, as the rhizome of certain species of 



5cu/e//ar(a. 

 Monoecious. Having stamens and pistils in separate flowers on the same plant. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 279 



MuCRONATE. Tipped with a short abrupt point or mucro. 



MuCRONULATE. Minutely mucronate. 



Multiple fruit. A cluster of matured ovaries produced by separate flowers. 



MuRlCATE. Roughened with short hard points. 



Naturalized (nat.). Although not native in the region, growing spontaneously and 



well established as a component of the flora. 

 Neutral. Devoid of stamens and functioning pistil. 

 Nodose. Provided with knots or internal transverse partitions, as the leaves of some 



species of Juticus. 

 Node. The joint of a stem where the leaves are inserted. 

 Nut. An indehiscent, dry, one-seeded, hard-walled fruit, produced from a compound 



ovary. 

 Nutlet. A little nut; one of the achene-like parts of the fruit of Boraginaceae, 



Verbenaceae, Labiatae, etc. 



Ob — . A Latin prefix, usually signifying inversion, as obcordate (inversely heart- 

 shaped), obianceolate (inversely lanceolate), obovate (inversely ovate), etc. 



Obtuse. Blunt, rounded. 



Opposite. Inserted on opposite sides of an axis, as leaves, when there are two at one 

 node. 



Orbicular. Circular; round in outline. 



Oval. Broadly elliptical, with the width more than half the length. 



Ovary. The basal part of the pistil containing the ovules; the immature fruit. 



OvATi;. Having the outline like the median longitudinal section of a hen's egg, the 

 broader end downward. 



Ovoid. A solid body ovate in longitudinal section. 



Ovule. The primordium of a seed in the ovary; the organ which may develop after 

 fertilization into the seed. 



Palet. The upper bract which with the lemma encloses the flower in grasses. 

 Palmate (leaf). Radiately lobed or divided, with three or more veins arising from 



one point. 

 Panicle. A compound raceme. 



Paniculate. Borne in panicles, or resembling, a panicle. 

 Papilionaceous. Referring to the peculiar irregular corolla of many Leguminosae, 



consisting of a lalrge upper petal f standard), two oblique lateral petals (rvings), 



and the two lower ones connivent into a f^eel. 

 Papillose. Covered with papillae, which are small protuberances. 

 Pappus. The modified limb of the calyx in Compositae, forming a crown of variable 



structure at the summit of the achene. 

 Parasite. An organism which derives nourishment from another living organism. 

 Parietal. Borne on or pertaining to the wall of the ovary or fruit. 

 Pectinate. Comb-like; pinnatifid with narrow, closely set segments. 

 Pedate. Palmately divided or parted, with the lateral divisions two-cleft. 

 PeU)ICEL. The stalk of a single flower in a cluster. 

 Peduncle. The primary flower stalk which supports either a cluster of flowers, or a 



single flower. 

 Pellucid. Clear, transparent, or translucent. 

 Peltate. Shield-shaped; said of a leaf when the petiole is attached to the under side 



away from the margin or usually not far from the center. 

 Pendent. Hanging down ; pendulous. 



PeNICILLATE. Bearing a little tuft of hairs, especially at the tip. 

 Perrennial. a plant, or part of a plant, which persists for more than two seasons. 

 Perfect (flower). Having both stamens and carpels; bisexual. 

 Perfoliate. Said of a leaf when the stem appears to pass through its base. 

 Perianth. The floral envelope; a term commonly used when there is no clear distinc- 

 tion between calyx and corolla. 

 Pericarp. The wall of the ripened fruit. 

 Perigynium. The inflated sac (bract) enclosing the pistillate flower in Carex. 




280 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



Perigynous. Boine arcund the ovary and not at its base, as in flowers in which 



perianth and stamens are borne on the rim of the hypanthium. 

 Petal. One of the parts of an apopetalous corolla. 

 Petaliferous. Petal-bearing. 

 Petiolate. Having a petiole. 

 Petiole. A leaf-stalk. 

 Petiolulate. Having a petiolule. 

 Petiolule. Stalk of a leaflet. 

 Phyllopodic. The basal leaves of the fertile stems normally blade-bearing, as in 



species of Carex. 

 Pilose. Pubescent with soft long straight trichomes. 

 PiLOSULOUS. Minutely pilose. 

 Pinna. A primary division of a pinnate leaf. 

 Pinnate (leaf). Compound, with the leaflets on each side of a common petiole or 



rachis. 

 PiNNATIFID. Cleft or divided in a pinnate manner, the sinuses or lobes narrow or acute. 

 Pinnule. One of the smaller subdivisions of the primary divisions of a pinnately 



compound leaf, especially of ferns. 

 Pistil. The ovule-beanng part of a flower, comprising ovary, style, and stigma; con- 

 sisting of a single carpel (simple pistil) or of two or more partly or wholly fused 

 carpels (compound pistil). 

 Pistillate flower. A flower with a pistil but no stamens. 

 Placenta. Any part of the interior of the ovary which bears the ovules. 

 Plano-convex. Plane on one side and convex on the other. 

 Plicate. Folded like a fan. 

 Plumose. Feathery; furnished with long hairs, as the beak of the achene in Clematis, 



or the pappus of some Compositae. 

 Pollen. Microspores, or partially developed male gametophytes, formed in the anthers 



of seed plants; the powdery contents of an anther. 

 Polygamous. Bearing unisexual and bisexual flowers on the same plant. 

 PoLYPETALOUS. With petals separate. 

 Pome. An accessory fruit composed of the pericarp and enlarged receptacle, as in the 



apple. 

 Prickle. A sharp-pointed outgrowth of the cortex and epidermis of a stem or leaf, 



as in rose, blackberry, etc. 

 Procumbent (stem). Trailing on the ground, but not rooting at the nodes. 

 Proliferous. Producing offshoots, sometimes abnormal, as when carpels or stamens 



give rise to leafy shoots. 

 Prostrate. Lying flat on the ground. 

 Puberulent. Minutely pubescent. 



Pubescent. Covered with pubescence, an indument of hairs (trichomes). 

 Pulverulent. Appearing as if covered with powder or dust. 

 Punctate. Marked with small dots or translucent glands. 

 PuncticULATE. Minutely punctate. 



Pungent. Terminating in a rigid sharp point; also of acrid flavor. 

 Pyriform. Pear-shaped. 



QuADRlFOLiATE. Four-leaved. 

 QuADRIFOLIOLATE. Having four leaflets. 



Raceme. An indeterminate inflorescence with pedicellate flowers on a more or less 

 elongated axis. 



Racemose. In a raceme, or resembling a raceme. 



Raciiilla. a secondary axis or rachis; in the grasses and sedges the axis that bears 

 the flowers. 



Rachis. An axis bearing flowers or leaflets. 



Radiate. Spreading from a common center; in the Compositae, a head with ray- 

 flowers. 



Ray. The branch of an umbel; the marginal flowers (ray-flowers) of an inflorescence 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 281 



if differentiated; the strap-shaped part of the corolla of the ray-flowers in 



Compositae. 

 Receptacle. The more or less expanded portion of an axis bearing the organs of a 



flower or the collected flowers of a head. 

 Regular (flower). See Actinomorphic. 

 Remform. Kidney-shaped; having the width greater than the length, and a wide 



sinus at the base. 

 Repand. With a slightly sinuate margin. 

 Reticulate. Net-veined; like a network. 

 Retrorse. Turned backward or downward. 

 Retuse. Slightly notched at the rounded apex. 

 Revolute. Rolled backward from the margin or apex. 

 Rhizome. A more or less elongated, usually underground, horizontal or ascending stem 



modified for food storage and asexual reproduction. 

 Rhombic. Having the shape of a rhomb; oval, but somewhat angular at the sides; 



obliquely four-sided. 

 Rotate, (corolla). Wheel-shaped; with a flat and circular limb, and a very short tube. 

 Rugose. Wrinkled. 

 RuGULOSE. Minutely rugose. 

 Runcinate. Pinnatifid; cut into sharp triangular lobes, the points directed backwards. 



Sagittate. Shaped like en arrowhead, with the basal lobes directed downward. 

 Salverform (flower). With the slender corolla-tube abruptly expanded in a flat limb. 

 Samara. A dry indehiscent, one-seeded, winged fruit, such as that of elm, ash, or 



maple. 

 SAPROPH'iTE. A plant which derives its food from non-living organic matter. 

 ScABRELLOUS. See Scabrid. 

 ScABRID. Slightly rough to touch. 

 Scabrous. Rough to the touch. 



Scale. A term applied to several kinds of small usually appressed leaves or bracts. 

 Scape. A leafless peduncle arising from the ground; it may bear scales or bracts but 



no leaves and may be one- or several-flowered. 

 Scapiform. Scape-like; having the form of a scape. 

 ScAPOSE. Having a scape. 



ScARlOUS. Dry, thin, scale-like; membranous; not green. 

 ScORPlOlD. Applied to inflorescences which are circinately coiled in the bud, unrolling 



as the flowers expand, as in some Boraginaceae. 

 Secund. Turned to one side, as the flowers of an inflorescence. 

 Sepal. One of the parts or lobes of a calyx. 

 Septate. Divided by septa, or partitions. 

 Septicidal. Dehiscing along or in the partitions; said of a fruit that opens between the 



locules. 

 Septum. A partition. 



Sericeous. Silky; pubescent with soft, shining, usually appressed hairs. 

 Serrate. Saw-toothed; having small, forwardly-directed sharp teeth en the margin. 

 Serrulate. Finely serrate. 

 Sessile. Not stalked. 

 Setaceous. Bristle-like. 

 Setose. Beset with bristles. 

 Setulose. Finely setose. 

 Sheath. The basal part of a leaf of a grass; any long and more or less tubular 



structure surrounding an organ or part. 

 Shrub. A woody plant which does not become tree-like and usually produces several 



stems from a common base. 

 Simple (leaf). With the blade all in one piece; not divided into separate leaflets. 

 Sinuate. With a strongly wavy margin. 



SoRUS. One of the fruit-dots or clusters of sporangia on the leaves of ferns. 

 Spadix. a thick or fleshy spike of certain plants, as the Araceae, surrounded or sub- 

 tended by a spathe. 

 Spathaceous. Resembling a spathe; spathe-bearing. 




282 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



Spathe. a large protecting bract, often colored or membranous, enclosmg the flower 



or inflorescence, especially of certain Monocotyledons. 

 Spathiform. See spathaceous. 



Spatulate. Spatula-shaped; gradually narrowed from a rounded summit. 

 Spike. An indeterminate inflorescence with sessile flowers on an elongated axis. 

 Spikelet. a small spike; the unit of inflorescence of grasses and sedges. 

 Spine. A sharp-pointed structure, usually the morphological equivalent of a leaf or 



part of a leaf. 

 Spinescent. Becoming spiny; with short spine-like branchlets. 

 Spinulose. Minutely spiny. 

 Spontaneous (spont.). Growing as native: appearing by itself without having been 



planted. 

 Sporangium. The spore-sac, especially in ferns, in which spores are produced. 

 Sporocarp. a pod-like structure containing one or more sporangia, as in Marsileaceae. 

 Sporophyll. a specialized spore-bearing leaf, usually more or less modified and unlike 



the normal leaves. 

 Spur. A sac-like or tubular extension of some part or parts of the peripnth, usuall> 



nectariferous; a short branchlet with much shortened internodes, usually bearint 



a cluster of leaves. 

 Spurred. Provided with a spur. 



Squarrose. Spreading at the tip, at a right angle or more. 

 Stamen. The pollen-bearing male organ of the flower. 

 Staminate flower, a flower which bears stamens but no carpels. 

 StaminodE. a sterile stamen, or a structure resembling such and borne in the staminal 



part of the flower; in some flowers staminodia are petal-like. 

 Standard. The upper broad petal of papilionaceous flower. 

 Stellate. Star-shaped; said of trichomas with radiating branches, or of a cluster of 



radiating trichomes. 

 Stigma. The part of the pistil, usually the apex, which receives pollen and upon which 



pollen grains germinate. 

 Stipe. The stalk of a pistil or similar organ. 

 Stipel. a minute stipule on the petiolule of a leaflet. 

 Stipitate. Having a stipe. 



Stipule. One of a pair of lateral appendages at the base of the petiole of many leaves. 

 Stipulate (leaf). Possessing stipules. 

 Stolon. In flowering plants, a slender modified stem or basal branch trailing along 



the ground and rooting at the nodes; a "runner. 

 StoloNIFEROUS. Bearing stolons. 



Stramineous. Straw-like, especially of the color of straw. 

 Striate. Marked with fine longitudinal lines. 

 Strigilose. Minutely strigose. 



Strigose. With appressed straight and stiff hairs. 



Style. The usually attenuated part of the pistil between the ovary and the stigma. 

 Sub — . A Latin prefix, usually signifying somewhat, or slightly. 

 Subulate. Awl-shaped; slender, and tapering to a point. 

 Succulent. Juicy; fleshy; soft and thickened. 



Superior (ovary). Borne above the insertion of the perianth and free from it. 

 Sympetalous. Having the petals united into one jjiece by their margins. 

 SyngENESIOUS. With stamens united by their anthers, as in Composifae. 



Tendril. A filiform organ used for climbing, and re[)resenting a modified leaflet, or 



leaf, or stipules, or branch. 

 Terete. Circular in transverse section. 

 Thalloid. Resembling or consisting of a thallus; said of Lemnaceae, a family of 



monocolyledonous aquatic plants distinguished by the absence of a distinct stem 



or foliage. 

 ToMENTOSE. Densely woolly or pubescent; with matted soft wool-like hairiness. 

 TomentulosE. Closely and finely tomentose. 

 ToRULOSE. Diminutive of torose; cylindrical, swelling in knobs at intervals, somewhat 



moniliform, or like a string of beads. 




Jones: Fi.oka or Illinois 283 



Trailing. A plant unable to support itself, prostrate but not rooting at the nodes. 

 Tree. A perennial woody plant, usually with an evident trunk, and attaining a height 



at maturity of not less than five meters. 

 Trichome. An outgrowth from the epidermis of plants, as hair, scale, bristle, or 



prickle. 

 Trifid. Divided into three parts; three-cleft. 

 Trigonal. Triangular; the same as trigonous. 

 Tripinnatifid. Thrice pinnatifid. 

 Truncate. Ending abruptly, as if cut off. 



Tuber. Enlarged, fleshy, underground stem, commonly borne at the end of a rhizome. 

 Tubercle. A small swelling, or a little tuber-like body; the persistent base of the 



style in certain Cyperaceae; the grain-like corky growths on the valves of 



Rumex ; enlargements on the roots of leguminous plants produced by symbiotic 



bacteria. 

 Tuberculate. Having tubercles. 



Tubular (corolla). Prolonged into a tube, without much spreading at the border. 

 Twining. Climbing by twisting spirally around another stem or other support. 



Umbel. An indeterminate inflorescence with branches (rays) arising from a common 



point, resembling the framework of an inverted umbrella; characteristic of the 



Umbelliferae. 

 Umbellate. Borne in umbels. 



Umbellet. a small umbel formed at the end of one of the rays of a compound umbel. 

 Undulate. With wavy surface or margin. 

 Unisexual. Of one sex, either staminate or pistillate. 

 Urceolate. Urn-shaped; ovoid or shortly cylindrical and contracted or constricted 



at the mouth. 

 Utricle. A fruit consisting of a single seed enveloped in a thin pericarp and enclosed 



by the persistent caljTC. 



Valve. The pieces into which a capsule splits or divides; of anthers which open by 



flaps or lids; the three inner accrescent sepals of Rumex. 

 Velutinous. Velvety. 

 Venation. Arrangement of veins. 

 Vernation. The arrangement of leaves in bud. 



Versatile. Attached by the middle so as to swing freely, as an anther. 

 Verticillate. Arranged in a whorl. 



Villous. Provided with long and soft, not matted, hairs; shaggy. 

 ViLLOSULOUS. Minutely villous. 



\'lRG.\TE. Wand-like; with straight, stiff, erect branches. 

 Viscid. Clammy; sticky; glutinous. 



Whorl. An arrangement of three or more leaves or other organs in a circle around 



the axis. 

 Zycomorphic. Bilaterally symmetrical; irregular; applied to flowers capable of being 



bisected into similar halves along only one plane. 




284 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



BIBLIOGRAPHY 



This is a list of the more important taxonomic articles dealing particularly with the 

 flora (vascular plants) of Illinois. Monographs and manuals are not included. For an 

 extensive bibliography of Illinois botany see A. G. Vestal, A Bibliography of the 

 Ecology of Illinois (Part I) in Trans. 111. Acad. Sci. 27:163-261. 1934; Part II in 

 manuscript. 



Bebb, M. S. 1857-58 — List of plants occurring in the northern counties of the state of 

 Illinois. Trans. 111. State Agr. Soc. 3:586-587. 



1860 — The flora of Ogle and Winnebago counties. Prairie Farmer 22:182-183. 



Beck, L. C. 1826-28 — Contributions toward the botany of the states of Illinois and 

 Missouri. Am. Journ. Sci. 10:257-264. 1826; 11:167-182. 1826; 14:112-121. 



1828. 



BogUSCH, E. R. and Ethel Molbv. 1930 — Grasses of Champaign County. Trans. 111. 

 Acad. Sci. 23:104-116. 



BrENDEL, F. 1857-58 — Additions and annotations to Mr. Lapham's catalogue of Illinois 

 plants. Trans. 111. State Agr. Soc. 3:583-585. 



• The trees and shrubs in Illinois. Op cit. 588-604. 



The oaks of Illinois. Op. cit. 605-631. 



1860 — Notices and additions to Illinois flora. Prairie Farmer 22:294-295. 



1887 — Flora Peoriana. 89 pp. Peoria. 



Buhl, C. A. 1934 — Supplement to an annotated flora of the Chicago area by H. S. 

 Pepoon. Bull. Chicago Acad. Sci. 5:5-12. 



Croker, Dorothy M. 1942 — A key to the Illinois species of Solidago. Trans. 111. 

 Acad. Sci. 35:62-63. 



Darlington, H. T. 1923 — The introduced weed flora of Illinois. Loc. cit. 15:171-184. 



Eaton, S. H. 1931 — The ligneous flora of Lawrence County. Loc. cit. 23:149-159. 



Evers. R. a. 1941 — The trees of Adams county. Loc. cit. 34:98-99. 



Engelmann, G. 1843 — Catalogue of a collection of plants made in Illinois and Missouri 

 by Charles A. Geyer. Am. Journ. Sci. 46:94-104. 



Fassett, N. C. 1933. — Notes from the Herbarium of the University of Wisconsin. — ■ 

 [corrections of Pepoon's Annotated Flora of the Chicago Area]. Rhodora 35: 

 199-203. 



Feldman, a. W. 1942 — Trees and shrubs of Champaign County. Trans. III. Acad. 

 Sci. 35:60-61. 



Fernald, Evelyn I. 1940 — Preliminary check list of herbaceous plants of Winnebago 

 County. 45 pp. (Mimeographed). Rockford, 111. 



Flagg, W. C. 1878 — Catalogue of the flowering and the higher flowerless plants of 

 Illinois. Rept. III. Industr. Univ. 9:221-297. 



Fuller, G. D. 1943 A preliminary check list of the vascular plants ol Sangamon 

 County. Trans. III. Acad. Sci. 36:91-99. 



1925 — The vegetation of the Chicago region. 27 p[). University of Chicago Press. 



, G. M. Link. & A. J. Toma.sek. 1942 — Forest Trees of Illinois. Revised edit. 



70 pp. Springfield, 111. 



Gates, F. C. 1923 — Contributions to the flora of Cass County. Trans. III. Acad. Sci. 

 15:165-170. 



1925 — Contributions to the flora of Hancock County. Loc. cit. 18:225-234. 



Glassman, S. 1942 — A taxonomic study of the Illinois species of Rumex. Loc. cit. 



35:63-65. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 285 



Gleason, H. a. 1923 — The vegetalional history of the Middle West. Ann. Assoc. Am. 

 Geogr. 12:39-85. 



Greene, E. L. 1869 — The botany of central Illinois. Am. Nat. 3:5-8. 



HiCLEY, W. K. & C. S. Raddin. 1891 — The flora of Cook County. Bull. Chicago 

 Acad. Sci. 2: no. I, 168 pp. 



Hill, E. J. 1912— The fern flora of lUmois. Fern Bull 20:33-43. 



Jones, G. N. 1942 — A checklist of the vascular plants of the University of Illinois 

 woodlands. Trans. 111. Acad. Sci. 35:71-72. 



LaPHAM, I. A. 1856-57. — Catalogue of the plants of the state of Illinois. Trans. III. 

 State Agr. Sec. 2:492-550. 



1856-57 — The native, naturalized, and cultivated grasses of the state of Illinois. 



Loc. cit.: 551-613. 



Miller, R. B. & L. R. Teiion. 1929 — The native and naturalized trees of Illinois. 

 III. State Nat. Hist. Surv. Bull. 18:1-339. 



MosHER, Edna. 1918 — The grasses of Illinois. Univ. III. Agr. Exp. Sta. Bull. 

 15:257-425. 



Palmer, E. J. 1921 — Botanical reconnaissance of southern Illinois. Jour. Arnold Arb. 

 2:129-153. 



Patterson, H. N. 1874 — A list cf plants collected in the viciniily of Oquawka, Hen- 

 derson County, 18 pp. 



1876 — Catalogue of the phaenogamous and vascular cryptogamous plants of 



Illinois, 54 pp. 



Pearsall, Gordon S. 1940 — List of the fauna and flora of the Forest Preserve, 

 District of Cook County, 36 pp. 



Peattie, D. C. 1922 — The Atlantic coastal plain element in the flora of the Great 

 Lakes. Rhodora 24:57-70; 80-88. 



Pepoon. H. S. 1927 — An annotated flora of the Chicago area. Chicago Acad. Sci. 

 Bull. 8:1-554. 



RiDGV.'AY, R. 1928 — The ligneous flora of Richland County. Trans. III. Acad. Sci. 

 20:105-115. 



Robertson, C. 1928 — Flowers and Insects. 221 pp. Science Printing Co., Lancaster, 

 Pa. 



ScHNECK, J. 1876 — Catalogue of the flora of the Wabash Valley. Geol. Surv. Indiana 

 Ann. Rept. 7:504-579. 



Smith, Isabel. 1909 — Native trees of Morgan County. Trans. III. Acad. Sci. 2:15-18. 



Steagall, Mary M. 1927 — Some Illinois Ozark ferns in relation to soil acidity. Trans. 

 111. Acad. Sci. 19:113-136. 



Stover, E. L. 1930 — A mesophytic ravine. Rocky Branch. Bull of the Eastern 111. 

 State Teachers Coll., Charleston. 110:1-26. 



Thone, F. 1925 — Preliminary check list of the vascular plants of Illinois Stat: Park 

 at Starved Rock, La Salie Co. Trans. 111. Acad. Sci. 17:100-106. 



Vasey, G. 1859-60--Additions to the flora of Illinois. Trans. 111. State Agr. Soc. 

 4:667-671. 



Vestal, A. G. 1931 — A preliminary vegetation map of Illinois. Trans. 111. Acad. Sci. 

 23:204-217. 



1934 — A bibliography of the ecology of Illinois. Loc. cit. 27:163-261. 



Voss, J. 1935 — Actinea herhacea. Torreya 35:61-62. 




286 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



TAXONOMIC MONOGRAPHS AND REVISIONS 



The following list of taxonomic monographs and revisions includes those that are of 

 value to students of the vascular plants of Illinois and adjacent areas. When the latest 

 definitive monograph of a group is listed, earlier works often are not mentioned, since it 

 is usually possible to trace these, if necessary, through the monograph cited. For con- 

 venience, an author-index is appended. 



Spermatophyta 



Aceraceae 



Pax, F., Aceraceae, Das Pflanzenr. IV. 163:1-89. 1902.— Rousseau, J., Histoire 

 de la nomenclature de VAcer saccharophorum, Contrib. Inst. Bot. Univ. Montreal 

 35:1-66. 1940. 



Aizoaceae 



Wilson, P., Teiragoniaceae [Aizoaceae], N. Am. Fl. 21:267-277. 1932.— Pax, 

 F. & K. Hoffmann, Aizoaceae, in Engler & PrantI, Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 2 ed. 16c: 

 179-233. 1930. 



Alismaceae 

 Buchenau, Fr., Alismalaceae, Das Pflanzenr. IV. 15:1-66. 1903. — Small, J. K., 

 Alismaceae, N. Am. Fl. 17:43-62. 1909. — Samuelsson, G., Die Arten der Gattung 

 AUsma, Arkiv f5r Bot. 24:1-46. 1932. 



Amaranthaceae 

 Standley, p. C, Amaranthaceae, N. Am. Fl. 21:95-169. 191 7.— ScHINZ, H., 

 Amaranthaceae, in Engler & PrantI, Die Nat. Pflanzenf., 2 ed. 16c:7-85. 1934. 



Amaryllidaceae 

 BracKETT, Amelia E., Revision of the American species of Hypoxis, Rhodora 25: 

 120-147. 1923. — Pax, F. & K. Hoffmann, AmarxilUdaceae in Engler & PrantI, Die 

 Nat Pflanzenf., 2 ed. 15a:391-431. 1930. 



Anacardiaceae 

 Barkley, F. a., a monographic study of Rhus and its immediate allies, Ann. Mis- 

 souri Bot. Gard. 24:265-498. 1937. 



Apocynaceae 

 Woodson, R. E., A monograph of the genus Amsonia, Ann. Missouri Bot. Gard. 

 15:379-434. 1928; Apocynaceae, m N. Am. Fl. 29:103-192. 1938. 



Aquifoliaceae 

 Loesener, Th., Aquifoliaceae in Engler & PrantI, Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 2 ed. 

 20b:36-86. 1942. 



Araceae 

 Engler, A., Araceae-Aroideae, Das Pflanzenr. IV. 23f: 1-274. 1920. — Fernald, 

 M. L. What is Arisaema Iriphvllnm? Rhodora 42:247-253. 1940. 



Aristolochiaceac 

 Schmidt, O. C, Aristolochiaceac in Engler & PrantI, Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 2 ed. 

 16b:204-242. 1935. 



Asclepiadaccae 

 Vail, Anna M., A revision of the genus Acerates in the United States, Bull. Torr. 

 Club 25:30-38. 1898. — Perry, Lily M., Conolohus within the Gray's Manual range, 

 Rhodora 40:280-287. 1938.— Woodson, R. E., The N. Am. Asdepiadaceae, I. Per- 

 spective of the genera, Ann. Missouri Bot. Gard. 28:193-244. 1941. 



Dalsaminaceae 

 Rydberg, p. a. Balsaminaceae, N. Am. Fl. 25:93-96. 1910. 



Betulaceae 

 Winkler, H. Betulaceae, Das Pflanzenr. IV. 61:1-149. 1904. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 287 



Boragmaceae 

 Brand, A., Boraginaceae, Das Pflanzenr. IV. 252:1-183. 1921; 1-236. 1931.— 

 Johnston, I. M., Restoration of the genus Hacl^elia, Contr. Gray Herb. 68:43-48. 

 1923; A synopsis of the Am. native and immigrant borages of the subfam. Boraginoi- 

 deae, op. cit. 70:3-44. 1924. — Mackenzie, K. K., Onosmodium, Bull. Torr. Bot. 

 Club 32:495-506. 1905. — Williams, L. O., A monograph of the genus Mertensia in 

 N. Am., Ann. Missouri Bot. Card. 24:17-159. 1937. 



Burmantiiaceae 

 JoNKER, F. P., A monograph of the Burmanniaceae, Meded. Bot. Mus. Ryks*. 

 Univ. Utrecht 51:1-279. 1938. — Pfeiffer, Norma E., Morphology of Thismia amer- 

 icana, Bot. Gaz. 57:122-135. 1914. — ScHLECHTER, R., Die Thismieae. Notizbl. Bot. 

 Gart. Berlm 8:31-45. 1921. 



Cacfaceae 

 Britton, N. L. & J. N. Rose, The Cactaceae, in Carnegie Inst. Washington, Publ. 

 248, 1:1-236, 1919; 2:1-239, 1920; 3:1-255, 1922; 4:1-318, 1923. 



Callilrichaceae 

 Pax, F., & K. Hoffmann, Callilrichaceae in Engler & Prantl, Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 

 2 ed. 19c:236-240. 1931. 



Capparidaceae 

 Pax, F., & K. Hoffmann, Capparidaceae in Engler & Prantl, Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 

 2 ed. 17b: 146-223. 1936. 



Caprifoliaceae 

 Jones, G. N., A monograph of the genus Symphoricarpos, Journ. Arnold Arb. 21: 

 201-252. 1940. — Rehder, A. Synopsis of the genus Lonicera, Ann. Rept. Missouri 

 Bot. Gard. 14:27-232. 1903. — WiEGAND, K. M., Notes on Triosteum perfolialum and 

 related species, Rhodora 25:199-203. 1923. 



Car\^ophyllaceae 

 ROSSBACH, Ruth P., Spergularia in N. & S. Am.. Rhodora 42:57-83; 105-143. 

 1940. — Pax, F. & K. Hoffmann, Caryophyllaceae in Engler & Prantl, Die Nat. 

 Pflanzenf. 2 ed. 16c:275-364. 1934. 



Celaslraceae 



Loesener, Th., Celaslraceae in Engler & Prantl, Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 2 ed. 20b: 

 87-197. 1942. 



Chenopodiaceae 



Aellen, p., Beitrag zur Systematik der C/ienopoJium-Arten Amerikas, Rep. Spec. 

 Nov. Reg. Veg. 26:31-64, 119-160. 1929.— Aellen, P. & Th. Just, Key and 

 Synopsis of the Am. Species cf the Genus Chenopodium, Am. Midi. Nat. 30: 

 47-76. 1943. — Hall, H. M., & F. E. Clements, The genus Alriplex, Carnegie Inst. 

 Washington Publ. 326:235-346. 1923. — Just, Th., Chenopodiaceae in Deam, Flora 

 of Indiana 418-427. 1940.— Standley, p. C, Chenopodiaceae, N. Am. FI. 21:1-93. 

 1916. — Ulbrich, E., Chenopodiaceae in Engler & Prantl, Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 2 ed. 

 16c:379-584. 1934. 



Cislaceae 



Grosser, W., Cislaceae. Das Pflanzenr. IV. 193:1-161. 1903.— Hodgdon, A. R., 

 A taxonomic study of Lechea, Rhodora 40:29-69; 87-131. 1938. — Janchen. E., 

 Cislaceae in Engler & Prantl, Die Nat. Pflanzenf., 2 ed. 2 1 : 289-313. 1925. 



Commelmaceae 

 Anderson, E., & R. E. Woodson, The species of Tradescanlia indigenous to the 

 U. S. Contr. Arnold Arb. 9:1-132. 1935. — Fernald, M. L., The varieties of Com- 

 melina erecia. Rhodora 42:435-441. 1940. — Pennell, F. W., The genus Comn^elina 

 in the U. S., Bull. Torr. Bot. Club 43:96-111. 1916. 



Composilae 

 Cronquist, a.. The separation of Erigeron from Con^za. Bull. Torr. Bot. Club 

 70:629-632. 1943. — Fernald, M. L., TT>e dwarf Antennarias of n.e. Am., Rhodora 

 26:95-102. 1924; Taraxacum in e. N. Am., loc. cit. 35:369-386. 1933.— A synopsis 




288 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



of Bohonia, loc. cit. 42:482-492. 1940. — Friesner, R. C, The genus Solidago in n.e. 

 N. Am., Butler Univ. Bol. Studies 3:1-64. 1933. — Gleason, H. A., Vernonieae, 

 N. Am. FI. 33:47-110. 1922.— Greene, E. L., Anlerwaria in the Middle West, 

 Am. Midi. Nat. 2:73-90. 1911.— Greenman, J. M., Monograph of the N. & 

 Centr. Am. species of the genus Senecio, Ann. Missouri Bot. Gard. 2:573-626. 1915, 

 3:85-194. 1916. — Hall, H. M., & F. E. Clements, The genus Artemisia, Carnegie 

 Inst. Washington Publ. 326:31-156. l923.--MiLLSPAUGH, C. F., & E. E. Sherff, 

 Xanthium. N. Am. FI. 33:37-44. 1922.— Pkrry, Lily M., Notes on Silphiiim, Rhodora 

 39:281-297. 1937. — Petrak, F., Die nordamerikanischen Arten der Gattung Cirsium, 

 Bot. Centralbl. Beihefte 35:223-567. 191 7.— PoPHAM, R. A., A key to the genera 

 of the Compositales of n.e. N. Am.. Ohio Biol. Surv. Bull. 7:103-129. 1941.— RvD- 

 BERG, P. A., CarJuaceae : Helenieac, N. Am. FI. 34:1-75. 1914; Tageieae, op. cit. 

 81-180. 1915; Anlhemideae, op. cit. 181-288. 1916; Amhrosiaceae, Carduaceae, loc. cit. 

 33:1-37. 1922.— St. John, H., & D. White, The genus Calimoga in N. Am., Rho- 

 dora 22:97-101. 1920. — Sharp, W. M., A critical study of certain epappose genera 

 [incl. Ralihida, Echinacea, Balsamorhiza, et al.] of the H ehaulheae-V erhesinineae, Ann. 

 Missouri Bot. Gard. 22:51-152. 1935.— Sherff, E. E., The N. Am. species of 

 Taraxacum, Bot. Gaz. 70:329-359. 1920; The genus Bidens, Publ. Field Mus. 

 Nat. Hist. Bot. Series 16:1 709. 1937; Revision of the genus Coreopsis, loc. cit. 11: 

 279-475. 1936. — Shinners, L. H., The genus Aster in Wisconsin, Am. Midi. Nat. 

 26:398-420. 1941.— A revision of the Lialris scariosa complex, loc. cit. 29:27-41. 1943. 

 — Standley, P. C A revision of the cichoriacrous genera Krigia, Cxjnthia, and 

 Adopogon, Contr. U. S. Nat. Herb. 13:351-358. 191 1 .— Steyermark, J. A., 

 A monograph of the N. Am. species of Crindclia, Ann. Missouri Bot. Gard. 

 21 :433-608. 1934. — Watson, E. E., Contributions to a monograph of the genus 

 H"lia„tlms, Papers Michigan Acad. Sci. 9:305-475. 1929.— Widder, F. J., Die Arten 

 der Gattung Xanthium, Rep. Spec. Nov. Reg. Veg. Beihefte 20:1-222. 1923. — WlE- 

 cand, K. M., Eupatorium purpureum and itb allies, Rhodora 22:57-70. 1920; Aster 

 laetiflorus and some of its relatives, loc. cit. 30:161-179. 1928; Aster paniculalus and 

 some of its relatives, loc. cit. 35:16-38. 1933. — WiEGAND, K. M., & C. A. Weather- 

 BY, The nomenclature of the verticillate Eupatoria, loc. cit. 39:297-306. 1937. 



Con\wh'ulaceae 



House, H. D., Studies in the N. Am. ConYohulaceae. Bull. Torr. Bot. Club 34: 

 143-149. 1907; loc. cit. 36:595-603. 1909; The N. Am. species of the genus Ipomaea. 

 Ann. New York Acad. Sci. 18:181-263 1908.- Tryon, R. M., The varieties of 

 Convolvulus spithamaeus and of C. sepium. Rhodora 41:415-423. 1939. YuNCKER, T. 

 G., The Convolvulaceae of Indiana, Proc. Indiana Acad. Sci. 1922:273-280. 1923; 

 Revision of the N. Am. and West Indian species of Cuscuta, Univ. of Illinois Biol. 

 Monogr. 6:1-141. 1921; The genus Cuscuta, Mem. Torr. Bot. Club 18:113-331. 1932. 



Cornaceae 



Wangerin, W., Nyssaceae [Cornaceae]. Das Pflanzenr. IV'. 56a : 1 -20. 1910; 

 Cor;icjccae loc. cit. 1-110. 



Crassulaceae 



Berger, a., Crassulaceae in Engler & Prantl, Die Nat. F^flanzenf. 2 ed. 18a: 

 352-483. 1930. -Britton, N. L., & J. N. Rose, Crassulaceae, N. Am. FI. 22:1-1 A. 

 1905.— Rydberg. p. a., Penlboraceac, N. Am. FI. 22:75. 1905. 



Criici/erae 

 Bailey, L. II., The cultivated brassicas, Gentes Herb. 1:53-108. 1922; loc. cit. 2: 

 211-267. 1930.- Deti.ing, L. li.., A revision of the N. Am. species of Descurainia, 

 Am. Midi. Nat. 22:481-520. 1939.— Fern ALD, M. L., Some variations of Ca/('.7e 

 cdentula, Rhodora 24:21-23, ]922;Draba in temperate e. N. Am., loc cit. 36:241-261 ; 

 285-305; 314-344; 353-371; 392-404. 1934.- Hitchcock. C. Leo, The genus Lepid- 

 ium in the U. S., Madrono 3:265-320. 1936. — HoPKlNS, M., Arahis in e. and centr. 

 N. Am., Rhodora 39:63-98; 106-148; 155-186. 1937.— Payson. E. B., A monograph 

 of the genus Lesquerella, Ann. Missouri Bot. Gard. 8:103-236. 1922. — RoLLlNS, R. 

 C Systematic study of lodanthus, Contr. Dudley Herb. Stanford Univ. 3:209-239. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 289 



1942; A monographic study of Arahis in w. N. Am., Rhodora 43:289-325; 348-411; 

 425-481. 1941.— ScHULZ. O. E.. Cmciferae, Das Pflanzenr. IV. 105:1-290. 1919; 

 1-100. 1923; 1-388. 1924; 1-396. 1927; also in Enaler & Ptantl, Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 



2 ed. 17b:227-658. 1936. 



Cucurbitaceae 

 Bailev, L. H., Species of Cuciirbila, Gentes Herb. 6:265-322. 1943. 



Cupressaceae 



PiLGER, R., Cupressaceae in Engler & PrantI, Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 2 ed. 13: 

 361-403. 1926. 



C\)peraceae 



Bush, B. P.. The N. Am. species of Fuirena, Ann. Rept. Missouri Bot. Gard. 16: 

 87-99. 1905.— Core. E. L., The Am. species of Scleria. Bnttonia 2:1-105. 1936. 

 — Fernald, M. L., The N. Am. species of Eriophonim, Rhodora 7:81-92; 129-136. 

 1905; Studies in N. Am. species of Scirpus, loc. cit. 45:279-296. 1943. — Fernald, M. 

 L., & Amelia E. Brackett, The representatives of Eleocharis paluslris in N. Am., 

 Rhodora 31:57-77. 1929. — Friedland, S., The Am. species of Hemtcarpha, Am. Jour. 

 Bot. 28:855-861. 1941. — Gale. Shirley, Rhvnchospora, sect. Eurbxinchospora in 

 Canada, U. S. & W. Ind., Rhodora 46 :89- 134 ; 'l59- 197 ; 207-249; 255'-278. 1944.— 

 KiJKENTHAL, G., Cvperaceae — Scirpoideae — Cvpereae, Das Pflanzenr. IV. 20:1-671. 

 1935'. — McGivNEY, Sr. M. Vincent de Paul, A revision of the subgen. Eucvpems 

 found in the U. S., Contr. Biol. Lab. Catholic Univ. Amer. 26:1-74. 1938.— Macken- 

 zie. K. K., C^peraceae—Cariceae, N. Am. Fl. 18:1-478. 1931-1935; Keys to the 

 N. Am. species of Carex, 80 pp.. New York Bot. Gard., 1941 ; N. Am. Cariceae, pi. 

 1-539. 1940. — Svenson, H. K., Monographic studies in the genus Eleocharis, Rhodora 

 31:121-135; 152-163: 167-191; 199-219: 224-242. 1929; 34:193-203; 215-227. 

 1932; 36:377-389. 1934; 39:210-231; 236-273. 1937; 41:1-19; 43-77; 90-110. 

 1939. 



Dioscoreaceae 



Bartlett, H. H.. Dioscoreaceae in the U. S., U. S. Dept. Agr. Plant Ind. Bull. 

 189:1-25. 1910.— Knuth, R., Dioscoreaceae, Das Pflanzenr. IV. 43:1-387. 1924, 

 Dioscoreaceae in Engler & PrantI, Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 2 ed. 15a: 438-463. 1930. 



Droseraceae 

 DiELS, L. Droseraceae, Das Pflanzenr. IV. 112:1-136. 1906; also in Engler & 

 PrantI, Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 2 ed. 17b:766-784. 1936.— Wynne, Frances E., Drosera 

 m eastern N. Am., Bull. Torr. Bot. Club 71 :166-174. 1944. 



£!/afi;iaceae 

 Fernald, M. L.. The genus Elatine in N. Am.. Rhodora 19:10-15. 1917; Elaline 

 americana and E. triandra. Ice. cit. 43:208-211. 1941. — NlEDENZU, F., Elatinaceae in 

 Engler & PrantI. Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 2 ed. 21:270-276. 1925. 



Ericaceae 



Adams. J. E., A systematic study of the genus Arctoslaphylos, Journ. Elisha Mit- 

 chell Sci. Src. 56:1-62. 1940. — Camp. W. H., The g^nus Ca^^lussacia in N. Am. n. 

 of Mexico, Bull. Torr. Bot. Club 62:129-132. 1935.— PoRSlLD, A. E., The cranberry 

 in Canada, Can. Field Nat. 52:116-118. 1938.— RydbERG, P. A., Pvrolaceae, N. Am. 

 Fl. 29:19-32. 1914.— Small, J. K., Monofropaceae, N. Am. Fl. 29:11-18. 1914; 

 Ericaceae, op. cit. 33-102. 



Eriocaidaceae 



Moldenke, H. N., Eriocaidaceae, N. Am. Fl. 19:17-50. 1937. — Ruhland, W.. 

 Eriocaidaceae in Engler & PrantI, Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 2 ed. 15a:39-58. 1930. 



£5ca//oniacerte 

 Britton, N. L., Ileaceae [Escalloniaceae], N. Am. Fl. 22:181. 1905. 



Euphorbiaceae 

 Ferguson, A. M., Crotons of the U. S., Ann. Rept. Missouri Bot. Gard. 12:33- 

 73. 1901. — Pax, F., & K. Hoffmann, Euphorbiaceae in Engler & PrantI, Die Nat. 

 Pflanzenf. 2 ed. 19c:l 1-233. 1941. — Weatherby, C. A., The group of Acahpha 




290 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



virginica in e. N. Am., Rhodora 29:193-204. 1927, also loc. cit. 39:14-16. 1937.— 

 Wheeler, L. C,, Euphorbia, subgenus Chamaesvce in Canada and the U. S., Rhodora 

 43:97.-154; 168-205; 223-286. 1941. 



Fagaceae 

 Dyal, Sarah C, A key to the species of oaks of eastern N. Am., Rhodora 38:53- 

 63. 1936. — Palmer, E. J., The red oak complex in the U. S., Am. Midi. Nat. 27: 

 732-740. 1942.— Trelease, W., The American oaks, Mem. Nat. Acad. Sci. 20:1- 

 255. 1924. 



Ceniianaceae 

 Card, H. H., A revision of the genus Frasera, Ann. Missouri Bot. Gard. 18:245- 

 282. 1931. — St. John, H., Revision of the genus Steeriia of the Americas and the 

 reduction of Frasera, Am. Midi. Nat. 26:1-29. 1941. 



Ceraniaceac 

 Fernald, M. L., Ceranium caroliniarmm and allies of northeastern N. Am., Rho- 

 dora 37:295-301. 1935.— Hanks, L. T., & J. K. Small, Ceraniaceae, N. Am. Fi. 

 25:1-24. 1907. — Jones, G. N., & F. F. Jones, A revision of the perennial species of 

 Ceranium of the United States and Canada, Rhodora 45:5-26; 32-53. 1943. — Knuth, 

 R., Ceraniaceae in Engler & Prantl, Die Nat. Pflanzenf., 2 ed. 19a:43-66. 1931. 



Cramineae 

 Fernald, M. L., Five common rhizomatous species of Muhlenbergia, Rhodora 45: 

 221-239. 1943.— Hitchcock, A. S.. Manual of the Grasses of the U. S., U. S. Depf. 

 Agr. Misc. Publ. 200:1-1040. 1935; Poaceae (Cramineae), N. Am. FI. 17:289-354. 



1931; 355-482,483-542. 1935; 543-638. 1939. 



Crossulariaceae 

 Berger, a., a taxonomic review of currants and gooseberries. New York Agric. 

 Exp. Sta. Tech. Bull. 109:1-118. 1924.— CoviLLE, F. V., & N. L. BritTON, Cros- 

 sulariaceae, N. Am. Fl. 22:193-225. 1908. 



Haloragidaceae 

 ScHlNDLER, A. K., Halorrhagaceae, Das Pflanzenr. IV. 225:1-133. 1905. 



H amamelidaceae 

 BritTON, N. L., H amamelidaceae, N. Am. Fl. 22:185-187. 1905.— Harms, H., 

 H amamelidaceae in Engler & Prantl, Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 2 ed. 18a:303-345. 1930.— 

 Wilson, P., Aliingiaceae, op. cit. 189. 1905. 



Hydrangeaceae 

 St. John, H., A critical revision of Hydrangea arborescens, Rhodora 23:203-208. 

 1922. — Rehder, a., Phdadelphus verrucosus spontaneous in Illinois, Jour. Arnold Arb. 

 2:153-156. 1921.— Small, J. K., & P. A. Rydberg, Hvdrangeaceae, N. Am. Fl. 

 22:159-178. 1905. 



Hydrochariiaceae 

 Marie-VictoriN, P"r., Anacharis canademis, Contr. Inst. Bot. Univ. Montreal 18: 

 1-43. 1931; Les Vallisneries Americaincs, loc, cit. 46:1-38. 1943. Rydberc, P. A., 

 Elodeaceae, N. Am. Fl. 17:67-71. 1909; Hydrocharilaceae. op. ciL 17:73-74. 1909. 

 —St. John, H., The genus Elodea in New Engl., Rhodora 22:17-29. 1920. 



H\)droph\illaceae 

 Brand, A., Hydroplndlaceae, Das Pflanzenr. IV. 251:1-210. 1913.— Chitten- 

 den, R. J., & W. B. TuRRiLL, Taxonomic and genetical notes on some species of 

 Nemophila, Kew Bull. Misc. Inf. 1926:1-12. 1926.- -CoN.'^TANCE, L., The genus N em- 

 ophila, Univ. Calif. Publ. Bot. 19:341-398. 1941; The genera of the tribe H\uJro- 

 phylleae, Madrom, 5:28-33. 1939; The genus Ellisia, Rhodora 42:33-39. 1940; The 

 genus Hydrophyllum, Am. Midi. Nat. 27:710-731. 1942. 



Hypericaceae 

 SVENSON, II. K., Woody Species of Hypericum. Rhodora 42:8-19. 1Q40. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 291 



Illecebraceae 

 Core, E. L.. The N. Am. species of Paronychia, Am. Midi. Nat. 26:369-397. 

 1941. 



IriJaceae 

 Anderson, E,., The problem of species in the northern blue flags. Iris versicolor and 

 [ris virginica. Ann. Missouri Bot. Gard. 15:241-332. 1928. — Foster, R. C. A cyto- 

 taxonomic survey of the N. Am. species of Iris, Contr. Gray Herb. 119:1-82. 1937. 



Juglandaceae 

 Little, E. L., Notes on the nomenclature of Car\}a, Am. Midi. Nat. 29:493-508. 

 1943.— Sargent, C. S., Notes on N.'Am. Trees, if, Car^a, Bot. Gaz. 66:229-258. 

 1918. — Trelease, W., Juglandaceae of the U. S., Ann. Rept. Missouri Bot. Gard. 

 7:25-46. 1896. 



Juncaceae 

 Buchenau, p., Juncaceae, Das Pflanzenr. IV. 36:1-284. 1906. Hermann, F. J., 

 Juncaceae in Deam, Flora of Indiana, 290-302. 1940. — WiEGAND, K. M., Juncus tenuis 

 and some of its N. Am. allies. Bull. Torr. Bot. Club 27:511-527. 1900. 



Labialae 

 BiCKNELL, E. P., The genus Teucrium in the e. U. S., Bull. Torr. Bot. Club. 28: 

 166-172. 1901. — Epling, C, Preliminary revision of Am. Slach^s, Rep. Spec. Nov. 

 Beih. 80:1-75. 1934; A revision of Salvia, subgen. Calosphace. op. cit. 110:1-380. 

 1938; The American species of Scutellaria, Univ. Calif. Publ. Bot. 20:1-146. 1942; 

 — Epling, C, & W. S. Stewart, A revision of Hedeoma, Rep. Spec. Nov. Beih. 

 115:1-49. 1939; A study of P^cnanthemum, Univ. Calif. Publ. Bot. 20:195-240. 

 1943. — Fernald, M. L., The indigenous varieties of Prunella vulgaris in N. Am., 

 Rhodora 15:179-186. 1913. — Hermann, F. J., Diagnostic characteristics in Lycopus, 

 Rhodora 38:373-375. 1936. — Leonard, E. C., The N. Am. species of Scutellaria, 

 Contr. U. S. Nat. Herb. 22:703-748. 1927.— McClintock, E., & C. Epling, A review 

 of the genus Monarda, Univ. Calif. Publ. Bot. 20:147-194. 1942.— Penland, C. W., 

 Notes en N. Am. Scutellarias, Rhodora 26:61-79. 1924. 



Legumuwsae 

 Blake, S. F., Notes on Am. Lespedezas, Rhodora 26:25-34. 1924; — Britton, 

 N. L., & J. N. Rose, Mimosaceae, N. Am. Fl. 23:1-76. 77-136, 137-194. 1928; 

 Caesalpiniaceae, loc. cit. 201-268, 269-349. 1930. — Fassett, N. C, Vicia cracca and 

 its relatives in N. Am., Rhodora 38:187-189. 1936; The leguminous plants of Wiscon- 

 sin, 157 pp., Univ. Wisconsin Press, 1939. — Fernald, M. L., The variations of Latbv- 

 rus palustris in e. Am., Rhodora 13:47-52. 1911; Lathyrus japonicus versus L. mari- 

 timus, loc. cit. 34:177-187. 1932; Some varieties of Lespedeza capilala and L. hirta, 

 loc. cit. 43:572-587. 1941. — Freeman, Florence L., The variations of Psoralea 

 psoralioides. loc. cit. 39:425-428. 1937. — HoPKlNS, M., Cercis in N. Am., loc. cit. 

 44:193-211. 1942. — Larisey, Mary M., Monograph cf the genus Baptisia, Ann. 

 Missouri Bot. Gard. 27:119-244. 1940. — Palmer, E. J., Conspectus of the genus 

 Amorpha. Jour. Arnold Arb. 12:157-197. 1931. — Rydberg, P. A., Psoraleae in 

 N. Am. Fl. 24:1-64. 1919, 65-136. 1920; Fahaceae (Cale^eae). loc. cit. 24:137-462. 

 1929; Genera of the N. Am. Fabacsae. I. Tribe Calegeae, Am. Jour. Bot. 10:485-498. 

 1923, Part II, Ice cit. 11:470-482. 1924. Part III, Tribe Psoraleae, loc. cit. 15: 

 195-203. 1928, Part IV, loc. cit. 425-432, Part V, Astragalus and related genera. 

 Ice. cit. 584-595. 1928, Part VI, loc. cit. 16:197-206. 1929, Pa^t VII, loc. cit. 



17:231-238. 1930, Bull. Torr. Bot. Club 53:161-169. 1926, Part VIII, loc. cit. 54: 

 13-23. 1927, Part IX. loc. cit. 321-336. 1927. Parts X and XI, loc. cit. 55:119-132, 

 155-164. 1928. — Schubert, Bernice G., Desmodium, Preliminary studies I, Contr. 

 Gray Herb. 129:3-31. 1940;— II, loc. cit. 136:78-115. 1941.— Senn, H. a.. Experi- 

 mental data for a revision of the genus Lathxirus, Am. Jour. Bot. 25:67-78. 1938; Ihe 

 N. Am. species cf Crotalaria, Rhodora 41:317-367. 1939. — Shafer, J. H., The 

 American Sennas (Cassia), Torreya 4:177-181. 1904. — Vail, Anna M., A study of 

 the g:nus Psoralea in America. Bull. Torr. Bot. Club. 21:91-119. 1894. 



Lemnaceae 

 Hicks. L. E.. The Lemnaceae of Indiana. Am. Midi. Nat. 18:774-789. 1937.— 




292 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



Thompson, C. H., Revision of ihe Am. Lemnaceae, Ann. Rept. Missouri Bot. Gard. 

 9:21-42. 1898. 



Liliaceae 



Anderson, W. A., Notes on the flora of Tennessee: the £ienus Trillium, Rhodora 

 36:119-128. 1934.— Bailey, L. H., Hemerocallis, Gentes Herb. 2:143-156. 1930.— 

 Barksdale, L., The pedicellate species of Trillium found in the southern Appalachians, 

 Jour. Eiisha Mitchell Sci. Soc. 54:271-296. 1938.— BusH, B. F., The species of 

 Polvgonatum, Am. Midi. Nat. 10:385-400. 1927.— BuTTERS, F. K.., Taxonomic 

 studies in the genus Maianihemum, Minnesota Studies PI. Sci. 6:429-444. 1927. — 

 CoKER, W. C., The woody smilaxes of the U. S., Jour. Eiisha Mitch. Sci. Soc. 60: 

 27-69. 1944. — Gates, R. R., A systematic study of the N. Am. genus Trillium, Ann. 

 Missouri Bot. Gard. 4:43-92. 1917; A revision of the genus Polvgonalum in N. Am., 

 Bull. Torr. Bot. Club 44:117-126. 1917. — Gleason, H. A., The pedunculate species of 

 TriVium, Bull. Torr. Bot. Club 33:387-396. 1906.— Gould, F. W., A systematic treat- 

 ment of the genus Camassia, Am. Midi. Nat. 28:712-742. 1942.— Marie- VicTORlN. Fr., 

 Les Liliiflores du Quebec (Pontederiacees, Iridacees Joncacees). Contr. Inst. Bot. 

 Univ. Montreal 14:1-202. 1929. 



Limnanlhaceae 



Rydberg, p. a., Limnanlhaceae, N. Am. Fl. 25:97-100. 1910. 



Linaceae 

 Small, J. K., Linaceae. N. Am. Fl. 25:67-87. 1907. — Winkler, H., Linaceae in 

 Engler & PrantI, Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 2 ed. 19a:82-130. 1931. 



Lobeliaceae 

 McVaugh, R., Lohelioideae [Campanulaceae : Lohelioideae] , N. Am. Fl. 32A: 

 1-134. 1943; A key to the N. Am. species of Lobelia, Am. Midi. Nat. 24:681-702. 

 1940. 



Loranihaceae 

 Engler, A., & K. Krause, Loranihaceae in Engler & PrantI, Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 

 2 ed. 16b:98-203. 1935.— Trelease, W., The genus PhoraJendron, 224 pp. Univ. 

 Illinois Press, Urbana, 1916. 



Lvthraceae 

 KOLHNE, E., Lylhraceae, Das Pflanzenr. IV. 216:1-326. 1903. 



Magnoliaceae 

 Dandy, J. E., The genera of Magnolieae, Kew Bull. Misc. Inf. 1927:257-264. 

 1927; Key to the species of Magnolia, Jour. Roy. Hort. Soc. 52:260-264. 1927. 



Malvaceae 

 Kearney, T. H., The N. Am. species of Sphaeralcea, subgen. Eusphaeralcea, 

 Univ. Calif. Publ. Bot. 19:1-128. 1935.— MoRTON, C. V., The correct names of the 

 small-flowered mallows, Rhodora 39:98-99. 1937. 



Mart\)niaceae 

 Van EsELTINE, G. P., A preliminary study of the unicorn plants. New ^'ork Slate 

 Agric. Exp. Sta. Bull. 149:1-41. 1929. 



Melastomaceae 

 Fernald, M. L., Rhcxia in n.e. N. Am., Rhodora 37:169-173. 1935. 



Menispermaceac 

 DiELS, L., Menispermaceac, Das Pflanzenr. IV. 94:1-345. 1910. 



Naiadaceae 

 Clausen, R. T., Studies in the genus Naja.s in the n. U. S., Rhodora 38:333-345. 

 1936.— ReNULE, a. B., Najadaceae. Das Pflanzenr. IV. 12 : I -2 1 . 1901 .— TayLOR. 

 N., Naiadaceae, N. Am. Fl. 17:33-35. 1909. 



N^ciaginaceae 

 Heimerl, a., Nvctaginaceae in Engler & PrantI, Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 2 ed. 16c: 

 86-134. 1934. — Standley, P. C, The AlUoniaceae \N\-ictaginaccae] of the U. S., Contr. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 293 



U. S. Nat. Herb. 12:303-390. 1909; AUioniaccae [N^claginaccae]. N. Am. Fl. 21: 

 171-254. 1918; Studies of American Plants: N\]cla§inaceae, Field Mus. Nat. Hist. Publ. 

 Bot. 8:304-310. 1931. 



N^mphaeaceae 

 CoNARD, H. S., The walerlilies: a monograph of the genus Nvmphaea, i-xiii. 1-279. 

 Washington, 1905. — MiLLER, G. S., & P. C. Standley, The N. Am. species of 

 Nxtmphaea, [i.e.. Nuphar]. Contr. U. S. Nat. Herb. 16:63-108. 1912. 



Oleaceae 

 LiNGELSHEIM, A., Fraxincae. Das Pflanzenr. IV. 243:1-66. 1920. 



Onagraceae 



Fernald, M. L. — The identities of EpHobium Uneare, E. deiuum, and E. ciliatum. 

 Rhodora 46:377-386. 1944. — MUNZ, P. A., Studies in the Onagraceae IX, The subgen. 

 Ralmanma, Am. Jour. Bot. 22:645-663. 1935; Part X, The subgen. Kneiffia, Bull. 

 Torr. Bot. Club. 64:287-306. 1937; Part XI, A revision of the genus Caura, loc. cil. 

 65:105-211. 1938; Part XIII, The Am. species of Ludmgta, loc. cit. 71:151-166. 

 1944. — Trelease, W., The species of Epilohium occurring n. of Mexico, Ann. Rept. 

 Missouri Bot. Card. 2:69-117. 1891. 



Orchidaceae 



Ames, O., The genus Habenaria in N. Am., Orchidaceae, fasc. 4, 1910; An enu- 

 meration of the orchids of the U. S. and Canada, i-viii, 1-120. Boston, 1924. — 

 Rydberg, p. a.. The Am. species of Limnorchis and Piperia n. of Mexico, Bull. 



Torr. Bot. Club 28:605-643. 1901. 



Orobanchaceae 

 AcHEY, Daisy M., A revision of the sect. Cvmnocaidis of the genus Orobanche, 

 Bull. Torr. Bot. Club 60:441-451. 1933.— Beck-.Mannagetta, C, Orobanchaceae. 

 Das Pflanzenr. IV. 261:1-348. 1930 —MuNZ, P. A., The N. Am. species of Oro- 

 banche. sect. M\}zorrhizo, Bull. Torr. Bot. Club 57:611-624. 1931. 



Oxalidaceae 

 Knuth, R., Oxalidaceae. Das Pflanzenr. IV. 130:1-481. 1930; also m Engler & 

 Prantl, Die Nat. Pflanzenf. ed. 2. 19a:ll-42. 1931.— Small, J. K., Oxalidaceae. N. 

 Am. Fl. 25:25-58. 1907. — Wiegand, K. M., Oxalis comiculala and its relatives in N. 

 Am., Rhodora 27:113-124, 133-139. 1925. 



Papaveraceae 

 Fedde, F., Papaveraceae. Das Pflanzenr. IV. 104:1-430. 1909; also in Engler & 

 Prantl, Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 2 ed. 17b:5-145. 1936.— HuTCHlNSON, J., Key to Papa- 

 veraceae. Kew Bull. Misc. Inf. 1925:161-168. 1925. 



Parnassiaceae 

 Pace, Lula, Pamassia and seme allied genera. Bot. Gaz. 54:306-329. 1912. — 

 Rydberg, P. A., Parnassiaceae, N. Am. Fl. 22:77-80. 1905. 



Passifloraceae 

 KiLLiP, E. P., The Am. specie? of Passifloraceae. Field Mus. Nat. Hist. Publ. Bot. 

 19:1-331; 335-613. 1938. 



Phvtolaccaceae 

 Heimerl, a., Phvtolaccaceae in Engler & Prantl, Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 2 ed. 

 16c:135-164. 1934.— Walter, H., Phvtolaccaceae, Das Pflanzenr. IV. 83:1-154. 

 1909.— Wilson. P.. Petiveriaceae [incl. Phytolacca]. N. Am. Fl. 21:257-266. 1932. 



Pinaceae 

 Pilger, R., in Engler & Prantl, Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 2 ed. 13:271-342. 1926. 



Plantaginaceae 

 Pilger, R., Plantaginaceae. Das Pflanzenr. IV. 269:1-466. 1937. 



Plalanaceae 

 Glf.ASON, H. a., Plalanaceae. N. Am. Fl. 22:227-229. I9C8. 




294 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



Polemoniaceae 

 Brand, A., Polemomaceae. Das Pflanzenr. IV. 250:1-203. 1907.— Wherry, E. 

 T., The eastern subulate-leaved phloxes, Bartonia 11:5-35. 1929; The eastern long- 

 styled phloxes, loc. cit. 13:18-37. 1932, 14:14-26. 1932; The eastern veiny-leaved 

 phloxes, loc. cit. 15:14-26. 1933; Miscellaneous eastern Polemomaceae, loc. cit. 18: 

 52-59. 1936; The genus Polemomum in America, Am. Midi. Nat. 27:741-760. 1942; 

 Review of the genera Collomia and Cyimnusleris, loc. cit. 31:216-231. 1944. 



Polv^alaceae 

 Blake, S. F., Polvgalaceae. N. Am'.^Fl. 25:305-379. 1924. 



Polvgonaceae 



Holm, Th., Pohgonum : sect. Tovara. Bot. Gaz. 84:1-26. 1927. — NiEUWLAND, 

 J. A., Our Amphibious Persicarias, Am. Midi. Nat. 2:1-24. 1911; sect. Potamocallis 

 in Peattie. D. C., Flora of the Indiana Dunes, 167-169. 1930. — Rechinger, K. H.. 

 The N. Am. species of Riimex, Field Mus. Nat. Hist. Publ. Bot. 17:1-151. 1937. — 

 Small. J. K., A monograph of the N. Am. species of the genus Polygonum, Columbia 

 Univ. Dept. Bot. Mem. 1:1-183. 1895. — Stanford, E. E., The amphibious group of 

 Polygonum, subgen. Persicaria, Rhodora 27:156-166. 1925; Pol\]goniim pennsxtlvaniciim 

 and related species, loc. cit. 173-184; Polygonum hxiJropiperoides and P. opeloiisaniim, 

 loc. cit. 28:11-17; 22-29. 1926; Pohgonum hxidropiper in Eur. and N. Am., loc. cit. 

 29:77-87. 1927. 



Ponlederiaceae 



Alexander, E. J., Ponlederiaceae, N. Am. Fl. 19:51-60. 1937. — Schwartz, O., 

 Pontederiaceae, in Engler & Prantl, Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 2 ed. 15a: 181-188. 1930. 



Porlulacaceae 

 Pax, F., & K. Hoffmann, Porlulacaceae in Engler & Prantl, Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 

 2 ed. 16c:234-262. 1934. — Poellnitz, K., Monographie der Gattung Talinum, Rep. 

 Spec. Nov. Reg. Veg. 35:1-34. 1934. — Rvdberg, P. A., Porlulacaceae, N. Am. Fl. 



21:279-336. 1932.— Wilson. P., Talinum, loc. cit. 21:280-289. 1932. 



Polamogetonaceae 

 AscHERSON, p., & p. Graebner, Potamogelonaceae, Das Pflanzenr. IV. 11:1-184. 

 1907. — Fernald, M. L., The linear-leaved N. Am. species of Potamogelon, sect. Axil- 

 lares, Mem. Gray Herb. Harv. Univ. 3:1-183. 1932. — OcDEN. E. C, The b-oad-leaved 

 species of Polamogeion of N. Am. n. of Mexico, Rhodora 45:57-105; 119-163; 171- 

 214. 1943.— Taylor. N., Zannichelliaceae, N. Am. Fl. 17:13-27. 1909. 



Primulaceae 



Fassett, N. C, Dodecatheon in e. N. Am., Am. Midi. Nat. 31:455-486. 1944.— 

 Fernald, M. L., Primula, sect. Farinosae in America, Rhodora 30:59-77; 85-104. 

 1928.— Pax, F.. & R. Knuth, Primulaceae, Das Pflanzenr. IV. 237:1-386. 1905; 

 ROBBIN.S, G. T., N. Am. species of Androsaceae, Am. Midi. Nat. 32:137-163. 1944. 



Ranunculaceae 



Ben.son, L., The N. Am. subdivisions of Ranunculus, Am. Jour. Bot. 27:799-807. 

 1940; N. Am. Ranunculi, Bull. Torr. Bot. Club 68:157-172; 477-490. 1941; loc cit. 

 69:298-316. 1942.— Boivin, B., Am. Thalictra and their Old World allies, Rhodora 



46:337-377, 391-445, 453-487. 1944.— Drew, W. B., N. Am. representatives of 

 Ranunculus, sect. Balrachium, loc. cit. 38:1-47. 1936. — Drummond, J. R., &t J. 

 Hutchinson, A revision of Isopprum and its nearer allies, Kew Bull. Misc. Inf. 

 1920:145-169. 1920. — Erick.son, R. O.. Taxonomy of Clemalis. sect. Viorna, Ann. 

 Missouri Bot. Gard. 30:1-62. 1943.— Fernald, M. L., The N. Am. species of 

 Anemone, sect. Anemonanlhea. Rhodora 30:180-188. 1928; Ranunculus aborlivus and 

 its e. Am. allies, loc. cit. 40:416-420. 1938. — Hutchinson, J., Key to Ranunculaceae, 

 Kew Bull. Misc. Inf. 1923:81-89. 1923.- Payson, E. B., Tlie N. Am. species of 

 Aquilegia, Contr. U. S. Nat. Herb. 20:133-157. 1919. 



Rhamnaceae 

 Van ReNNSELALR, M., & H. E. McMinn. A systematic study of the genus Ccano- 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 295 



thui. Publ. Santa Barbara Bol. Card, i-xii, 1-308. 1942.— WoLF, C. B., The N. Am. 

 species of Rbammis, Monogr. Rancho Santa Ana Bot. Gard. 1:1-136. 1938. 



Rosaceae 



Bailey, L. H., Enumeration of the Eubati (dewberries and blackberries) native in 

 N. Am.. Gentes Herb. 1:203-300. 1925; The blackberries of N. Am., loc. cit. 2:271- 



471. 1932; The genus Rubm in N. Am., loc. cii. 5:1-228. 1941, 229-462. 1943, 463- 

 588. 1944. — BoLLE, F., Eine iibersicht iiber die Gatfung Ceum, Rep. Spec. Nov. Reg. 

 Veg. 72:1-119. 1933. — Fernald, M. L., & C. A. Weatherby. Varieties of Ceum 

 cmwdense, Rhodora 24:47-50. 1922. — Fernald. M. L., The identities of the sand 

 cherries of e. Am.. Rhodora 25:69-74. 1923. — JoNES, G. N.. A synopsis of the 

 N. Am. species of Sorbus, Jour. Arnold Arb. 20:1-43. 1939; The Am. species of 

 Amelanchier, Univ. Illinois Biol. Monogr. 20: 1945. — Palmer, E. J., Synopsis of 

 N. Am. Crataegi. Jour. Arnold Arb. 6:5-128. 1925. — Rydberg. P. A.. A monograph 

 of the N. Am. Polentilleae, Mem. Dept. Bot. Columbia Univ. 2:1-221. 1898; Rosa- 

 ceae. N. Am. Fl. 22:239-388. 1908;389-480. 1913; 481-533. 1918.— Wiegand. K. 

 M.. The genus Amelanchier in e. N. Am., Rhodora 14:117-161. 1922. — WiGHT. W. 

 F., Native Am. species of Prunus, U. S. Dept. Agric. Bull. 179:1-75. 1915. 



Rubiaceae 

 Standley, p. C., Rubiaceae, N. Am. Fl. 32:1-86. 1918; 87-158. 1921; 159-300. 

 1934. 



Rulaceae 

 Engler. a., Rulaceae in Die Nat. Pflanzenf.. 2 ed. 19a: 187-359. 193 I .— WiLSON. 

 P., Rutaceae, N. Am. Fl. 25:173-224. 1911. 



Salicaceae 

 Schneider, C., Notes on American willows, Bol. Gaz. 67:309-346. 1919; Jour. 

 Arnold Arb. 1:1-32. 1919; 2:1-25, 65-90. 1920; 2:185-204. 1921. 



Sanialaceae 

 PilgER, R., Sanialaceae in Engler & Prantl. Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 2 ed. l€b:52-91. 

 1935. 



Sapoiaceae 

 Clark, R. B., A revision of the genus Dumelia in the U. S., Ann. Missouri Bot. 

 Gard. 29:155-182. 1942. 



Sarraccniaceae 

 Macfarlane, J. M., Sarraccniaceae, Das Pflanzenr. IV. 110:1-38. 1906. — 

 Uphof. J. C. Th.. Sarraccniaceae in Engler & Prantl. Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 2 ed. 

 17b: 704-727. 1936. — Wherry, E. T.. The geographic relations of Sarracenia purpurea, 

 Bartonia 15:1-6. 1933. 



Saxifragaceae 

 Engler, A.. & E. Irmscher, Saxifraga, Das Pflanzenr. IV. 117:1-709. 1916; 

 Saxifragaceae in Engler & Prantl, Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 2 ed. 18a: 74-226. 1930.— 

 Johnson, A. M., A revision of the N. Am. species of the sect. Boraphila, genus Saxi- 

 fraga, Univ. Minnesota Stud. Biol. Sci. 4:1-110. 1923. — RosENDAHL. C. O., A revi- 

 sion of the genus Sullivanlia, loc. cit. 6:401-427. 1927; A revision of the genus Mitella, 

 Engler's Bot. Jahrb. 50:375-397. 1914.— RosENDAHL, C. O., F. K. Butters, & 

 Olga Lakela, a monograph on the genus Heuchera, Minnesota Studies PI. Sci. 2:1- 

 180. 1936.— Small, J. K., & P. A. Rydberg, Saxifragaceae, N. Am. Fl. 22:81-158. 

 1905. 



Scheuchzeriaceae 



Britton, N. L., Scheuchzeriaceae, N. Am. Fl. 17:41-42. 1909. — BuCHENAU, Fr., 

 5c/ieuc/izenaceae, Das Pflanzenr. IV. 14:1-19. 1903. 



Scrophulariaceae 



Grant, Adele L., A monograph of the genus Mimulus, Ann. Missouri Bot. Gard. 

 11:99-388. 1925. — Munz, P. A., The AnlirrhinoiJeae-Antirrhineae of the New 

 World, Proc. Calif. Acad. Sci. (ser. 4) 15:323-397. 1926.— Newsom. Vesta M., A 

 revision of the genus Collinsia, Bot. Gaz. 87:260-301. 1929. — Pennell, F. W., Scro- 




296 American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



phulariaceae of eastern temperate N. Am., Acad. Nat. Sci. Philadelphia, Monograph 

 1:1-650. 1935. 



Simarubaceae 

 Engler, a., Simarubaceae. in Engler & Prantl, Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 19:359-405. 

 1931.— Small, J. K., Simarubaceae, N. Am. Fl. 25:227-239. 1911. 



Solanaceae 



Hitchcock., C. Leo, A monographic study of the genus Lvcium of the western 



hemisphere, Ann. Missouri Bot. Card. 19:179-374. 1932.— RvDBERG, P. A., The N. 



Am. species of Ph\3salis and related genera, Mem. Torr. Bot. Club 4:297-374. 1896. 



— Safford, W. E., Synopsis of the genus Datura, Jour. Washmgton Acad. Sci. 11: 



173-189. 1921. 



Spargantaceae 

 Fernald, M. L., Notes on Sparganium, Rhodora 24:26-34. 1922. — Graebner, P., 

 Sparganiaceae, Das Pflanzenr. IV. 10:1-26. 1900. — Rydberg, P. A., Spargartiaceae, 

 N. Am. Fl. 17:5-10. 1909. 



Staphyleaceae 

 Krause, J., Siaphvleaceae in Engler & Prantl, Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 2 ed. 20b: 

 255-321. 1942. 



Slhracaceae 

 Perkins, J., Slvracaceae, Das Pflanzenr. IV. 241:1-111. 1907. 



Taxaceae 

 PlLGER, R.. Taxaceae, Das Pflanzenr. IV. 5:1-24. 1903; Taxaceae in Engler & 

 Prantl, Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 2 ed. 13:199-211. 1926. 



TaxoJiaceae 

 PiLGER. R., TaxoJiaceae in Engler & Prantl, Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 2 ed. 13:342-360. 

 1926. 



Tiliaceae 

 Bush, B. F., The glabrate species of Tilia. Bull. Torr. Bot. Club 54:231-248. 

 1927.— Sargent. C. S., Notes on N. Am. Tr-es, III. Tilia, Bot. Gaz. 66:421-438. 

 1918. 



T^^phaceae 

 Graebner. P.. T\)pbaceae, Das Pflanzenr. IV. 8:1-18. 1900.— Wilson. P. T\,pha- 

 ceae. N. Am. Fl. 17:3-4. 1909. 



Umbelliferae 

 Coulter, J. M., & J. N. Rose, Monograph of the N. Am. Umbelliferae. Contr. 

 U. S. Nat. Herb. 7:9-256. 1900; suppl., loc. cii. 12:441-451. 1909.— Mathias, Mil- 

 dred, & L. Constance, A synopsis of N. Am. species of Er\^ngium, Am. Midi. Nat. 

 25:361-387. 1941; A synopsis of the Am. species of Cicala. Madroiio 6:145-151. 

 |942._WoLFF. H.. Umbelliferae, Das Pflanzenr. IV. 228:1-214. 1910; 1-305. 1913; 



1-398. 1927. 



V alerianaceue 

 Dyal, Sarah C, Valeriancllu m N. Am., Rhodora 40:185-212; 465-467. 1938. 



Verbenaceae 



Perry, Lily M., A revision of the N. Am. species of Verbena, Ann. Missouri Rot. 

 Card. 20:239-362. 1933. 



Violaceae 



Baird, Viola B., Wild Violets of N. Am. 1-225. Univ. Calif. Press, Berkeley, 

 1942. — Brainerd, E., Violets of N. Am., Vermont Agr. Exp. Sta. Bull. 224:1-172. 

 1921. — Holm, Til, Comparative studies of N. Am. Violets, Beih. Bot. Centralb. 50: 

 135-182. 1932. — Morton, C. V., The genus Hvbanihus in continental N. Am., Contr. 

 U. S. Nat. Herb. 29:74-82. 1944.— ScHULZE, G. K., Morphologisch-systematische 

 Studien Liber die Gattung Hybantlws, Bot. Jahrb. 67:437-492. 1936. 



Viiaceae 

 Bailey, L. 1 1., The species of grapes peculiar to N. Am., Gentcs Herb. 3:151-244. 



1934. 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 297 



Xvridaceae 

 Malme, G. O. a., Xyridaceae, N. Am. Fl. 19:3-15. 1937. 



Zy§oph\}llaceae 



Engler, a., Z\igophvllaceae in Engler & Prantl, Die Nat. Pflanzenf. 2 ed. 19a: 

 144.184. 1931. Vail. Anna M., & P. A. Rydberg, Zvgophnllaceae, N. Am. Fl. 

 25:103-116. 1910. 



Pteridophyta 



Benedict, R. C, OsmimJaceae, N. Am. Fl., 16:27-28. 1909.— Broun, M., Index 

 to N. Am. Ferns, 1-217. Orleans. Mass., 1938. — Clausen, R. T., A monograph of 

 the Ophioglossaceae, Mem. Torr. Bol. Club. 19:1-77. 1938. — FerNALD, M. L., Pol\)- 

 podium virginianum and P. vulgare, Rhodora 24:125-142. 1922; American representa- 

 tives of Aspleinum ruta-muraria, loc. cit. 30:37-43. 1928. — Friesner, R. C, Key to 

 genera of ferns and fern-allies, Butler Univ. Studies Bot. 1:55-60. 1929; Key to 

 species and varieties of ferns and fern-allies of n.e. N. Am., loc. cit. 4:142-162. 1940. 

 — Lloyd, F. E., & L. M. Underwood, A review of the species of L\)copodiiim of N. 

 Am., Bull. Torr. Bot. Club 27:147-168. 1900.— Marie-Victorin. Fr., Les Filicinees 

 du Quebec, Revue trimestnelle Canad. suppl. 9:1-98. 1923; Les Lycopodmees du 

 Quebec, Contr. Inst. Bot. Univ. Montreal 3:1-121. 1925. — PiNKERTON, M. ELIZABETH. 

 Ferns and fern allies of Missouri. Ann. Missouri Bot. Card. 20:45-78. 1933. — Pfeiffer, 

 Norma E., Monograph of the Isoetaceae. loc. cit. 9:79-232. 1922. — Schaffner, J. H., 

 N. Am. species of Eqiiiseium, Am. Fern. Journ. 11:65-75. 1921; Diagnostic key 

 to the species of Equiselum, loc. cit. 22:69-75; 122-128. 1932. — SvENSON, H. K., The 

 New World species of Azolla, loc. cit. 34:69-84. 1944. — Tryon, R. M., A 

 revision of the genus Pieridiiim, Rhodora 43:1-31. 1941. — Underwood, L. M. & R. 

 C. Benedict, Ophioglossaceae, N. Am. Fl. 16:1-13. 19C9. Weatherby, C. A., 



A list of vprieties and forms of the ferns of e. N. Am., Am. Fern Jour. 25:45-51, 



95-100. 1935; loc. cit. 26:11-16. 60-69. 94-99. 130-136. 1936; loc. cit. 27:20-24, 51- 

 56. 1937; A new variety of C\)stopkns fragiUs. Rhodora 37:373-378. 1935; The 

 group of Pol\]podiiim pohpodioides, Contr. Gray Herb. 124:22-35. 1939. — Wherry, 

 E. T., Guide to eastern ferns, (ed. 2) 1-252. 1942. — WiLSON. L. R., The spores of 

 the genus Lvicopodiiim in the U. S. and Canada, Rhodora 36:13-19. 1934. 




Author Index 



AcHEY, Daisy M. — Orobanchaceae....293 



Adams, J. E. — Ericaceae 289 



Aellen, p. — Chenopodiaceae 287 



, & Th. Just — Chenopodiaceae 287 



Alexander, E. J. — Pontederiaceae....294 



Ames, O. — Orchidaceae 293 



Anderson, E. — Iridaceae 290 



, & R. E. Woodson — 



Commelinaceae 287 



Anderson, W. A. — Liliaceae 292 



AsCHERSON, p., & p. GrAEBNER 



Potamogetonaceae 294 



Bailey, L. H. — Cruciferae, Cucurbita 

 ceae, Liliaceae, Rosaceae, Vitaceae 



288, 292, 295, 296 



Baird, Viola B. — Violaceae 296 



Barkley, F. a. — Anacardiaceae 286 



Barksdale, L. — Liliaceae 292 



Bartlett, H. H. — Dioscoreaceae 289 



Beck-Mannagetta, G. — Oroban- 



chaceae 293 



Benedict, R. C. — Pteridophyta 297 



Benson, L. — Ranunculaceae 294 



Berger, a. — Crassulaceae, Grossulari- 



aceae 288, 290 



BiCKNELL, E. P. — Labiatae, Rosa- 

 ceae 291, 295 



Blake, S. F. — Leguminosae, Poly- 



galaceae 291, 294 



BoLLE, F. — Rosaceae 295 



Brackett, Amelia E. — Amarylli- 



daceae 286 



Brainerd. E. — Violaceae 296 



Brand, A. — Boraginaceae, Hydro- 



phyllaceae, Polemoniaceae 



287, 290, 294 



Britton, N. L. — Hamamelidaceae, 

 Escalloniaceae, Scheuchzeriaceae 

 290. 289, 295 



, & J. N. Rose — Cactaceae, 



Crassulaceae, Leguminosae 287, 288, 291 



Broun, M. — Pteridophyta 297 



BucHENAU, F. — Alismaceae, Junca- 

 ceae, Scheuchzeriaceae.. .286, 291, 295 



Bush, B. F. — Cyperaceae, Liliaceae, 

 Tiliaceae 289, 292. 296 



Butters, F. K. — Liliaceae 292 



Camp. W. H. — Ericaceae 289 



Card, H. H. — Gentianaceae 290 



Chittenden, R. J., & W. B. Turrill 



— Hydroiihyllaceae 290 



Clark, R. B- Sapotaceae 295 



Clausen, R. T. — Gentianaceae, Nai- 



adaceae, Pteridophyta 290, 292, 297 



Coker, W. C. — Liliaceae 292 



CoNARD, H. S. — Nymphaeaceae 293 



Constance, L. — Hydrophyllaceae 290 



Core, E. L. — Cyperaceae, Illecebra- 



ceae 289. 290 



Coulter, J. M., & J. N. Rose — 



Umbelliferae 296 



CoviLLE. F. v.. & N. L. Britton^ — 



Grossulariaceae 290 



Cronquist. a. — Compositae 287 



Dandy, J. E. — Magnoliaceae 292 



DetLING, L. E. — Cruciferae 288 



DiELS, L. — Droseraceae. Menisperm- 



aceae 289. 292 



Drew, W. B. — Ranunculaceae 294 



Drummond. J. R., & J. Hutchinson 



— ■ Ranunculaceae 294 



Dyal, Sarah C. — Fagaceae, Valeri- 



anaceae 289, 296 



Engler, a. — Araceae, Rutaceae, Sim- 

 arulaceae, Zygophyllaceae 



286, 295, 296, 297 



, & E. Irmscher — Saxifraga- 



ceae 295 



, & K. KrAUSE — Loranthaceae 292 



EpliNG, C. — Labiatae 291 



. & W. S. Stewart — Labiatae 291 



Erickson. R. O. — Ranunculaceae 294 



Fassett, N. C. — Leguminosae, Primu- 



laceae 291, 294 



Fedde. F. — Papaveraceae 293 



Ferguson, A. M. — Euphorbiaceae 289 



Fernald, M. L. — Araceae, Comme- 

 linaceae, Compositae, Cruciferae, 

 Cyperaceae, Elatmaceae, Gerania- 

 ceae, Grammeae, Labiatae, Leg- 

 uminosae, Melastomaceae, Onagra- 

 ceae, Potamogetonaceae, Primula- 

 ceae. Pteridophyta, Ranunculaceae. 

 Rosaceae, Sparganiaceae 



286, 287, 288, 289. 289, 290, 

 291, 292, 293, 294, 295, 296, 297 



, & Amelia E. Brackett — 



Cyperaceae 289 



, & C. A. Weatherby — Ros- 

 aceae 295 



Foster, R. C. — Iridaceae 290 



Freeman, Florence L. — Legumin- 

 osae 291 



Friedi.AND. S.- Cyperaceae 289 



FriesNER. R. C. — Compositae. Pteri- 

 dophyta 287, 297 



298 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 



299 



Gale, Shirley — Cyperaceae 289 



Gates, R. R. — Liliaceae 292 



Gleason, H. a. — Compositae, Lilia- 

 ceae, Platanaceae 287, 292, 293 



Gould, F. W. — Liliaceae 292 



Graebner, p. — Sparganiaceae, Ty- 



phaceae 296 



Grant, Adele L. — Scrophulariaceae 295 



Greene, E. L. — Compositae 287 



GreeNMAN, J. M. — Compositae 287 



Grosser, W. — Cistaceae 287 



Hall, H. M., & F. E. Clements — 



Chenopodiaceae, Compositae 287 



Hanks, L. T., & J. K. Small — 



Geraniaceae 290 



Harms, H. — Hamamelidaceae 290 



Heimerl, a. — Nyctaginaceae, Phyto- 



laccaceae 292, 293 



Hermann, F. J. — Juncaceae, Labiatae 291 



Hicks, L. E. — Lemnaceae 291 



Hitchcock, A. S. — Gramineae 290 



Hitchcock, C. Leo — Cruciferae, So- 



lanaceae 288, 296 



HoDGDON, A. R. — Cistaceae 287 



Holm, Th. — Polygonaceae, Violaceae 



294, 296 



Hopkins, M. — Cruciferae, Legumin- 



osae 288, 291 



House, H. D. — Convolvulaceae 288 



Hutchinson, J. — Papaveraceae, Ran- 



unculaceae 293, 294 



Janchen, E. — Cistaceae 287 



Johnson, A. M. — Saxifragaceae 295 



Johnston, I. M. — Boraginaceae 287 



Jones, G. N. — Caprifoliaceae, Rosa- 



ceae 287, 295 



, & Florence F. Jones — 



Geraniaceae 290 



Jonker, F. p. — Burmanniaceae 287 



Just, Th. — Chenopodiaceae 287 



Kearney, T. H. — Malvaceae 292 



KiLLiP, E. P. — Passifloraceae 293 



Knuth, R. — Dioscoreaceae, Gerani- 

 aceae, Oxalidaceae 289, 290, 293 



KoEHNE, E. — Lythraceae 292 



KrAUSE, J. — Staph yleaceae 296 



Larisey, Mary M. — Leguminosae 291 



Leonard, E. C. — Labiatae 291 



LiNGELSHElM, A. — Oleaceae 293 



Little, E. L. — Juglandaceae 291 



Lloyd, F. E., & L. M. Underwood 



— Pteridophyta 297 



LoESENER, Th. — Aquifoliaceae, Celas- 



Iraceae 286, 287 



Macfarlane, J. M. — Sarraceniaceae 295 



Mackenzie, K. K. — Boraginaceae, 



Cyperaceae 287, 289 



McClintock, E., & C. Epling — 



Labiatae 291 



McGivNEY, Sr. M. Vincent de Paul 



— Cyperaceae 289 



McVaugh, R. — Lobeliaceae 292 



Malme, G. O. a. — Xyridaceae 296 



Marie-Victorin, Fr. — Hydrochari- 



taceae, Liliaceae, Pteridophyta 



290, 292. 297 



Mathias. Mildred, & L. Constance 



Umbelliferae 296 



Miller, G. S., & P. C. Standley- — 



Nymphaeaceae 293 



MiLLsPAUGH, C. F., & E. E. Sherff 



— Compositae 287 



MoLDENKE, H. N. — Eriocaulaceae— .289 

 Morton, C. V. — Malvaceae, Viola- 

 ceae 292, 296 



MuNZ, p. A. — Onagraceae, Oroban- 

 chaceae, Scrophulariaceae 293, 295 



Newsom, Vesta M. — Scrophularia- 

 ceae 295 



NiEDENZU, F. — Elatinaceae 289 



NiEUWLAND, J. A. — Polygonaceae 294 



Ogden, E. C. — Potamogetonaceae 294 



Pace, Lula — Parnassiaceae 293 



Palmer, E. J. — Fagaceae, Legumin- 

 osae, Rosaceae 289, 291, 295 



Pax, F. — Aceraceae 286 



, & K. Hoffmann — Aizoaceae, 



Amaryllidaceae, Callitrichaceae, Cap- 

 paridaceae, Caryophyllaceae, Eu- 

 phorbiaceae, Portulacaceae 



286, 287, 289, 294 



, & R. Knuth — Primulaceae 294 



Payson, E. B. — Cruciferae, Ranun- 



culaceae 288, 294 



Penland, C. W. — Labiatae 291 



Pennell, F. W. — Commelinaceae, 



Scrophulariaceae 287, 295 



Perkins, J. — Styracaceae 296 



Perry, Lily M. — Asclepiadaceae, 



Compositae, Verbenaceae 286, 287, 296 



Petrak, F. — Compositae 287 



Pfeiffer, Norma E. — Burmanniaceae, 



Pteridophyta 287, 297 



PiLGER, R. — Cupressaceae, Pinaceae, 

 Plantaginaceae, Santalaceae, Taxa- 

 ceae, Taxodiaceae 289, 293, 295, 296 

 Pinkerton, M. Elizabeth — Pterido- 

 phyta 297 



PoELLNlTZ, K. — Portulacaceae 294 



Popham, R. a. — Compositae 287 



Porsild, a. E. — Ericaceae 289 



Rechinger, K. H. Polygonaceae 294 




300 



American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



Rehder, a. — Caprifoliaceae, Hydran- 



geaceae 287, 290 



Rendle, a. B. — Naiadaceae 292 



RoBBlNS, G. T. — Primulaceae 294 



Rollins, R. C. — Cruciferae 288 



RoSENDAHL, C. O. — Saxif ragaceae 295 



, F. K. Butters, & Olga La- 



KELA — Saxif ragaceae 295 



RosSBACH, Ruth P. — Caryophylla- 



ceae 287 



Rousseau, J. — Aceraceae 286 



Ruhland, W. — Eriocaulaceae 289 



Rydberg, p. a. — Caprifoliaceae, 

 Composifae, Crassulaceae, Ericaceae, 

 Hydrocharitaceae, Leguminosae, Lim- 

 nanthaceae, Orchidaceae, Parnassi- 

 aceae, Portulacaceae, Rosaceae, Sol- 

 anaceae, Sparganiaceae 287, 288, 



289, 290, 29], 292. 293, 294, 295, 296 



St. John, H. — Gentianaceae, Hy- 



drangeaceae, Hydrocharitaceae 290 



, & D. White — Compositae.. .287 



Safford, W. E. — Solanaceae 296 



Samuelsson, G. — Alismaceae 286 



Sargent, C. S. — Juglandaceae, Tilia- 



ceae .^ 291, 296 



Schaffner, J. H. — Pteridophyla 297 



ScHINDLER, A. K. — Haloragidaceae. .290 



Schlechter, R. — Burmanniaceae 287 



SCHINZ, H. — Amarantfiaceae 286 



Schmidt, O. C. — Arislolochiaceae 286 



Schneider, C. — Salicaceae 295 



Schubert, Bernice G. — Leguminosae 291 



SciiULZ, O. E. — Cruciferae 288 



SciiULZE, G. K. — Violaceae 296 



Sci IWARTZ, O. — Ponlederiaceae 294 



Senn, H. a. — Leguminosae 291 



Shafer, j. H. — Leguminosae 291 



Sharp, W. M. — Compositae 287 



SllERFF, E. E. — Compositae 287 



Shinners, L. H. — Compositae 287 



Small, J. K. — Alismaceae, Ericaceae, 

 Linaceae, Oxalidaceae, Polygona- 



ceae, Simarubaceae 



286, 289, 292, 293, 294. 296 



, & P. A. Rydberg — Hydran- 



geaceae, Saxif ragaceae 290, 295 



Standley, p. C. — Amaranthaceae, 

 Chenopodiaceae, Compositae, Nyc- 

 taginaceae, Rubiaceae 286, 287, 292, 295 



Stanford, E. E. — Polygonaceae 294 



Steyermark, J. A. — Compositae 287 



SvENSON, H. K. — Cyperaceae, Hyper- 

 icaceae, Pteridophyta 289, 290, 297 



Taylor, N. — Naiadaceae, Polamoge- 



tonaceae 292. 294 



Thompson, C. H. — Lemnaceae 291 



Trelease, W. — Fagaceae, Juglanda- 

 ceae, Loranthaceae, Onagraceae 



289, 291, 292, 293 



Tryon, R. M. — Convolvulaceae, Pteri- 

 dophyta 288, 297 



UlbricH, E. — Chenopodiaceae 287 



Underwood, L. M. & R. C. Bene- 

 dict — Pteridophyta 297 



Uphof, J. C. Th. — Sarraceniaceae....295 



Vail, Anna M. — Asclepiadaceae, Le- 

 guminosae 286, 291 



, & P. A. Rydberg — Zygophyl- 



laceae 297 



Van Eseltine, G. P. — Marlyniaceae 292 



Van Rensselaer, M., & H. E. Mc- 

 MiNN — Rhamnaceae 294 



Walter, H. — Phytolaccaceae 293 



Wangerin, W. — Cornaceae 288 



Watson. E. E. — Compositae 287 



Weatherby, C. a. — Euphorbiaceae, 



Pteridophyta 289, 297 



Wheeler. L. C. — Euphorbiaceae 289 



Wherry, E. T. — Polemomaceae, Pteri- 

 dophyta, Sarraceniaceae 294, 297, 295 



WiDDER, F. J. — Compositae 287 



Wiegand, K. M. — Caprifoliaceae, 

 Compositae, Juncaceae, Oxalidaceae, 



Rosaceae 287, 291, 293, 295 



, & C. A. Weatherby — Com- 

 positae 287 



Wight, W. F.— Rosaceae 295 



Williams, L. O. — Boraginaceae 287 



Wilson. L. R.— Pteridophyta 297 



Wilson. P. — Aizoaceae. Hamameli- 

 daceae, Phytolaccaceae, Portulaca- 

 ceae, Rutaceae, Typhaceae 



286, 290, 293. 294. 295. 296 



Winkler. H. — Betulaceae. Linaceae 



286, 292 



Wolf. C. B.- Rhamnaceae 294 



Wolff. H.^Umbelliferae 296 



Woodson. R. E. — Apocynaceae, As- 

 clepiadaceae 286 



Wynne, Frances E. — Droseraceae 289 



YuNCKER, T. G. — Convolvulaceae 288 




Index of Plant Names* 



Absinth 266 



Abutilon 183 



Acalypha I 74 



ACANTHACEAE 233 



Acanthus Family 233 



Acer I 78 



ACERACEAE 1 78 



Acerates 208 



Achillea 265 



Acmispon 163 



Acnida 121 



Acorus 87 



Acrostichum 38 



Actaea 129 



Actinea 264 



Aclinella 264 



Actinomeris 262 



Acuan 161 



Adders-tongue 33 



Adders-tongue Family 33 



Aclelia 204 



Adiantum 39 



Adopogon 270 



Aesculus 1 79 



Agalinis 230 



Agastache 219 



Agave 96 



Agoseris 272 



Agrimonia 1 5 1 



Agrimony I 5 1 



Agropyron 54 



Agrostemma 125 



Agrostis 57 



Ague-tree 1 34 



Ailanthus 1 73 



AlZOACEAE 123 



Alder 107, 108 



Aietris 96 



Alfalfa 163 



Alisma 45 



Alismaceae 44 



Alliaria 1 40 



Aliionia 122 



Allium 93 



AInus 107 



Aloe 96 



Alopecurus 57 



Alsine 124 



Althaea 182 



Alumroot 145 



Alyssum 142 



Amaranth 121 



Amaranthaceae 121 



Amaranth Family 121 



Amaranthus 121 



Amaryllidaceae 96 



Amaryllis Family 96 



Ambrosia 247 



Amhrosiaceae 242 



Amelanchier 1 54 



Ammannia 1 89 



Ammophila 57 



Amorpha 164 



Ampelamus 208 



Ampelopsis 181 



Amphicarpa I 70 



Amsonia 206 



Am^gdalus 157 



Anacardiaceae 1 77 



Anacharis 46 



Anagallis 202 



Anaphalis 258 



Anchistea 39 



AnJrocera 225 



Andromeda 199 



Andropogon 67 



Androsace 201 



Anemone 131 



Anemonella I 32 



Anethum 198 



Angelica 198 



Aiiisoslichus 233 



Annonaceae 126 



Anoplanthus 232 



Antennaria 258 



Anthemis 265 



Anthoxanthum 62 



An^chia 122 



Aphelion 232 



Apios 169 



Aplectrum 101 



Apocynaceae 205 



Apccynum 206 



Apple 155 



Apple of Peru 224 



Aquifoliaceae 1 77 



Aquilegia 128 



Arabidopsis 142 



Arabis 141. 142 



Araceae 86 



Aralia 194 



Araliaceae 194 



Arbor-vitae 41 



Arctium 268 



Arctostaphylos 200 



Arena ria 124 



Argentina I 50 



Arisaema 86 



* Family names appear in caps and small caps; synonyms are indicated by italic type. 



301 




302 



American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



Aristida 60 



Aristolochia 1 14 



Aristolochiaceae 1 14 



Armoracia 142 



Aronia 1 55 



Arrhenatherum 56 



Arrow-grass 44 



Arrow-grass Family 44 



Arrowhead 45 



Artemisia 266 



Arum Family 86 



Aruncus 149 



Arundinaria 50 



Asarum 1 14 



ASCLEPIADACEAE 206 



Asclepias 206, 208 



Asclepiodora 208 



Ascyrum 183 



Ash 203 



Asimina 126 



Asparagus 94 



Aspen 102 



Asphodel 93 



AspiJium 36 



Asplenium 38 



Asplenosorus 38 



Aster 252 



Astragalus 1 65 



Athyrium 38 



Atragene 132 



Atriplex 121 



Aureolaria 230 



Avena 56 



Avens 151 



Azalea 199 



Azolla 39 



Bachelor's Button 269 



Bacopa 228 



Bald Cypress 40 



Balm of Gilead 102 



Balsam-apple. Wild 241 



Balsaminaceae 1 72 



Dahamiia 266 



Baneberry 129 



Baplisia 162 



Barbarea 1 39 



Barberry Family 133 



Barley 55 



Barlonia 205 



Basil 221 



Basswood 181 



BatodeuJron 200 



Datrachiiim 129 



Bayberry Family 105 



Beaked-rush 74 



Bean 169 



Bearberry 200 



Beckmannia 61 



Bedstraw 236 



Bee Balm 221 



Beech 108 



Beech-drops 232 



Beech Family 108 



Beggar- ticks 263 



Belamcanda 97 



Bellflower 241 



Bellflower Family 241 



Bellwort 94 



Benzoin 1 34 



Berberidaceae 133 



Bergamot Mint 221 



Berteroa 142 



Berula 196 



Besseva 230 



Betula 107 



Betulaceae 106 



Bicuculla 1 35 



Bidens 263 



Bignonia 233 



Bignonia 233 



BiGNONIACEAE 233 



Bindweed 118. 209 



Birch Family 106 



Birch 107 



Birlhwort 114 



Birlhwort Family 114 



Bishop's-cap 145 



Bishop's-weed 197 



Bittercress 141 



Bittersweet 1 77 



Blackberry 152, 153 



Blackberry-lily 97 



Black Cohosh 128 



Black-eyed Susan 260 



Black Gum 194 



Black-haw 237 



Black Medic 163 



Bladdernut 178 



Bladdernut Family 178 



Bladder-pod 143 



Bladderwort 231 



Bladderwort Family 231 



Blazing-star 249 



Blepliar'igloHis 99 



Blephilia 221 



Blilum 119 



Bloodroot 1 35 



Blue Beech 108 



Bluebells 214 



Blueberry 200 



Blue Cohosh 133 



Bluecurls 218 



Blue-eyed grass 97 



Blue-eyed Mary 227 



Blue Hearts 231 



Bluestem 55, 68 



Bluets 235 



Bluevine 208 



Blueweed 2 1 5 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 



303 



Boebera 265 



Boehmeria 1 13 



Bog-rosemary 199 



Boltonia 252 



Bonamia 209 



Boneset 248 



Borage Family 213 



BORAGINACEAE 213 



Botrychium 34 



Bouncing Bet 126 



Bouteloua 61 



Box-elder 1 79 



Brachvactis 257 



Brachyelylrum 59 



Bracken 39 



Bramble 1 52 



Bramia 228 



Brasenia 1 32 



Brassica 1 38 



Brauneria 260 



BreTveria 209 



B istly Aralia 194 



Briza 53 



Bromus 50 



Brookweed 201 



Broomcorn Millet 63 



Broomrape 232 



Broomrape Family 232 



Broom-sedge 68 



Brown-eyed Susan 259 



Bruniera 87 



Brunnichia 1 19 



Buchnera 23 1 



Buckbean 205 



Buckbean Family 205 



Buckbrush 239 



Buckeye 1 79 



Buckthorn 179. 180, 203 



Buckthorn Family 179 



Buckwheat 1 18 



Buckwheat Family 114 



Buffalo-berry 188 



Buffalo-bur 225 



Bugbane 128 



Bugseed 121 



Bulbostylis 72 



Bulrush 73 



Bumeha 203 



Bunchberry 194 



Bunchflower 93 



Burdock 268 



BURMANNIACEAE 98 



Burmannia Family 98 



Bur-reed 41 



Bur-reed Family 41 



Bursa 143 



Bush-clover 167 



Bufter-and-Eggs 228 



Buttercup Family 127 



Buttercup 129, 130 



Butterfly Pea 170 



Butterfly-weed 192, 207 



Butternut 105 



Butferprmt 1 83 



Butterweed 268 



Buttonbush 235 



Bultonweed 236 



Cabomba 1 32 



Cacalia 267 



Cactaceae 188 



Cactus Family 188 



Cakile _ 138 



Calamagrostis 57 



Calaminlha 221 



Calamovilfa 57 



Callirhoe 182 



Callitrichaceae 1 76 



Callitriche 1 76 



Calopogon 100 



Caltha 128 



Caltrop 1 72 



Caltrop Family 172 



Calycocarpum 1 34 



Camas 94 



Camassia 94 



Camehna 143 



Campanula 241 



Campanulaceae 241 



Campanulasirum 24 1 



Campion 126 



Campsis 233 



Camptosorus 38 



Cane 50 



Cannabinaceae 1 12 



Cannabis 1 12 



Caper Family 143 



CapnoiJes 1 35 



Capparidaceae 143 



Caprifoliaceae 237 



Capriola 61 



Capsella 143 



Cardamine 141 



Cardaria 143 



Cardinal-flower 242 



Carduaceae 242 



Carduus 269 



Carex 75 



Carpenter-weed 220 



Carpetweed 123 



Carpetweed Family 123 



Carpinus 108 



Carrion Flower 96 



Carrot 1 96 



Carya 1 05 



Caryophyllaceae 123 



Cassia 1 61 



Castalia 1 33 



Castanea 1 08 



CastiUeja 23 1 




304 



American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



Catalpa 233 



Catchfly 125 



CalhartoUnum 1 71 



Catnip 219 



Cat-tail 41 



Cat-tail Family 41 



Caulophyllum 133 



Ceanothus 180 



Cehaiha 134 



Cedar 41 



Celandine 135 



Celastraceae 1 77 



Celasti us 1 77 



Celtis 11 1 



Cenchrus 67 



Centaurea 269 



Centaunum 204 



Centaury 204 



Centunculus 201 



Ceanothus 180 



Cephaianthus 235 



Cerastium 123 



Ceratcphyllaceae 133 



Ceratophyllum 1 33 



Cercis 161 



Chaenorrhtnum 228 



Chaerophyllum 196 



Chaelochloa 67 



Chaffweed 201 



Chamaecrista 161 



Chamaedaphne 200 



Chamomile 265 



Chamaenerion 190 



Chamacpericlimenum 194 



Chamaesyce 1 75 



Cheat 51 



Checkerberry 200 



Cheilanthes 39 



Cheirinia 1 40 



Chelidonium 1 35 



Chelone 226 



Chenopodiaceae 1 19 



Chenopodium 1 19 



Cherry 1 57 



Chervil 196 



Chestnut 108 



Chicory 270 



Chickweed 124 



Chimaphila 199 



Chloris 61 



Chokeberry 1 55 



Chokecherry 1 58 



Chrysanthemum 266 



Chrysopsis 249 



Chrysosplenium 145 



Chufa 69 



Cichoriaceae 242 



Cichorium 270 



Cicuta 197 



Cimicifuga 128 



Cinna 57 



Cinquefoil 149. 150 



Circaea 192 



Cirsium 268 



Cissus 181 



CiSTACEAE 185 



Cisius 185 



Cladium 75 



Clammyweed 144 



Claytonia ....123 



Cladrastis 1 62 



Clearweed ....1 13 



Clematis I 32 



Cleome 144 



Cliff-brake 39 



Climbing Bittersweet 177 



Clinopodium 22 1 



Clitoria 1 70 



Clover 162, 163 



Clubmoss 32 



Clubmoss Family 32 



Cocklebur 247 



Cocculus 1 34 



Cocloglossum 99 



Coffee-weed 161 



Cohosh 128, 133 



Colic-root 96 



Collinsia 227 



Collinsonia 223 



Collomia 2 12 



Columbo 205 



Columbine 128 



Comandra 1 13 



Comarum 1 50 



Comf rey 21 5 



Ccmmelina 88 



COMMELINACEAE 88 



Compass- plant 259 



COMPOSITAE 242 



Composite Family 242 



Comptonia 105 



Ccneflower 259, 260 



Conioselinum 198 



Conium 197 



Conobea 229 



Conopholis 232 



Conringia 1 40 



CoNVOLVULACEAE 209 



Convolvulus 209 



Coralberry 239 



Corallorrhiza 101 



Coralroot 101 



Coreopsis 263 



Corispermum 121 



CORNACEAE 193 



Corn Cockle 125 



Corn-salad 240 



Cornus 193, 194 



Coronilla 165 



Corydalis 135. 136 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 



305 



Corylus 1 08 



Cota 265 



Cotton Sedge 74 



Cottonwood 101, 102 



Cowbane 197 



Cow-herb 126 



Cow-parsnip 198 



Cow Pea 169 



Crab-apple 1 55 



Cracca 1 64 



Cranberry 200 



Cranberry-bush 238 



Cranesbill -.... 1 70 



Crassulaceae 1 44 



Crataegus 1 55 



Cristatella 1 44 



Crocanlhemum 185 



Cross- vine 233 



Crotalana 162 



Croton - 1 74 



Crotonopsis 1 74 



Crown- vetch 165 



Cruciferae 136 



Cryptogramma 39 



Cryptotaenia 196 



Cubelium 186 



Cucumber Tree 126 



Cucurbita 241 



CUCURBITACEAE 24 1 



Cudweed 258 



Culver- root 229 



Cunila 222 



Cuphea 1 89 



Cup-plant - 259 



CUPRESSACEAE 41 



Cupseed 1 34 



Currant 147 



Cuscuta --.-2 1 



Custard-apple Family 126 



Cvanococcus 200 



C^clachaena 247 



Cycloloma 120 



Cynodon 61 



Cynoglossum 2 1 3 



C\^nox\}lon 194 



C})nlhia 270 



Cyperaceae 68 



Cyperus 69 



Cypripedium 98 



Cystoptens 36 



Dactylis 54 



Dactyloctenium 61 



Dalea 164 



Dandelion 272 



Danthonia 57 



Darnel 56 



Dasiphora 1 5 1 



Dasistoma 23 1 



Das\istoma 230 



Datura 225 



Daucus 196 



Dayflower 88 



Day Lily 93 



Deadly Nightshade 225 



Dead-nettle 220 



Death Camas 92 



Decemium 212 



Decodon 189 



Delopyirum 1 18 



Delphinium 128 



Dennstaedtia 36 



Denslovia 99 



Dentaria 1 40 



Deschampsia 56 



Descurainia 140 



Desmanthus 161 



Desmodium 165 



Dianthera 233 



Diarina 54 



Diarrhena 54 



Dicenfra 135 



Diclfsonia 36 



Didiplis 189 



Diervilla 239 



Digitaria 62 



Diodella 236 



Diodia 236 



Discopleura 197 



Dioscorea 96 



DiOSCOREACEAE 96 



Diospyros 203 



Diplazium 38 



Diplotaxis 1 38 



DiPSACACEAE 241 



Dipsacus 241 



Dirca 188 



Discopleura 197 



Ditremexa 161 



Dock 115 



Dodder 210 



Dodecatheon 202 



Doellingeria 256 



Dogbane Family 205 



Dogbane 206 



Dog- fennel 265 



Dogwood 193, 194 



Dogwood Family 193 



Doll's Eyes 128 



Draba 140 



Dracocephalum 219 



Dragonhead 219 



Dragonroot 86 



Dropseed 59 



Drosera 144 



Droseraceae 144 



Drupaceae 147 



Drvmocallis 1 50 



Dryopteris 36, 37 



Duckweed 87 




306 



American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



Duckweed Family 87 



Dulichium 70 



Dutchman's-breeches 135 



Dutchman's-pipe 1 14 



Dyssodia 265 



Ebenaceae 203 



Ebony Family 203 



Echinacea 260 



Echinochloa 67 



Echinops 268 



Echinocystis 241 



Echinodorus 45 



Echium 21 5 



Eclipia 259 



Eelgrass 46 



Elaeagnaceae 1 88 



Elatinaceae 126 



Elatine 126 



Elder 237 



Elecampane 258 



Elephanfopus 248 



Elephant's- foot 248 



Eleocharis 70 



Eleusine 60 



Ellisia 212 



Elm 1 1 1 



Elm Family Ill 



Elodea 46 



Elymus 55 



Enchanter's-nightshade 1 92 



Epibaleriiim 1 34 



Epifagus 232 



Epigaea 200 



Epilobium 190 



Epipaclis 100 



Epiphegits 232 



Equisetaceae 32 



Equisetum 32 



Eragrostis 53 



Erechtites 267 



Erianthus 68 



Ericaceae 198 



Erigenia 196 



Erigeron 257 



Eriocaulaceae 88 



Eriocaulon 88 



Eriophorum 74 



Erodium 1 7 1 



Eryngium 196 



Erysimum 140 



Erythronium 94 



Escalloniaceae 1 46 



Escallonia Family 146 



Eulophus 196 



Euonymus 1 77 



Eupatorium 248 



Fuphorbia 1 75 



EUPI lORBIACEAE 1 74 



Euthamia 249 



Evening-primrose 191 



Evening-primrose Family 189 



Everlasting 258 



Fagaceae 108 



Fagopyrum 1 18 



Fagus 108 



Falcata 1 70 



False Boneset 249 



False Bugbane 131 



False Dandelion 272 



False Dragonhead ....219 



False Foxglove 230 



False Garlic 93 



False Gromwell 215 



False Indigo 164 



False Loosestrife 190 



False Mermaid 172 



False Nettle 113 



False Pennyroyal 218 



False Rue Anemone 128 



False Solomcn's-seal 94 



Farkleberry 200 



Featherfoil 201 



Fern. Bladder 36 



Brake 39 



Broad Beech 37 



Chain 39 



Christmas 36 



Cinnamon 34 



Cliff 36 



Common Wood 37 



Crested Wood 37 



Family 34 



Filmy 34 



Glade 38 



Goldie's 37 



Grape 34 



Hay-scented 36 



Interrupted 34 



Lady 38 



Lip 39 



Long Beech 37 



Maidenhair 39 



Marginal Wood 37 



Marsh 36 



Mosquito 39 



New York 36 



Oak 37 



Ostrich 36 



Royal 34 



Sensitive 36 



Spinulose Wood 37 



Walking 38 



Festuca 51 



Feverfew 259 



Figwort 227 



Figwort Family 225 



Fihpendula 150 



lihiiy I' em Family 34 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 



307 



Fimbnstylis 72 



Firepink 125 



Fireweed 267 



Flax 171 



Flax Family 171 



Fleabane 257 



Floerkia 1 72 



Flower-of-an-hour 183 



Forestiera 204 



Forget-me-not 2 1 4 



Forked-chickweed 1 22 



Four-o'clock Family 122 



Foxtail 57, 67 



Fragaria 149 



Frasera 205 



Fraxinus 203 



Froelichia 1 22 



Frogbit 46 



Frogbit Family 45 



Frog- fruit 216 



Frostweed 185 



Fuirena 72 



Fumaria 136 



FUMARIACEAE 1 35 



Fumitory 136 



Fumitory Family 135 



Galactia 1 70 



Caleorchis 99 



Gahnsoga 260 



Galium 236 



Garlic 93 



Gaultheria 200 



Gaura 192 



Gaylussacia 200 



Cemmingia 97 



Gentian 205 



Gentiana 205 



Gentian ACEAE 204 



Gentian Family 204 



Geraniaceae 1 70 



Geranium 1 70 



Geranium Family 170 



Gerardia 230 



Geum 151 



Gillenia 149 



Ginseng 194 



Ginseng Family 194 



Glecoma 219 



Gleditsia .161 



Globe-thistle 268 



Glyceria 51 



Glycine 169, 170 



Gnaphalium 258 



Goat's-beard 149. 270 



Goats-rue 164 



Golden-alexanders 197 



Golden-aster 249 



Goldenglow 259 



Goldenrod 249 



Goldenseal 128 



Gonolobus 208 



Conopxirum 1 18 



Good-King-Henry 120 



Goodyera 1 00 



Gooseberry 146, 147 



Gooseberry Family 146 



Goose-grass 236 



Goosefoot 119, 120 



Goosefoot Family 119 



Gourd Family 241 



Gramineae 46 



Grape 180, 181 



Grape Family 180 



Gratiola 228 



Grass, Autumn Bent 57 



Barnyard 67 



Beach 57 



Bent 57 



Bermuda — 61 



Billion-dollar 67 



Blue 52 



Blue-joint 57 



Bottlebrush 55 



Brome 50 



Canada Blue 52 



Canary 62 



Catchfly 62 



Common Crab 62 



Cord 61 



Crowfoot 61 



Cut 62 



Dune 55 



Family 46 



Fescue 51 



Gamma 68 



Goose 60 



Grama 61 



Hair 56 



Hungarian 67 



Indian 68 



Johnson 68 



June 56 



Kentucky Blue 52 



Manna 51 



Meadow 52 



Munro 64 



Northern Reed 57 



Oat 57 



Orchard 54 



Plume 68 



Porcupine 60 



Quack 55 



Quaking 53 



Redtop 57 



Reed 57 



Reed Canary 62 



Rice 60 



Rye 56 



Sand : 54 




308 



American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



Slough 61 



Smooth Crab 62 



Sprangle-top 61 



Squirrel-tail 55 



Stink 53 



Sweet - 61 



Sweet Vernal 62 



Switch - 63 



Tall Oat _ 56 



Tickle 57 



Three-awned 60 



Velvet 57 



Wedge 56 



Wheat 54 



White 62 



Windmill 61 



Witch 64 



Grass-of- Parnassus 145 



Grass-of-Parnassus Family 145 



Gratiola 228 



Greenbrier 95 



Green Dragon 86 



Green Violet 186 



Grindelia 249 



Gromwell 214 



Crossularia 146 



Grossclariaceae 146 



Ground-cherry 224 



Ground-hemlock 40 



Groundnut 169 



Groundsel 268 



Gum weed 249 



Gymnocladus 161 



Habenaria 99 



Hackberry Ill, 112 



Hackdia .2 1 4 



Halerpcsles 129 



Halesia 203 



Haloracidaceae 192 



Hamamelidaceae 147 



Hamamelis 147 



Harbinger-of-spring 196 



Hardback 1 49 



Hartmannia 191 



I lawkweed 272 



Hawthorn 1 55 



Hazel 108 



Heath Family 198 



Hedge-apple 1 12 



Hedge-nettle 220 



Hedge Parsley 196 



I ledeoma 221 



1 lelenium 265 



Heleochloa 59 



Hehanthemum 185 



Helianthus 260 



Heliopsis 259 



Heliotrope 2 1 3 



Heliotropium 21 3 



Hemerocallis 93 



Hemicarpha 72 



Hemlock 40 



Hemlock-parsley 198 



Hemp 112 



Henbit 220 



Hepatica 1 32 



Heracleum 198 



Hercules-club 194 



Heteranthera 89 



Heuchera 145 



Hibiscus 183 



Hieracium 272 



Hierochloe 61 



Hickory 106 



Hicoria 105 



HlPPOCASTANACEAE 1 79 



Hippuris 193 



Hog-peanut 1 70 



Holcus 57, 68 



Holly 177 



Holly Family 177 



Hollyhock 182 



Homalocenchnis 62 



Honewort 196 



Honey Locust 161 



Honeysuckle 239 



Honeysuckle Family 237 



Hop 112 



Hop-clover 163 



Hop-hornbeam 108 



Hop- tree I 73 



Hordeum 55 



Horehound 219 



Horned Pondweed 44 



Horn wort 133 



Hornwort Family 133 



Horse-chestnut I 79 



Horse-chestnut Family 179 



Horse-gentian 239 



Horse-nettle 225 



Horseradish 142 



Horsetail 33 



Horsetail Family 32 



Horseweed 257 



Hosackia 163 



Hottonia 201 



Hound's-tongue 2 1 3 



Floustonia 235 



Huckleberry 200 



Hudsonia 185 



Humulus 1 12 



Hybanthus 186 



Hydrangea 146 



HVURANGEACEAE I 46 



Hydrangea Family 146 



Hvdranlhelium 228 



Hydrastis 128 



HVDROCIIARITACEAE 45 



Hydrolea 213 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 



309 



Hydrophyllaceae 2 1 2 



Hydrophyllum 212 



Hymenocallis 96 



Hymenopappus 264 



Hymenophyllaceae 34 



Hypericaceae 183 



Hypericum 183 



Hypopitys 1 99 



Hypoxis — 96 



Hyssop - - 219 



Hystnx 55 



Illecebraceae 1 22 



Ilex - 1 77 



Il\}santhes 228 



Impatiens 1 72 



Indian Corn 68 



Cucumber-root 95 



Mallow 183 



Paint Brush 231 



Physic 149 



Pipe 199 



Plantain 267 



Turnip 86 



Inula 258 



lodanlhus 1 4 1 



lonactis 256 



lonoxalis 1 7 1 



Ipecac 149 



Ipomoea 210 



Iridaceae 97 



Iris 97 



Iris Family 97 



Ironweed 247 



Ironwood 108 



Isanthus 2 1 8 



hnardia 1 90 



Isoetes - 32 



Isoetaceae 32 



Isopyrum 128 



Italian Millet 67 



Itea 1 46 



lieaceae 1 46 



Iva 247 



Jack-in-the-Pulpit 86 



Japanese Millet 67 



Jeffersonia 133 



Jerusalem Artichoke 262 



Jerusalem Oak 119 



Jewel-weed 1 72 



Jewel-weed Family 172 



Jimson-weed 225 



Joe-pye Weed ...248 



Jointweed 1 18 



Juglandaceae 105 



Juglans 105 



JUNCAGINACEAE 44 



JUNCACEAE 89 



Juncoides 91 



Juncus 89 



Juniper 41 



Juniperus 41 



Jussiaea 190 



Kallstroemia 1 72 



Kentucky Coffee-tree 161 



Kicffxia 228 



Kidney Bean 169 



Kinnikinnick ..200 



Knapweed 269 



Kneiffia 191, 192 



Knotweed 116. 118 



Kochia 120 



Koelena 56 



Koellia .222 



Korycarpus 54 



Kraunhia 1 65 



Krigia 270 



Kuhnia 249 



Kyllingia 70 



Labiatae 216 



Lacinaria 249 



Lactuca 270 



Lady's Slipper 98 



Lady's Thumb 118 



Ladies' Tresses 100 



Lamb's Quarter 120 



Lamium 220 



Laportea 1 13 



Lappula 214 



Larch 40 



Larkspur ....128 



Larix 40 



Lafhyrus 168 



Lauraceae 134 



Laurel Family 134 



Lead-plant 164 



Leaf cup 259 



Leather-flower 1 32 



Leatherleaf 200 



Leatherwood 1 88 



Lechea 1 85 



Leersia 62 



Leguminosae 158 



Lemna 87 



Lemnaceae 87 



Lentibulariaceae 23 1 



Leonurus 220 



Leontodon 272 



Lepachvs 260 



Lepadena 1 76 



Lepidium 143 



Leptamium ; 232 



Lepiandra 229 



Leplilon 257 



Leptochloa 61 



Leptogloltis 161 



Leptoloma 62 



Lepiorchis 100 




310 



American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



Lespedeza 1 67 



Lesquerella 143 



Lettuce 270 



Leucanthemum 266 



Leucospora 229 



Liatris 249 



LiLIACEAE 91 



Lilium 93 



Lily 93 



Lily Family 91 



LiMNANTHACEAE 1 72 



Limnobium 46 



Limnorchis 99 



Limodorum 100 



LiNACEAE 171 



Linaria 227 



Linden 181 



Linden Family 181 



Lindera 1 34 



Lmdernia 228 



Linnaea 239 



Lmum 1 71 



Liparis 100 



Lippia 216 



Liquidambar 147 



Linodendron 126 



Lithospermum 214 



Lizard-tail 101 



Lizard-tail Family 101 



Lobelia 242 



LOBELIACEAE 242 



Lobelia Family 242 



Locust 164 



Lolium 56 



Lonicera 239 



Lophotocarpus 45 



Lopseed 234 



Lopseed Family 234 



Loosestrife 189. 202 



Loosestrife Family 189 



LORANTHACEAE 1 14 



Lotus 1 32 



Lotus Family 132 



Ludwigia 190 



Lupine 162 



Lupinus 162 



Luzula 91 



Lychnis 126 



Lycium 224 



Lycopodiaceae 32 



Lycopodium 32 



Lycopsis 214 



Lycopus 222 



Lysias 99 



Lysimachia 202 



Lytiiraceae 189 



Lythrum 189 



Madura 1 12 



MacuUlamia 228 



Madder Family 235 



Magnolia 126 



Magnoliaceae 126 



Magnolia Family ..126 



Maianthemum 94 



Maize 68 



Malaceae ...147 



Malaxis ...100 



Mallow 182 



Mallow Family 181 



Malus 1 55 



Malva 182 



Malvaceae 181 



Malvastrum 182 



Mandrake ...133 



Manfreda 96 



Maple 178. 179 



Maple Family 178 



Mare's-tail 193 



Marijuana 1 12 



Mariscus 75 



Marrubium 219 



Marsh-elder 247 



Marsh-marigold 128 



Marsilea 39 



Marsileaceae 39 



Marthisia 1 70 



Manila 265 



Martynia 233 



Martyniaceae 233 



Matdea 209 



Matricaria 266 



Matrimony- vine 224 



Matteiiccia 36 



Mayapple 1 33 



Mayweed 265 



Mazus 229 



Meadow-beauty 189 



Meadow-parsnip 197 



Meadow-rue 130. 131 



Meadowsweet 1 50 



Medeola 95 



Medicago 163 



Megalodonta 264 



Meibomia 1 65 



Mcgapleriiim 191 



Melampyrum 23 1 



Mclaiulrium 126 



Melanthium 93 



Melastomaceae 189 



Melastoma Family 189 



Melica 54 



Melilotus 163 



Melissa 22 1 



Menispermaceae 1 34 



Menispermum 134 



Mentha 223 



Meiilhaceae 216 



Menyanthaceae 205 



Menyanthes 205 



Mermaid-weed 193 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 



311 



Merlensia 2 1 4 



Mesadenia 267 



Mexican Tea 119 



Mezereum Family 188 



Micrampelis 24 1 



Micrantbes 145 



Mikania 249 



Milium - 59 



Milk Pea 170 



Milk-vetch 165 



Milkweed 206. 207, 208 



Milkweed Family 206 



Milkwort 1 73 



Milkwort Family 173 



Mimosa - 161 



Mimulus 228 



Mint 223 



Mint Family 216 



Mirabilis 122 



Mist Flower 249 



Mistletoe 1 14 



Mistletoe Family 114 



Mitchella 236 



Mitella 145 



Miterwort 145 



Mockernut 106 



Mock-orange - 146 



Moehringia 124 



Moldavica 219 



Mollugo 123 



Monarda 221 



Moneywort 202 



Monkey Flower 228 



Monotropa 199 



Moonseed 1 34 



Moonseed Family 134 



MORACEAE 1 12 



Morongia 161 



Morus 112 



Morning-glory 210 



Morning-glory Family 209 



Motherwort 220 



Mountam-ash 1 54 



Mountain Holly 177 



Mountain Mint 222 



Mouse-ear Chickweed 123, 124 



Mouse-ear Cress 142 



Mousetail 1 28 



Mud-plantain 89 



Muhlenbergia 58, 59 



Mulberry 112 



Mulberry Family 112 



Mullein 226 



Mullem Foxglove 231 



Muricauda 86 



Muscle Tree 108 



Mustard 138. 139, 140. 142 



Mustard Family 136 



Myosotis 2 1 4 



Myosurus 128 



Myrica 105 



Myricaceae 105 



Myriophyllum 192 



Myzonhiza 232 



Nahalm 271 



Naiad 42 



Naiadaceae 42 



Naiad Family 42 



Naias 42 



Nannyberry 237 



Napaea 182 



Nasturtium 142 



Negundo 1 79 



Nelumbium 1 32 



Nelumbo 1 32 



Nelumbonaceae - 1 32 



Nemexia 95 



Nemopanthus 1 77 



Neobeckia 142 



Nepeta 2 1 9 



Neslia 1 42 



Nettle 1 13 



Nettle Family - 113 



New Jersey Tea 180 



Nicandra 224 



Nightshade 225 



Nightshade Family 224 



Nimble Will 58 



Nmebark 1 49 



Nothocalais 272 



Nolholcus 57 



Nothoscordum 93 



Nuphar 133 



Nut-rush 75 



Nyctaginaceae 122 



Nymphaea 132, 133 



Nymph aeaceae 1 33 



Nvmphozaulhus 133 



Nyssa 194 



Oak 108. 109, 110, 111 



Oakesia 94 



Oakesiella 94 



Oat 56 



Obolaria 205 



Odontostephana 208 



Oenothera .....191 



Oleaceae 203 



Oleaster Family 188 



Oligoneuron 249 



Olive Family 203 



Onagraceae 189 



Onion 93 



Onoclea 36 



Onosmodium 215 



Ophioglossaceae 33 



Ophioglossum 33 



Opulasler 149 



Opuntia 188 




312 



American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



Orbexilum 1 64 



Orchid 99, 100 



Orchidaceae 98 



Orchid Family 98 



Orchis 99 



Ornithogalum 94 



Orobanchaceae 232 



Orobanche 232 



Oryzopsis 60 



Osage-orange 1 12 



Osmorhiza 196 



Osmunda 34 



Osmundaceae 34 



Ostrya 108 



Otophvlla 230 



Oxalidaceae 171 



Oxalis 171 



Ox-eye Daisy 266 



Oxvbaphiis 122 



Oxycoccus 200 



Oxxigraphis 1 29 



Oxypolis - 198 



Oyster Plant 269 



Padus 1 58 



Panax 194 



Panicularia 51 



Panicum 63 



Pansy 188 



Papaver 1 35 



Papaveraceae 1 34 



Panefana ....1 13 



Parnassia 145 



Parnassiaceae 145 



Paronychia 122 



Parasela 164 



Parsley Family 194 



Parsnip 198 



Parthenium 259 



Parthenocissus 181 



Partridge-berry 236 



Partridge-pea 162 



Paspalum 62 



Pasque-flower 1 3 1 



Passiflora 188 



Passifloraceae 1 88 



Passion-flower 188 



Passion-flower Family 188 



Pastinaca 198 



Paulo wnia 233 



Pawpaw 126 



Pea 1 58 



Peach 1 57 



Pea Family 158 



Pear 1 55 



Pearlwort 124 



Pecan 105 



Pedicularis 23 1 



Pellaea 39 



Pellitory 113 



Peltandra 87 



Pencil -flower 168 



Peniophyillum 192 



Pennycress 143 



Pennyroyal 221 



Penstemon ...227 



Penthorum 145 



Peplis 189 



Pepo 241 



Peppercress 143 



Peppermint 223 



Pepper-vine 181 



Peramium 100 



Perideridia 196 



Perilla 223 



Periwinkle 206 



Persicaria 1 16 



Persimmon 203 



Perularia 99 



Peruvian Daisy 260 



Petalostemum 164 



Phacelia 2 1 3 



Phalaris 62 



Pharhiiis 2 1 



Phaseolus 169. 170 



Phegopteris 37 



Philadelphus 1 46 



Phleum 58 



Phlox 211 



Phlox Family 211 



Phoradendron 1 14 



Phragmites 54 



Phryma 234 



Phrymaceae 234 



Phyla 216 



Phyllanthus 1 75 



Physalis 224 



Ph\}salodes 224 



Ph\nocarpa 1 49 



Physocarpus 149 



Physostegia 219 



Phytolacca 122 



Pi I vtolaccaceae 1 22 



Pickerelweed 89 



Pickerelweed Family 89 



Picradenia 264 



Pigweed 119. 120. 121 



Pilea 1 1 3 



Pimpernel 202 



PlNACEAE 40 



Pine 40 



Pineapple-weed 266 



Pine Family 40 



Pinesap 199 



Pineweed 184 



Pink Family 123 



Pinweed 185 



Pinus 40 



Pipewort 88 



Pipewort Family 88 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 



313 



Pipsissewa 199 



Pitcher-plant 144 



Pitcher-plant Family 144 



Planera - H I 



Plane-tree 147 



Plane-tree Family — .....147 



Plantaginaceae 234 



Plantago 234 



Plantain - 234 



Plantain Family 234 



Platanaceae - 1 47 



Plalanlhera 99 



Platanus 147 



Pleiolaenia 198 



Pluchea 257 



Plum 1 57 



Poa 52 



Podophyllum 1 33 



Pogonia 100 



Poinsettia 1 76 



Poison-hemlock 197 



Poison-ivy 1 77 



Pokeweed - 122 



Pokeweed Family 122 



Polanisia 144 



Polemonium 21 2 



Polemoniaceae ..: 21 1 



Polygala I 73 



polygalaceae i 73 



Polvgonaceae 1 14 



Polygonatum 94 



Polygonella 1 18 



Polygonum 1 Id 



Polymnia 259 



Polypodiaceae 34 



Polypodium 38 



Polypody 38 



Polystichum - 36 



Polytaenia 198 



Pond-lily 133 



Pondweed 42 



Pondweed Family 42 



Pontederia 89 



Pontederiaceae 89 



Poplar 101, 102 



Poppy 1 35 



Poppy Family 134 



Populus 101 



Portulaca 123 



Portulacaceae 123 



Possumhaw 1 77 



Potamogeton 42 



Potamogetonaceae 42 



Potentilla 1 49 



Prairie-clover 1 64 



Prairie-dock 259 



Prairie Meadowsweet 150 



Prenanthes 271 



Prickly-ash I 73 



Prickly-pear 188 



Prickly Sida 183 



Primrose 201 



Primrose Family 201 



Primrose-willow 190 



Primula 201 



Primulaceae .201 



Prmce's- feather 1 18 



Princess Tree 233 



Proserpinaca 193 



Prunella 220 



Prunus 1 57 



Psedera 181 



Psoralea 163 



Psoralidhim 1 64 



Ptelea -1 73 



Pteretis 36 



Pteridium 39 



Pteris 39 



Ptilimnium 197 



Pulsalilla 1 3 1 



Puncture-weed 1 72 



Purpletop 54 



Purslane 123 



Purslane Family 123 



Puttyroot 101 



Pycnanthemum 222 



Pyrola 199 



Pyrrhopappus 272 



Pyrus 1 55 



Quamasia 94 



Quamoclit 210 



Quassia Family ....173 



Quercus 108 



Quillwort 32 



Quillwort Family 32 



Racoon-grape 181 



Radicula 139, 142 



Radish 138 



Ragweed 247 



Ragwort 267 



Raimannia 191 



Ranunculaceae 127 



Ranunculus 129 



Raphanislrum 1 38 



Raphanus ...138 



Raspberry 152 



Ratibida 260 



Rattle-box 162 



Rattlesnake-master 196 



Rattlesnake-plantain 100 



Redbud 161 



Redtop 57 



Reed 54 



Rhamnaceae 1 79 



Rhamnus 1 79 



Rhexia 189 



Rhinanlhaceac 225 



Rhinanihus _ 230 




314 



American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



Rhododendron 199 



Rhus 1 77 



Rhynchospora 74 



Ribes 146 



Rich weed 223 



Robinia 1 64 



Rock-brake 39 



Rockcress 141, 142 



Rockrose Family 185 



Rock Pink 123 



Rorippa 139, 142 



Rosa 1 53 



ROSACEAE 147 



Rose 153, 154 



Rose Family 147 



Rose Mallow 183 



Rose-pink 205 



Rosmweed 259 



Rotala 189 



Royal Fern Family 34 



RUBIACEAE 235 



Rubus 1 52 



Rudbeckia 259 



Rue-anemone 1 32 



Rue Family 172 



Ruellia 234 



Rumex 1 15 



Rush 89 



Rush Family 89 



RUTACEAE 1 72 



Rye 55 



R\inchospora 74 



Sabatia 205 



Saccharodendron 1 79 



Sage 220 



Sagina 124 



Sagittaria 45 



St. Andrews-cross 183 



St. John's-wort 183, 184, 185 



St. Johns-wort Family 183 



Salicaceae 101 



Salix 1 02 



Salsify 269 



Salsola 121 



Saltwort 121 



Salvia 220 



Sai.viniaceae 39 



Sambucus 237 



Samolus 201 



Sandalwood Family 113 



Sandbur 67 



Sandwort 124 



Sand Rocket 138 



Sanguinaria 135 



Sanguisorba 1 5 1 



Sanicie 196 



Sanicula 196 



Santalaceae 1 13 



Sapodilla Family 203 



Saponana 126 



Sapotaceae 203 



Sarcosiphon 98 



Sarothra 184 



Sarracenia 1 44 



Sarraceniaceae 144 



Sassafras 1 34 



Satiireia 221, 222 



Saururaceae 101 



Saururus 1 01 



Savastana 61 



Savory 221 



Sawbrier 95 



Saxifragaceae 145 



Saxif raga 145 



Saxifrage 145 



Saxifrage Family 145 



Schedonnardus 61 



Scheuchzeria 44 



Schmallzia 1 77 



Schrankia 161 



Scirpus 72, 73 



Scleraiithiis 122 



Selena 75 



Scouring-rush 33 



Scrophulana 227 



Scrophulariaceae ...; 225 



Scutellaria 218 



Sea Rocket 138 



Secale 55 



Sedge 69, 72, 74, 75 



Sedge Family 68 



Sedum 144 



Seedbox 190 



Selaginella 32 



Selaginellaceae 32 



Selfheal 220 



Seneca Snakeroot 173 



Senecio 267 



Sensitive-brier 161 



Serinia 269 



Serviceberry I 54 



Setaria 67 



Shadbush 1 54 



Shepherdia 188 



Shepherd's Purse 143 



Shinleaf 199 



Shooting-star 202 



Sihara 141 



Sicklepod 142 



Sicycos 24 1 



Sida 183 



Sidopsis 1 82 



Sieversia 1 5 1 



Silene 125 



Silphium 259 



Silverbel! Tree 203 



Silverweed 1 50 



SlMARUBACEAE 1 73 



Sisymbrium 139, 142 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 



315 



Sisyrinchium 97 



Sium 197 



Skullcap 218 



Skunk-cabbage 86 



Smartweed 1 1 7 



Smilacina 94 



Smilax - 95 



Snailseed ...135 



Snakerool 114. 249 



Sneezeweed 265 



Snowberry 238 



Snow-on-the-Mountain 1 76 



Soja 169 



SOLANACEAE .....224 



Solanum 225 



Solidago 249 



Solomon's-seal 94 



Sonchus 271 



Sophia 1 40 



Sorbus 1 54 



Sorghastrum 68 



Sorghum 68 



Sorrel 115, 171 



Southernwood 266 



Sow-thistle 271 



Soy Bean 169 



Spanish Needles 263 



Sparganiaceae 41 



Sparganium 41 



Spartina 61 



Spaihxiema 86 



Spearmint 223 



Specularia 242 



Speedwell 229 



Spermacoce 236 



Spermolepis 1 97 



Sphaeralcea 182, 183 



Sphenopholis 56 



Spice-bush 134 



Spider Lily 96 



Spiderwort 88 



Spiderworf Family 88 



Spikenard 194 



Spike Rush 70 



Spiraea 1 49 



Spiranthes 1 00 



Spirodela 87 



Spleenwort 38 



Sporobolus 59 



Spring Beauty 123 



Spurge 175. 176 



Spurge Family 174 



Squawroot 232 



Squirrel-corn 135 



Stachys 220 



Staff-tree Family 177 



Staphylea 1 78 



Staphyleaceae 1 78 



Star-flower 201 



Star-grass 96 



Star-of-Bethlehem 94 



Star-thistle 269 



Steironema 202 



Stellaria 124 



Stenanlhium 92 



Slenophragma 142 



SterwphxiUus 72 



Stickseed 2 1 4 



Stipa 60 



Slomosia 232 



Stonecrop 144. 145 



Stonecrop Family 144 



Stone Mint 222 



Storax 203 



Storax Family 203 



Storksbill 171 



Strawberry 1 49 



Strophostyles 1 69 



Stylisma 209 



Stylophorum 135 



Stylosanthes 1 68 



Styracaceae 203 



Styrax 203 



Sugarberry 1 12 



Sullivantia 145 



Sumac 177, 178 



Sumac Family 177 



Summer Cypress 120 



Sundew 144 



Sundew Family 144 



Sundrops 191 



Sunflower 260. 261. 262 



SviJa 193 



Swamp-candle 202 



Sweet Alyssum 142 



Sweetbriar 153 



Sweet Cicely 196 



Sweet Clover 163 



Sweet fern 105 



Sweetflag 87 



Sweet-gum 147 



Sweet William 125 



Sycamore 147 



Symphoricarpos 238 



Symphytum 2 1 5 



Symplocarpus 86 



Synandra 219 



SxinJesmon 132 



Spnosma 267 



S\)niherisTna 62 



Synthyris 230 



Tabernaemonlana 206 



Taenidia 197 



Talinum 123 



Tamarack 40 



Tanacetum 266 



Tansy 266 



Taraxacum 272 



Taxaceae 40 




316 



American Midland Naturalist Monograph No. 2 



Taxodiaceae 40 



Taxodium 40 



Taxus 40 



Teasel 241 



Teasel Family 241 



Tecoma 233 



Tephrosia 164 



Tetraneitris 264 



Teucnum 218 



Thalesia 232 



Thalicfmm 130, 132 



Thaspium 197 



Thehpteris 36, 37 



Thismia 98 



Thistle ....268 



Thiaspi 1 43 



Thorough wort 248 



Three-seeded Mercury 174 



Thymeleaceae 188 



Thyme 222 



Thymus 222 



Thuja 41 



Tick-clover ....165 



Tickseed 263 



Tilia 181 



Tiliaceae 181 



Timothy 58 



Tilhvmalopsis 1 76 



Tofieldia 93 



Tomanihera 230 



Tomatillo 224 



Toothwort 140 



Torilis 196 



Torresia 61 



Touch-me-not 1 72 



Toxicodendron 1 77 



Tracaulon .,] 18 



Trachelospermum 206 



Tradescantia 88 



Traaopogon 269 



Trailing Arbutus 200 



Trautvetferia 13 1 



Tree of Heaven 173 



Triadenum 1 85 



Tribulus 1 72 



Trichomanes 34 



Trichostema 218 



Tridens 54 



Trientalis 201 



Trifolium 162 



Triglochin 44 



Trillium 95 



Triodia 54 



Triosteum 239 



Triphora 100 



Triplasis 54 



Tripsacum 68 



Triticum 55 



Trout Lily 94 



Troximnn 272 



Trumpet-creeper 233 



Trumpet-creeper Family 233 



Tsuga 40 



Tulip Tree 126 



Tumbleweed 121 



Tupelo ...194 



Tupelo Gum 194 



Turnip 1 38 



Turrilis 141 



Turtlehead 226 



Twayblade 100 



Twig-rush 75 



Twinf lower 239 



Twinleaf 133 



Typha 41 



Tvphaceae 41 



Ulmaceae 1 1 1 



Ulmus 11 1 



Umbelliferae 194 



Umbrella Sedge 72 



Umbrella-wort 1 22 



Unamia 256 



Unicorn-plant 233 



Unicorn-plant Family 233 



Uniola 54 



Urtica 1 1 3 



Urticaceae 1 13 



Urticaslrum 1 13 



Utricularia 23 1 



Uvularia 94 



Vaccaria 126 



Vaccinium 200 



Vagnera 94 



Valerian 240 



Valeriana 240 



Valerianaceae 240 



Valerianella 240 



Valerian Family 240 



Vallisneria 46 



Vegetable Oyster 270 



Velvet-leaf 183 



Venus' Looking-glass 242 



Veratrum 93 



Verbascum 226 



Verbena 215 



Verbena Family 215 



Verbenaceae 2 1 5 



Verbesina 262 



Vernonia 247 



Veronica 229 



Veronicastrum 229 



Vervain 21 5 



Vetch - 168 



Viburnum 237 



Vicia 168 



Vigna 169 



VInca 206 



V'tncetoxicum 208, 209 




Jones: Flora of Illinois 



317 



Viola 186 



ViOLACEAE 186 



Violet 186. 187, 188 



Violet Family 186 



Viorna 1 ^■^ 



Virginia Creeper 181 



Virginia Snakeroot '14 



Virginia Willow 146 



Virgin's-Bower 1^2 



VlTACEAE 180 



Vitis 180. 181 



Wafer-ash - - '73 



Wahoo 1 77 



Wallflower 140 



Walnut - 1 05 



Walnut Family - 105 



Washingionia 1 "6 



Watercress 1 4^ 



Water Elm HI 



Water-hemp - 1-^' 



Water Horehound 222 



Water Hyssop 228 



Waterleaf 2 1 2 



Waterleaf Family 212 



Waterlily - 133 



Waterlily Family 133 



Water Locust - 161 



Water-marigold 264 



Water-milfoil - - 192 



Water-milfoil Family 192 



Water-parsnip 197 



Water-pepper - 1 17 



Water-plantain 45 



Water-plantain Family 44 



Water-purslane 189 



Watershield 1 32 



Water-stargrass 89 



Water-starwort 1 76 



Water-starwort Family 176 



Waterweed 46 



Water-willow 233 



Waterwort 126 



Waterwort Family 126 



Waxweed 1 89 



Wheat - 55 



Whitetop 257 



Whitlowcress 1 40 



Whitlow-wort Family - - 122 



Wild Balsam-apple 241 



Barley 56 



Bean 169 



Celery 46 



Comf rey 2 1 4 



Geranium 1 70 



Ginger ' 14 



Hyacinth 94 



Indigo 162 



Leek 93 



Licorice 236 



Millet 59 



Oat 56 



Pansy 188 



Pea 168 



Rice 62 



Rye 55 



Sarsaparilla 194 



Sweet-potato 210 



Willow 102 



Willow Family 101 



Willowherb 190 



Winterberry 1 77 



Wlntercress 1 39 



Wlntergreen ...199. 200 



Wisteria 165 



Witch-hazel 147 



Witch-hazel Family 147 



Wolfberry 238 



Wolffiia 87 



Woodbine 181 



Woodrush 91 



Woodsla 36 



Wood Nettle 113 



Wood-sorrel 171 



Wood-sorrel Family 171 



Woodwardla 39 



Wormwood 266 



Xanthium 247 



Xanthoxalis 171 



Xvlosleon 239 



Xyridaceae 88 



Xyris 88 



Yam 96 



Yam Family 96 



Yarrow 265 



Yellow Cress 139 



Yellow-eyed grass 88 



Yellow-eyed grass Family 88 



Yellow Ironweed 262 



Yellow-wood 1 62 



Yew 40 



Yew Family 40 



Zanichellla 44 



Zanthoxylum 1 73 



Zea 68 



Zlgadenus 92 



Zizia 197 



Zizania 62 



Zosterella 89 



Zygophyllaceae 172 






■, I. 





mm 



i'liliiilil- ill it ^ 1 



« 1 1 « I 



II 11 



ilM i 



I 



>i lii i 



iiilit 



iilj 



lil*t(Tli;}l;;MI/il^ 



ninniHruntif 



lllJIIIf f 211 





11 





hi! li. 



.m 



lilitiliii: 



{J f .' 



.1 . nii! 



I ItlMIMlMl 




A^ -Tj 





b, Wv^^.W 



V^ 



"4, 



V^ 



■'^, 



\^ 









r^ 



^^ 



.o" 



.d" 



"yfc ■t?' II 





.4" 





^^. .^^ 



.<c 



V <■ 



n- 



\r 



>, 



^' 



v^ 



> 



SP 



^^ 



U 



.^" 



<^^^ 



^ 





^ - * 



..^^ 



./^ 





.O^ 



'^A 





v^ 



n; 



.^^ \ 



v 





Xs 



•3^ V" 



\> 







<^ 



o,, >^ 



.P^ 



^<^ 



^^ 





,\^ 



vr 



iJtii-;; 





^^ 



v^ 



> 



</, 



'<?. 



^\^ 



% 'o^ 



4; 



Oa 



''A 



,111 





V 



I llti 



.< 



N> 



.< 



.o^ 





s 





•y 



%.^^ 



,v 



-^^ 



«Vi 



V 



*-?. 



V.O- 



^^. 



rCr 



0>^ 



^ 



^ 



s> 



^ 



^^ 



-b. 





.^^ ^i 



s> 



.V' 



Yj 











^ 



I'll 



^-9 





V. 



,\ 



<S:i 



\ s^" 



o. 



^ 



<--:^Sl ,--;■_-.'■ ■"-•i I 



^A c,V 



</^ 



\:-u 



^^s= V <F^ 



% 





.-^^ '^4., 





^^^^ 



> 



-^ c^ 



.^ 



iim 



>i^ 



^^. 



^A 



^A v" 



..^- 



%J 



s,^ 



\<?^ 



^ \jl 






% 



^. 











/ 





^.^^..^ v^^^ %, %M 









m ^ \ 



>i' 

 ^ 









MEMOIRS 



OF THE 



AMERICAN ENTOMOLOGICAL SOCIETY 



NUMBER 3 



A VENATIONAL STUDY 

 OF THE SUBORDER ZYGOPTERA 



(ODONATA) 



WITH KEYS FOR THE IDENTIFICATION 



OF GENERA 



BY 

 PHILIP A. MUNZ 



PUBLISHED BY THE AMERICAN ENTOMOLOGICAL SOCIETY 



AT THE ACADEMY OF NATURAL SCIENCES 



PHILADELPHIA 



1919 




THE AMERICAN ENTOMOLOGICAL SOCIETY 



Pounded 1869 PHILADELPHIA 



Incorporated 1862 

 Organized as "The Entomological Society of Philadelphia " 

 the present title was adopted February 11, 1867. 



Pkbsident 

 Henry Skinner 



Vice-President 

 James A. G. Rehn 



CoRRESPONDiNo Secretary Recording Secretary 



Morgan Hebard cteorge M. Greene 



Treasurer 

 Ezra T. Cresson 



PtTBLICATION COMMITTEE FiNANCE COMMITTEE PnnPirp-rv n 



James A. G. Rehn James A G R^hn Property Committee 



Ezra T. Cresson D M die ^^T"" "°^ ^"*'^*'^'» 



of NSSTci'ef es^^^P^tall^i^ ^f'^ °^ *^« ^-^-y 



November, January, February ffihAnrit /nd^ J^'f*^ 1 September, October, 

 June and t>ecember (annuK^etinJf -nfJiffi^^ May and on the second Monday of 

 of the Society areTnCS^tSoJcal Demrfm?ntTffe'°T' "^T? and collectloni 

 of Philadelphia, Logan Square ^^epartment of the Academy of Natural Sciences 



Serial Publications of the Society 



Proceedmgs of the Entomological Society of Philadelphia, volumes I-VT iftfti ifi«^ r^ 

 of prmt and cannot be supplied. ^ipuia, vommes i-vi, 1861-1867. Out 



Transactions of the American Entomological Sociptv vniiirr,^ t tt^ ^ , . 



'SS?- --^S^i--3 ^aS -SV^M« 



^TricS'KrSt^l^''rh^» -■' '-«>. -hich „ay be fo„.d in ou, 



. <»W°of S maibd tll'ST.lelonoSS'inS^^^ Z^t*^' '= •"\"«' »° «"« «■'-' 

 in tfieir Ubrary tor reference •""'"""e institutions, witB a request that it be pUced 



the student who desires prompt v the iSti^^nn f„^^"«e™e^t « of inaterial benefit to 



In sending subscriptions or in making inquiries relative to publications, address- 

 THE AMERICAN ENTOMOLOGICAL SOCIETY, 

 Publication Department, 



The Academy of Natural Sciences of Philadelphia 

 Logan Square. ' 




EMT- 



MEMOIRS 



OF THE 



AMERICAN ENTOMOLOGICAL SOCIETY 



NUMBER 3 



, A VENATION AL STUDY 

 OF THE SUBORDER ZYGOPTERA 



(ODONATA) 



WITH KEYS FOR THE IDENTIFICATION 



OF GENERA 



BY 

 PHILIP A. MUNZ 





PUBLISHED BY THE AMERICAN ENTOMOLOGICAL SOCIETY 



AT THE ACADEMY OF NATURAL SCIENCES 



PHILADELPHIA 



1919 




{Issued March ij, igig.) . 






Memoirs 



OF THE 



American Entomological Society 



Number 3 



A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE SUBORDER ZYGOPTERA 

 (ODONATA) WITH KEYS FOR THE IDENTIFICATION 



OF GENERA 1 



By Philip A. Munz 

 CONTENTS 



PAGE 



I. Introduction 3 



Acknowledgements 3 



Nomenclature of wing- veins 4 



Explanation of figures y 



II. A Discussion of the Phylogeny j 



The Anisozygoptera y 



The Zygoptera 8'> 



The Agrionidae ^ 



The PolytJwrinae 10 



The Agrioninae 1 1 



The Epallaginae 12 



The Disparocyphinae 13. 



The Coenagrionidae ..." 13, 



The Lestinae 15, 



The Lestoidinae 17- 



The Megapodagrioninae jj 



The Pseiidostigmatinae 20 



The Coenagrioninae 21 



The Protoneurinae 24 



1 A Contribution from the Entomological Laboratory of Cornell University. 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




2 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



III. Tendencies in Specialization 26 



Vein Reduction 27 



1. Reduction in the number of supplementary sectors 27 



2. Reduction of the veins Cu2 and Cui 28 



3. Decrease in the number of antenodal cross-veins 28 



4. Decrease in the number of postnodals 29 



5. Loss of the cross-veins in the quadrangle and subquadrangle 29 



6. Reduction in the number of those antenodal cells situated between M4 



and Cui 29 



7. Reduction in the number of cross-veins behind the anal vein 29 



Vein Shifting 30 



1 . Narrowing of the wing 30 



2. Progressive petiolation 31 



3. Retraction of the nodus toward the base of the wing 31 



4. Tendency for M2, Rg, and INIs to arise nearer the tip of the wing and 

 further from the subnodus 31 



5. Migration outward of the base of Mia 33 



6. The position of the second antenodals before the arculus 33 



7. The tendency for the quadrangle to become acute distally 33 



8. Change in the length of the quadrangle 35 



9. Attachment of supplementary sectors 35 



10. Straightening of the longitudinal veins 35 



1 1 . Matching up of the cross-veins in transverse series 36 



Aliscellaneous Features 36 



1 . Differentiation of fore and hind wings ; 36 



2. The bracing of the stigma 36 



3. Atrophy of the stigma 37 



IV. Summary ' 37 



V. Keys for the Identification of Genera 38 



The Anisozygoptera 40 



The Zygoptera 40 



The Agrionidae 40 



The Polythorinae 42 



The Agrioninae 42 



The Epallaginae 45 



The Disparocyphinae 47 



The Coenagrionidae ^ 41 



The Lestinae 48 



The Lestoidinae 49 



The Pseudostigmatinae 49 



The Megapodagrioninae 50 



The Coenagrioninae 53 



The Protoneurinae 63 



. VI . Bibliography 67 



VII. Plates 72 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 3 



I— INTRODUCTION 



At the present time it is not necessary to offer either explanation 

 or excuse for the use of venation as a guide to the phylogeny of a 

 group of insects, particularly of any of the Neuropteroids, the 

 exceedingly rich and varied veining of which has been the basis of 

 many excellent pieces of work. The purpose of this paper is to 

 make the fullest possible use of wnng-veins as a means of interpre- 

 ting relationships and as a method of identifying the genera of one 

 of the suborders of the Odonata, the Zygoptera. It must be remem- 

 bered, however, that venation is not the only index to genealogy, 

 nor perhaps always the most reliable, but it is one of the most 

 evident and fundamental and therefore most valuable methods 

 which we have to enable us to determine relationships. In some 

 cases, without doubt, a study of genitalia and morphology will throw 

 more light on the situation and even change some of our concep- 

 tions which have been arrived at from the study of the wings only. 



The nomenclature of the veins of the Zygoptera and their 

 homologies to those of other groups have been thoroughly worked 

 out, but, since the days of Baron de Selys, no attempt has been 

 made to consider the whole suborder in detail and to make keys 

 for identification. A word of explanation may be permissible in 

 regard to the keys herewith submitted; I have examined such 

 material as I have had access to in an endeavor to make them as 

 generally applicable as possible; but in some cases descriptions 

 only could be used, since during the past two years correspondence 

 with many European workers and hence the securing of many 

 desirable figures have been impossible. I feel, however, that the 

 paper is justifiable, if for no other reason than to have in one place 

 in the literature such wing-photographs as have been collected in 

 the course of the work, the venation of many genera not having 

 been published before. 



A cknowledgements 

 To the many who have kindly contributed material and sugges- 

 tions for this study my gratitude is due and is thankfully given. 

 This problem was undertaken at the suggestion and under the 

 direction of Professor James G. Needham, whose unfailing interest 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, %. 




4 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



and valuable criticism have made possible what has been accom- 

 plished. He has been very generous in the time and abundant 

 material which he has given me. Mr. C. H. Kennedy, also of Cor- 

 nell University, who has been working on the same phylogenetic 

 problem from another method of approach, has never hestitated in 

 giving me suggestions arrived at from his study, has made several 

 drawings for me and brought material from museums which I was 

 not able to visit. Dr. P. P. Calvert and Dr. Henry Skinner of 

 Philadelphia very generously loaned specimens and permitted the 

 use of the extensive collections at the Academy of Natural Sciences 

 of Philadelphia. Alir. Carl Ilg of Philadelphia kindly copied 

 several descriptions which were not available at Cornell. Mr. 



E. B. Williamson of Bluffton, Indiana, loaned valuable material; 

 Dr. Samuel Henshaw of Cambridge sent material for study and 

 permitted Mr. E. Avery Richmond of Cornell to photograph 

 several specimens at the Museum of Comparative Zoology. Mr. 

 Rolla P. Currie and Miss Currie were very kind and helpful in 

 allowing me the use of the collections at the National Museum. 

 Dr. W. J. Holland and Mr. Hugo Kahl of the Carnegie Museum 

 permitted Mr. Kennedy to bring several specimens to Ithaca and 

 to study others at Pittsburg. Mr. Herbert Campion and Mr. 



F. W. Campion sent several photographs of specimens at the 

 British Museum. Dr. F. Ris of Rheinau, Switzerland, kindly sent 

 proof-sheets of an article expressing his views on the venation of 

 the Zygoptera, and Mr. R. J. Tillyard of New South Wales, Aus- 

 tralia, sent several papers dealing with the same subject and with 

 new and rare Australian Zygoptera. To all of these contributors 

 is due much of the success in the completeness which it has been 

 possible to secure. 



Nomenclature of the Wing- Veins 



The Comstock-Needham system of naming the veins has come 

 into very general use among workers on the Odonata since the 

 Genealogic Study by Professor Needham in 1903; and it is to be 

 retained in all its essentials as presented in his paper, Tillyard, 

 however, (19 14) showed that the vein formerly known as A is in 

 reality partly a secondary structure built back toward the base of 

 the wing from one of the so-called " cubito-anal " cross-veins and 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 5 



that the vein A at the base of the wing is fused with Cu, but crosses 

 the space back of Cu and then proceeds as formerly thought 

 toward MA. He therefore proposes the name "anal-crossing" 

 (Ac) for this apparent cross- vein, and the abbreviations Ab for the 

 bridge toward the wing-base, and A' for the distal portion of the 

 anal vein. This system will be used in this paper when especial 

 attention is called to some part of this vein, otherwise A alone will 

 be used to designate the anal vein in general; the sign ist A is not 

 necessary since the Zygoptera possess only one anal vein. I agree 

 with Mr. Tillyard that the sign A followed by an asterisk as used 

 by Dr. Ris is unfortunate ; when I read one of his descriptions I find 

 myself involuntarily looking to the bottom of the page for the foot- 

 note which I always associate with the use of the asterisk. 



Mr. Tillyard's contention (1915) and that of Dr. Ris (1916a) 

 that the Zygoptera present a different condition than that of the 

 Anisoptera in the branching of the radius do not seem well founded. 

 To be sure none of the nymphs of the Zygoptera that have yet been 

 examined show the trachea Rs crossing over that of M1+2 as do the 

 Anisoptera, however it seems inconceivable that the vein Rg of the 

 Anisoptera can have in the Zygoptera a vein so completely analo- 

 gous in position and yet not be homologous. Mr. Tillyard's 

 name "median sector" is a matter of words only; it indicates 

 no homology to the veins of any other order, although in retaining 

 the same name for the different branches of media he admits that 

 the media has exactly the same position in both suborders, which 

 state cannot be true if the radius does not present the same con- 

 dition in both. Professor Needham (19 17) has shown how many 

 of Mr. Tillyard's arguments can be used to support the opposite 

 view of the case. I therefore have no hesitation in following the 

 usual system of nomenclature. 



As an example of the Agrionidae the genus Agrion (Calopteryx) 

 may be used with the abbreviations given in fig. A. These abbre- 

 viations are given as follows: 



C=costa, Sc=subcosta; Ri = radius-one, Rs= radical sector; 

 Mi = media-one, M2 =media-two, M3 = media- three, M4=media- 

 four, Mia = the longest sector between Mi and M2; Cu = cubitus, 

 Cui = cubitus-one, Cu2 =cubitus-two, Cu2a=a branch of Cu2 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



arising just beyond MA; A = first anal vein, Ac = anal crossing, 

 Ab=anal bridge, A' = anal vein from Ac to MA; N= nodus, 

 Sn=subnodus; St=stigma, B.S. =basal space, B.R.S. =basal 

 radial space; An=antenodal cross- veins, Pn=postnodal cross- 

 veins, Ar =arculus, MA =medio-anal link; Q = quadrangle, Sq = 

 subquadrangle. 



/»r. 



Fig. A. Venation of Agrion (Calopteryx). 



These terms are all familiar ones and need for the most part no 

 definition here. The subquadrangle is that space between Ac and 

 MA, and between Cu and A, or Cu and the hind margin of the 

 wing when A' is not present. Ac cannot always be located because 

 of the numerous cross-veins between Cu and A to be found in some 

 genera, but can generally be distinguished by its obliquity. The 

 term medio-anal link is one defined by Mr. Williamson (1913) "as 

 the cross vein forming the distal end of the quadrangle and that 

 part of Cu2 opposed to Cu, and placed transversely to the long axis 

 of the wing." Supplementary sectors are those longitudinal veins 

 present between the principal veins. The quadrangle, subquad- 

 rangle, basal space, and basal radial space are said to be crossed 

 when they have cross veins, and Sive free when without cross- veins. 

 The basal radial space is open when M1+2 does not touch R, and 

 closed when M1+2 fuses with R. Of the antenodals there are two 

 series: those of th.e first or costal series, i.e. those between C and Sc; 

 and those of the second or subcostal series, i.e. between Sc and R. 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 



7 



Fig. B. Venation of Argiocnemis. 



As an example of a wing of the Coenagrionidae, Argiocnemis may 

 be used, for which see fig. B. The notations are largely as in fig. A, 

 except that there is no basal radial space present and that the ante- 

 nodel spaces are few enough to be numbered ; the first antenodal 

 space is that between the base of the wing and the first antenodals, 

 the second antenodal space is that between the first and second 

 antenodals, and the third antenodal space is that between the second 

 antenodals and the nodus. Cu2a is not present. 



Explanation of Figures 

 In referring to figures. A, B, C, etc. are the text figures, while 

 figures I, 2, 3, etc. are to be found in the plates at the end of the 

 paper. 



II— A DISCUSSION OF THE PHYLOGENY 



Passing now from a review of the system of nomenclature used, 

 the next step is the consideration of the phylogeny of the Zygoptera 

 and their relationship to other groups. 



The Anisozygoptera 



In his treatise on fossil insects, Handlirsch (i 906-1 908) created 

 as a new suborder the Anisozygoptera, for many fossil forms and 

 for the living genus Palaeophlebia, to which he gave the name 

 Neopalaeophlebia, since the former name was preoccupied. Dr. 

 Calvert (1903), however, had already used the name Epiophlebia 

 •for Palaeophlebia and it is his name that must be used. This 

 genus according to Handlirsch falls as readily into the Anisoptera 

 as the Zygoptera and to keep the two groups distinct, a third 

 intermediate one is necessary. Epiophlebia (fig. i) is the only 

 known survivor of a large suborder of Mesozoic insects and is 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




8 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



therefore of considerable importance phylogenetically. Hence, 

 while it is not now one of the Zygoptera, it deserves discussion in 

 this paper. 



Aside from its venational primitiveness it has been shown by 

 Schmidt (1915) to be intermediate between the two modern sub- 

 orders in the structure of the male genitalia of the second and third 

 abdominal segments. Mr. Kennedy informs me that this is so 

 •obviously the case that only a separate suborder will suffice to 

 show its points of difference. The broad area between M4 and Cui 

 just beyond MA; the shape of the quadrangle, especially that of 

 the hind wing where a cross-vein in the right position would give 

 the supertriangle and triangle of the Anisoptera the zigzag con- 

 dition of the supplementary sectors, — all these are venational fea- 

 tures which justify its position as something quite distinct from 

 the Zygoptera. In itself it does not need to be taken as a form from 

 which the Zygoptera and Anisoptera have descended, in fact it can- 

 not be so considered, but it does show affinities with both and, as a 

 survival of the ancestral group from which our two modern sub- 

 orders have sprung, it is worthy of note. 



The Zygoptera Proper 



The Zygoptera may therefore evidently be considered as deriva- 

 tives of the Anisozygoptera. They may themselves be divided 

 into two families, which were long made subfamilies by workers on 

 Odonata. It would be very desirable and lead to much less con- 

 fusion if these families could retain the old names; Calopterygidae 

 and Agrionidae, but since most writers on the group have recently 

 followed Kirby's Catalogue in using the genus names Agrion and 

 Coenagrion rather than Calopteryx and Agrion, and since Mutt- 

 kowski (1910) has brought additional evidence to show that these 

 are the names to be used, I shall follow their example and speak of 

 the old group Calopteryginae as Agrionidae and of the former 

 Agrioninae as Coenagrionidae. 



Of the generic names proposed, about one hundred and eighty 

 now seem valid and are recognized in the keys hereto appended. 

 Of these about forty come in the first family, the Agrionidae, 

 which is the more generalized of the families and ends in forms 

 very closely related to some of the Coenagrionidae. The two 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 9 



families, in fact, do not form a dichotomy, but the one leads to the 

 other and is connected with it by so many genera that the dividing 

 line is in some cases difficult to find. In a general way the former 

 one is characterized by the presence of several to many antenodals 

 and by cross-veins generally being present in the quadrangle and 

 subquadrangle. M3 separates from M1+2 nearer to the arculus 

 than to the subnodus, and the nodus is far out in the wing, at from 

 one-third to one-half of the length of the wing. These tendencies 

 in venation are all fairly constant and, as will be shown later, in- 

 dicate a rather primitive condition. The Coenagrionidae, on the 

 other hand, have two antenodals generally and no cross veins in 

 the quadrangle or subquadrangle, with but few exceptions. In 

 one line only, that of the Lestinae and Lestoidinae, does M3 retain 

 its original condition of branching off from M1+2 near the arculus, 

 in the other groups its point of origin migrates outward. The 

 nodus, however, is drawn toward the base of the wing and ranges 

 in position from about one-seventh to one-third of the length of 

 the wing. The more detailed account of the exact steps in phy- 

 logeny may better be discussed under the families and subfamilies. 



The Agrionidae 



As was said before, this family includes the old group Calop- 

 teryginae which was divided by de Selys into five legions: Thore, 

 Calopteryx, Euphaea, Lihellago, and Amphipteryx. Venationally 

 these five groups are better arranged in three subfamilies, as was 

 done by Professor Needham (1903a), which I shall call : Polythorinae, 

 to include the legion Thore; Agrioninae, for the legion Calopteryx, 

 and the Epallaginae, for the last three legions. To these must now 

 be added a fourth subfamily, the Disparocyphinae for the genus 

 Disparocypha (fig. 37), recently described by Dr. Ris (1916b). 

 This very remarkable genus will be discussed later with the reasons 

 for its segregation from the others. 



The affinities of the Agrionidae with Epiophlebia (fig. i) are 

 evident enough: the large number of antenodals, the origin of Ms 

 far before the subnodus, and the location of the nodus far out in 

 the wing. 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




10 



A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



PROTOnEURIMAE 

 LESTOIDIMAE 



\ CoEMAGRIOrSINAL 



Lestimae \ ^^ I ■ / 



r\EGAP0DA6Ri0NIHAE 



PsEUD05TI6MATinAE 



EPALLAei/SAE 

 DiSPAROCYPHIHAE 



Agriomi/sae 



POLYTnORIfiAE 



Epiophlebinae 



AfilSOZYGOPTERA 



Fig. C. Proposed Phylogenetic Tree for the Zygoptera. 



The Polythorinae 



The most sharply differentiated group of the Agrionidae, in that 



it differs most from the others, Is the Polythorinae. In it M does 



not descend the arculus to any extent, so that the quadrangle is 



very much wider proximally than distally and is concave anteriorly. 




PHILIP A. MUNZ II 



This peculiar little group of four genera is a rather compact one, but 

 shows within itself the ever present tendencies of specialization to 

 be found in the other subfamilies. It retains a rich venation with 

 many cross-veins, but has these fewer in number in the higher 

 genera, has petiolation become more advanced, has some of the 

 sectors tend to become attached to the principal veins, and has M2 

 becoming branched from Mi beyond the subnodus. Polythore 

 (fig. 2) and Euthore (fig. 3) are the two more generalized, Cora 

 (fig. 5) and Chalcopteryx (fig. 4) the two more specialized genera. 

 The fact that the Polythorinae are discussed first does not mean 

 that they are the most generalized Zygoptera; their quadrangle 

 and the continuing of the direction of Mi_3 by M1+2 rather than by 

 M3, as well as their petiolation, gainsay this. However, they are 

 the most distinct group and must have separated from the others 

 at rather a low level. 



The Agrioninae 



Venationally this group is quite distinct from the Epallaginae; 

 however, Schmidt (1915) working on the male genitalia, finds 

 there no basis for such a division. The Agrioninae consists of the 

 Vestalinae as defined by Dr. Needham (1903a) and can be dis- 

 tinguished from the Epallaginae and Disparocyphinae by the 

 following venational tendencies: Mia has a course parallel to that 

 of M2, the stigma becomes diffuse and finally atrophies altogether; 

 and the vein Cu2 in most forms has a branch Cuoa running toward 

 the hind margin of the wing. Vestalis (fig. 18) , Heterina (fig. 19) and 

 Lais (fig. 20) do not possess this branch, but the facts that the 

 stigma may be lost, that M^ is parallel to M2, that the quadrangle 

 becomes convex above, that some of the sectors tend to become 

 attached to the longitudinal veins, and that there is no petiolation- 

 and but slight reduction in the number of antenodals, indicate 

 affinities with the Agrioninae rather than the Epallaginae. The 

 subfamily Agrioninae has its own methods of specialization, but its 

 line ends in itself and shows no relationship to higher forms. 



Aside from the Vestalis-IIeterina-Lais group, which is the most 

 distinct, the remaining genera can be divided into those which 

 have Cu2a running perpendicular to the hind margin of the wing or 

 toward the base of the wing, and those in which it is bent away 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




12 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



from the base of the wing. The former group begins with such' 

 genera as Archineura (fig. 8) and Echo (fig. 7) and continuing 

 through Umma (fig. 9), SapJw (fig. 10) and Agrion (fig. 11), ends, 

 with Matrona (fig. 13), Matronoides (fig. 12), and Neurohasis (fig. 

 14). The latter group consists of Mnais (fig. 15), Psolodesmus 

 (fig. 16), and Phao?i (fig. 17), which approach Vestalis (fig. 18) in 

 some respects; for example in the attachment of sectors, in the 

 convexity of the quadrangle above, and in the general wing pro- 

 portion and number of cross-veins. 



The Epallaginae 



The discussion now leads to perhaps some of the most generalized 

 of living Zygoptera: the genera Pseudophaea (fig. 21) and Dysphaea 

 (fig. .22). It is here that one must look for the beginning of the 

 line which leads to the higher family by reduction in the number 

 of cross-veins and of the supplementary sectors, by the location of 

 Mia halfway between Mi and M2, and especially by the bending of 

 M3 and Rs away from Mi+o so that it is the latter vein rather than 

 Ms which continues the direction of M 1+2+3- All the genera so far 

 discussed under the Zygoptera, except the Polythorinae, have M3 

 in line with M 1+2+3, but in the higher members of the Epallaginae 

 it is no longer the case. Petiolation too proceeds to a high degree 

 of advancement and the stigma persists. Beginning then, with 

 Pseudophaea (fig. 21) and Dysphaea (fig. 22) a series can be ar- 

 ranged (as has been done in the key to the Epallaginae) which 

 proceeds" by reduction and petiolation through Bayadera (fig. 23), 

 EpaUage (fig. 24), Anisopleura (fig. 25) and Rhinocypha (fig. 26) 

 to Micromerus (fig. 28) where the new condition is first evident as 

 regards the base of M3. Rhinocypha (fig. 26), Libellago (fig. 27), 

 and Micromerus (fig. 28) form rather a compact and distinct 

 group with M4 arching forward and Cu2 backward, more so than 

 in the related genera and with Rg and M2 parallel at their tips and 

 with two prominent sectors between. Cyanocharis (fig. 29),. 

 Caliphaea, Heliocharis (fig. 30), Dicterias (fig. 32) and Neocharis 

 (fig. 31) carry on the reduction process until in Devadatta (fig. 33) 

 and Amphipteryx (fig. 34) the continuing of Mi+2+3 by M1+2 is 

 again evident and firmly established. Diphlebia (fig. 34) is enough 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 13. 



like a low form of the Lestinae to be taken for one but for the pres- 

 ence of too many antenodals; and in Philoganga (fig. 36) is to be 

 seen the beginning of the tendency for Rg and M3 to arise nearer 

 the subnodus. Thus the evolutionary steps in the Epallaginae 

 are in marked contrast to those in the Agrioninae. 



The Disparocyphinae 



The genus Disparocypha (fig. 37) is placed by Ris in the legion 

 Libellago and it is clearly related to that group. But its characters 

 of difTerence are so great that to be consistent with the arrange- 

 ment in the higher subfamilies, it must be placed in a separate one. 

 It differs from the members of the legion Libellago as much as the 

 Protoneura group does from the Coenagrion group or the genus 

 Lestoidea (fig. 45) from Lestes. Cui is short, not extending to the 

 level of the subnodus; Cu2 is reduced to a cross- vein; A ends in the 

 hind margin of the quadrangle; M4 is almost perfectly straight in 

 its entire length; and the stigma is very much broader distallythan 

 proximally. 



This reduction of Cui and Cu2, which seems to be a very highly 

 specialized tendency, will be discussed again under Lestoidea (fig. 

 45) and Protoneura. Its occurrence in three widely separated 

 groups is indeed an interesting parallelism. 



The Coenagrionidae 

 As the two families now stand they can conveniently be sepa- 

 rated by placing in the Agrionidae those genera with five or more 

 antenodals and with M3 arising nearer the arculus than the sub- 

 nodus. Of the Coenagrionidae those with more than two anteno- 

 dals have M3 arising near the subnodus and often have the nodus 

 very near the base of the wing, while those with M3 arising near 

 the arculus have only two antenodals. Now from this state of 

 affairs it is evident that the division into two families is somewhat 

 artificial and yet, I think, it is a tenable one and it certainly is 

 convenient. The higher family includes only more specialized 

 forms than the lower; the only difficulty in the whole situation is 

 .that our series from one to the other is too complete to make the 

 divisions clearly marked. From the phylogenetic standpoint this 

 condition is of course fortunate. Diphlehia (fig. 34) and related 

 genera show very evident affinities to the Lestinae among the 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




14 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



Coenagrionidae, especially in the position of the base of M3 

 and of Rs and in the petiolation and general arrangement of 

 veins. It connects the Lestinae to the Epallaginae through 

 the genera Psendolestes and Ortholestes, and differs from these forms 

 chiefly in the number of antenodals. On the other hand, the 

 Lestinae are related very closely to the Megapodagrioninae by 

 Rhipidolestes (fig. 52). Yet in this same group of Megapodagrion- 

 inae it is necessary to include Thaumatoneura (fig. 51), which with 

 its number of antenodals and abundant sectors indicates a descent 

 from some Agrionid, possibly one like Philoganga (fig. 36) in which 

 the quadrangle is short, and M3 and Rs arise at some little distance 

 beyond the arculus. The retraction of the nodus in a form like 

 Philoganga would bring about a condition comparable to that in 

 Thatimatoneura, except for the numerous sectors and many cross- 

 veins of the latter. As will be shown later, Thaumatoneura in turn 

 leads to the Pseudostigmatinae and to the other Megapodagrion- 

 inae, which by reduction approach the Coenagrioninae and these in 

 their turn are connected with the Protoneurinae. After this addi- 

 tional evidence is presented, it will be seen that it is a very logical 

 thing to consider the Coenagrionidae merely a specialized offshoot 

 or number of offshoots from the Agrionid ae, as arranged in the 

 tree in Figure C. 



In this connection the following quotation is of interest. Till- 

 yard (1914b) in discussing the classification of the Zygoptera de- 

 clares, "It becomes now more than ever apparent that the Selysian 

 division into Calopterygidae and Agrionidae is quite untenable as a 

 natural dichotomy, more than this, it is pretty clear also that the 

 Zygoptera are not like the Anisoptera, derived from an original pure 

 line descent. Triangle-formation most certainly started once ; and, 

 however far back new fossil discoveries may take us as regards the 

 first formation of the triangle, there can be no doubt about the 

 origin of all Anisoptera from that single line of descent, which 

 Palaeontology already places as far back as the Trias, and which 

 probably began in the Permian period. Most of the Zygoptera 

 (certainly all those with regular quadrilaterals) must have branched 

 away from the Anisoptera-XmQ before this. But who can tell how 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 15 



many separate branchings took place, even amongst this one por- 

 tion of the Suborder? The origin of the tribe Agrionini^ is doubt- 

 ful, for their acute quadrilateral might yet be proved to be the 

 reduced remnant of an originally weak Anisopterid triangle-forma- 

 tion. Finally, standing out clear from all the rest as the most 

 recent ofTshoot from the Anisopterid line, we see the Epiophlebia- 

 Synlestes-Lestes line of descent, which branched off from that line 

 not very far from the beginnings of the Gomphinae, and whose 

 sharply angulated quadrilateral is almost certainly an Anisopterid 



remnant," 



Following out his theory, Mr. Tillyard places this "line of de- 

 scent" in a family Lestidae and divides it into the following sub- 

 families: Epiophlebinae, Lestinae, Synlestinae, and Heterophle- 

 binae, the last named containing fossils only. It is now known 

 that Epiophlebia (fig. i) is far from being near the Lestinae not 

 only venationally, but on the basis of the genitalia, it is of far too 

 generalized a nature to be placed near them, although an oblique 

 vein between M2 and Rs is present" in both subfamilies and many 

 of the sectors are very zigzag. The Zygoptera cannot be con- 

 sidered as derived from the Anisoptera, but form a dichotomy 

 with them, both arising from the ancient Anisozygoptera. The 

 argument that all Zygoptera with the regular quadrangle are 

 primitive is also unfounded; the regularity of the quadrangle, that 

 is, its squareness distally, is not so fundamental a thing as it might 

 seem. Those forms which are perhaps the most highly specialized, 

 those in which Cu2 is reduced to a cross-vein, have the^ square 

 quadrangle; yet this condition arises independently three times, in 

 Disparocypha (fig. 37). in Lestoidea (fig. 45) and in the Protoneur- 

 inae. I cannot, therefore, agree with any of the views expressed 

 in the above quotation as regards the phylogeny of the Zygoptera. 

 This subject can, however, be more fully discussed in treating each 

 subfamily independently. 



The Lestinae 

 The Lestinae, as has been said before, include those Coenagrion- 

 idae in which the vein M3 arises nearer the arculus than the sub- 

 nodus, therefore it comprises the legion Lestes of de Selys. This 

 feature is an ancient and primitive one and specialization in this 



2 Agrionini is Coenagrionidae of this paper. 

 MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




1 6 A VENATION AL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



group has been in a different direction from that in the other Coen- 

 agrionidae. The presence of the oblique vein between M2 and Rg 

 is of course a character recalling the condition to be found in the 

 Anisoptera, but it seems to be a rather dangerous one on which to 

 depend too extensively if it means that Epiophlebia must be placed 

 in the same category as the Lestinae. Pseudolestes (fig. 38) and 

 Ortholestes (fig. 39) have the general venation of the Lestinae and 

 are intermediate between the higher Lestine genera and Diphlebia 

 (fig. 34). Yet they do not possess the oblique vein, at least it is 

 not distinct. Cannot this cropping out of a primitive feature be 

 a secondary matter, a reappearance? It is evidently so in the case 

 of the square quadrangle of Protoneura, Lestoidea, and Disparo- 

 cypha. A single character is dangerous to use too far to the exclu- 

 sion of others, although it may sometimes seem necessary to do so. 

 The oblique vein is present also in Chlorolestes (fig. 66) and Syn- 

 lestes (fig. 63) yet the rest of the venation does not suggest the 

 Lestinae. This oblique vein is of course present in those genera 

 in the nymphs of which the trachea for Rg is joined to the trachea 

 for Mo. Whether this attachment of the trachea is to be taken as 

 more or less important than the adult venation is the question. It 

 seems reasonable to lay more stress on the latter since in it several 

 other characters unite in placing Chlorolestes and Synlestes in the 

 Megapodagrioninae. 



Pseudolestes (fig. 38), Ortholestes (fig. 39) and Rhipidolestes (fig. 

 52) show a connection between the Lestinae and Megapodagrion- 

 inae, and these two subfamilies can be considered as offshoots from 

 the same general region of the Agrionidae. Their close affinity 

 warrants the retention of the subfamily name for the Lestinae 

 rather than the use of a family name. Of the forms included here 

 under Lestinae Pseudolestes (fig. 38) is undoubtedly the most primi- 

 tive, in having the quadrangle like that of Diphlebia (fig. 34) and 

 in its large number of supplementary sectors. Ortholestes (fig. 39) 

 comes next and is followed by the Lestine genera proper: Archi- 

 lestes (fig. 40), Megalestes (fig. 41), Orolestes, Platylestes, Lestes (fig. 

 44), Sympycna (fig. 42), etc. The general tendency is that of 

 reduction, combined with straightening of the veins at the tips. 

 Many sectors and veins are somewhat zigzag, and there develops 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 17 



also a narrowing and sharpening of the quadrangle distally. Peti- 

 olation does not proceed very far, never to the level of the arculus. 



The Lestoidinae 



Mr. Tillyard (1912a) described as a new genus a very peculiar 

 form which he called Lestoidea (fig. 45) and for which he proposed 

 a new legion of the same name. This remarkable insect has de- 

 cided Lestine affinities in the location of the base of M3 and R^, but 

 has the vein Cu2 reduced to a cross-vein and Cui but one cell long. 

 Yet in addition to the above characters it is distinguished from all 

 Protoneurinae by the presence of two sectors between Mi and Mi.^. 



The decrease in length of Cui and Cuo is one of the most extreme 

 tendencies in specialization occurring in the Zygoptera and its 

 origin in the various groups is an interesting parallelism. As al- 

 ways happens when Cuo is thus reduced MA is straightened and the 

 quadrangle ends squarely. The retention of the two sectors be- 

 tween Ml and Mi^ is rather remarkable, in view of the fact that all 

 others are gone and that in none of the Lestinae are there any long 

 sectors between these two veins. Lestoidea must therefore have 

 arisen from some rather ancient form and is distinct enough to 

 merit a legion for itself or in the system here used, a subfamily. 



The Megapodagrioninae 



Here are included the genera ordinarily considered as belonging 

 to the legion Podagrion of de Selys; this is the group which leads 

 to the higher members of the Coenagrionidae. The genus most 

 distinct from the others is undoubtedly Thaumatoneiira (fig. 51), 

 which has been given much attention by various workers. Mc- 

 Lachlan (1897) and Foerster (1909) referred it to the Agrionidae; 

 Needham (1903a) spoke of its affinities to the Pseudostigmatinae 

 and Calvert (191 3) placed it in the Megapodagrioninae. All 

 agreed that it was an intermediate form. The safest course to 

 follow seems to be to leave it in the Megapodagrioninae, but to call 

 attention to the fact that it shows an undoubted approach to the 

 Pseudostigmatinae. It is unquestionably one of the Coenagrion- 

 idae although it does have more than two antenodals. Neuro- 

 lestes (fig. 62), Trineuragrion (fig. 54), and often Neuragrion hav^e 

 three antenodals as the normal condition, so that the old idea of 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




l8 . A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



two as being an infallible means of determining Coenagrionidae 

 must give way, as has been stated by previous workers. The re- 

 traction of the nodus is a more fundamental difference than the 

 retention of four or five cross-veins and must place the genus in 

 the higher family. Now as to its subfamily ; it is convenient to 

 limit the Pseudostigmatinae to those genera in which the stigma 

 becomes diffused and which have Mia following M2 rather than 

 Ml. If this is done, Thaumatoneura may be placed near the base 

 of the Pseudostigma line. I can readily see, however, that its gen- 

 eral vein-arrangemeat, its large postnodal area, its broad area 

 behind Cu and its retracted nodus may indicate a condition near 

 enough to that of Megaloprepus (fig. 46) to warrant placing the 

 two in the same subfamily. 



To' return to the general discussion of the Megapodagrioninae, 

 it may be said that Rhipidolestes (fig. 52) in the position of the base 

 of M3 shows a decided affinity to the Lestinae, to separate it from 

 which is perhaps as artificial an arrangement as to divide Thauma- 

 toneura from the Pseudostigmatinae. The extreme petiolation and 

 long narrow quadrangle, however, of Rhipidolestes throw it in this 

 subfamily, which may be said really to begin with Podopteryx 

 (fig- 53)- From there on, the adult venation at least, gives a well 

 connected series which has been carefully discussed by Dr. Cal- 

 vert (191 3). As nearly as they can be made to do so the keys 

 show my interpretation of its evolution. M3 and R« at their points 

 of attachment move outward to beyond the subnodus, the quad- 

 rangle becomes elongate, the wing reaches the extreme of petiola- 

 tion, and the number of supplementary sectors is reduced to none 

 other than M^. 



Tillyard (1914), on the basis of the presence of the oblique vein 

 formed the Synlestinae as a group including such genera as Chloro- 

 lestes (fig. 66) and Synlestes (fig. 63), and placed them with the 

 Lestinae. But, as has been shown, this was a dangerous undertak- 

 ing. According to Schmidt (1915) the genera Chlorolestes (fig. 66) 

 and Synlestes (fig. 63) belong to the Lestinae on the basis of the 

 structure of the male genitalia; his figures, however, fail to show 

 any very close connection. Venationally they are not to be placed 

 in the Lestinae; M3 arises very near to or at the subnodus although 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 19 



the general wing proportions are tliose of the Lestinae, in which it 

 arises far before the subnodus: petiolation has proceeded to the 

 level of half the length of the quadrangle; in the Lestinae it does 

 not reach the arculus. It is true that Cui arches forward just 

 beyond MA as in Lestes (fig. 44), but that is the case in some other 

 genera as well; for example Chorismagrion (fig. 69) and Trineura- 

 grion (fig. 54) and Dimeragrion (fig. 67) to a certain extent. Rhipid- 

 olestes (fig. 52) in its venation is nearer to Lestes (fig. 44), but 

 Schmidt considers it much nearer Megapodagrion (fig. 57) itself on 

 the basis of the penis. 



I have spoken before of the progressive reduction of the sectors 

 in the Megapodagrioninae until all except Mia are gone; when this 

 state is arrived at, the condition to be found in the Coenagrioninae 

 is present. But there are two genera which agree with the Coen- 

 agrioninae in this respect, but which seem better retained in the 

 Megapodagrioninae. These are Chorismagrion (fig. 69) and Peri- 

 lestes (fig. 70) ; their extreme petiolation, the remote origin of Rg 

 and Mg, the arching forward of Cui beyond MA, and the heavy 

 stigma of Chorismagrion are indicative of affinity to Synlestes (fig. 

 63) and Ileteragrion (fig. 68) and through its likeness to Chorismag- 

 rion, Perilestes is to be placed at the apex of the Megapodagrion 

 line. 



Just the fact, then, of the presence or absence of supplementary 

 sectors is not a safe criterion by which to separate the IVIegapo- 

 dagrioninae from the higher forms. It is indeed an accompani- 

 ment of specialization and reduction and is a convenient character 

 to use. Generally mere presence or absence is not so reliable a 

 matter as might be supposed, since two forms without a giv^en char- 

 acter may have arisen independently from two very distinct an- 

 cestors, one with the 'character present in one way, another with it 

 in quite a different way. 



It is probable, however, that the forms placed by de Selys in the 

 legions Agrion and Platycnemis have been derived from others, 

 closely related to Megapodagrion (fig. 57), in which petiolation has 

 not reached the level of Ac and in which M3 arises before the sub- 

 nodus. A wing like that of Megapodagrion with the supplementary 

 sectors removed would be much like Platycnemis (fig. 74). Per- 

 haps the distinction between the legion Podagrion on the one hand, 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




20 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



and Platycnemis and Coefiagrion on the other is hardly great 

 enough to merit their being placed in separate subfamilies, but it 

 may be done, if it is kept in mind that the groups are close to each 

 other and that the second is an offshoot from the first. 



So much may suffice for a discussion of the Megapodagrioninae; 

 those groups to which it has given origin may now be discussed. 



The Pseudostigmatinae 



As here used, this subfamily includes the Anormostigmatini of 

 Kirby's Catalogue, and is characterized by a diffusion of the stigma, 

 by having Mia parallel to M2 rather than to Mi, and by a very re- 

 tracted nodus with a long postnodal portion which has many cross- 

 veins and with the longitudinal veins running far out into the wing. 

 These insects are as specialized in a venational way as in their 

 elongate abdomens and peculiar habit of life, the nymphs living 

 in the small pools in epiphytic Bromeliads. If it were not for the 

 genus Thaumatoneura (fig. 51) they would stand so far removed 

 from all other Zygoptera as perhaps to deserve a separate family. 



Megaloprepus (fig. 46), however, the most generalized of the five 

 genera, has so many points of similarity to Thaumatoneura that 

 there can be no doubt of their relationship. They agree in the 

 width and general proportions of the wings, in the presence of 

 abundant sectors and the position of the nodus. Megaloprepus 

 shows a more generalized condition than the remaining genera in 

 the short quadrangle, the broad area back of Cu2 with many at- 

 tached sectors, and in the fact that the stigma while diffuse is not 

 so much so as in the others. 



Within the group the same tendencies of specialization appear 

 as in other groups: loss of sectors, narrowing of the wing, reduction 

 in number of cross-veins, straightening of veins, elongation of the 

 quadrangle, and petiolation of the wing. Next to Megaloprepus 

 comes Microstigma (fig. 47), with the quadrangle about five times as 

 long as wide and with M1+2 forking more than half the distance 

 from the subnodus to the tip of the wing. In these respects these 

 two genera differ from Anomisma (fig. 48), but agree with it in hav- 

 ing many secondary sectors and with Cu2 bearing many branches. 

 Anomisma is peculiar in being a genus of Coenagrionidae having a 

 crossed quadrangle, Pseiidostigma (fig. 49) and Mecistogaster (fig. 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 21 



50) have few sectors and no branches to Cu2. Mecistogaster is the 

 most specialized of all, with a single row of cells behind Cu2 and 

 between M^ and Mo. It is interesting to note that in this group 

 the tendency is for the nodus to approach a more normal position 

 in the wing, so that in Mecistogaster (fig. 50) it is at one-fourth 

 the length of the wing, while in Megaloprepiis (fig. 46) it is at 

 one-seventh. 



The Coenagrioninae 



Baron de Selys created two legions, Platycnemis and Agrion, for 

 the reception of genera which fall, it is true, into two groups, but 

 these have no definite nor sharply defined differences. In general 

 it can be said that the quadrangle of the first of these groups has a 

 relatively long upper side, hence that the outer angle is not very 

 acute, but there are exceptions to this, as for example in Leptocne- 

 mis (fig. 80); in the second legion there are exceptions to the obliq- 

 uity of the quadrangle, since some of the more specialized forms, 

 as Hemiphlebia (fig. 106) and Agriocnemis (fig. 104), have a fairly 

 regular one. For that reason a recent key to subfamilies of the 

 Zygoptera does not hold as applied in the following quotation: 



"Quadrilateral regular Subfamily Platycneminae. 



Quadrilateral irregular, usually with distal angle sharply acute. 



Subfamily Agrioninae."^ 

 Now these two groups have many points in common; they have no 

 supplementary sectors other than Mia, they have the stigma rather 

 short as compared with that of the Megapodagrioninae and they 

 have Cu2 well developed. Since they do grade so from one into 

 the other, and are so fundamentally related, I cannot follow the 

 above example and place them in separate subfamilies; in fact, I 

 am not absolutely sure that as many such divisions ought to be 

 recognized as I have already done in this paper, that is, whether 

 these "subfamily" groups are really equivalent to subfamilies in 

 other orders. 



This placing both in one group does not indicate, however, that 

 my feeling is that the legions Platycnemis and Coenagrion are not 

 rather distinct. Although the quadrangle alone does not suffice in 



^ Agrioninae is here used for the legion Agrion of de Selys, hence it is equivalent to 

 the Coenagrioninae of this paper minus the Platycnemis group. 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




22 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



all cases to separate the two, the general wing proportion and ar- 

 rangement of the veins do. In Platycnemis (fig. 74) and its allies 

 the wing is long and with the longitudinal veins arranged in a very 

 regular and parallel fashion. The cells are largely square or rec- 

 tangular, while in the group containing Coenagrion (fig. 94) there is 

 a tendency for M1+2 to bend posteriorly at the subnodal region and 

 for M4 and Cu2 to be zigzag so that many cells are pentagonal. 

 The methods of specialization in the two groups are also different, 

 in the Platycnemis series are retained some of the features to be 

 found in the Megapodagrioninae; for example, (i) great petiola- 

 tion which may extend beyond the level of the arculus, and (2) an 

 outward migration of the base of Rg to a considerable distance be- 

 yond the subnodus. In the second group, on the other hand, petio- 

 lation is delayed for a long time, so that it never reaches the level 

 of the arculus, and Rg arises beyond the subnodus in Amphicncmis 

 (fig. 129) only. Many of the Coenagrion group are further special- 

 ized by a great reduction in the number of cross veins in the wing. 

 To come now to the discussion of the legion Platycnemis in de- 

 tail, it is perhaps to be noted first of all that this may not be a 

 natural group, it may represent a collection of forms each of which 

 is the result of the dropping out of sectors from some corresponding 

 Megapodagrionine. If Megapodagrion (fig. 57) itself, by way of 

 example, were to lose its supplementary sectors, the resulting vena- 

 tion would be much like that of Platycnemis (fig. 74) or Calicnemis 

 (fig. 'J2). The same might be true of Wahnesia (fig. 65) and Tatoc- 

 nemis (fig. 78), of Heteragrion perhaps, (fig. 68) and of Prionocne- 

 mis (fig. 79). However this may be, and although these genera 

 resembling Platycnemis may not have come from a common an- 

 cestor, they do form a remarkably close and well connected series 

 beginning with Metacnemis (fig. 71), Calicnemis (fig. "ji), and 

 Platycnemis (fig. 74), in which the wing is not petioled to the level of 

 Ac, and Rs begins at the subnodus. Proceeding through Idiocnemis 

 (fig- 75). Coeliccia (fig. 76), and Allocnemis (fig. J'j), petiolation and 

 the outward movement of the base of Rs advance until the two 

 tendencies reach their culmination in Tatocnemis (fig. 78) and 

 Prionocnemis (fig. 79) respectively. 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 23 



Leptocnemis (fig. 79) and Paracnemis which are rather typical 

 forms of the Platycnemis group, except in the proportions of the 

 quadrangle, and Antiagriofi (fig. 81) a segregate of the old genus 

 Coenagrion itself, offer themselves as transitional genera to the 

 remaining Coenagrioninae. 



These other genera in turn, can be divided into two groups: the 

 Argia group and that of Coenagrion proper. In the former the 

 inner end of the quadrangle is generally longer than the upper part 

 of the arculus and as long as the upper side of the quadrangle, which 

 is widened distally. Another character, not venational, is the 

 presence of long tibial spines. This group has its own evolutionary 

 line which begins with Hyponeura (fig. 82) and Palaiargia (fig. 83) 

 and proceeds by greater petiolation, shortening of Cu2, and reduc- 

 tion of the number of postnodals through Argia (fig. 84) to Argial- 

 lagma (fig. 86) and Diargia (fig. 85). 



• Of the Coenagrion group proper, it may be said that venation 

 offers fewer marks for identification than in any other group of the 

 Zygoptera, and it is here that keys for determination must be 

 artificial. The genera are so numerous and so much alike that 

 other characters are necessary for their differentiation. Venation 

 does, however, indicate the general tendencies of phylogeny. Mr. 

 Tillyard (191 2) may be quoted as follows, "Those forms are the 

 least asthenogenetic in which the basal postcostal nervule* is closest 

 to the base of the wing, the petiolation consequently least marked, 

 and the inferior sector of the triangle longest and best developed. 

 Such forms, while marking the 'high-water mark' of success- 

 ful coenogenetic specialisation in the legion, must nevertheless 

 be considered to be more in line with the ancestral stem of the 

 group than are their asthenogenetic off-shoots." Following this 

 theory, one can readily arrange a series which begins with Oreagrion 

 (fig. ^j) and Pyrrhosoma (fig. 89) and, by a shortening of Cu2 and a 

 reduction in the number of postnodals, continues through EnaUagma 

 (fig. 98), Ischnura (fig. 100) and Coenagrion (fig. 94) to another 

 dividing point, one branch leading off in the direction of reduction 

 in size and further decrease in the number of postnodals until 

 Ceratura (fig. 102), Anomalagrion (fig. 97), Agriocnemis (fig. 104) 



* Basal postcostal nervule is the vein Ac of this paper. Inferior sector of the tri- 

 angle is Cu2. 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




24 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



and Hemiphlehia (fig. io6) are arrived at; the other branch devel- 

 ops by a greater petiolation, which extends to or beyond Ac in 

 those genera above Pseiidagrion (fig. 114). This line continues 

 through Oxyagrion (fig. 109), Acanthagrion (fig. no) and others until 

 a new tendency is observable, namely the movement outward of 

 the base of M3, until the origin of this vein very nearly coincides 

 with that of Rs. This is true of such genera as Nesohasis, Aciagrion 

 (fig. 123), Leptohasis (fig. 127) and Teinobasis (fig. 128). In 

 Amphicnemis (fig. 129) the base of M3 reaches thesubnodus and Rg 

 arises a cell beyond, while petiolation extends at least to the level 

 of the arculus. 



To return for a moment t® the discussion of Ceratura (fig. 102), 

 Anomalagrion (fig. 97) and their allies; there are to be found here 

 several very interesting and peculiar conditions. The male of 

 Anomalagrion hastatum in the fore-wing has the stigma small and 

 three-sided, with the apex of this triangle not reaching the margin* 

 of the wing, and with the base on Ri. Ceratura (fig. 102), Aus- 

 trocnemis (fig. 104) and Hemiphlehia (fig. 106) have the second 

 antenodals placed before the arculus, and have only from five to 

 seven postnodals, while Cuo extends but a few cells beyond the 

 level of the subnodus. In Austrocnemis and Hemiphlehia petiola- 

 tion extends almost to Ac, since Ab and Ac are in line with each 

 each other. A' does not begin at the wing margin and the other 

 characters above mentioned place these two genera in this line 

 rather than in the Leptohasis one. The absence of the inner end 

 of the quadrangle in the fore-wing of the male of Hemiphlehia (fig. 

 106) is an unusual state of affairs, and an interesting parallelism to 

 the Megapodagrionine Chorismagrion (fig. 69) recently described 

 by Morton (1914). 



The Protoneurinae 

 This subfamily, the most specialized one among all the Zygop- 

 tera, includes the legion Protoneura of de Selys. It is distinguished 

 primarily by the reduction in length of Cua which is generally 

 represented by a cross-vein only. In fact, this character was the 

 one first used by de Selys to determine whether a genus belonged in 

 the legion or not. On the discovery of Pro/zez^ra prolongata (fig. 131), 

 in 1889, with the vein Cu2 one cell long, he modified the definition 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 25 



of the legion to include this form and the genus Chlorocnemis (fig. 

 130) which is likewise characterized by having Cu2 one cell in 

 length. It is of course evident that these two genera are interme- 

 diate between the old legions Agrion and Platycnemis proper. Yet 

 they are closer to the latter and may easily be considered as coming 

 in the same subfamily with it. 



Chlorocnemis (fig. 130) with its general wing proportions and 

 arrangement of veins is a genus connecting Platycnemis (fig. 74) 

 with such genera as Palaemnema (fig. 136) and Platysticta, which 

 also have a long postnodal area with the longitudinal veins very 

 regularly and evenly placed. Proneura (fig. 131), on the other 

 hand, shows its affinities with the Coenagrion group on the one side 

 and Neonenra (fig. 133) and related genera on the other, in it are 

 found the pentagonal cells near AI4, the bend of M 1+2+3 before the 

 subnodus, and the small number of the cells of the wing and a short 

 vein Mia. 



After Cu2 has become reduced, the next step in the evolution of 

 the Protoneiirinae seems to have been the atrophy of that part of 

 the anal vein beyond Ac. Thus in Disparoneura (fig. 132), Peri- 

 sticta (fig. 134), Neonenra (fig. 133), and Idioneura (fig. 135) it 

 extends to the medio-anal link; in Palaemnema (fig. 136) and the 

 old genus Platysticta (fig. 137) it ends before MA on the posterior 

 edge of the quadrangle, and in Hypostrophoneura on the hind mar- 

 gin of the wing. In the higher forms it does not extend beyond Ac, 

 which then is generally moved nearer the base of the wing until in 

 Nososticta (fig. 151), Isosticta (fig. 150), and Selysioneiira (fig. 153) 

 it lies before the level of the first antenodals. At the same time 

 Cui becomes shorter and the whole line culminates in Selysioncura 

 (fig. 153), w^hich has only a cross-vein for both Cui and Cuo. In its 

 absence of sectors other than Mia, in the reduction of Cui and Cu2, 

 in the origin of both Rg and M3 beyond the subnodus, in the 

 absence of that portion of A beyond Ac, in the retracted position 

 of Ac, and in the fact that the second antenodals lie before the 

 arculus, this genus presents a combination of characters of so high 

 a degree of specialization that it can hardly be equalled in its 

 reduction by any other member of the Zygoptera. It is therefore 

 fitting that it should be placed at the very apex of the genealogic 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




26 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



tree of the suborder, and should bear the name of the man who has 

 done more than any other worker to further our knowledge of the 

 Odonata, namely Baron de Selys-Longchamps. 



In contrast to the Coenagrioninae the Protoneurinae do not have 

 the reduction in the number of postnodals, they are as numerous in 

 Selysioneura (fig. 153) as in Disparoneura (fig. 132). 



Ill— TENDENCIES IN SPECIALIZATION 



These have been rather fully discussed in previous papers, par- 

 ticularly by Dr. Needham (1903a) for the order Odonata as a whole, 

 and by Dr. Calvert (1913) for the Zygoptera with special reference 

 to the Megapodagrioninae. It is my purpose here to review their 

 opinions and to add a few observations of my own. 



I think it must be apparent from the preceding discussion on the 

 phylogeny that the outstanding features in the development of the 

 Zygoptera are a constant reduction and simplification of venation. 

 At any rate this is true from the standpoint of comparative mor- 

 phology and to a certain degree it seems to be so paleontologically. 

 As might be expected this reduction is to some extent accompanied 

 by a decrease in the power of flight. Dr. Calvert says, " Many of 

 the ideas which have been expressed on the changes which have 

 taken place in the venation of the Odonate wings have been based 

 on the comparative morphology of living representatives of the 

 order or on mechanical advantage. It does not follow that these 

 foundations are trustworthy or that there has always been mechan- 

 ical improvement in the wings. Degeneration is just as probable 

 as progressive development. The actual course of phylogeny can- 

 not be deduced from these considerations or from the data of 

 morphology. It seems therefore desirable to attempt to ascertain 

 what paleontological evidence exists affording clues to the descent 

 of these insects, by tracing the modifications which the wings 

 exhibit from the Carboniferous period down to the present time." 

 This is what he has done and free use is here made of his 

 conclusions. 



It should be noted that the tendencies here discussed are not all 

 present in the group, nor all to be found even in the highest groups, 

 but they are those which impress one, when studying over all the 

 groups, as being indicative of advancement and departure from the 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 27 



generalized condition. They fall under two or three general heads 

 and may be so treated in their discussion. First come those which 

 may be classified under "Vein Reduction," secondly, those having 

 to do with "Vein Shifting," and as a last group "Miscellaneous 

 Features." 



Vein Reduction 

 I. Reduction in the number of supplementary sectors. — This is one 

 of the most evident means of specialization within any group which 

 possesses such sectors, as well as in the whole suborder, of which 

 the two highest subfamilies have none. A comparison of the dif- 

 ferent subfamilies in this regard may be made in a general way by 

 choosing for each one as its most typical genus the one after which 

 it is named. In Table I this has been done, the figures indicating 

 the number of sectors between the veins listed at the top of the 

 columns. The figures are for the front wings. 



Table I 

 The Number of Supplementary Sectors present in the Sub- 

 families of Zygoptera 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3, 




28 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



It should be remembered of course that such a table is of value 

 in a general way only, since there is great variation in some sub- 

 families. Epiophlebia is a member of a lower suborder, yet its 

 supplementary sectors are not so numerous as those of many 

 Zygoptera. Thaumatoneura (fig. 51) is placed in the Megapoda- 

 grioninae, but its many sectors indicate a primitive condition, or 

 possibly they may represent a secondary acquirement. Neverthe- 

 less, this table shows that the highest subfamilies have the fewest 

 sectors. 



Dr. Calvert has shown that in a general way the reticulation of 

 the oldest fossil order related to Odonata, the Protodonata, was 

 rich in supplementary sectors. In Anisozygoptera some wings 

 were richly veined, others less so. He concludes, that we have, 

 therefore, "only the general tendency to guide us when we assume 

 that reduction in density of venation means specialization." 



2. Reduction of the veins Cuo and Cui. — This tendency appears 

 in three widely removed groups; by it are derived Disparocypha 

 (fig. 37) from the Epallaginae, Lestoidea (fig. 45) from the Lestinae, 

 and the Protoneurinae from the Coenagrioninae. As was shown 

 in the discussion of the Protoneurinae, Cui follows Cu2 in its reduc- 

 tion until nothing remains for both except the cross vein forming 

 the lower part of the medio-anal link. This condition is the one to 

 be found in Selysioneura (fig. 153) and is approached by a number 

 of forms, such as Nososticta (fig. 151) and Isosticta (fig. 150). 



3. Decrease in the number of antenodal cross-veins. — This very 

 apparent tendency needs but little discussion, particularly after 

 the thorough treatment given it by Campion (191 3). The number 

 of cross-veins in the lower Agrionidae is very high; in the higher 

 Epallaginae it is reduced to seven, eight, and nine; in the Coenagri- 

 onidae, only Thaumatoneura (fig. 51) has over three. Neurolestes 

 (fig. 62), Trineuragrion (fig. 54), and Neuragrion have three gener- 

 ally, in one wing at least; and Chlorolestes (fig. 66), Podopteryx (fig. 

 53), Paraphlebia (fig. 64), Heteragrion (fig. 68), and Pyrrhosoma 

 (fig. 89) have occasionally been observed to have three ; all others 

 commonly two. Dr. Calvert cites evidence to show that this 

 reduction is not in proportion with the retraction of the nodus, but 

 is apparently an independent and recent acquisition. 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 29 



4. Decrease in the number of postnodals. — In the Zygoptera this 

 tendency comes in much later than does the reduction in the ante- 

 nodal series, nor does it ever reach so advanced a state. It ap- 

 pears very marked in the Coenagrioninae only, and there in the 

 Argia and Coenagrion series some of the highest genera such as 

 Diargia (fig. 85), Agriocnemis (fig. 104), Hemiphlebia (fig. 106), 

 and others have very few postnodals. 



5. Loss of the cross-veins in the quadrangle and subquadr angle. — 

 The number of cross-veins in and before the subquadrangle seems 

 generally to correspond roughly to that of the antenodals. In 

 those Agrionidae with numerous antenodals the subquadrangle is 

 generally crossed and the number of "cubito-anal" cross-veins is 

 so great that Ac itself is distinguished only with difficulty. Neo- 

 charis (fig. 31) offers an interesting exception; in it the antenodals of 

 both series are numerous, but there are no true cross-veins back of 

 Cu. Diphlebia (fig. 34) and Amphipteryx (fig. 35) may also have 

 none. In the Coenagrionidae the lack of cross-veins in the sub- 

 quadrangle has become the normal state and it is only in such 

 forms as Paraphlebia (fig. 64) and Dimeragrion (fig. 67) that any 

 are found. The same tendency is true of the cross-veins of the 

 quadrangle; they are first lost in the Epallaginae and in the higher 

 forms are normally retained by one genus only, Anomisma (fig. 48). 



6. Reduction in number of those antenodal cells situated between Mi 

 and Cui. — As shown by Dr. Calvert "this character is -in general 

 dependent on the degree of retraction of the nodus," and, "a reduc- 

 tion in the number of antenodal cells may occur independently of 

 retraction of the nodus, however, by the greater development of 

 the quadrilateral distad." It is evident also that this reduction is 

 a part of the general tendency toward a smaller number of cross- 

 veins in the wing as a whole; almost any part of which when ob- 

 served through a long ascending series, will show the cross-veins 



* becoming placed further apart. Other examples of the tendency 

 might be noted, for instance, the freeing of the basal radial space 

 where the latter exists. 



7. Reduction in the number of cross-veins behind the anal vein. — 

 In part this is in line with the general tendency to drop out cross- 

 veins; in part due to progressive petiolation which reduces the 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




30 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



amount of space back of the anal bridge and therefore the possi- 

 biHty of cross-veins occurring there. 



Vein Shifting 

 I. Narrowing of the wing. — This tendency is coupled with the 

 first one mentioned in the previous group, namely the reduction in 

 the number of sectors. When the sectors drop out, the principal 

 veins come to lie closer together. The wing may become narrower 

 also by the veins Cui and Cu2 becoming reduced. A comparison 

 of the typical genera of the subfamilies shows at a glance how preva- 

 lent this tendency is (see Table II). 



Table II 



The Ratio of the Width of the Wing to the Length in the Dif- 

 ferent Subfamilies. 



Subfamily Typical genus and species Ratio, as Decimal 



Polythorinae Polythore gigantea .380 



Agrioninae Agrion maculattim .345 



Epallaginae Epallage Jatima .228 



Disparocyphinae Diparocypha biedermanni . 167 



Megapodagrioninae Megapodagrion erinys .201 



Lestinae Lestes rectangularis .203 



Lestoidinae Lestoidea conjuncta .252 



Pseudostigmatinae Pseudostigma, sp ? .195 



Coenagrioninae Coenagrion resohitiim • .210 



Protoneurinae Protoneura capillaris .152 



It is evident in this table, what effect the dropping out of Cu2 in 

 Disparocypha and Protoneura has on the width of the wing. In 

 Lestoidea, however, the presence of two sectors between Mi and 

 Mia, has offset this tendency (see fig. 45). 



The Pseudostigmatinae is a good example of the same tendency 

 (see Table III). The subfamilies Megapodagrioninae, Coena- 

 grioninae, and Epallaginae might be used for similar tables. 



An examination of Handlirsch's figures in "Die Fossilen In- 

 secten" show some rather narrow wings in periods as remote as the 

 Mesozoic; evidently narrowing of the wing and loss of the sectors 

 are ancient tendencies. 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 31 



Table III 

 The Ratio of the Width of the Wing to the Length, in the 

 Pseudostigmatinae. 



Genus and Typical Species Ratio, as Decimal 



Megaloprepus coeruleatus ' , . 267 



Microstigma exiistum .237 



Anomisma ahnorme .204 



Pseudostigma aberrans .177 



Mecistogaster marchali . 148 



2. Progressive petiolation. — In each subfamily except the Agrion- 

 inae, where specialization is along a different direction, there is a 

 very noticeable tendency toward greater petiolation; it has been 

 referred to constantly in the discussion on phylogeny and is used 

 often in the keys, offering as it does an easy index to the amount of 

 departure from the primitive. The Protoneurinae might be con- 

 sidered an exception, since in them, A becomes shorter and the 

 reduction process is a matter of retraction. But in both cases the 

 result is the narrowing of the wing near the base. Dr. Calvert 

 discusses petiolation from the paleontological standpoint and says, 

 "It seems justifiable to assume that the farther distad petiolation 

 has progressed, the more specialized the insect." 



Petiolation reaches its highest development in the Megapoda- 

 grioninae where in Chorismagrion (fig. 69) and Perilestes (fig. 70) 

 it extends to beyond the level of MA. 



3. Retraction of the nodus toward the wing base. — This is one of 

 the most common and evident occurrences in specialization and is 

 discussed in detail by both Professors Needham and Calvert. In 

 the Agrionidae the nodus is almost universally at more than one- 

 third the distance from the base of the wing toward the tip, in the 

 Coenagrionidae at generally less. 



4. Tendency for Mo, Rs, and Ms to arise nearer the tip of the wing 

 and further from the subnodus. — As Dr. Calvert remarks this out- 

 ward "migration may be real or apparent. Retraction of the 

 nodus with no change in position of the separation point of M2 

 would result in a greater interval between nodus and M2 and hence 

 an apparent movement of the latter toward the stigma, but no real 

 movement in respect to the wing as a whole." His table for 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




32 



A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



various members of the Megapodagrioninae shows it is often ap- 

 parent only; but even if so a combination of the preceding ten- 

 dency and of this one indicates specialization. 



A study of almost any group will show the same thing; one that 

 is a good example is the Platycnemis group of the Coenagrioninae 

 (see Table IV). • 



Table IV 



The Ratio to the Length of the Wing of the Distance from the 

 Base of the Wing to the Subnodus and Points of Origin of M2, Rs, 

 and M3. 



A first glance at the wings themselves might suggest to one that 

 M2, Rs, and M3 arise further out in the wing in the last genera than 

 in the first, but an inspection of the above table shows that in 

 general this is not true. It is not even equally true of the different 

 veins but may be more so of some than others; Rg for example in 

 Prionocnemis (fig. 79) does arise beyond what it does in the others, 

 M2 and M3 really arise nearer the base in the more specialized than 

 in the lower wings. The subnodus becomes more retracted, quite 

 consistently so, and the space between it and the points of origin of 

 M2 and Rs enlarges, while the relative positions of the subnodus 

 and the base of M3 change. 



A comparison of the Agrionidae and of the Coenagrionidae shows 

 on the whole, that in the lower subfamilies of the latter family the 

 vein Mi+2 forks at about one-half the wing-length, as it does in the 

 former family, but in the higher subfamilies the movement out- 

 ward is evident. In the whole series Rg and M3 also migrate out- 

 ward. Dr. Calvert says that "the paleontological evidence is not 

 altogether satisfactory and at least admits of the possibility of the 

 separation — points of these three veins having fluctuated proximad 

 or distad from time to time." 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 33 



5. Migration outward of the base of Mia. — This tendency is cor- 

 related somewhat with the preceding, but seems to be independent 

 of it to a certain degree. Most genera among the Agrionidae, 

 Pseudostigmatinae, Lestinae, and Megapodagrioninae have Mia 

 arising about three or four cells beyond the fork of M1+2, or at least 

 rather near it. Perilestes, (fig. 70) however, which has M1+2 fork- 

 ing about two-thirds of the way out has Mia arising below the outer 

 end of the stigma, or about one-fourth of the wing-length beyond 

 M2. This is true to a lesser degree in some of the Coenagrioninae 

 such as Platycnemis (fig. 74), Antiagrion (fig. 81), Hyponeura (fig. 

 82), Agriocnemis (fig. 104), Ceriagrion (fig. 117) and others. It is 

 not on the whole an important character, but does occasionally 

 seem worthy of notice. 



6. The position of the second antenodals before the arcidus. — In 

 those Agrionidae with many antenodals, there is a tendency for two 

 of the costal antenodals to become more strongly developed than 

 the others, and to be in line with two corresponding ones of the sub- 

 costal series, while at the same time the second of these pairs is 

 directly above the arculus. In Epiophlebia (fig. i) this second pair 

 lies considerably beyond the level of the arculus; in Polythore (fig. 

 2) and Eiithore (fig. 3) it is at that level, in Cora (fig. 5) and Chal- 

 copteryx (fig. 4) before it. In the Agrioninae, i.e. the legion Calop- 

 teryx, there is no evident hypertrophy of antenodals, but in the 

 Epallaginae the tendency is again evident and the number of 

 antenodals is reduced, until the two pair typical of the Coenagri- 

 onidae remain. Here, as in the Polythorinae and some Epallaginae, 

 in some of the most highly developed forms: Lestoidea (fig. 45), 

 Perilestes (fig. 70), Chorismagrion (fig. 69), Ceratura (fig. 102), 

 Agriocnemis (fig. 104), Ilemiphlebia (fig. 106), Caconeura (fig. 143), 

 Protoneura (fig. 146), Selysioneura (fig. 153) and others, the second 

 antenodals are distinctly before the level of the arculus. Since 

 this tendency rarely is manifest except in the highest members of 

 the respective groups, it seems indicative of specialization. 



7. The tendency for the quadrangle to become acute distally. — Dr. 

 Needham (1903a) has taken as the primitive type of quadrangle 

 one square distally and Mr. Williamson (1913) agrees that "in the 

 relations of MA," the Calopteryginae (Agrionidae of this paper) 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




34 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



shows a generalized structure and adds that for the Agrioninae 

 (Coenagrionidae here) he believes in two lines of evolutionary 

 activity, one in which MA is the center of activity and the quad- 

 rangle becomes pointed; the other in which ALA. is not changed, 

 but the posterior area of the wing is reduced ; here he refers of course 

 to the Protoneurinae. Dr. Calvert (1913) disagrees with the views 

 above expressed, partly because he finds no paleontological evi- 

 dence for their support. He argues that since "all the Jurassic 

 fossils, which are not clearly Anisoptera, show an oblique quad- 

 rilateral with its posterior distal angle acute," it seems "necessary 

 to regard the oblique quadrilateral as the more primitive and the 

 rectangular as a later appearance." It is true that the Anisozy- 

 goptera figured by Handlirsch have a quadrangle which is some- 

 what acute distally, and that the only living representative of this 

 suborder, Epiophlebia, (fig. 10) has an acute quadrangle, so that 

 this condition seems the more ancient. When the living Zygoptera 

 are taken up, however, those that are in other respects the most 

 primitive have the quadrangle regular; in the Agrionidae, it is only 

 in the higher Epallaginae that the obliquity becomes noticeable; 

 and in the higher Megapodagrioninae, Lestinae, Pseudostigma- 

 tinae, and those Coenagrioninae of the Argia and Coenagrion 

 groups it is carried to its highest development. Comparative 

 morphology, therefore, brings evidence to show that the obliquity 

 of the distal end of the quadrangle is not a direct heritage from the 

 Anisozygoptera, but rather by a parallelism or independent devel- 

 opment, and in general is a sign of specialization. 



I think that enough evidence has now accumulated to show that 

 this obliquity may in turn, grow less and the quadrangle be re- 

 stored to distal squareness. In other words, the quadrangle is not 

 as fixed and unchangeable a part of the wing as might at first be 

 supposed. How else can the same shape of the quadrangle be 

 explained in three widely separate groups which agree only in the 

 reduction of Cu2? I refer to Disparocypha (fig. 37), Lestoidea (fig, 

 45), and the Protoneurinae. Evidently when this reduction takes 

 place new demands for bracing must be met and the quadrangle 

 again becomes square. The squareness of the quadrangle, then, 

 in the lower Agrionidae and in the Protoneurinae, is no proof of a 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 35 



primitive or of a specialized state in both groups, but of one in the 

 first, and of the other in the second. 



8. Change in length of the quadrangle. — At first thought the 

 elongation of the quadrangle seems to be a tendency which may 

 point to departure from the ancient condition and which occurs 

 rather often. Further investigation, however, fails to permit of 

 the selection of any very well marked series in which this can be 

 traced. Apparent elongation may be due to narrowing of the 

 quadrangle itself or retraction of the nodus so that the quadrangle 

 almost reaches its level. Beginning with Climacobasis (fig. 6) 

 and Echo (fig. 7) and proceeding to Psolodesmus (fig. 16), one 

 can observe some elongation, and likewise with Pseudophaea (fig. 

 21), Dysphaea (fig. 22), Anisopleura (fig. 25) and Rhinocypha 

 (fig. 26), and in some Megapodagrioninae the tendency is similar. 

 But for the whole suborder it has perhaps been rather different; 

 the highest Coenagrionidae have almost as short a quadrangle 

 as Pseudophaea (fig. 21), in fact often they may seem to have a 

 smaller one, partly because of distal obliquity and the resulting 

 shortness of the upper side. The length of the quadrangle, then, 

 does not greatly change, except in short series. 



9. Attachment of supplementary sectors. — Here again is a tendency 

 not at all universal in its appearance, but occuring often enough to 

 deserve mention. Among the Polythorinae it is evident in Chal- 

 copteryx (fig. 4) ; among the Agrioninae it begins in Neurohasis 

 (fig. 14) and Phaon (fig. 17) and ends in Vestalis (fig 18); in the 

 Coenagrionidae, Thaumatoneura (fig. 51) exhibits it to a certain 

 degree, Megaloprepus (fig. 46), Microstigma (fig. 47) and Anomisma 

 (fig. 48) to a higher one, but since in Pseudostigma (fig. 49) and 

 Mecistogaster (fig. 50) almost all secondary sectors drop out, the 

 tendency cannot longer manifest itself; nor can it in the Coena- 

 grioninae. 



10. Straightening of the longitudinal veins. — Wherever there are 

 many supplementary sectors present, the principal veins tend to 

 curve, especially near the margin of the wing. But when these 

 sectors drop out the veins themselves become straight and scarcely 

 curve. Among the Agrionidae, this is true of Micromerus (fig. 28) 

 and Philoganga; among the Coenagrionidae of Lestes (fig. 44), 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




36 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



Mecistogaster (fig. 50), the higher Megapodagrloninae, and the 

 Coenagrioninae and Protoneurinae generally. I think fossil evi- 

 dence bears out this tendency equally well; it is, as was said above, 

 apparently one dependent on reduction in the number of sectors. 



II. Matching up of the cross-veins in transverse series. — At the 

 same time that the preceding tendency becomes evident and, 

 largely in the same forms, it is very noticeable that the cross-veins 

 become matched up and form regular transverse series across the 

 wing. These are beautifully illustrated in the higher Pseudo- 

 stigmatinae, the Coenagrioninae and the Protoneurinae above all 

 others. 



Miscellaneous Features 



1. Differentiation of fore and hind wings. — This tendency so im- 

 portant among the Anisoptera has practically no place among the 

 Zygoptera. A marked difference in size and shape is noticeable in 

 only very few cases : Chalcopteryx (fig. 4) among the Polythorinae, 

 Pseudolestes (fig. 38) among the Lestinae, and sometimes Mecisto- 

 gaster (fig. 50) among the Pseudostigmatinae. These cases are 

 certainly evidence of a departure from the primitive condition. 



Many Zygoptera have a fairly constant difference in the length 

 of the quadrangles of the fore and hind wings, enough so that one 

 can tell which is the front and which the hind wing. The Poly- 

 thorinae have this difference well developed in that the quadrangle 

 of the fore wing is much the shorter and with fewer cross-veins. 

 Among the Coenagrionidae several subfamilies have the upper side 

 of the quadrangle of the fore wing shorter than that of the hind 

 wing. But, generally speaking, the differentiation of fore and 

 hind wings among the Zygoptera is not of enough importance for 

 it to be considered a sign of specialization. 



2. The bracing of the stigma. — Dr. Needham has shown two ways 

 by which this may proceed, one by the cross-vein between Ri and 

 Ml below the inner end of the stigma becoming oblique and often 

 hypertrophied. This sort of bracing is not met with in the Agrioni- 

 dae, nor in the lower Lestinae nor Megapodagrloninae. In most 

 higher Lestinae, Megapodagrloninae, Coenagrioninae, and Pro- 

 toneurinae it is the usual thing. The plates In Handlirsch's 

 ■"Die fossilen Insecten" show bracing In Tarsophlebia, a genus 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 37 



of the Anisozygoptera and among the possible ancestors of the 

 Zygoptera. 



The other method of bracing is for the inner end of the stigma 

 to be pointed and form a Y, the base of which is made by that por- 

 tion of Ri situated just before it. In this way Ri holds the stigma 

 firmly. Both methods may occur in the same wing. The Poly- 

 thorinae have this Y well developed. 



3. Atrophy of the stigma. — The diffusion and even total disap- 

 pearance of the stigma in genera of two subfamilies, the Agrioninae 

 and Pseudostigmatinae, may not be considered by some as a sign 

 of advancement, but since the Odonata as far back as the Mesozoic 

 do have the stigma, and since the modern genera which stand at the 

 base of the Agrionine and Pseudostigmatine lines have it, and its 

 gradual disappearance is traceable in a series, its atrophy must 

 be taken as a matter of specialization, if not necessarily one of 

 advantage. 



IV— SUMMARY 



From the preceding discussion it is evident that venation gives 

 In most cases an easy and fairly clear means of determining rela- 

 tionships, but in certain ones it may be capable of more than one- 

 method of interpretation, and must therefore be checked up by 

 other characters if a final decision is to be reached. Sometimes 

 this doubtful condition is due to parallelism, sometimes to contra- 

 dictory evidence from several sources; one character in the wing 

 may indicate one tendency, another quite a different one. 



The keynote to the phylogeny of the Zygoptera as based on 

 venation is reduction. With this in mind one can divide the sub- 

 order into two families, the lower of which, the Agrionidae, has as 

 lateral offshoots: (i) the Polythorinae (figs. 2-5) in which M4 does 

 not descend the arculus and the quadrangle is therefore broad at 

 the base and concave above;' (2) the Agrioninae (figs. 6-20), where 

 the wing fails to become petiolated, but the stigma atrophies and 

 the quadrangle becomes somewhat convex above and widened 

 distally; and (3) at a much higher level, the Disparocyphinae (fig. 

 37) as a direct ofiEshoot of the main line of descent, by a shortening 

 of Cu2, until it is represented by a cross-vein only. This main line 

 of descent is to be found in the Epallaginae (figs. 21-36) which 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




38 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



advance by petiolation, by reduction of the number of cross-veins, 

 especially of the antenodals, and by a retraction of the nodus 

 toward the wing-base. The Epallaginae lead to the second family, 

 the Coenagrionidae, with which they are connected by various inter- 

 mediate forms: Diphlebia (fig. 34), Philoganga (fig. 36), Thauma- 

 toneura (fig. 51), Ortholestes (fig. 39) and Pentaphlehia. Early in 

 the Coenagrionidae the nodus becomes more retracted, the number 

 of antenodals becomes established as two, and the number of sup- 

 plementary sectors shows a decided tendency to be decreased. 

 There are two general lines of descent as regards the points of 

 origin of Rg and M3; in the first one these veins retain the condition 

 of the Agrionidae and arise nearer the arculus than the subnodus; 

 this is true of the Lestinae (fig. 38-44) and Lestoidinae (fig. 45). 

 In the Lestinae is developed a quadrangle which is acute distally, 

 and in the other subfamily the vein Cu2 is again reduced so that it 

 does not extend beyond MA. The other line in the Coenagrionidae 

 has Rs and M3 migrate outward so that they arise nearer the sub- 

 nodus than the arculus. The Pseudostigmatinae (figs. 46-50) are 

 an immediate offshoot, with greatly elongated wings in which the 

 nodus is retracted and the stigma becomes diffuse. The Megapo- 

 dagrioninae (figs. 51-70) form the central branch which leads to 

 the Coenagrioninae (figs. 71-129) by the loss of all sectors except 

 Mia, and also continues in its own direction by greater petiolation 

 and outward progression of the base of M3. The Coenagrioninae 

 are also characterized by a slight movement outward of M3 and by a 

 great reduction in the number of postnodals; petiolation on the 

 whole does not proceed very far. This family in turn gives rise to 

 the Protoneurinae (figs. 130-153) by the reduction of Cuo, a change 

 which has thus taken place in three groups of Zygoptera. In the 

 Protoneurinae Cui also becomes short, and in the highest form, 

 Selysioneura (fig. 153), Cu does not branch at all. 



V— KEYS FOR THE DETERMINATION OF GENERA 



For the most part these keys indicate as nearly as they can be 

 made to do so, the same views regarding the phylogeny of the 

 Zygoptera as have been expressed in the preceding pages. The 

 Coenagrioninae have been the stumbling block for such a system, 




' PHILIP A. MUNZ 39 



and although an arrangement can be made which seems to follow 

 the general line of descent in this subfamily, and to indicate what 

 tendencies have been followed out venationally, it has been so far 

 impossible to base any key on venation, since the genera as now 

 recognized have considerable variation within themselves. It has 

 been necessary, therefore, to make use of structural characters for 

 this subfamily, and to make a key for which no claims of natural 

 relationship can be made, but which is merely an attempt to aid in 

 identification. Before this difficult group can be finally worked 

 out, however, much more material must be studied than it has 

 been possible to study for this paper. 



The nomenclature of veins used in the keys is the same as that 

 shown in the wings of Agrion and Argiocnemis in the first part of 

 the paper. The number of the figure appearing in connection 

 with each genus refers to the plates at the end of the paper. For 

 the following genera neither figures nor specimens have been 

 available: Paraphaea., Caliphaea, and Pentaphlebia among the 

 Agrionidae; and Orolestes, Platylestes, Protolestes, Mesopodagrion, 

 Metagrion, Allolestes, Argiagrion, Heteropodagrion, Mesagrion, 

 Mesocnemis, Momhagrion, Myagrion, Nesocnemis, Nesobasis, Neiir- 

 agrion, Onychargia, Paracnemis, Pericnemis, Phasmoneura, Sten- 

 ocnemis, and Thermagrion among the Coenagrionidae. 



The material used for study of the other genera was that in the 

 collections at Cornell University, at the Academy of Natural 

 Sciences at Philadelphia, at the National Museum, in the private 

 collection of Air. C. H. Kennedy, and some borrowed from Mr. 

 E. B. Williamson, the Carnegie Museum, and the Museum of 

 Comparative Zoology.- In addition to this free use was made of 

 those figures and keys which appear in the literature, and of some 

 photographs sent by Mr. H. Campion of the British Museum. 



Key to the Suborders of Odonata 



1 (4). Fore and hind wings essentially similar; in repose, held vertically or half- 

 opened; eyes far apart. A quadrangle present. Males with two superior and 

 two inferior abdominal appendages 2 



2 (3). Area between M4 and Cui just beyond MA as broad as that between Cui 

 and posterior margin of the wing. Quadrangle of hind wing and that of fore 

 wing quite different in shape, the former twice as wide distally as proximally. 

 Sectors of the wing (except M^) zigzag ANISOZYGOPTERA (p. 40) 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




40 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



3 (2). Area between M4 and Cui just beyond MA generally narrower than that be- 

 tween Cui and the posterior margin of the wing. The quadrangle of the fore 

 wing of the same general shape as that of the hind wing; one may be longer 

 than the other, but if one is widened distally, both are. Sectors of the wing 

 tend usually to be continuous veins, not broken nor zigzag. 



ZYGOPTERA (p. 40) 



4 (l). Fore and hind wings dissimilar, held horizontally in repose. Eyes close to- 

 gether. Supertriangle and triangle present. Males with two superior and one 

 inferior abdominal appendage ANISOPTERA* 



Key to the Suborder Anisozygoptera 

 Family Epiophlehiidae. Subfamily Epiophlehiinae. 

 I. But one living genus. Characters those of the suborder. Japan and Eastern 



Asia. (Fig. i) Epiophlebia Calvert, 1903 



(Palaeophlebia Selys, 1899) 



Key to the Families and Subfamilies of the Suborder Zygoptera 



1 (8). Antenodal cross-veins 5 or more. Usually- cross-veins present in the sub- 

 quadrangle beyond the vein Ac. M3 separating from M1+2 nearer to the arculus 

 than to the subnodus. Nodus usually more than one-third of the distance froni 

 the base of the wing to the tip. The quadrangle often crossed. 



(Family Agrionidae) „ 2 



2 (3). M not descending the arculus; quadrangle therefore concave anteriorly and 

 at least twice as wide proximally as distally. Basal space crossed. Wings 

 petioled at least one-half way to the arculus. Mia closely parallel to Mi. 



Polythorinae (p. 42) 



3 (2). M descending the arculus for some distance; the quadrangle not markedly 

 concave anteriorly, and not twice as wide proximally as distally, at least in the 

 hind wing. Basal space crossed or not. Wings petioled or not 4 



4 (5). Mia parallel to M2. Stigma often atrophied. Quadrangle elongate, often 

 as long as the basal space, and convex anteriorly. Cu2 beyond the quadrangle, 

 especially in the hind wing, sends off a branch (Cu2a) to support the area posterior 

 to it, or Cu2 itself bends back to support this area Agrioninae (p. 42) 



5 (4). Mia not parallel to M2, but more or less intermediate between Mi and M2 

 (not in Micromerus) and with rather prominent sectors on either side. Stigma 

 well developed, at least in the hind wing. Quadrangle not so long as the basal 

 space, or if so, not generally convex anteriorly. Cuaa not present 6 



6 (7). Cui and Cu2 well developed veins, A extending as far as the distal end of the 

 quadrangle. M4 generally somewhat curved beyond MA. Stigma usually not 

 much broader distally than proximally Epallaginae (p. 45) 



7 (6). Cui short, not reaching the level of the subnodus. Cu2 reduced to a cross- 

 vein. A following the hind margin of the wing beyond Ac for some distance, 

 then bending forward and ending at the posterior side of the quadrangle. M4 

 not curved beyond MA. Stigma much broader distally than proximally. 



Disparocyphinae (p. 47) 

 ^ Not further discussed in this paper. 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 41 



8 (i). Antenodals generally two, rarely three to five. Usually no cross-veins in the 

 subquadrangle beyond Ac. M3 separating from Mi+2 nearer the subnodus than 

 the arculus, except in the Lestinae, none of which have more than two antenodals. 

 Xodiis usually from one-fifth to one-third of the distance from the base of the 

 wing to the tip. The quadrangle crossed in Anomisma only. 



(Family Coenagrionidae) 9 



9 (12). M3 arising nearer the arculus than the subnodus. The base of R^ (properly, 

 the base of the bridge to Rs) arising before the subnodus and generally as near the 

 arculus as the subnodus 10 



10 (11). Supplementary sectors present between R3 and M3, and between M3 and 

 M4. Cui and Cu2 well developed, extending considerably beyond the subnodus. 



Lestinae (p. 48) 



11 (10). No supplementary sectors between Rs and M3, and between AI3 and M4; 

 two between Mi and Mia. Cui one cell long and not reaching the subnodus. 

 Cus reduced to a cross-vein Lestoidinae (p. 49) 



12 (9). Ms arising nearer the subnodus than the arculus (half-way in Rhipidolestes). 

 The bridge to Rs short, arising at or beyond the subnodus (slightly before in 

 Rhipidolestes) I3 



13 (18). Cuauot reduced toa vein one cell long norlacking 14 



14 (15). Stigma difi"used or lost, not made up of one cell, but if present, usually of 

 several cells, and irregular in shape, not braced. The longest vein between Mi 

 and Mo rather more parallel to M2 than to Mi. Nodus at from one-fourth to 

 one-seventh the wing length. Many postnodal cross-veins. 



Pseudostigmatinae (p. 49) 



15 (14). A true stigma present, usually braced at the inner end. Mia not usually 

 parallel to M2, when any other sectors are present. Nodus generally at more 

 than one-fourth of the wing length. The number of postnodal cross-veins often 

 reduced ^" 



16 (17). Definite supplementary sectors present other than M^and arising at least 

 as far in the wing as under the stigma. (No such sectors in Chorismagrion or 

 Perilestes, but these genera can be recognized by the petiolation of the wing which 

 extends almost to the level of MA, by the quadrangle coming near to the posterior 

 wing-margin, by the arching of Cui beyond MA, and by Rs arising several cells 

 beyond the subnodus.) The stigma generally rather heavy. 



Megapodagrioninae (p. 50) 



17 (16). No definite supplementary sectors other than M^ are present, except oc- 

 casional very irregular ones which are only a few cells long and do not arise more 

 than a few cells from the wing-margin. Stigma generally rather small. 



Coenagrioninae (p. 53) 



18 (13). Cuo reduced to a cross-vein, ending in the margin of the wing, or in two 

 genera to a \ein one cell long Protoneurinae (p. 63) 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




42 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



Key to the Genera of the Subfamily Polythorinae 



1 (8). Cu2 branched, more than one row of cells between Cui and Cu2 and between 

 Cu2 and the wing-margin 2 



2 (7)- Quadrangle of hind-wing one and one-half to two times as long as that of the 

 fore-wing. Wings petioled about one-half of the way to the arculus. Fore-wing 

 about three and one-half times as long as broad. Cu2 forking, with two rows of 

 cells between the branches. Arculus at slightly more than one-third of the dis- 

 tance from the base of the wing to the subnodus 3 



3 (6). Fore and hind wings of same general shape and size. Sectors arising between 

 the main veins, which do not appear forked. M2 arising within a cell or two of 

 the subnodus 4 



4 (5)- Venation very complex, many sectors and cross-veins; for example, 40-50 

 antenodals; often 12 or more cross-veins under the stigma; rather prominent 

 sectors between M4 and Cui, at least in the hind wing. In the hind wing, several 

 sectors between M2 and Rs arise as far proximad as the inner end of the stigma. 

 Northern South America from Colombia to Peru and Brazil. - (Fig. 2.) 



Polythore'' Cahert, 1917 

 {Thore Selys, 1853) 



5 (4). Venation not so complex, antenodals 20 to 35; cross-veins under the stigma 

 6 to 10; usually no sectors between M4 and Cui, more than three or four cells 

 long. Between M2 and Rs no sectors arise proximad of stigma. South America, 

 Venezuela to Peru and Brazil. (Fig. 3.) Eu thore Selys, 1869 



6 (3). Fore-wing evidently longer and narrower than the hind wing. Main veins 

 appear forked because of the attached sectors. M2 arising two to four cells be- 

 yond the subnodus, especially in the fore-wing. Brazil. (Fig. 4.) 



Chalcopteryx Selys, 1853 



7 (2). Quadrangle of hind wing scarcely longer than that of the fore wing. Wings 

 petioled about two-thirds of the distance from the base of the wing to the arculus. 

 Fore wing about four and one-half times as long as broad. Arculus often at almost 

 one-half the distance from the wing-base to the subnodus. Mexico to Bolivia. 

 (Fig. 5-) Cora Selys, 1853 



8 (i). Cu2 unbranched, one row of cells between Cui, and Cu2, one row of cells back 

 of Cu2 Miocora Calvert, 1917 



Key to the Genera of the Subfamily Agrioninae 



1 (24). Cu2a present. Rs in hind wing usually strongly waved 2 



2 (19). Cu2a running perpendicular to the posterior margin of the wing or toward the 

 base of the wing, and usually with one or more sectors toward the anal angle 

 which are longer than the quadrangle 3 



3 (12). In the hind wing the sectors of that portion of the wing posterior to Cuo 

 and distad to Cu2a are generally arched from near the wing margin and not di- 

 rectly attached to Cu2a. True stigma present 4 



* Calvert, 1917, proposes the name Polythore for this genus, since the name Thore 

 is preoccupied. 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 43 



4 (9). Basal space crossed. Arculus usually distinctly angled and not markedly 

 oblique 5 



5 (6). Eight or more cells across the anal area along Cu2a. More than two sectors 

 from Cu2a run toward the anal angle, but they are irregular. Anal margin of 

 hind wing convex. Space between Cui and Cu2 in hind wing reticulate just be- 

 yond MA. China. (Fig. 8.) Archineura Kirby, 1894 



6 (5). Not more than four to five cells along Cu2a between Cu2 and the wing-margin. 

 In the fore wing there is one sector from Cu2a toward the anal angle; anal margin 

 not convex. One row of cells between Cui and Cu2 at their origin 7 



7 (8). Nodus less than one-half of the distance from the .base of the wing to the 

 stigma. Southern and south-eastern Asia. (Fig. 7.) Echo Selys, 1853 



8(7). Nodus more than one-half the distance from the base of the wing to the stigma. 

 Southeastern Asia. (Fig. 6.) Climacobasis' Laidlaw, 1902 



9 (4). Basal space free. Tendency for arculus to be less angled and more 

 oblique ' 10 



10 (11). Cu2a in the hind wing running almost toward the margin,' so that it does 

 not reach the length of the quadrangle before sending off a branch toward the 

 anal angle. Western and Central Africa. (Fig. 9.) Umma Kirby, 1890 



{Cleis Selys, 1853) 



11 (10). Cu2a in the hind wing running toward the base of the wing, almost the 

 length of the quadrangle before sending a branch toward the anal angle. West 

 Africa. (Fig. 10) Sapho Selys, 1853 



12 (3). Sectors in that area of the hind wing posterior to Cu2 and distad to Cu2a, 

 usually (sometimes not in Agrion) attached directly to Cuoa. Stigma false or 

 lacking 13 



13 (14). Basal space free. Almost cosmopolitan, except for most of Africa and 

 Australia. (Fig. 11.) Agrion Fabricius, 1775 



{Calopteryx Leach, 18 15) 



14 (13). Basal space crossed 15 



15 (16). Broad area in hind wing posterior to Cu2, with five rows of cells between end 

 of Cu2a and the wing margin which is very convex; in the hind wing the length is 

 less than three and one-half times the breadth. Rs very strongly waved in the 

 hind wing, cutting ofif a sector anterior to it. All four wings of the male opaque; 

 only one or two cells of the basal space divided. Borneo. (Fig. 12.) 



Matronoides Foerster, 1897 



' I am not sure that Climacohasis is generically distinct from Echo. Laidlaw (1903) 

 says of Climacohasis lugens and Echo modesta, "There can be no doubt that the two spe- 

 cies which I founded on a single specimen in each case, are merely male and female of 

 the same species. The generic name may be retained as that of a section of the genus 

 Echo, distinguished by the great relative length of the pterostigma in 'the male, in which 

 it is about three times as long as in the female." Williamson (1904) says, "Echo is 

 known to me only from descriptions and figures, but such differences between it and 

 Climacobasis appear to exist in the anal region and in the stigmas of the males that, in 

 so far as the two names have been published, their separation seems to me desirable, at 

 least till more critical study can be made." 



Since I have had no access to specimens of Echo, I shall here follow the precedent made 

 by Williamson. The stigmatic differences in figures six and seven are due to sex rather 

 than genus.- 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




44 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



i6 (15). Area of hind wing posterior to Cu2 narrower, with two to four rows of cells 



between end of Cu2a and wing margin which is not very convex; hind wing about 



three and one-half times as long as broad. Rs not usually so strongly waved as 



■ to cut off an anterior sector 17 



17 (18). M2and Msnot appearing forked. Most cells of basal space divided into 

 two by median nervules. All four wings of male opaque. Cu2a alike in fore and 

 hind wings. Japan and southeastern Asia to India. (Fig. 13.) 



Matrona Selys, 1883 



18 (17). Mo and M3 appearing forked because of attached sectors. Only one or two 

 cells of basal space divided. Front wings of male hyaline. Cuoa in fore wing 

 tends to parallel A. Malaysia. (Fig. 14.) Neurobasis Selys, 1863 



19 (2). Cu2a turning away from the wing-base; the sector from Cu2a toward the anal 

 angle shorter than the quadrangle 20 



20 (23). True stigma present. M1+2 fusing with R at least in the hind wing. Mi-s 

 and M4 arise separately from arculus. Asian genera 21 



21 (22). Quadrangle approximately as long as the basal space and with four to seven 

 cross-'veins; posterior wing-margin near the anal angle not concave. Stigma 

 about three times as long as broad ; the distance from the wing-base to the nodus 

 more than two-fifths of the wing length. Posterior end of the medio-anal link 

 more basal than the anterior end. China and Japan. (Fig. 15) 



Mnais Selys, 1853 



22 (21). Quadrangle one and one-half times as long as the basal space and with ten 

 or more cross- veins; posterior wing-margin near the anal angle very concave. 

 Stigma four times as long as broad; the distance from the wing-base to the nodus 

 less than two-fifths of the wing length. Posterior end of MA not so basal as 

 anterior end. China and Formosa. (Fig. 16.) . .Psolodesmus McLachlan,i870 



23 (20). Stigma present or not. Mi+2 not fusing with R. Mi-sand M4 usually arise at 

 a common point, especially in the hind-wing. Rs in the hind wing waved so as 

 to approach M2 very closely. Africa and Madagascar. (Fig. 17) 



Phaon Selys, 1853 



24 (i). Cu2a not present. Area posterior to Cu2 supported by a wide bend of Cu2. 

 Rs in the hind wing not strongly waved. Quadrangle often very convex anter- 

 iorly and widened distally. Arculus not angled, but oblique 25 



25 (26). Basal space free. M2, M3, Cui, and Cu2 with attached sectors. Veins and 

 sectors turn sharply toward wing margin. Quadrangle almost as long as the 

 basal space. India to Malaysia. (Fig. 18.) Vestalis Selys, 1853 



26 (25). Basal space crossed, distinctly longer than the quadrangle. Sectors inter- 

 mediate, generally not attaching to the main veins. Veins and sectors not bend- 

 ing sharply toward the wing-margin. Rs and M3 parallel at the end, with two 

 intervening sectors. Genera of the Western Hemisphere, ranging from Canada 

 to South America. (Figs. 19 and 20.) 



Heterina^ Selys, 1853, and Lais Selys, 1853 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 45 



Key to the Genera of the Subfamily Epallaginae 



1 (lo). Wings petioled not more than one-half way from the wing base to the 

 arculus. Quadrangle not more than four times as long as broad; with not more 

 than two or three cross-veins. Area posterior to Cu2, at its widest point, at least 

 one-third the width of the wing at that point with several sectors beyond M A . . . 2 



2 (5). Quadrangle with one or two cross- veins; subquadrangle usually with more 

 than two. In the hind wing the basal space generally not more than twice as 

 long as the quadrangle 3 



3 (4). Area back of anal vein with only one row of cells to beyond MA, at least in 

 the fore wing. Stigma with anterior proximal angle away from the wing-base. 

 In the fore wing the antenodal cross-veins are less numerous than the postnodal. 

 India to China and Malaysia. (Fig. 21.) Pseudophaea' Kirby, 1890 



(Euphaea Selys, 1840) 



4 (3) . Area back of anal vein with two rows of cells to beyond MA. Anterior prox- 

 imal angle of stigma toward the wing-base. Antenodal cross-veins more numer- 

 ous than the postnodal. Indo-China to Malaysia. (Fig. 22.) 



Dysphaea Selys, 1853 



5 (2). Quadrangle without cross-veins; subquadrangle usually with two or fewer. 

 Basal space generally more than twice as long as the quadrangle 6 



6 (7). Basal radial space closed and free. India. (Fig. 23.) 



Bayadera Selys, 1853 



7 (6). Basal radial space not closed in both wings 8 



* The genera Heterina and Lais now contain so many species with so many intergrad- 

 ing characters, that it is impossible to fix upon any clearly defined characters for the sep- 

 aration of the two genera, without a more detailed study than I have been able to give 

 them. Many species of Heterina have several rows of cells back of the anal bridge in the 

 forewings, while Lais is supposed to have but two such rows. However, in specimens of 

 H. donna, vulnerata, crtientata, tricolor, titia, caja, macropiis, etc. some have only two. 

 In many species of Hetaerina the males have the base of the wing red. Beyond these 

 characters further ones are unknown to me. 



' The genus Paraphaea, Martin, 1903, would seem, from the description, in the Bulle- 

 tin of the Museum of Paris 1903, to come in this part of the key, but the description is 

 too incomplete to use for the key. The translation reads as follows: "This new genus is 

 created from a single specimen from Manilla and belonging to the Museum of Paris. 

 It is of the Legion Euphaea of M. de Selys. The basal space is free, the median sector 

 (M3) branches from the principal (Mi) toward the end of the quadrangle; the feet are 

 quite long, the body slender, the fundamental color of the body red, but the ventral 

 surface of the thorax entirely black. The nodus is placed exactly at the middle of the 

 wing. The superior appendages are slightly bent not dilated, the inferior small; the 

 posterior margin of the tenth segment bears a papilla." 



Under the specific description of P. barbata: "Abdomen 55 mm.; lower wing 41 

 mm.; 24 antenodals and 24 postnodals to the upper wings; 24 antenodals and 24 post- 

 nodals to the lower wings. Wings hyaline, slightly tinged with safifranin, the distal tip 

 of the stigma bordered with brown; the stigma brown, covering seven cells, broad at the 

 middle, narrowed at the two ends which are pointed, especially proximally. Quadrangle 

 small, short, crossed." 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




46 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



8 (9). Basal radial space crossed. M2 usually arising not more than one cell from 

 sub-nodus. The longest sector between Cui and Cu2 arising below a point sev- 

 eral cells before the level of the subnodus. Greece to Persia. (Fig. 24.) 



Epallage Charpentier, 1840 



9 (8). Basal radial space free; M2 tends to arise two cells beyond the subnodus. 

 The longest sector between Cui and Cu2, especially in the hind-wing, arises almost 

 below the subnodus. In the hind-wing of the male, C has a hump before the 

 arculus. India to Burma. (Fig. 25.) Anisopleura Selys, 1853 



10 (i). Wing usually petioled two-thirds or more of the way to the arculus. Length 

 of quadrangle and the number of cross-veins vary. The area posterior to Cu2 

 narrow, at its widest point usually less than one-fourth the width of the wing at 

 that point, and with not more than two distinct longitudinal sectors 1 1 



11 (16). Area posterior to Cuo a single row of cells (occasionally two cells wide for a 

 short distance; but if so, Cu2 is not arched). Quadrangle in the fore wing usually 

 at least six times as long as wide. Beyond MA, M4 arches forward, Cu2 back- 

 ward. M2 and Rs near the wing-margin generally are parallel and with two rather 

 prominent parallel sectors between 12 



12 (13). Quadrangle generally with two or more cross-veins, at least in one wing. 

 The sector anterior to Mu arising before the inner end of the stigma, at least in 

 the hind wing. India to Malaysia. (Fig. 26.) . . . . Rhinocypha Selys, 1853 



13 (12). Quadrangle usually with less than two cross- veins. The sector anterior to 

 Mia, if present, not arising before the inner end of the stigma 14 



14(15). Short sectors between Ml and Mia. Third antenodal over arculus. Quad- 

 rangle uniform in width or widened distally. West Africa to Zanzibar and in 

 Philippines. (Fig. 27.) Libellago Selys, 1853 



15 (14). No sectors between Mi and Mia- Second antenodal over arculus. Quad- 

 rangle wider proximally. India to Malaysia. (Fig. 28.) 



Micromerus Rambur, 1842 



16 (11). Area posterior to Cu2 with more than one row of cells beyond MA, except 

 in Dicterias and Heliocharis. (Of these two, Heliocharis often has basal space 

 crossed; Dicterias has M2 and R3 ending very near to each other.) M4 generally 

 not prominently arched beyond MA 17 



17 (34)- Quadrangle at least four times as long as wide. Wings generally widest 

 beyond the level of the subnodus 18 



18 (27). Antenodal cross-veins usually more than twelve. Area posterior to Cu2 

 of one row of cells only, sometimes two rows in Neocharis; or Cu2 forks and has 

 two rows of cells between the forks. Quadrangle crossed 19 



19 (20). Cu2 forking; two rows of cells between the forks. First costal antenodal 

 almost over the arculus. Brazil. (Fig. 29.). . . .Cyanocharis Needham, 1903 



20 (19). Cu2 not forking. First costal antenodal generally some distance before the 

 arculus 21 



21 (22). Stigma covering only two to three cells. Supplementary sectors in apex 

 of wing numerous and curved; some attached to the principal veins. Spines on 

 the legs very long. India and China Caliphaeai" Selys, 1859 



" Same as Notholestes, McLachlan, 1887. See McLachlan, 1894, Annals and Magazine 

 of Natural History, (6) 13: 435. I have seen neither figures nor specimens of this genus, 

 but descriptions seem to place it in the Epallaginae. 




PHILIP A. MUXZ 47 



22 (21). Stigma co\"ering four to seven cells. Supplementary sectors not attached. 

 Spines on legs medium in length. Genera of South America 23 



23 (24). Basal space often crossed. Sectors between Mu and M> do not arise before 

 the level of the inner end of the stigma. M1-2 forks about two cells beyond the 

 subnodus. Quadrangle with one cross-vein. Brazil. (Fig. 30.) 



Heliocharis Selys, 1853 



24 (23). Basal space free. M2 arises within a cell of the subnodus. Quadrangle 

 with one or two cross-veins 25 



25 (26). Some sectors between Mia and M: arise far before the level of the stigma. 

 Quadrangle with one cross-vein. Brazil. (Fig. 32.). . . .Dicterias Selys. 1853 



26 (25). No sectors between Mia and M-iarise before the level of the stigma. Quad- 

 rangle with two cross- veins. British Guiana. (Fig. 31.) 



Neocharis Foerster, 1906 



27 (18). Antenodal cross-veins usually less than nine. Area posterior to Cu2 of 

 more than one row of cells, but Cuo not s>"mmetrically forked 28 



28 (29). Two cross-veins in the quadrangle: two or thre'e often in the subquad- 

 rangle. Stigma about three times as long as wide. Fourth antenodal over the 

 arculus. M2 arising four to five cells beyond the subnodus. Straits Settle- 

 ments. (Fig. 33.) Devadatta Kirby, 1890 



{Tetniueiira Selys, 1859) 



29 (28). No cross-veins in the quadrangle; usually none in the subquadrangle. 

 Stigma about five times as long as wide, fusiform in outline. Second or third 

 antenodal over the arculus 30 



30 (33). Genera of the Old World. Mo not arising more than one cell beyond the 

 subnodus. Sectors present between Mi and Mia. Second antenodal over the 

 arculus 31 



31 (32). M2 arising at the subnodus, or within one-half cell of it: Mia arising three 

 to five cells beyond M2. Arculus less than one-half way from the base of the 

 wing to the nodus. Antenodals five to seven. Australia and Malaysia. (Fig. 

 34.) Diphlebia Selys. 1869 



32 (31). M2 arising one cell bej'ond the subnodus, Mia five cells beyond M2. 

 Arculus at one-half the distance from the base of the wing to the nodus. An- 

 tenodals generally five. West Africa Pentaphlebia" Foerster, 1909 



33 (30)- A genus of the New World. M2 arising two to four cells beyond the sub- 

 nodus. Often no sectors between Mi and Mia. The third antenodal over the 

 arculus. Colombia. (Fig. 35.) Amphipteryx Selys. 1853 



34 (17)- Quadrangle about twice as long as wide. Wings widest before the level of 

 the nodus. Antenodals about fifteen. India to China. (Fig. 36.) 



Philoganga Selys, 1879 



Key to the Disparocyphinae 



I. One genus only, characters those of the subfamily. Antenodals ten to twelve 

 in each series. South Celebes. (Fig. 37.) '. . . .Disparocypha Ris, 1916 



'1 Only the description was available for this genus. 



MEM. AM. EXT. SOC, 3. 




48 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



Key to the Genera of the Subfamily Lestinae 



1 (2). The distal end of the quadrangle cut off almost squarely. The front wing 

 over one-third longer than the hind wing. A short sector present in the fore 

 wing between Mi and Mia. In the hind wing a sector present between M4 and 

 Cui. The distance between the points of origin of M3 and the bridge to Rs is 

 almost as long as that from the origin of M3 to the arculus. Hainan. (Fig. 38.) 



Pseudolestes Kirby, 1900 



2 (i). The distal end of the quadrangle is not cut off squarely. The fore and hind 

 wings of about the same length. No sector between Mi and M^ (e.xcept in 

 Ortholestes). The distance between the origin of M3 and that of the bridge to Re 

 is less than the distance from the origin of M3 to the arculus 3 



3 (4). The quadrangle widened distally and with the superior side over one-half the 

 length of the inferior. Xo sectors between M3 and M4. Two rows of cells be- 

 tween M4 and Cui at the end of Cui, at least in many specimens. West Indies. 

 (Fig. 39.) r Ortholestes Calvert. 1891 



4 (3). The quadrangle not widened distally and with the superior side scarcely 

 one-half the length of the inferior. One or more sectors between M3 and M4, 

 e.xcept in Orokstes. One row of cells between M4 and Cui. 



5 (6). The inner end of the quadrangle in the fore wing almost one-half the length 

 of the lower side. M1+2 forking less than two cells beyond the subnodus. The 

 third antenodal space almost twice the length of the first. California to Vene- 

 zuela. (Fig. 40.) Archilestes Selys, 1862 



6 (5). The inner end of the quadrangle one-third or less of the length of the lower 

 side except in Orolestes. M1+2 forking more than two cells beyond the subnodus, 

 at least in one wing. The third antenodal space not more than one and one- 

 half times the length of the first 7 



7 (8). Wing petioled to within Ac's length of itself. No sectors between M3 and Rs. 

 The longest sector between M2 and Rs arises about one-half of the way between 

 the stigma and the origin of Mia. Mja not zigzag. India. (Fig. 41.) 



Megalestes Selys, 1862 



8 (7). Wing petioled to Ac or nearly so. Sectors present between M3 and Rs. The 

 longest sector between M2 and Rs not arising more than three or four cells before 

 the level of the stigma 9 



9 (10). Wings, at least those of the male, with large opaque areas. Cuo is the only 

 zigzag vein. Stigma very large, surmounting four to six cells. M1+2 forking 

 five to seven cells beyond the subnodus. India. . . .Orolestes'- McLachlan, 1895 



10 (9). Wings hyaline. Many of the veins strongly zigzag ; i. e. the cells are angled. 

 Stigma shorter, surmounting two to three cells. M1+2 forks three to seven cells 

 beyond the subnodus 11 



11 (12). Stigma broad, scarcely two and one-half times as long as wide. Rs zigzag. 

 The anal appendages of the female ovoid, very much depressed, as long as the 

 tenth segment. A single species, from East Indies.. .Platylestes'^ Selys, 1862 

 ** Descriptions only have been available for these genera. 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 49 



12 (i i). Stignui narrower, usually three or more limes as long as wide 13 



13 (14). Wings raised, when at rest. Inner end of quadrangle only one-fifth as 

 long as the inferior side. The jirothorax with three scallops posteriorly, the mid- 

 dle one of which is the longest. Europe to Madagascar, New Guinea, and Xew 

 Caledonia. (Fig. 42.) Sympycna Charpentier, 1840 



14 (13). WingsheldhorizontalK, when at rest. The prothorax not as above 15 



15 (16). The sectors of the arculus arising toward the middle, M.4 about one-half of 

 the way down; hence the cjuadrangle is narrow with the inner end between one- 

 fourth and one-fifth as wide as the inferior side is long. The quadrangle in the 

 hind wing has a distinctly longer upper side than does that of the fore wing. 

 The upper and lower sides are almost parallel. A genus from Australia and sur- 

 rounding islands. (Fig. 43.) Austrolestes Tillyard, 1913 



16 (15). The sectors of the arculus arising nearer its upper end, M4 about one-third 

 of the way dow-n, hence the inner end of the quadrangle is from one-third to 

 one-fourth of the length of the inferior side. The quadrangle of the front and 

 hind wings essentially alike and triangular in shape because of the narrow- . 

 ing distally. Cosmopolitan, except not in Australia. (Fig. 44.) 



Lestes Leach, 181 5 



Key to the Subjamily Lestoidinae 



I. One genus only; the characters those of the subfamily. Australia. (Fig. 45.) 



Lestoidea Tillyard, 1913 



Key to the Genera of the Subfamily Pseiidostigmatinae 



1 (6). Secondary sectors numerous; two or more rows of cells between Mia and M2 

 for some distance. M1+2 forking at more than one-half of the distance from the 

 subnodus to the tip of the wing. Cu2 short, ending at the level of less than one- 

 half the distance from the fork of M1+2 to the tip of the wing. Cu-j with many 

 forks ; several to man>- cells between Cu2 and the posterior wing margin 2 



2 (5)- Quadrangle not crossed; about five times as long as wide. No cross-vein in 

 the subquadrangle. MA before the level of the subnodus. Mi+o forking be- 

 yond the half-way point between the subnodus and the tip of the wing 3 



3 (4). The nodus at one-sixth of the wing length; M2 arched forward under the 

 stigma so as to make a sharp bend. M3 forks under the inner end of the stig- 

 matic area, at about fifteen cells from the margin of the wing; Cui forks many 

 cells from the wing-margin. Mexico to Guatemala. (Fig. 46.) 



Megaloprepus Rambur, 1842 



4 (3). The nodus at one-fifth of the wing length; M2 not so strongly arched. Mj 

 forks about five cells from the wing margin or not at all. Cui forks about five 

 cells from the wing margin. Colombia to Braziland Ecuador. (Fig. 47.) 



Microstigma Rambur, 1842 



5 (2). The cjuadrangle with tw'O or three cross-veins, several in the subquadrangle, 

 some of which line up with those in the quadrangle. MA in the hind-wing es- 

 pecially, is at the level of the subnodus. M1+2 forking at about half wa\- between 

 the subnodus and the wing tip. Peru and Ecuador. (Fig. 48.) 



Anomisma .McLachlan, 1877 



MEM. .\M. ENT. SOC, 3. 




50 A VE^'ATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



6 (i). Secondary sectors few; a tendency to only one row of cells between Mia and 

 M2, if two rows, it is for a short distance only, M1+2 forking at less than one-half 

 the distance from the subnodus to the tip of the wing. Cih longer, ending at 

 one-half or more than one-half of the distance from the fork of Mi^2 to the tip 

 of the wing, at least in the fore wing. Cu> unbranched. One or two rows of cells 

 between Cua and the posterior wing margin. One row of cells between Ri and 

 Mi+2 before the fork of the latter 7 



7 (8). The nodus at one-fifth of the wing length. The hind wing, at least, tends to 

 have two rows of cells between Mta and i\l2 for a short distance. M4 has several 

 short sectors at its end ; there are two rows of cells posterior to Cu2. Mexico to 

 Colombia. (Fig. 49.) Pseudostigma Selys, i860 



8 (7). The nodus at one-fourth to one-fifth of the wing length. One row of cells 

 between Mia and M2. No sectors more than a few cells long, except between Mi 

 and M,a. M4 usually unbranched. One row of cells between Cu2 and the pos- 

 terior wing-margin. West Indies and Mexico to Ecuador. (Fig. 50). 



Mecistogaster Rambur, 1842 



Key to the Genera of the Subfamily Megapodagrioninae 



1 (2). Antenodals three to five, postnodals over fifty; venation very complex, many 

 supplementary' sectors from Mi to the posterior margin of the wing. About ten 

 cross-veins under the stigma. Quadrangle almost rectangular at both ends. 

 Wings not petioled to the level of the arculus. Panama to Costa Rica. (Fig. 5 1 .) 



Thaumatoneura McLachlan, 1897 



2 (i). Antenodals two to three, postnodals generally not over thirty; venation 

 simpler; supplementary sectors not usually present between Mi and Mu, and 

 Cui and Cu2. Cross-veins under stigma six or fewer. Quadrangle generally 

 acute diptally. Wings usually petioled beyond the level of the arculus 3 



3 (4). Rs arising one cell before the subnodus, M3 about one-half the distance be- 

 tween the arculus and the subnodus. Supplementary sectors Mia to Cu2. Wing 

 petioled to the level of one-third to one-half of the distance between the arculus 

 and MA. Formosa. (Fig, 52.) Rhipidolestes Ris, 1912 



4 (3) . Rs not arising before the subnodus. M3 arising nearer the subnodus than the 

 arculus ■ 5 



5 (30). Rs arising at or ven." near the subnodus, M3 at least one cell before the sub- 

 nodus " 



6 (7). Area posterior to Cu2 with four or five rows of cells. Wing petioled to or 

 beyond the level of the arculus. Supplementary sectors from Mia to Cui or Cu2. 

 Malaysia and Australia. (Fig. 53.) Podopteryx Selys, 1871 



7 (6). Area posterior to Cu-. with one or two, rareh' three rows of cells .8 



8 (19). Wing not petioled to the level of the arculus. it may be almost so in Tri- 

 neuragrion, a genus with a third antenodal 9 



9 (14). Short sectors present between Rsand M3 as well as some of the other longi- 

 tudinal veins - ^^ 




PHILIP A. MUXZ 51 



IC (11). One or two sectors between Mi and Mu,; others from Mi,, to M3 and M* 



and Cui. Malaysia. (Fig. 55.) Rhinagrion Calvert, 1913 



{Amphileste^ Selys, 1862) 



11 (10). No sectors between Mi and Mn, 12 



12 (13). Three antenodals, the third one being costal and beyond the arculus. One 

 row of cells back of Cuj. New Caledonia. (Fig. 54.) . . Trineuragrion Ris, 1915 



13 (12). Two antenodals. Generally at least two more or less complete rows of 

 cells back of C112. Australian region. (Fig. 56.) Argiolestes Selys, 1862 



14 (q). No sectors between Rs and M3 ^ I5 



15 (16). A genus of the Old World. Three cells below the stigma, postnodals about 

 twenty. Thibet? Mesopodagrioni* McLachlan, 1896 



16 (15). Genera of the New World. One cell below the stigma: postnodals about 

 fifteen i? 



17 (18). Three rows of cells in the area between Mia and M2, with two unbroken 

 sectors between M2 and Rs- In the male the stigma is two and one-half times as 

 long as wide. Brazil. (Fig. 57.) Megapodagrion Selys, 1885, sens, strict. 



18 (17). Two rows of cells in the area between Mi^ and M2 and one sector between 

 M2 and Rs. Stigma about twice as long as wide. Northern South America. 

 (Fig 18.) Allopodagrion Foerster, 1910 



19- (8). -vt least one wing petioled to beyond the level of the arculus 20 



20 (21). At least one sector between M4 and Cui. Sectors present Mia to Cui. 

 Generally two or more rows of cells back of Cu2, at least part way. Australian 

 region. (Fig. 56.) Argiolestes Selys, 1862, sens, strict. 



21 (20). No sectors between M4and Cui. One row of cells back of Cu2 22 



22 (29). Supplementary sectors between' R^ and Ms as well as Mia to Rs and be- 

 tween Ms and M4. Cui not strongly arched beyond MA 23 



23 (24). The anterior of the sectors between Rsand M3 shorter than the posterior 

 one. Five cross-veins under the stigma. The longest sector betw^een Mia and 

 M2 arising four to six cells before the inner end of the stigma. Between M3 

 and M4 only one sector is more than three or four cells long. Costa Rica to 

 Brazil. (Fig. 59.) Philogenia Selys, 1862 



24 (23). The anterior of the sectors between Rs and M3 is longer than the posterior 

 one. Two or three cross-veins under the stigma. The longest sector between 

 Mia and Mo arises not more than one or two cells before the inner end of the 

 stigma. Between M3 and M4 are often two sectors more than three cells long, 

 especially in the hind wing 25 



25 (26). Wing not petioled beyond the arculus. At least three cells between MA 

 and the level of the subnodus in the area between M4 and Cui. Supplementary 

 sectors (one or two each) from Mia to M4. Labuan and Sumatra. (Fig. 60.) 



Podolestes Selys, 1862 



26 (25). Wing is petioled beyond the arculus. Two cells between MA and the level 

 of the subnodus in the area between M4 and Cu,. Supplementary sectors (two 

 each) from Mia to M 4 ^7 



'^ Description only was available for this genus. 

 MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3- 




52 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



27 (28). Wing petioled to the level of about one-third the length of the quadrangle. 

 Three antenodals. Tendenc}' to a cubito-anal cross-vein before the subquad- 

 rangle in addition to the vein Ac. Arculus not beyond the last antenodals. 

 West Africa. (Fig. 62.) Neurolestes Selj-s, 1882 



28 (27). Wing petioled to the level of one-half to two-thirds of the length of the quad- 

 rangle. Two antenodals. No accessor}' cross-veins before the subqua'drarigle. 

 Arculus distinctly beyond the second antenodals. Madagascar. (Fig. 61.) 



Nesolestes Selys, 1891 



29 (22) . No sectors present between Rs and M3. Cui strongly arched beyond MA. 

 One sector between Mm and Mo and one between Mo and Rs. Australia. (Fig. 

 63.) Synlestes Selys. 1869 



30 (5). Rs arising at least a cell beyond the subnodus. M3 usually not before the 

 subnodus, at least not a cell's length before it. The wing petioled to beyond the 

 level of the arculus 31 



31 (32). Sectors Mi to Cu2. Many sectors between Cui and Cuo so that the dis- 

 tance on the hind margin between these two veins is as great as that from the 

 level of MA to the end of Cu2. Quadrangle very long, almost or quite reaching 

 the subnodus. Wing greatly petioled. Mexico to Central America. (Fig. 64.) 



Paraphlebia Hagen, 1861 



32 (31). No sectors between Miand Mia. Cui and Cuo usually ending near together 

 at the wing-margin 33 



33 (36). The area behind Cuo of two or three rows of cells. Supplementary sectors 

 at least from Mm to Cui 34 



34 (35). Ms arising at the subnodus. Ac is slightly beyond the level of the first 

 antenodal. New Guinea. (Fig. 65.) Wahnesia Foerster, 1900 



35 (34). M3 arising slightly beyond the subnodus, New Guinea. 



Metagrion'^ Calvert. 1913 



36 (33) • The area posterior to Cu2 of one row of cells only 37 



37 (48). Supplementary sectors rather numerous. Some between R^and M3. . ■ .38 



38 (41). Supplementary sectors from M^ to M4. Old World genera 39 



39 (40). Ms arising from M1+2 at the subnodus. Often more than two sectors be- 

 tween Mia and Mo. Quadrangle not reaching the level of the nodus. South 

 Africa. (Fig. 66.) Chlorolestes Selys, 1862 



40 (39)- M3 arising before the subnodus. Not more than two sectors between Mm 

 and Mo. Quadrangle long, reaching the level of the nodus. Seychelles. 



Allolestesi^ Selys, 1869 



41 (38). No sectors between Ms and M4. Genera of South America 42 



42 (43). Antenodals more than two, at least in the hind wings. Ecuador. 



Neuragrion'^ Karsch, 1891 



43 (42) . Antenodals two only 44 



44 (47). M3 separating from M1+2 before the subnodus 45 



45 (46). Supplementary sectors from Mm to M3, often none between M2 and R3. 

 Usually an accessorv' cross-vein between Cu and A. Guiana. (Fig. 67.) 



Dimeragrion Calvert, 1913 



'* Descriptions only were available for these genera. 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 53 



46 (45). Supplementary sectors between* Mi and R, and two long ones between Rs 

 and M3. No cross-veins in the subquadrangle or before it. Ecuador. 



Heteropodagrioni^ Selys, 1885 



47 (44). M3 separating from M 1+2 beyond the subnodus. Supplementary sectors 

 between Mia and I\l.. and Rs and M3. Colombia Mesagrioni^ Selys, 1885 



48 (37). No supplementary sectors between Rg and M3 49 



49 (50)- Rs arising one cell beyond the subnodus. Two sectors between Mia and 

 M2, some also between M2 and Rs, and M3 and M4. Cui arched beyond MA. 

 South Africa. (Fig. 66.) Chlorolestes Selys, 1862 



50 (49). Rs arising at least two or three cells beyond the subnodus. No sectors be- 

 tween M2 and Rs nor between M3 and IVI4 5^ 



51 (54). At least some supplementary sectors present. Quadrangle not approach- 

 ing \er>- closely the posterior wing-margin. Cui not strongly arched beyond 

 MA 52 



52 (53). One sector between Mu, and M2. Africa and Madagascar. 



Protolestes^^ Foerster, 1899 



53 (52). Two sectors between Mia and M2. The New World, from Mexico to 

 Argentina. (Fig. 68.) Heteragrion Selys 1862 



54 (51). No supplementary sectors except Mia. The quadrangle at its distal end 

 approaches the hind margin of the wing. Cui strongly arched beyond MA .... 55 



55 (56) ■ The fore wing of the male with the inner end of the quadrangle lacking. 

 Ac about one-third of the way from the first to the second antenodals. R3 

 arising lour cells beyond the subnodus in the fore wing, three in the hind wing. 

 The upper side of the quadrangle distinctly shorter than the lower side. Aus- 

 tralia. (Fig. 69.) Chorismagrion Morton, 1914 



56 (55). The quadrangle touching the posterior wing-margin. The wing petioled 

 to Mia. M3 arising one to one and one-half cells beyond the subnodus, R, at 

 five to seven cells beyond the subnodus. Costa Rica to Brazil. (Fig. 70.) 



Perilestes Selys, 1862 



Key to the Genera of the Subfamily Coenagrioninae 



1 {22). Quadrangle relatively regular, the upper side two-thirds to three-fourths 

 or more of the length of the lower in both wings. M4 and Cu2 scarcely zigzag, so 

 that most of the cells of the wing are four-sided rather than five-sided ; the longi- 

 tudinal veins arranged in a parallel and very regular fashion. Tibial spines and 

 quadrangle relatively long. (Legion Platycnemis of Selys for the most part) . . '. .2 



2 (13). Wings generally plainly not petioled to Ac. Rs arising at the subnodus. . . .3 



3 (6). The upper side of the quadrangle more than three-fourths the length of the 

 lower side. Antenodal cells between M4 and Cui are three to five in number, 

 usualh- at least four. Ac near the level of the first antenodal cross-veins. The 

 first and second antennal segments short, the third long and slender 4 



4 (5). Three to five antenodal cells between M4 and Cui. Arculus under the second 

 antenodals. Africa. (Fig. 71.) Metacnemis Selys, 1863 



'^ Descriptions only were available for these genera. 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




54 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



5 (4). Four antenodal cells between M4 and Cui. The arculus between the first 

 and second antenodals, much before the second. West Africa. 



Mesocnemisi^ Karsch, 1891 



6 (3). The upper side of the quadrangle not more than three-fourths the length of 

 the lower side; the antenodal cells three or less between ^^U and Cui. Ac gen- 

 erally beyond the level of the first antenodals. Antennae not as above except in 

 Platycnemis and Stenocnemis 7 



7 (10). Cu2 long, extending beyond the level of the base of Mia which is six to seven 

 cells before the level of the stigma. Postnodals fifteen or more. Posterior 

 tibiae of males not dilated, superior anal appendages at least as long as the in- 

 ferior 8 



8 (9). Three antenodal cells between M4 and Cui. About fifteen postnodal cells in 

 the front wing. The third segment of the antenna shorter than the first plus the 

 second. Cuo long, extending beyond the level of the base of Mia, which vein arises 

 six to seven cells before the stigma. India to Burma. (Fig. 72.) 



Calicnemis Selys, 1863 



9 (8). Two antenodal cells between M4 and Cuj. Front wing with eighteen to 

 twenty postnodals. The third segment of the antenna longer than the first plus 

 the second. West Africa Stenocnemisi' Karsch, 1899 



10 (7). Cu2 not extending beyond the level of the base of Mia, the latter arising two 

 to four cells before the stigma. About thirteen postnodals. Two antenodal 

 cells between M4 and Cui. Posterior tibiae of males more or less dilated, su- 

 perior anal appendages shorter than the inferior 11 



11 (12). Cu2 extending almost to the level of the base of Mia. The second antennal 

 segment as long as the third. Syria to Japan and Sumatra; Madagascar. 

 (Fig. 73.) Copera Kirby , 1 890 



{Psilocnenvis Selys, 1863) 



12 (11). Cu2 not extending to the level of the base of M^ by several cells. The third 

 antennal segment as long as the first plus the second. Mediterranean Region and 

 China. (Fig. 74.) Platycnemis Charpentier, 1 840 



13 (2). Wings petioled close to or beyond Ac; R^ usually arising beyond the sub- 

 nodus (sometimes at the subnodus in AUocnemis) 14 



14 (21) . Rs arising within one or two cells of the subnodus 15 



15 (20). Wings not petioled to the level of the arculus. Ac almost as near the level 

 of the second antenodal as of the first 16 



16 (17). The end of the wing with a denticulate margin. Superior appendages of 

 the male longer than the inferior, which are straight. Malaysia. (Fig. 75.) 



Idiocnemis Selys, 1878 



17 (16). The end of the wing not denticulate at the margin. Superior appendages 

 not longer than the inferior 18 



18 (19). The upper side of the quadrangle not more than three-fourths the length of 

 the lower. Cu2 extending beyond the subnodus to a distance of thirteen to six- 

 teen cells. Usually six to nine cells between the base of Rs and the point where 

 Mi-t-2 forks. India to Malaysia. (Fig. 76.) Coeliccia Kirby, 1894 



{Trichocnemis Selys, 1857) 



^* Description only was available for this genus. 

 ^' Studied from descriptions only. 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 55 



19 (18). The upper side of the quadrangle scarcely shorler ihan the lower. Cu2 

 extending six to eight cells beyond the level of the subnodus. Four to five cells 

 between the base of Rs and the forking of Mi^j. West Africa to South Africa. 

 (Fig. 77.) Allocnemis Selys, 1863 



20 (15). Wings petioled beyond the level of the arculus. Ac under or near the level 

 of the first antenodal. R3 arising one or two cells beyond the subnodus, M3 at the 

 subnodus. Madagascar. (Fig. 78.) j Tatocnemis Kirby, 1889 



; Nesocnemis'* Selys, 1891 



21 (14). Rs arising four or more cells beyond the subnodus, at least in the front wing. 

 Ac about one-half way between the antenodals. Philippines. (Fig. 79.) 



Prionocnemis Kirby, 1890 

 {Ilypooiemis Selys, 1863) 



22 (i). The quadrangle generally with a very acute distal lower angle, the upper side 

 of the quadrangle usually less than two-thirds the length of the upper side. 

 M4 and Cui usually zigzag, so that many cells are pentagonal. Wings generally 

 not long nor with the "straight appearance of those under rubric (i). (If the 

 wings have the general appearance of those under (i), the quadrangle is acute at 

 the end. If the quadrangle is regular, the postnodals are few in number and the 

 second antenodals are before the arculus.) .- 23 



23 (28). M4 and Cuiuot strongly zigzag, so that the principal veins are long, straight 

 and give the wing the straight, uniform appearance of the Platycnemis group. 

 Tibial spines relati\-ely long 24 



24 (27). In the front wing the inner end of the quadrangle is about as long as the 

 upper side. M1+2 forks much nearer the origin of Mia than the subnodus 25 



25 (26). The upper side of the quadrangle about one-third as long as the lower side. 

 The superior appendages of the male longer than the inferior, and compressed, 

 and bent at the end. Seychelles. (Fig. 80.) Leptocnemis Kirby, 1890 



[Ilemicnemis Selys, 1882) 



26 (25). The upper side of the quadrangle about one-half as long as the low-er side. 

 The superior appendages of the male thick, short, compressed, and conical in 

 form. Madagascar Paracnemisi^ Martin, 1903 



27 (24). The inner end of the quadrangle of the fore wing about one-third the length 

 of the upper side; the quadrangle long and narrow. M1+2 forking about one- 

 half w^ay between the subnodus and the base of Mia. Chili. (Fig. 81.) 



Antiagrion Ris, 1904 



28 (23). M4 and Cui zigzag; M1+2 usually curved somewhat at or be>ond the sub- 

 nodal region, instead of running straight out 29 



29 (40). Tibial spines long, generally about twice as long as the intervening spaces. 

 In the front wing the inner end«of the quadrangle generally longer than the upper 

 part of the arculus and as long as the upper side of the quadrangle. Quadrangle 

 widened distally. Wing not petioled to the level of Ac 30 



'* De Selys' description of Nesocnemis fits that of Tatocnemis almost exactly; the two 

 are evidently the same genus. 



1' Studied from the description only. 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




56 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



30 (31). Tarsal claws symmetrically cleft, so that the superior and inferior teeth are 

 about equal. The ninth segment of the abdomen almost equals the eighth. The 

 first segment of the antenna scarcely visible; superior male appendages as long 

 as the inferior. Malaysia Onychargia Selys, 1865 



31 (30). Tarsal claws not symmetrically cleft, the superior and inferior teeth not 

 equal 32 



?)2 (33). The area posterior to Cu2 tends to be two cells wide and the second anteno- 

 dal is often slightly beyond the level of the arculus. M4 becomes zigzag at the 

 level of the fork of M 1+2. Mexico to Colombia. (Fig. 82.) 



Hyponeura Selys, 1854 



33 (32)- The area back of Cu2 of one row of cells only 34 



34 (35)- The prolongation of the nodal cross-vein through the vein M1+2 is generally 

 at first perpendicular to Mi+2- Mi+o in the front wing forks six cells beyond the 

 subnodus; in the hind wings four cells beyond. Tibial spines three times as long 

 as the intervening spaces. New Guinea. (Fig. 83.) Palaiargia Foerster, 1903 



35 (34)- The prolongation of the nodal cross- vein through the vein Mi-1-2 is not per- 

 pendicular to Mi+2 36 



36 (37)- Cua long, extending to Ihe level of the origin of Mia, especially in the hind 

 wing, and at least ten or twelve cells beyond the subnodus. Generalh- fourteen 

 or more postnodal cells; three to seven antenodal cells between M4 and Cui. 

 The New World. Moluccas, Cape of Good Hope. Kurile Islands. (Fig. 84.) 



Argia Rambur, 1842 



37 (36)- Cu2 short, not extending more than four or five cells beyond the level of the 

 subnodus. About ten cells present between the nodus and the stigma 38 



38 (39)- An apical spine on segment eight of the female. The arculus slightly be- 

 yond the second antenodal. Three antenodal cells between M4 and Cui. West 

 Indies and Central America. (Fig. 86.) Argiallagma Selys, 1876 



39 (38). No apical spine on segment eight of the female. The arculus at the second 

 antenodal. Two antenodal cells between M 4 and Cui. Brazil. (Fig. 85.) 



Diargia Calvert, 1909 



40 (29). Tibial spines shorter, scarcely longer than the intervening spaces; if long, 

 the wings are petioled to or beyond Ac. The inner end of the quadrangle usually 

 not longer than the upper part of the arculus in the fore wing, nor longer than the 

 upper side of the quadrangle. Quadrangle generally not widened distally ..... 41 



41 (88). No pale post-ocular spots present on a dark background 42 



42 (53). Female with apical spine on segment eight-" 43 



(A) Wing petioled to the vein Ac. The quadrangle in the front wing with a very pointed 

 distal lower angle, so that the upper side is shorter than or only as long as the inner 

 end. Tenth segment of the abdomen with a deeply cut posterior margin. Con- 

 siderable blue in the coloration. South America. (Fig. 121.) 



Skiallagma Foerster, 1906 



^^ The following two genera cannot be fitted into the key, because the females are un- 

 known, but a brief description may aid in their determination. 




PHILIP A. MUNZ • 57 



(B) "Arculus at, or very near to, the second antenodal; M2 on the hind wings arising 

 nearest the fourth postnodal; costal edge of the stigma of the hing wings shorter 

 than the proximal or distal edges; Cui and Cu2 not reaching as far distad as the 



level of origin of Mia and M2 ; A separating from the hind 



margin proximal to, or less frequently at, the cubito-anal cross-vein , 



which is situated nearer the level of the first than of the second antenodal; venation 

 of the tips of front and hind wings similar, abdomen chiefly red, tenth segment of 

 the male not elevated dorsally, vulvar spine?" Considerable orange and red in 

 the coloration, with black markings. Brazil. (Fig. 96.) 



Tigriagrion Calvert, 1909 



43 (48). Wing not petioled all the way to Ac 44 



44 (47). Genera of the New World 45 



45 (46). Abdomen chiefly red. The costal side of the stigma not shorter than the 

 proximal or distal sides. Cui extending at least to or beyond the level of the base 

 of Mia, Cui to or be>ond that of M,. In the hind wing the inner end of the quad- 

 rangle not as long as the upper side. North and South America. (Fig. 88.) 



Amphiagrion Selys, 1876 



46 (45) . Abdomen generally with some red. The costal edge of the stigma is shorter 

 in the hind wing than the proximal •01' distal sides. Venation otherwise much like 

 the preceding. Mexico and United States. (Fig. 95.) 



Hesperagrion Calvert, 1902 



47 (44) . Genus of the Old World. Front margin of the stigma longer than the pos- 

 terior one. Quadrangle exceedingly narrow. South Abyssinia. 



Thermagrion-' Foerster, 1906 



48 (43) . Wing petioled to or be\ond Ac 49 



49 (50). A genus of the Old World. Coloration largely black and blue. Tibiae with 

 long spines. Lower tooth of tarsal claw almost as large as the upper. Oceanica. 

 (Fig. 116.) Xiphiagrion Selys, 1876 



50 (49) . Genera of the New World 5i 



51 (52). Ms not arising very close to the subnodus, but at least one-half cell before it- 

 Coloration light, much red. Color pattern of dorsum of thorax with no markings 

 darker than brown. Some blue often jiresent. South America and Western 

 North America. (Fig. 109.) Oxyagrion Sehs. 1876 



52 (51). M3 arising very near the subnodus, not more than one-fifth of a cell before 

 it. Abdomen chief!)- reddish and yellowish. (Fig. 127.) 



Leptobasis Selys, 1877 



54 (42). Female without apical spine on segment eight 54 



54 (55). Two complete rows of cells beyond the stigma between C and Ri. this area 

 much broader than the corresponding one between Ri and Mi. The wing-margin 

 slighth- indented at the stigma. Considerable red in the bod>- coloration. East 

 Indies' (Fig. 87.) ^ Oreagrion Ris. 1913 



55 (54). Rarely two complete rows of cells beyond the stigma between C and Ri. 

 Wing-margin not indented at the stigma 56 



" Studied from description only. 



MEM. AM. EXT. SOC, 3. 




58 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



56 (59). Wing ven- evidently not petioled to the level of Ac; petiolation ceasing as 

 far before it as Ac is long 57 



57 (58). Colors red and dark bronze. Europe and Mediterranean Region to China. 

 (Fig. 89.) Pyrrhosoma Charpentier, 1840 



58 (57). Coloration without red, but is bronze varied with blue, green, or yellow. 

 Europe, Asia Minor, and Chili? (Fig. 90.) . . . .Erythromma Charpentier. 1840 



59 (56) • \^ ing petioled very close to the level of Ac 60 



60 (71). Genera of the Xew World 61 



61 (68). Wing not petioled beyond Ac. Tarsal claw with rather strong inferior 

 tooth 62 



62 (63). Postnodals eighteen to twenty, Cu2 extending to the level of the base of 

 IMia. which arises four or more cells before the stigma. Colors of the dorsum blue 

 and black; yellow beneath the thorax. United States and Canada. (Fig. 108.) 



Chromagrion Needham, 1903 



63 (62). Postnodals fourteen or fewer, Cuo not extending to the level of the base of 

 Mia, the latter arising one to two cells before the stigma 64 



64 (67) .• Coloration not reddish. Abdomen usually thirty or more millimeters 

 long 65 



65 (66). The descending cross-vein from the subnodus continuous to the wing- 

 margin. Rs and M3 narrowly separated at the proximal cross-vein between them. 

 Tooth on tarsal claw well developed but distinctly shorter than the claw. Male 

 inferior appendages well developed. South America. (Fig. 120.) 



Aeolagrion" Williamson, 191 7 



66 (65). The descending cross-vein from the subnodus not continued directly to the 

 wing-margin. Tooth on the tarsal claw large, almost as large as the claw; male 

 inferior appendages rudimentary^ Rs and Ms widely separated at the proximal 

 cross-vein between them. South America. (Fig. 119.) 



Leptagrion Selys, 1876, sens, strict. 



67 (64). Coloration reddish. Tarsal claw with a small inferior tooth. Abdomen 

 generally less than thirty millimeters long. United States and West Indies to 

 Brazil. (Fig. 122.) Telebasis Selys, 1865 



{Erythragrion Self's, 1876) 



68 (61). Wing petioled beyond Ac. Tarsal claw with a very small or no inferior 

 tooth 69 



69 (70). M2 arising nearest the fifth or sixth postnodals in the hind wings; at the 

 sixth or beyond in the front wings. Tarsal claw toothless; superior appendages 

 of male not bent down almost at a right angle in their apical half. Genital valves 

 of the female not reaching far beyond the level of the tips of the abdominal ap- 

 pendages. Central America to Brazil. (Fig. 126.) 



Metaleptobasis Calvert, 1907 



22 This genus includes Leptagrion dorsale, hence Hylaeagrion of Foerster, 1906. Wil- 

 liamson (Entom. News, 191 7, p. 241) arrives at the conclusion that Foerster's Hylaeagrion 

 argentolineatiim is in reality L. dorsale, and his H. croceum Selys is Leptobasis, probably 

 vacillans. Therefore the generic name Hylaeagrion falls, L. dorsale becomes the type 

 of Aeolagrion and L. macrurum is that of Leptagrion. 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 59 



70 (69). M2 arising nearest the fourth postnodal in the hind wings, the fifth in the 

 front wings. Tarsal claws toothed. The superior appendages of the male bent 

 down almost at a right angle in their apical half. Genital valves of the female 

 reach far beyond the level of the tips of the abdominal appendages. West Indies 

 and Brazil. (Fig. 127.) Leptobasis Selys, 1877 



71 (60) . Genera of the Old World 72 



72 (83). Ms arising very distinctly before the subnodus 73 



73 (80). Inferior tooth of tarsal claws well developed, when compared with the su- 

 perior tooth 74 



74 (75). Wing ten to twelve mm. long; arculus distinctly be}ond the second an- 

 tenodal, inner end of quadrangle lacking in the male. Postnodals six to eight. 

 Australia. (Fig. 106.) v Hemiphlebia Selj-s, 1869 



75 (74)- Wing usually twenty or more mm. long; arculus near the level of the sec- 

 ond antenodals; inner end of quadrangle present 76 



76 (77). Coloration yellowish or reddish. India to Australia and Africa. (Fig. 

 117.) Ceriagrion-3 Selys, 1876 



77 (76) . Coloration not light 78 



78 (79). Largely black. Tibial spines long. Fiji Islands and Xew Guinea. 



Nesobasis^^ Selys, 1891 



79 (78). Bronze and dark. Tibial spines \ery short. Aru and Bivak Islands. 

 (Fig. 118.) Papuagrion Ris, 1913 



80 (73). Inferior tooth of the tarsal claw lacking or very small 81 



81 (82). Largely black. Tibial spines long. Malaysia and Polynesia. 



Nesobasis-^ Selys, 1891 



82 (81). Coloration bronze, \aried with green and black, wings broad. Black 

 bands on head, thorax, and abdomen. Africa Argiagrion-^ Selys, 1876 



83 (72). M3 arising almost or quite at the subnodus 84 



84 (87). Rs arising at the subnodus 85 



85 (86). Stigma square or oblong, followed by a single row of cells. Coloration not 

 ver>- metallic. Malaysia. (Fig. 128.) Teinobasis Kirby, 1890 



(Telebasis Selys, 1877) 



86 (85). Stigma five-sided and followed by two rows of cells. Malaysia and Poly- 

 nesia Pericnemis" Selys, 1863 



87 (84). Rs arising bej'ond the subnodus; Msalso slightly beyond or at the sub- 

 nodus. Wing petioled to or beyond the le\el of the arculus. Mala> sia. (Fig. 

 129.) Amphicnemis Sehs, 1863 



88 (41). Pale postocular spots present on a dark background, although sometimes 

 confluent with the light coloring of the rear of the head; apparently so in those 

 genera with dichromatic females 89 



.23 Ceriagrion is here used to include Brachybasis; in the opinion of Dr. Ris the latter 

 cannot stand as a genus. See p. 317 of his "Odonatanach den Sammlungen L. 

 Schultzes und Katalog der Odonaten von Suedafrika," 1908. Denkschr Med.-natwiss. 

 Ges. Jena, 13 : 303-346. 



^^ Studied from description only. 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




60 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



89 (94). Stigma in fore and hind wings of males dissimilar in color, size or both 

 Tenth segment of abdomen of male generally with a bifid dorsal process. Fe- 

 male often with apical spine to segment eight of abdomen. Postocular spots, in 

 female at least, tend to disappear. Females dichromatic or polychromatic. . . .90 



90 (91). In the male the stigma of the front wing does not touch the costa. Fe- 

 male with no external black stripe on second or third tibiae. Coloration black, 

 orange, and yellowish. Postocular spots, in females at least, tend to disappear. 

 United States to Venezuela and West Indies. (Fig. 97.) 



Anomalagrion Selys, 1857 



91 (90). Stigma in male touching C. Female generally with an external black 

 stripe on second and third tibiae 92 



92 (93). Penis with pair of erect spines on the penultimate segment. In American 

 species at least, the anterior surface of thorax not solid black. Cosmopolitan. 

 (Fig. 100.) Ischnura Charpentier, 1840. {Mkronympha Kirby, 1890) 



93 (92). Penis with pair of erect spines on penultimate segment. Anterior surface 

 of thorax solid black, except in green females, middle prothoracic lobe with small 

 tooth. on each side. Arizona to Baja California. (Fig. loi.) 



Celaenura Kenned>-, 1917 



94 (89) . Stigma in fore and hind wings of male similar 95 



95 (102). The second antenodals distinctly before the level of the arculus. Both 

 wings not petioled to Ac, but the vein from Ac back to the wing-margin, that is 

 A', does not continue the direction of the petioled part of the margin, instead it 

 passes up toward Ac and Ab 9^ 



96 (97)- Female with apical spine on segment eight. Postnodals six to seven. 

 Coloration dark bronze, with yellow and blue. Dichromatic temales. A genus 

 of the New World — tropical America and the West Indies. (Fig. 102.) 



Ceratura Selys, 1876 



97 (96)- Female without apical spine. Old World genera 98 



98(101). Postnodals five to nine; females dichromatic; very small insects, usually 



less than 24 mm. long 99 



99 (100). Quadrangle of fore wing with upper side less than half as long as the lower 

 side; hence distal angle very acute. Legs very long in comparison with rest of 

 body. Australia. (Fig. 103.) Austrocnemis Tillyard, 1913 



100 (99). Quadrangle of fore wing with upper side one-half or more than one-half 

 of length of lower. Legs short. Australia to India. (Fig. 104.) 



Agriocnemis Selys, 1869 



loi (98). Postnodals ten to twelve; females not dichromatic; chiefly insects of more 



moderate size i.e. abdomen of twenty-five or more mm. India to Australia, 



and in Zanzibar and Madagascar. (Fig. 105.) . . . . Argiocnemis Selys, 1877 



102 (95). The second antenodals not distinctly before the arculus, or it so, either one 

 wing petioled to Ac or the vein A' continues direction of the hind margin of wing 

 up to point of petiolation 103 



103 (i 16). Both wings distinctly not petioled to the le\el of Ac 104 



104 (in). Female without apical spine to segment eight 105 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 6l 



105 (106). Stature very slender, abdomen especially so. Coloration metallic and 

 brilliant, similar in both sexes. Europe, China, North and South America. 

 (Fig. 91.) . Nehalennia Selys, 1850 



106 (105). Stature more robust, abdomen not extremely slender; coloration not 

 very brilliant and dissimilar in sexes 107 



107 (108). Postocular spots elongated, almost linear, with other trans\erse lines be- 

 tween them. Two small clear spots between the ocelli. Superior appendages of 

 male longer than last abdominal segment and arcuate. Europe, Asia Minor, 

 Japan, South Africa. (Fig. 92.) Cercion" Xavas, 1907 



108 (107). Postocular spots cuneate or rounded, no spots between the ocelli. Su- 

 perior appendages often short and straight 109 



109 (no). Species of Hawaiian Islands. Characters variable. (Fig. 93.) 



Megalagrion2« McLachlan, i8S;> 

 no (109). Not Hawaiian, nor Australian, otherwise quite cosmopolitan. (Fig. 94.) 



Coenagrion Kirby, 189a 

 • {Agrion Fabricius, 1775) 



1 1 1 (104). Female with apical spine on segment eight 112 



\12 (113). Costal edge of stigma shorter than the proximal or distal edges. Cui 

 reaching the level of base of Mia, Cu2 that of origin of M.. Postocular spots 

 sometimes disappearing. United States and Mexico. "(Fig. 95.) 



Hesperagrion Calvert, 1902 



113 (112). Costal edge of stigma as long as proximal or distal edges 114 



n4 (115)- M2 of hind wing generally arising at or beyond the fourth postnodal, 

 tenth segment of male not elevated. Coloration of male generally blue, of fe- 

 male green or yellow, sometimes blue. Cosmopolitan, not in Australia. (Fig. 



t)8.) Enallagma Charpentier, 1840 



us (n4). Tenth segment of male elevated and with a bifid dorsal process. Penis 

 with transverse row of short spines at base of distal or spatulate lobe. M2 of 

 hind wing arises at about the fifth postnodal. California. (Fig. 99.) 



Zoniagrion Kennedy, 191 7 

 n6 (103). One or both wings petioled practically to or even beyond the level of 



Ac....' "7 



n7 (108). Pale postocular spots widely confluent with the pale color on the rear of 

 the head. M2 arising nearest the fourth postnodal in the hind wings and the 

 fifth in the front wings. Tarsal claws toothed. Superior appendages of the male 

 bent down almost at a right angle in their apical half. Genital valves of female 

 reaching far beyond the level of the tips of the abdominal appendages. West 

 Indies to Brazil. (Fig. 127.) Leptobasis" Selys, 1877 



25 Cerciou has been shown by Kennedy, 191 7, P^nt. News, to include C. littdenii, C. 

 quadrigerum, and C. punctum, all formerly considered species of Coenagrion. 



-^ Megalagrion was said by Perkins (Fauna Hawaiiensis \'ol. I, p. clxxv and \'ol. 

 II, pp. 63 to 77 and 693 to 696) to have been separated by McLachlan from the genus 

 Coenagrion on inconstant characters. Kennedy (Ent. News, 1917), in a study of the penes 

 of many of the Hawaiian species, considers it probable that all the species of those islands 

 may be considered as comprising the genus Megalagrion. 



•-' Pale postocular spots not always present. Females sometimes with, sometimes 

 without, vulvar spine. See (52) and (70). 



. MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




62 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



Ii8 (117). Pa'e postocLilar spots not widely confluent with the pale color on the 

 rear of the head 119 



119 (124). Female with apical spine to segment eighths 120 



120 (121). Genus of the New World. Colors bronze and blue or greenish. The 

 eighth or ninth or tenth segments blue. End of tenth more or less prolonged or 

 turned back. Mexico to South America. (Fig. no.) 



Acanthagrion Selys, 1876 



121 (120). Genera of the Old World 122 



122 (123). Ms arising before the subnodus; front wing with twelve to fifteen post- 

 nodals. Coloration yellowish, greenish and bluish with black markings. Kili- 

 manjaro and Meru, Africa Mombagrion^^ Sjostedt, 1909 



123 (122). Ms arising almost at the subnodus; front wing with nine to twelve post- 

 nodals. Coloration black, blue, and dark green. Malaysia and West Africa. 

 (Fig. 123.) Aciagrion Selys, 1892 



124 (119). Female without apical spine on segment eight 125 



125 (128). Genera of the New World 126 



126 (127). Tips of the wings similar, abdomen very long and slender. Tenth seg- 

 ment of male not forked. Coloration greenish or yellowish. Mia arising one or 

 two cells before the stigma. Eastern United States and Brazil. (Fig. in.) 



Telagrion Seljs, 1876 



127 (126). Tips of front and hind wings of male unlike; Ri and Mi in the hind wing 

 almost unite at the tip. Segment ten of the male with a tubercle above and two 

 spines. Coloration bluish or reddish, or brownish. IMexico to Central America. 

 (Fig. 125.) . . ; Anisagrion Selys, 1876 



128 (125). Genera of the Old World 129 



129 (138). Ms arising quite distinctly before the subnodus. Tarsal claw generally 

 with an inferior tooth 130 



130 ( 1 33) . Prothorax of female provided with two hooks which project forward . .131 



131 (132). Ac at or but slightly beyond the level of the first antenodals, not more 

 than one-fourth the distance to the second ones. Coloration blue. Australia. 

 (Fig. 107.) Caliagrion Tillyard, 191 2 



132 (131). In Australian species, at least, Ac is about one-halfway between the first 

 and second antenodals. Superior appendages of male usually forked or hollowed 

 at tips. Africa and Asia to Australia. (Fig. 114.) Pseudagrion Selys, 1876 



133 (130)- Prothorax of female simple, no hooks present 134 



-* Skiallagma sometimes has traces of postocular spots; female unknown. See descrip- 

 tion in footnote to rubric forty-two. 



Myagrion, female unknown. Male described as follows: Color carmine-red. Quad- 

 rangle irregular, upper side contained in the lower two and one-half times, in the front 

 wing. Cu2 thirteen cells long. M> arises six cells beyond the subnodus in the front 

 wing, five in the hind wing. Abdomen very slender, legs short, tibial spines weak. 

 Tergum of tenth abdominal segment produced into two spines, but without a tubercle 

 such as occurs in Anisagrion. Appendages scarcely as long as these spines. South 

 -America, Foerster, 19 1 4. 



-' Studied from description only. 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 65 



25 (30). JNIaand R, arising separately and the latter arising at the subnodus 26 



26 (27). Legs quite long; femora strongly compressed. Tibial spines long, numer- 

 ous. Xodus not very oblique, so that Sc ends beyond the level of the base of M3. 

 Cuba. (Fig. 145.) Microneura Selys, 1886 



27 (26). Legs short; femora not compressed. Nodus oblique, so that Sc ends before 

 the le\el of the base of M3 28 



28 (29). Wings narrow, about one-sixth or one-seventh as wide as long. The first 

 antenodal space twice as long as the second and also longer than the third. Ac 

 oiten very near the level of the first antenodals. Cuba and Central America to 

 Brazil. (Fig. 146.) Protoneura Selys, 1857 



29 (28). Wings broader, about one-fifth as wide as long. The first antenodal space 

 twice as long as the second, and equal to the third. Ac usually at a level inter- 

 mediate between the antenodals. British Guiana. (Fig. 147.) 



Epipleoneura Williamson, 191 5 



30 (25). Ms and Rs joined at their origin into a single vein arising beyond the sub- 

 nodus; or they may arise as separate veins, but if so, Rs still arises beyond the 

 subnodus 3 1 



31 (32). Cui about two and one-half cells long, so that it passes through the cross- 

 vein coming down from the subnodus. The first and third antenodal costal 

 spaces about equal; the second much shorter, more than one-half of the third. 

 Stigma long and narrow, twice as long as wide. British Guiana. (Fig. 148.) 



Epipotoneura Williamson, 191 5 



32 (31). Cui ending at the cross-vein descending from the subnodus. The three 

 antenodal costal spaces about equal. Wings rather broad, almost one-fourth as 

 wide as long. Stigma shorter '. . -. 33 



33 (34). Main the front wing arises at the seventh postnodal; in the hind wing at the 

 fifth. British Guiana Phasmoneura^^ Williamson, 191 6 



34 (33). M2 in the front wing arises before the seventh postnodal, usually at or be- 

 fore the sixth; in the hind wing at the fourth or before. British Guiana. (Fig. 

 i^Q.) .Psaironeura Williamson, 191 5 



35 (20). The subquadrangle of about the same length as the space before Ac. 

 Australian genera 3^ 



36 (39). Cui more than one cell long and traversing the cross- vein coming down 

 from the subnodus. The space between the fork of M1+2 and the base of 

 I\La is not over two-thirds as great as that between the fork of M]+2 and the 

 subnodus 37 



37 (38). Mia arising about five cells before the stigma in the hind wing. The quad- 

 rangle almost as long as the second antenodal space. Cui extending six to seven 

 cells beyond the quadrangle. New South Wales. (Fig. 139.) , 



Neosticta TilKard, 191 3 



38 (37). Mi^arising about three cells before the stigma in the hind wing. The quad- 

 rangle shorter than the second antenodal space. Cui extending three to four 

 cells beyond the quadrangle. Australia. (Fig. 140.) 



Austrosticta Til hard, 1908 



22 Description only was available for this genus. 

 MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




66 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



39 (36). Cui not more than one cell long and not reaching the cross-vein which 

 conies down from the subnodus (this true in the hind hind wing at least). The 

 space between the base of Mia and M1+2 at least four-fifths of that between the 

 fork of Mi+2and the subnodus. in the hind wing 40 



40 (41). Cui less than one cell long. M3 arising before the subnodus. The stigma 

 longer than wide. The second antenodal space about one-half as long as the third. 

 The space between the forking of I\Ii+2 and the base of Mia is longer than that be- 

 tween the subnodus and the forking of M1+2, in the hind wing. Australia. 

 (Fig. 141.) Notoneura Tillyard, 1913 



41 (40). Cui about one cell long. M 3 arising beyond the subnodus. The stigma 

 about as wide distally as long. The second antenodal space as long as the third; 

 the space between the base of Mia and the forking of M1+2 not as long as that be- 

 tween the subnodus and the forking of M1+2 in the hind wing. Australia. (Fig. 

 142.) Oristicta Tillyard. 1913 



42 (19). Ac at or before the level of the first antenodals; Cui usually not extending 

 to the level of the subnodus 43 



43 (50)- Cui generally not reduced to a cross-vein, but extending beyond MA. Cuo 

 maybe lacking. Ri on lower side of stigma not zigzag, but straight 44 



44 (47). Quadrangle widened distalh-. Area back of M4 beyond MA broad, at least 

 one-third as great as the width of the wing at that point 45 



45 (46). Head very small, thorax narrow^ legs short, abdomen exceedingly attenuate. 

 About nine postnodals. Australia. (Fig. 141.) Notoneura Tillyard, 1913 



46 (45). Head larger, thorax not so narrow, but form robust, tibiae with many spines. 

 About fourteen postnodals. Australia. (Fig. 151.) . .Nososticta Selys, i860 



47 (44). Quadrangle not widened distally. Area beyond Mx^ not so broad as 

 above 48 



48 (49). Ms in some species arising just beyond subnodus. Cuiin species from East 

 Indies is at least two cells long, in Australian species less. In Australian species 

 at least, "both superior and inferior appendages of males somewhat forcipate, the 

 inferior pair prolonged beyond the superior." New Caledonia, Bismarck Arch- 

 ipelago and Torres Straits. (Fig. 150.) Isosticta Selys. 1885 



49 (48). Ms always arising before the subnodus. Cui in the front wing almost 

 always less than two cells long, generally ending in the first cell beyond MA. 

 Malaysia to Bismarck Archipelago. (Fig. 152.) Risioneura^s gen. nov. 



50 (43). Cui reduced to a cross-\-ein, not extending beyond MA. Ri on lower side 

 of stigma zigzag. M3 arising beyond the subnodus. New Guinea. (Fig. 153.) 



Selysioneura Foerster, 1900 



33 This genus is made for those species of Caconeura {Alloneura) included by Selys 

 (1886) in his second group and differs from Caconeura, sens, strict., in having Ac situated 

 under or before the first antenodals and Cui rarely long enough to reach the cross-vein 

 coming down from the subnodus. R. plagiata Selys is the genotype; the other species 

 included are R. insignis Selys, R. erythroprocla Selys, R. wallacii Selys, R. exul Selys, 

 R. moluccensis Selys, R. flavipennis Selys, R. salomonis Selys, R. circumscripta Selys, R. 




PHILIP A. MUXZ 63 



134 (135). Ac at the level of the first antenodals. Postnodals eleven to fifteen. 

 Coloration red. Australia and New Zealand. (Fig. 115.) 



Xanthagrion Selys, 1876 



135 (134). Ac about half-way between the first and second antenodals 136 



136 (137). Front wing not petioled quite to Ac, the hind wing so petioled. Inferior 

 appendages of male much longer than superiors. New Zealand. (Fig. 112.) 



Xanthocnemis Tillyard, 1913 



137 (136). Both wings petioled to Ac. Superior appendages of male longer than in- 

 ferior; small species of blue and bronze color. (Fig. 113.) 



Austroagrion Tillyard, 1913 



138 (129). M3 arising very near to subnodus, almost touching base of Rs. Tarsal 

 claw without an inferior tooth. Body slender. Malaysia to Australia. (Fig. 

 124.) Archibasis Kirby, 1890 



(Stoiobasis Selys, 1877) 



Key to the Genera of the Subfamily Protoneurinae 



1 (4) . Cu2 one cell long 2 



2 (3). Usually more than 14 postnodal cells. Ac near the level of the first antenodals. 

 Mia arising six to eight cells before the stigma. Cui is six to seven cells long. 

 West Africa. (Fig. 130.) Chlorocnemis Selys, 1863 



3 (2). Less than 10 postnodal cells. Ac about midway between the antenodals. 

 Mia arising one cell before the stigma. Cui is four cells long. Brazil. (Fig. 131.) 



Proneura Selys, 1889 

 4(1). Cu-2 reduced to a cross-vein or lacking, not projecting beyond MA 5 



5 (18). A not reduced to Ac, but extending beyond 6 



6 (13). A ending in MA, and not in Cu on the posterior side of the quadrangle, nor 

 in the hind margin of the wing before MxA. No "cubito-anal" cross-veins before 

 Ac. That edge of the stigma along the margin of the wing as great as that along 

 Ri. The quadrangle practically uniform in width 7 



7 (8). Labium with short lobes. The wings often not petioled to Ac. Cui ending 

 at or beyond the level of the subnodus. India, Africa, Malaysia. (Fig. 132.) 



Disparoneura Selys, i860 sens, strict. 



8 (7) . Labium with elongate lobes 9 



9 (10). Cui ending three to five cells beyond the level of the subnodus. Wing 

 petioled almost to Ac. Front wings with three cells between the subnodus and 

 fork of Mi+2. Brazil. (Fig. 134.) Peristicta Selys, i860 



10 (9). Cu, ending within a cell of the level of the subnodus. Wing petioled to or 

 slightly beyond Ac. Often four or more cells between the subnodus and fork of 

 Ml+2 V ■ " 



11 (12). Ac not nearer the level of the second antenodal than of the first. The first 

 antenodal space generally more than one and one-half times as long as the second. 

 Five or more cells in the hind wing beyond the stigma. Tibial spines short. 

 West Indies, Central America to Brazil. (Fig. 133) Neoneura Selys, i860 



{Caen one lira Kirby, 1890) 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




64 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



12 (ii). Ac nearer the level of the second antenodal than of the first. The first 

 antenodal space less than one and one-half times the length of the second. Three 

 or four cells beyond the stigma. Brazil. (Fig. 135.). . .Idioneura Selys, i860 



13 (6). A ending in Cu under the quadrangle or in the wing margin, but not reach- 

 ing MA. 14 



14 (17). A ending in Cu on the posterior side of the quadrangle. A "cubito-anal" 

 cross-vein generally present before Ac. That edge of the stigma along the wing 

 margin shorter than that along Ri 15 



15 (16). Cui ending generally some distance beyond the level of the fork of M1+2, 

 about two-thirds of the distance from the nodus to the stigma. M1+2 forking 

 between one-third and one-half the distance from the subnodus to the stigma. 

 Mexico to Venezuela. (Fig. 136.) Palaemnema Selys, i860 



16 (15). Cuiending not more than a cell or so beyond the fork of M1+2, usually before 

 it, Mi+2 often forking less than one-third the distance from the subnodus to the 

 stigma. Ceylon to Malaysia. (Fig. 137.) Platysticta Selys, i860 



17 (14). A ending in the hind margin of the wing between Ac and MA. No cubito- 

 anal cross-vein before Ac. The costal edge of the stigma as long as that edge 

 along Ri. Southeastern Asia and Malaysia. (Fig. 138.) 



Hypos trophoneura^" gen. nov. 



18 (5). The vein A reduced to Ac, not extending beyond 19 



19 (43). Ac distinctly beyond the level of the first antenodal: Cui usually extending 

 beyond the level of the subnodus 20 



20 (35)- The subquadrangle shorter than the portion of the wing behind Cu-|-A and 

 before Ac. Genera of the New World and two of the East Indies and Southern 

 Asia 21 



21(24). Genera of the Old World. Labium with short lobes, z^bout sixteen post- 

 nodals ' 22 



22 (23). Accessory cross- vein before Ac. The costal edge of the stigma shorter than 

 that along R,. India to Malaysia. (Fig. 144.) Protosticta Selys, 1885 



23 (22). No accessory cross-vein before Ac. The costal edge of the stigma not 

 shorter than that along Ri. Malaysia, j Disparoneura Selys, i860, sens. lat. 



\ Caconeura^^ Kirby, 1890 sens, strict. 

 [ Alloneiira, Selys, i860 sens, strict. 



24 (21). Genera of the New World. Labium with elongated lobes. About twelve 

 postnodals 25 



'"This genus is created for those species of Disparoneura placed by Selys (1886) 

 in the third group, and has as its type gomphoides Rambur. It is distinct from Dis- 

 paroneura, sens, strict., by having A end before MA and not in MA, and by Cui usually 

 being much shorter than in Disparoneura. It receives its name from the fact that A 

 turns downward: viroar po<i)y) = a turning backward, and vtvpov= nerve. 



31 As here treated this genus comprises only the first group of Alloneura as given by 

 Selys (1886). It, therefore, contains the following species: C. dorsalis Selys, C. lansbergei 

 Selys, C. gracillima Selys, C. hyperylhra Selys, and C. dohrni Krueger. See rubric 49 

 for Risioneura. Dr. Ris and Mr. Laidlaw consider this section of Caconeura as belong- 

 ing to Disparoneura; the genus Caconeura thus passes out of existence, since C. dorsalis 

 is the genotype. See Ris (1915) and Laidlaw (1913). 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 69 



Kirby, \V. F. 1894 (a). Catalogue of the described NeuropteraOdonata (dragon- 

 flies) of Ceylon, with descriptions of new species. 

 Jour. Linn. Soc, 24: 545-566, pis. 41-42. 



1894 (b). On a new genus and species of Agriqnidae from Foo Chow. 

 Ann. Mag. Nat. Hist., (6) 13:84-86. 



1894 (c). Note on Archineura basilactea Kirby. 

 Ann. Mag. Nat. Hist., (6) 13:450-451. 



1900. On a small collection of Odonata (dragonflies) from Hainan collected 

 by the late John Whitehead. 

 Ann. Mag. Nat. Hist., (7) 5: 530-539. ph 12. 

 Laidlaw, F. F. 1902. On a collection of dragonflies made b}- members of the Skeat 

 expedition in the Malay peninsula in 1899-1900. 

 Proc. Zool. Soc. London: 63-92, 381-389, pis. 5-6. 



191 3. Contributions to a study of the dragonfly fauna of Borneo. Part L 

 Proc. Zool. Soc. London: 63-80, pi. 4. 



1915. Notes on Oriental dragonflies in the Indian Museum, No. 3. Indian 

 species of the "legion" Protoneura. 



Rec. Ind. Mus. Calcutta, 11:387-391. 



1916. Notes on Oriental dragonflies in the Indian Museum, No. 4. The 

 genus Pseiidagrion. 



Rec. Ind. Mus. Calcutta. 12:21-25. 

 Martin, R. 1903. Odonates indo-oceaniens des collections du museum. 



Bull. Mus. Paris, 8: 506-512. 

 McLachlan, R. 1870. Description of a new genus and four new species of Calop- 



terygidae, and of a new genus and species of Gomphidae. 



Trans. Ent. Soc. London, 165-170. 



1895. Some new species of Odonata of the legion Lestes, with notes. 

 Ann. Mag. Nat. Hist., (6) 16: 19-28. 



1896. On Odonata from the province of Szechuen, in western China, and 

 from Moupin in Eastern Thibet. 



Ann. Mag. Nat. Hist., (6) 17:364-374. 



1897. Thaumatoneura inopinata, a new genus and species of Calopteryginae. 

 Entom. Mo. Mag., (2) 8: 130-131. 



Morton, K. J. 1914. A remarkable new genus and species of Odonata, of the 



legion Podagrion Selys, from North Queensland. 



Trans. Entom. Soc. London: 169-172, pi. 9. 

 Muttkowski, R. A. 1910 (a). The applicability of certain generic names of 



Odonata. i. Agrion \'ersus Calopteryx. 



Bull. Wis. Nat. Soc, Milwaukee, 8: 158-160. 



1910 (b). Catalogue of the Odonata of North America. 



Bull. Public Museum City of Milwaukee, i: 1-207. 

 Navas, L. 1907. Neuropteros de Espana y Portugal. 



Broteria, S. Fiel, 6: 43-100. 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




70 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



Needham, J. G. 1903 (a). A genealogic study of dragonfly wing venation, 

 Proc. U. S. Nat. Mus., 26: 703-764, pis. 31-54. 



1903 (b). A new genus and species of dragonfly from Brazil. 

 Proc. Ent. Soc. Washington, 16: 55-58. 



1903 (c). Aquatic insects in New York State. Part 3, Life histories of 

 Odonata, suborder Zygoptera. 

 Bull. New York Mus., 68: 218-279, pls^ 11-19. 



1917. Notes on some recent studies of dragonfly wing tracheation. (Odon.) 

 Entom. News, 28: 169-173. 

 Perkins, R. C. L. 1899. Neuroptera. (in) 



Fauna Hawaiiensis, 2: 31-89, pis. 3-5. 

 Rambur, J. P. 1842. Histoire naturelle des insectes Neuropteres. 



Paris. 

 Ris, F. 1898. Neue Libellen vom Bismarck -Archipel. 

 Entom. Nachrichten, 24: 321-327. 



1900. Libellen vom Bismarck-Archipel gesammelt durch Prof. Friedr. Dahl. 

 Arch.'Naturg., 66: 175-204, pis. 9-10. 



1904. Odonaten. 

 Hamburg. Magalhaen. Reise, 7: 44 pp. 



191 1. Libellen von Slntang, Borneo gesammelt von Dr. L. Martin. 

 Ann. Soc. Entom. Belgique, 55: 231-255. 



1912. Neue Libellen von Formosa, Slidchina, Tonking, und den Philip- 

 pinen. 



Suppl. Entom., Berlin, 1:44-85, 3 pis. 



1913 (a). Die Odonaten von Dr. H. A. Lorentz's Expedition nach Sud- 

 west New-Guinea 1909 und einige Odonaten von Waigeu. Nova Guinea. 

 Resultats de I'expedition scientifique neerlandaise a la Nouvelle Guinee, 9 

 Leiden: 471-512. 



1913 (b). Odonata von den Aru- und Kei- Inseln gesammelt durch Dr. H. 

 Merton 1908, nebst (jbersicht iiber die von den Aru-Inseln bekannten Odon- 

 aten. 

 Abh. Senckenb. Ges. Frankfurt a. Main, 34: 501-536, i pi. 



191 5. Libellen (Odonata) von Neu-Caledonien und den Loyalty-Inseln. 

 F. Sarasin und J. Roux, Nova Caledonia, Zoologie, 2: 57-72, 11 fig. 



1916 (a), ijber Ontogenese der Flugeladerung bei den Libellen. 

 Mitth. Schweiz. Entom. Ges., 28: pp. 



1916 (b). Zwei Notizen iiber Calopterygiden (Odonata) vom Malaiischen 

 Archipel. 



Entom. Mitth., Berlin, 5: 303-318, 9 figs. 

 Schmidt, E. 1915. Vergleichende Morphologie des zweiten und dritten Abdom- 

 inalsegments bei mannlichen Libellen. 

 Zool. Jahrb., 39: 87-196, pis. 9-1 1, figs. A-Z. 




PHILIP A. MUXZ 67 



VI— A PARTIAL LIST OF THE MOST IMPORTANT REF- 

 ERENCES CONSULTED IN THE PREPARATION 



OF THIS PAPER 



Calvert, P. P. 1891 . A new genus and species of Odonata from Jamaica. 

 Entom. News, 2: 199. 



1893 (a). Catalogue of the Odonata (dragonflies) of the vicinity of Phila- 

 delphia, with an introduction to the study of this group of insects. 

 Trans. Amer. Entom. Soc, 20: 152-172, pis. 2-3. 



1893 (b). The Odonate genus Ortholestes. 

 Proc. Acad. Xat. Sci. Philadelphia, 45: 377-382, tig. 



1898. Odonata. A synonym and the bearing of its discovery- on the 

 classification oi Agrion. 

 Entom. News, 9: 72. 



1901-1908. Odonata. (in) 

 Biologia Centrali-Americana, Neuroptera: 17-420, 10 pis. 

 London, R. H. Porter and Dulau and Co. 



1902. On the systematic position of Thaumatoueiira inopinata McLachlan 

 (Order Odonata), with some remarks on the classification of the suborder 

 Zygoptera. 

 Entom. Mo. Mag., 38: 29-32. 



1904. Thauviatoneura again. 

 Entom. News, 15:216. 



1909. Contributions to a knowledge of the Odonata of the Neotropical 

 region, exclusive of Mexico and Central America. 

 Ann. Carnegie Mus., 6: 73-280, pis. 1-9. 



1913. The fossil Odonate Phenacolestes, with a discussion of the venation 

 of the legion Podagrion Selys. 



Proc. Acad. Nat. Sci. Philadelphia, 65: 225-272, pi. 14. 

 Calvert, P. P. 1917. Studies in Costa Rican Odonata, 8. A new genus allied to 

 Cora. 



Entom. News, 28: 259-263, figs. 

 Campion, H- 1913- The antenodal reticulation of the wings of Agrionine dragon- 

 flies. 



Proc. Acad. Nat. Sci. Philadelphia, 65: 220-224. 

 Comstock, J. H. and Needham, J. G. 1898. The wings of insects. Chap. 4, III. 

 The venation of the wings of the Odonata. 

 Amer. Natural., 32:903-911. 



selysi Foerster, R. finisterrae Foerster, R. ebuniea Foerster, R. jruhstorferi Krueger, R. 

 pseudexul Ris, R. nigrifrons Ris, R. marina Ris, R. rosea Ris, R. dorsonigra Martin, and R. 

 torrenticola Foerster. It is dedicated to Dr. Ris, who has given us the most careful re- 

 cent treatment of this group. See F. Ris, 1913, Odonata von den Aru-und Kei-Inseln, 

 pages 508 to 514. 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




68 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



Foerster, F. 1897 (a) Beitrage zur kenntniss der indo-australischen Odonaten- 

 fauna, IV. 

 Wien Entom. Zeitung, 16: 1 01-103. 



1897 (b) Beitrage zur kenntniss der indo-australischen Odonatenfauna, 

 VI. 

 Entom. Nachrichten, 23: 333-338. 



1899. Zur Odonatenfauna von Madagascar. 

 Entom. Nachrichten, 25: 1 86-191. 



1900. Odonaten aus Neu-Guinea. 

 Termes. Fuzetek, 23: 81-108. figs. 



1903. Odonaten aus Neu-Guinea III. 

 Ann. Mus. Hungar., i: 509-554. 



1906 (a). Neotropische Libellen. 

 Insektenborse, 23: 15-16. 



1906 (b). Libellen. (Forschungsreise durch Siidschoa, Galla und die 

 Somalilander v. C. Frhr. v. Erlanger.) 

 Jahrb. Ver. Naturk. Wiesbaden. 59: 299-344, i pi. 



1909. Beitrage zu den Gattungen und Arten der Libellen. 

 Jahrb. Ver. Natk. Wiesbaden, 62: 211-235. 



191 o. Beitrage zu den Gattungen und Arten der Libellen. 

 Entom. Zeitung, Wien, 29: 51-56. 

 Hagen, H. 1861. Synopsis of the Neuroptera of North America. 



Smithsonian Mis. Coll., 345 pp. 

 Handlirsch, A. 1906-1908. Die fossilen Insecten und die Phylogenie der rezenten 

 Formen. Ein Handbuch fuer Palaeontologen und Zoologen. 2 vols., 51 pis. 

 Leipzig, Verlag von Wilhelm Engelmann. 

 Karsch, F. 1891 (a). Neue Odonaten von Ecuador. 

 Societas Entom., 6: 105-12 1. 



1891 (b). Ubersicht der von Herrn Dr. Paul Preuss in Deutsch-West- 

 Afrika 1890 gesammelten Odonaten. 

 Entom. Nachrichten, 17:65-80. 



1895. Archineum basilactea \\ . F. Kxrhy = Echo incarnata Karsch. 

 Entom. Nachrichten, 20: 84. 



1899. Odonaten von Johann-Albrecht-Hohe (Nord-Kamerun), gesammelt 

 von Herrn Leopold Conradt. 

 Entom. Nachrichten, 25, 161-176. 

 Kennedy, C. H. 191 7. Notes on the life-history and ecology of the dragonflies 

 (Odonata) of central California and Nevada. 

 Proc. U. S. Nat. Mus., 52: 483-635, 404 figs. 

 Kirby, W. F. 1889. Descriptions of new genera and species of Odonata in the 

 collection of the British Museum, chiefly from Africa. 

 Proc. Zool. Soc. London, 299-303. 



1890. A synonymic catalogue of Neuroptera Odonata, or dragonflies, with 

 an appendix of fossil species. 

 Gurney and Jackson, London. 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 73 



Plate IV 



Fig. 16. — Front wing of P solode smiis dorothea Williamson. (Male, after William- 

 son.) 

 — Front wing of Phaon iridipennis Burmeister. (Male, Cornell Collection.) 

 —Front wing of Vestalis gracilis Rambur. (Female, Cornell Collection.) 

 — Front wing of Hetaerina nmericana Fabricius. (Female, Cornell Col- 

 lection.) 

 —Front wing of Lais globifer Hagen. (Male, after Selys.) 

 —Hind wing of Pseudophaea ochracea Selys. (Female, Cornell Collection.) 



Plate V 



— Front wing of Dysphaca dimidiata Selys. (Male, after SeK-s.) 

 —Hind wing of Bayadera ind'ica Selys. (Female, Cornell Collection.) 

 —Hind wing of EpaUage fatima Charpentier. (Female, Cornell Collection.) 

 —Front wing of A nisopleiira furcata Selys. (Female, after Williamson.) 

 —Front wing of Rhinocypha biforata Selys. (Male, after Williamson.) 

 —Front wing of Libellago caligata Selys. (Female, Cornell Collection.) 

 —Front wing of Micromerus lineatus Burmeister. (Female, after Wil- 

 liamson.) 



Plate VI 



—Front wing of Cyanocharis valga Needham. (Male, Cornell Collection.) 

 —Front wing of Heliocharis amazona Selys. (Male, after Cahert.) 

 —Front wing of Neocharis cothurnata Foerster. (Male, Williamson Col- 

 lection.) 

 —Front wing of Diderias atrosanguinea Selys. (Male, after Selys.) 

 —Hind wing of Devadatta argyoides Selys. (Female, after Williamson.) 

 —Front wing of Diphlebia lestoides Selys. (Cornell Collection.) 

 —Front wing of Amphipteryx agrioides Selys. (Male, Cornell Collection.) 



Plate VII 



—Hind wing of Philoganga nwiitaiia Selys? (Male, Cornell Collection.) 

 —Front wing of Disparocypha biedermanni Ris. (Male, after Ris.) 

 —Front wing of Pseiidolestes mirabilis Kirby. (Male, in British Museum. 



From photograph by F. W. Campion.) 

 —Hind wing of Ortholestes clam Calvert. (Male, Cornell Collection.) 

 —Front wing of Archilestes grandis Rambur. (Male, Cornell Collection.) 

 —Front wing of Megalestes major Seljs. (Male, Cornell Collection.) 

 —Front wing of Sympycna fusca Van der Linden. (Female, Cornell 



Collection.) 

 Fig. 43. — Front wing of Austrolestes cingiilatns Burmeister. (Male, Cornell 



Collection.) 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




74 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



Plate VIII 



Fig. 44. — Front wing of Lestes sponsa Hansem. (JMale, Cornell Collection.) 

 Fig. 45. — Hind wing of Lestoidea conjuncta Tillyard. (Male, after Tillyard.) 

 Fig. 46. — Hind wing of Megaloprepus coenileatus Drury. (Female, Cornell 



Collection.) 

 Fig. 47. — Hind wing of Microstigma anomalum Rambur. (Specimen in Acad. Nat. 



Sci. Philadelphia. Photograph by C. H. Kennedy.) 

 Fig. 48. — Hind wing of Anomisma terminatum McLachlan. (Male, Acad. Nat. 



Sci. Philadelphia.) 

 Fig. 49. — Hind wing of Pseudostigma ahermns Selys. (Male, Acad. Nat. Sci. 



Philadelphia. From photograph by C. H. Kennedy.) 

 Fig. 50. — Hind wing of Mecistogaster linearis Fabricius. (Female, Acad. Nat. 



Sci. Philadelphia. From photograph by C. H. Kennedy.) 



Plate IX 



Fig. 51. — Front wing of Thaumatoneura pelhicida Calvert. (Male, Acad. Nat. 



Sci. Philadelphia.) 

 Fig. 52. — Hind wing of Rhipidolestes actileata Ris. (IVIale, after Ris.) 

 Fig- 53- — Front wing of Podopteryx roseonotata Selys. (Male, after Ris.) 

 Fig. 54. — Front wing of Trineiiragrion percostale Ris. (Male, after Ris.) 

 Fig- 55- — Front wing of Rhinagrion macrocephalum Selys. (Male, in Museum of 



Comparative Zoolog}'. From photograph by E. Aver>' Richmond.) 

 Fig. 56. — Hind wing of Argiolestes icteromelas Selys. (From photograph by J. G. 



Xeedham.) 

 Fig- 57- — Front wing of Megapodagrion erinys Ris. (Male, after Ris.) 

 Fig. 58. — Front wing of AUopodagrion sp.? (Male, Cornell Collection.) 



Plate X 



Fig- 59- — Front wing of Philogenia terraba Calvert. (Male, in Acad. Nat. Sci. 

 Philadelphia.) 



Fig. 60. — Front wing of Podolesies orientalis Selys. (Male, in Acad. Nat. Sci. 

 Philadelphia.) 



Fig. 61. — Hind wing of Nesolestes alboterniinata Selys. (Female, Cornell Col- 

 lection.) 



Fig. 62. — Hind wing of Neurolestes trinerv-is Selys. (Male, in Acad. Nat. Sci. 

 Philadelphia.) 



Fig. 63. — Hind wing of Synlestes weyersi Selys. (Male, Cornell Collection.) 



Fig. 64. — Hind wing of Paraphkhia diiodecima Calvert. (Male, Cornell Collec- 

 tion.) 



Fig. 65. — Front wing of Wahnesia montivagans Foerster. (Male, in Acad. Nat. 

 Sci. Philadelphia.) 



Fig. 66. — Hind wing of Chlorolestes fasciata Burmeister. (Female, in British 

 Museum. From photograph by F. \V. Campion.) 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 71 



Selys-Longchamps, E. de. 1853. Synopsis des Calopterygines. 

 Bull. Acad. Belg., (2) i : 73 pp. 



1854. Monographic des Calopterygines avec collaboration H. Hagen. 

 Mem. Soc. R. Science de Liege, 9. 



1857. Neuropteres de I'isle de Cuba. 

 De la Sagra Hist. Cuba, 7: 183-201. 



1859. Additions au synopsis des Calopterygines. 

 Bull. Acad. Belg., (2) 7: 437-451. 



i860. Synopsis des Agrionines. Premiere legion: Pseudostigma. 

 Bull. Acad. Belg., (2,) 10: no. 6. 



i860. Derniere legion: Protoneura. 

 L. c, (2) 10:431-462. 



1862. Seconde legion: Lestes. 

 L. c, (2) 13: 288-338. 



1862. Troisieme legion: Podagrion. 

 L. c, (2) 13 :5-44. 



1863. Quatrieme legion: Platycnemis. 

 L. c, (2) 16: 147-176. 



1865. Cinquieme legion: Agrion. 

 Genre Argia, 1. c. (2) 20: 375-414. 



1875. Genre Agrion, 1. c, (2) 41 : 247-322, 496-539, 1233-1309. 



(2) 42:490-531,953-999. 



1877. Genres Telebasis, Argiocnemis, et Hemiphlebia. 

 L. c, (2) 43:97-159. 



1882. Odonates des Phillippines. 



Anal, de la Soc. Esp. de Hist. Nat., 11 : 1-5, 19-31. 



1883. Les Odonates du Japon. 



Ann. Soc. Entom. Belg. 27:82-87, 128-138. ■ 



1886. Revision du synopsis des Agrionines. 

 Mem. Cour. Acad. Belg., 28: 1-233. 



1889. Palaeophlehia. 

 Ann. Soc. Entom. Belg., 33. 



1 891. Causeries odonatologiques, no. 5. 

 Compt. Rendu. Soc. Entom. Belgique, 35: cccxcviii-cccciii. 

 Sjostedt, Y. 1909. Pseudoneuroptera. 1. Odonata. 



Sjostedt's Kilimandjaro-Meru Expedition, 14: 1-52, pis. 1-2. Stockholm. 

 Tillyard, R. J. 191 1. On the genus Diphlebia with descriptions of new species 

 and life-histories. 

 Proc. Linn. Soc. New So. Wales, 36: 584-604, pis. 19-20. 



1912. On seme new and rare Australian Agrionidae, (Odonata). 



L. c, 37: 404-479- 



1913. Some descriptions of new forms of Australian Odonata. 



L. c, 38: 229-241, pi. 15. 



1914. On some problems concerning the development of the wing vena- 

 tion of the Odonata. 



L. c, 39: 163-216, pis. 11-13. 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




72 



A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



Tillyard, R. J. 191 5- On the development of the wing venation in Zygopterous 

 dragonflies, with special reference to the Calopterygidae. 

 L. c, 40: 212-230, figs. 



1916. Further researches upon the problems of the radial and zygopterid 

 sectors in the wings of Odonata, and upon the formation of bridges. 

 L. c. 41:871-887, 6 figs. 

 Williamson, E. B. 1901. The dragonflies of Indiana. 

 Report Dept. Geol. Indiana, 24: 229-333. 



1904 (a). The dragonflies (Odonata) of Burma and Siam. I. Subfamily 

 Calopteryginae. 

 Proc. U. S. Nat. Mus., 28: 165-187, figs. 



1904 (b). A new species of Psolodesmus (order Odonata) from Formosa. 

 Entom. News, 15: 247-250, i pi. 



1913. The medio-anal link in the Agrioninae. 

 L. c, 24: 258-261. 



1915. Notes on neotropical dragonflies or Odonata. 

 Proc. U. S. Nat. Mus., 48: 601-638, pis. 36-40. 



1916. A new dragonfly genus of the legion Protoneura, (Odonata). 

 Entom. News, 27:30-33, figs. 



1917. Some species of Leptagrion with descriptions of a new genus and a new 

 species (Odonata). 



L. c, 28: 241-255. pis. and figs. 



Fig. 



Fig. 



Fig- 

 Fig. 



Fig 

 Fig 

 Fig 

 Fig 

 Fig 

 Fig 



Fig. 

 Fig. 

 Fig. 

 Fig. 



Explanation of Plates 

 Plate I 



I. — Wings of Epiophlebia super stes Selys. (Female, Cornell Collection.) 

 2. — Hind wing of Polythore gigantea Selys. (Male, Cornell Collection.) 

 3. — Hind wing of Euthore fasciata Selys. (Female, Cornell Collection.) 

 4. — Hind wing of Chalcopteryx rutilans Rambur. (Male, Cornell Collection.) 



Plate II 



5. — Hind wing of Cora marina Selys. (Male, Cornell Collection.) 

 — Hiiid wing of Climacohasis modesta Laidlaw. (Male, after Williamson.) 

 — Front wing of Echo margarita Selys. (Female, after Selys.) 

 — Hind wing of Archineura basilactea Kirby. (Male, after Kirby.) 

 9. — Hind wing of Umma longistigvia Selys. (Male, Cornell Collection.) 

 10. — Hind wing of Sapho ciliata Fabricius. (Female, i\cad. Nat. Sci. Phila- 

 delphia.) 



Plate III 

 II.- — Hind wing of Agrion virgo Linnaeus. (Female, Cornell Collection.) 

 12. — Hind wing of Matronoides cyaneipennis Foerster. (Male, after Foerster.) 

 13. — Hind wing of Matrona japonica Foerster. (Female, Cornell Collection.) 

 14. — Front wing of Neurobasis chinensis Linnaeus. (Female, Cornell Col- 

 lection.) 



Fig. 15. — Front wing of Mnais pruinosa Selys. (Male, Cornell Collection.) 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 



77 



Fig. 119. — Hind wing of Leptagrion macntrum Burmeister. (Male, after Xeed- 

 ham.) 



Fig. 120. — Hind wing of Aeolagrion fluvimeum Selys. (Collection of E. B. William- 

 son.) 



Fig. 121. — Hind wing of Skiallagma simulacrum Calvert. (Male, in Acad. Nat. 

 Sci. Philadelphia.) 



Fig. 122. — Front wing of Telebasis salva Hagen. (From photograph by J. G. 

 Xeedham.) 



Fig. 123. — Hind wing of Aciagrion pallidum Selys. (Cornell Collection.) 



Fig. 124. — Hind wing of Arckibasis mimetes Tillyard. (Male, after Calvert.) 



Plate XVIII 



Fig. 125. — Hind wing of Anisagrion truncatipenne Calvert. (Male, Cornell Col- 

 lection.) 

 Fig. 126. — Front wing of Metaleptohasis manicaria Williamson. (Male, Cornell 



Collection.) 

 Fig. 127. — Front wing of Leptobasis vacillans Selys. (Male, after Williamson.) 

 Fig. 128. — Hind wing of Teinobasis metallica Foerster. (After Ris.) 

 Fig. 129. — Front wing of Amphicnemis ■waUacei Selys. (Female, after Ris.) 

 Fig. 130. — Front wing of Chlorocnemis elongata Selys. . (Male, in Acad. Nat. Sci. 



Philadelphia.) 

 Fig. 131. — Front wing of Proneura prolongata Selys. (Male, after Selys.) 

 Fig. 132. — Front wing of Disparoneura sp.? (After J. G. Needham.) 

 Fig. 133. — Hind wing of Neoneura amelia Calvert. (Male, in collection of E. B. 

 Williamson.) 



Plate XIX 



Fig. 134. — Hind wing of Peristicta forceps Selys. (Female, in Museum of Compar- 

 ative Zoolog>'. From photograph by E. Avery Richmond.) 

 Fig. 135. — Hind wing of Idioneura anciUa Selys. (Cornell Collection.) 

 Fig. 136. — Front wing of Palaemnema paulina Drury. (Male, Cornell Collection.) 

 Fig. 137. — Front wing of Platysticta macidata Selys. (Female, Cornell Collection.) 

 Fig. 138. — Hind wing of Hypostrophoneura sp.? (Male, Acad. Nat. Sci. Philadel- 

 phia.) 

 Fig. 139. — Hind wing of Neosticta canescens Tillyard. (Male, after Tillyard.) 

 Fig. 140. — Hind wing of Ausfroslicta fieldi Tillyard. (Male, after Tillyard.) 

 Fig. 141. — Hind wing of Notoneura soUtaria Tillyard. (Male, after Tillyard.) 

 Fig. 142. — Hind wing of Oristicta filicicola Tillyard. (Male, after Tillyard.) 

 Fig. 143. — Front wing of Disparoneura dorsalis Selys. (Male, in Acad. Nat. Sci. 

 Philadelphia.) 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC, 3. 




78 A VENATIOXAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



Plate XX 



Fig. 144. — Hind wing of Protosticta sp.? (Female, in British Museum. From 

 photograph by F. \V. Campion.) 



Fig. 145. — Hind wing of Microneura caligata Selys. (Male, Museum of Com- 

 parative Zoology. From photograph by E. A. Richmond.) 



Fig. 146. — Hind wing of Protoneiira capillaris Rambur. (Male, Cornell Collec- 

 tion.) 



Fig. 147. — Front wing of Epipleoneura incusa Williamson. (iVIale, after William- 

 son.) 



Fig. 148. — Front wing of Epipotoneura nehalennia Williamson. (Female, after 

 Williamson.) 



Fig. 149. — Hind wing of Psaironeura remdssa W^illiamson. (Male, after William- 

 son.) 



Fig. 150. — Front wing of Isosticta spinipes Selys. (Male, after Ris.) 



Fig. 151. — Hind wing of Nososticta solida Selys. (Female, Cornell Collection.) 



Fig. 152. — Hind wing of Risioneura eburnea Foerster. (Male, Cornell Collection.) 



Fig. 153. — W\ng oi Selysioneura cervicornuY otrster. (Male, after Foerster.) 




PHILIP A. MUNZ 



/ D 



Fig. 74- 



Fig. 



Fig. 83.- 



Fig. 

 Fig. 



91. 

 92. 



Plate XI 



Hind wing of Dimemgrion peraihitak Calvert. (Male, after Cal\-ert.) 

 -Hind wing of Ileteragrion flavovittatum Selys. (Cornell Collection.) 

 -Front wing of Chorismagrion risi Morton. (Male, after Morton.) 

 -Front wing of Perilestes fragilis} Selys. (Male?, after Calvert.) 

 -Front wing of Metaciienns valida Selys. (Male, Museum of Compara- 

 tive Zoology. From photograph by E. Avery Richmond.) 

 -Hind wing of CaJicnemis eximia Se!},s. (Female, Cornell Collection.) 

 -Hind wing of Copeni marginipes Rambur. (Male, in Acad. Xat. Sci. 



Philadelphia.) 

 -Front wing of Platycnemis pennipes Pallas. (From photograph by 

 J. G. Xeedham.) 



Plate XII 



-Hind wing of Idiocnemis mertoni Ris. (Female, after Ris.) 



-Front wing of Coeliccia membmnipes Rambur. (Female, after Ris.) 



-Front wing of AUocnemis leucosticta Selys. (Male, in collection of E. B. 



Williamson.) 

 -Hind wing of Tatocnemis malgassica Kirb>-. (Cornell Collection. From 



photograph by J. G. Needham.) 

 -Front wing of Prionocnemis haeviatopus Selys. (After Selys.) 

 -Hind wing of Leptocnemis hilineata Selys. (Male, Cornell Collection. 



Photograph by J. G. Needham.) 

 Hind wing of Antiagrion gayi Selys. • (Male, in National Museum.) 

 Hind wing of Hyponeura liigens Hagen. (Female, Cornell Collection.) 



Plate XIII 



Hind wing of Palaiargia flavovittata Selys. (Male, in collection of E. B. 



Williamson.) 

 -Front wing of Argia fumipennis Burmeister. (Cornell Collection.) 

 -Front wing of Diargia biceUulata Cah-ert. (After Cahert.) 

 -Hind wing of Argiallagma minuta Selys. (Male, in Acad. Xat. Sci. 



Philadelphia.) 

 -Front wing of Oreagrion lorentzi Ris. (After Ris.) 

 ■Front wing of Amphiagrion saitcium Burmeister. (Female. Cornell 



Collection. From photograph by J. G. Needham.) 

 -Front wing of PyrrJwsoma nymphula Sulzer. (Male, Cornell Collection.) 

 Hind wing of Erythromnia najas Hansem. (Male, Cornell Collection. 



From photograph b>- J. G. Needham.) 



Plate XI\' 



■Front wing of Xehalennia irene Hagen? (Photograph, by J. G. Need- 

 ham.) 



Hind wing of Cercion Hndenii Sehs. (Male, in Acad. Nat. Sci. Phila- 

 delphia.) 



MEM. AM. ENT. SOC. 



> J- 




76 A VENATIONAL STUDY OF THE ZYGOPTERA 



Hind wing of Megaiagrion oceaiiicuni McLachlan. (Male.) 



Hind wing of Coenagrion puella Linnaeus. (Female, Cornell Collection.) 



Hind wing of Hesperagrion heterodoxum Selys. (From photograph by 



J. G. Needham.) 

 Hind wing of Tigriagrion anrantinignim Calvert. (After Calvert.) 

 Front wing of Anomalagrion hastatiim Say. (Male, Cornell Collection. 

 From photograph by J. G. Xeedham.) 

 Fig. 98. — Front wing of Enallagma cyathigerum Charpentier. (Cornell Collec- 

 tion.) 



Plate XV 



Fig- 99- — Front wing of Zoniagrion exclamationis Selys. (Male, in collection of 



C. H. Kennedy.) 

 Hind wing of Ischniira verticaUs Say. (Male, after Needham.) 

 Hind wing of Celaeniira denticoUis Burmeister. (Male, in collection of 



C. H. Kennedy.) 

 Hind wing of Cemtura capreola Hagen. (Cornell Collection. From 



photograph by J. G. Needham.) 

 Hind wing of Austrocnemis spkndida Martin. (Male, in collection of 



Carnegie Museum. From drawing by C. H. Kennedy.) 

 Front wing of Agriocnemis pulvendans Selys. (After Needham.) 

 Front wing of Argiocnemis ruhescens Selys. (Female, in Carnegie 



Museum. From drawing by C. H. Kennedy.) 

 Front wing of Hemiphlehia mirahilis Selys. (Male, Cornell Collection.) 

 Part of hind wing of Caliagrion biUinghursti Martin. (Male, after 



Tillyard.) 

 08. — Hind wing of Chromagrion conditiini Selys. (After Needham.) 



Plate XVI 



Front wing of Oxyagrion rufulum Hagen. (Male, Cornell Collection.) 

 Front wing of Acanthagrion gracile Rambur. (From photograph by 



J. G. Needham.) 

 Front wing of Telagrion longiim Selys. (After Calvert.) 

 Front wing of Xanthocnemis zelandicum McLachlan. (Female, Cornell 



Collection.) 

 Part of hind wing of Austroagrion cyaiie Selys. (Male, after Tillyard.) 

 Front wing of Pseudagrion furcigernm Rambur. (Male, from photo- 

 graph by J. G. Needham.) 

 Front wing of Xanthagrion erythroneuriim Sel>'s. (From photograph by 



J. G. Needham.) 

 Front wing of Xipkiagrion cyanomelas Selys. (Male, after Ris.) 



Plate XVII 



Hind wing of Ceriagrion coromandelianuni Fabricius. (Male, after 



Needham.) 

 Hind wing of Papiiagrion occipitale Selys. (After Ris.) 



Fig 




Mem. Am. Ent. Soc, No. 3. 



Plate L 



MUNZ— ZYGOPTERA VENATION 





r 



Mem. Am. Ent. Soc, No. 3. 



Plate II. 



MUNZ— ZYGOPTERA VENATION 





Mem. Am. Ent. Soc, No. 3. 



Plate III. 



IMUNZ— ZYGOPTERA \'EXATIOX 





Mem. Am. Ent. Soc, No. 3. 



Plate IV. 



MUNZ— ZYGOPTERA VENATION 





Mem. Am. Ent. Soc, No. 3. 



Plate V. 



MUNZ— ZYGOPTERA VENATION 





Mem. Am. Ext. Soc, Xo. 3. 



Plate \'I, 



MUNZ— ZYGOPTERA X'EXATIOX 





Mem. Am. Ent. Soc, No. 3. 



Plate VIL 



MUNZ— ZYGOPTERA VENATION 





Mem. Am. Ent. Soc, No. 3. 



Plate VIII. 



MUNZ— ZYGOPTERA VENATION 





Mem. Am. Ent. Soc, No. 3. 



Plate IX. 



MUNZ— ZYGOPTERA X'ENATION 





Mem. Am. Ent. Soc, No. 3. 



Plate X. 



MUNZ— ZYGOPTERA X'ENATION 





Mem. Am. Ent. Soc, No. 3. 



Plate XI, 



MUNZ— ZYGOPTERA VENATION 





Mem. Am. Ext. Soc, No. 3. 



Plate XII. 



:^IUXZ— ZYGOPTERA \EXATIOX 





Mem. Am. Ent. Soc, No. 3. 



Plate XIII. 



MUNZ— ZYGOPTERA VENATION 





Mem. Am. Ent. Soc, No. 3. 



Plate XIV. 



MUNZ— ZYGOPTERA VENATION 





Mem. Am. Ent. Soc, No. 3. 



Plate XV. 



MUNZ— ZYGOPTERA VENATION 





Mem. Am. Ent. Soc, No. 3. 



Plate XVI. 



MUNZ— ZYGOPTERA VENATION 





Mem. Am. Ent. Soc, No. 3. 



Plate XVI L 



MUNZ— ZYGOPTERA VENATION 





Mem. Am. Ent. Soc, No. 3. 



Plate XVIII. 



MUNZ— ZYGOPTERA VENATION 





Mem. Am. Ent. Soc, No. 3. 



Plate XIX. 



MUNZ— ZYGOPTERA VENATION 





Mem. Am. Ent. Soc, No. 3. 



Plate XX. 



MUNZ— ZYGOPTERA VENATION 






-■' ■''";^i^S ' 



'/fgm^MSISfl'WWM^ 

















^-^^ 



% 





^" 



'\ 





,^^ 



„_ ^m ^ 









^^ 



mh 







O 





<^ 



.< 



vb 



A^ 





'n 



vV 



^KTr5iSS> 




vV ^, 



.^ 





^h 





% 4 



V 



.^^^ % 



\ 



\r 



J^-S 



tm 



;w, 







.N^ 



.V 



.^^ 



,\^ 



''^, 



% 



Oy 



/a 





% 





^^ 



^-^ 



-fA 













^ \^ 





-a^\ 







-_<iCV(, 



V 



^^ ^ 



.0" 



^^, 



Vr 



.^ 



O- 



V-i; , 



V 





O- 





4 _ ■^*l 



% ^^^ 



vV 



v-N 



.0 





A^ 



% 



■!.«c 





^>- 



'-'ft 



r 



^^ 



T 



A^° 



c^ -<^ 





.<S^ 



< 





.^^ ^i. 





£^, 



"-P, 



'l,ii 



'-V < 



i 







4^, 



O. 





.0 



.\ 



<>' 



> 







A 



O^ 



%. 



■Y. 





'V 







^^^ 



.<o 



kO' 



iSH, 



.^^ 



^A 



^> 



iV 



'^'>. 



.0^ ^o. 



A 



\^ 



.>^' 





"5^; 



V. 







^> 



v>^ 



.0^ 





.>^" 





.& 





>> 4-. 





^^^ 



^ 



V. 



''A 







4^ 



.< 



V 



\^ 



:% 



rs" "y 



.>^^ 



'b 



-1/ 





Vl, <r 



%. 




SMITHSONIAN INSTITUTION LIBRARIES 



3 9088 00741 3461 



JSJn'rir; 



4 



Hiitfttatj 






AALPH I SMITH- FDITQP 



Spe 



FOR REFERENCE 



Do Not Take From This Room 





o- 



Ql 

 573 



.3 



KEYS TO MARINE INVERTEBRATES 



of the 

 WOODS HOLE REGION 



A manual for the identification of the more 



common marine invertebrates, compiled 



by Ralph I. Smith with the assistance 



of many other contributors 



X. 



5: 



CD- 

 S' 



m 



lor 

 ; ru 



j o 

 " o 



i a 



z nn 

 § a 



LL 



Contribution No. 11 



Systematics-Ecology Program, Marine Biological Laboratory 



Woods Hole, Massachusetts 



1964 



J 

 CO 




Copyright 1964 by the Marine Biological Laboratory 

 Tenth Edition 



Referrals To 

 Marine Biological Laboratory 



Supply Dept. 

 Woods Hole, Massachusetts 02543 



Printed by Spaulding Co., Inc., 29 Pacella Park Drive, Randolph, Mass. 02368 




Ill 



TABLE OF CONTENTS 



Page 

 List of Plates v 



Foreword vi 



Editor's Preface vii 



Chapter 



I . Phylum PORIFERA 1 



Glossary 1 



Key 2 



Checklist 6 



II. Phylum CNIDARIA, Class Hydrozoa 8 



Glossary 8 



Key 10 



Checklist 17 



III. Phylum CNIDARIA, Class Scyphozoa 21 



Key to attached Scyphozoa 21 



Key to Scyphomedusae 21 



IV. Phylum CNIDARIA, Class Anthozoa 25 



Key 26 



Checklist 26 



V. Phylum CTENOPHORA, key and checklist 29 



VI . Phylum PLATYHELMINTHES 30 



Key to common Turbellarians 30 



Checklist of Acoela, Rhabdocoela, and Alloeocoela 32 



Checklist of Tricladida 36 



Key to Polycladida 36 



Checklist of Polycladida 37 



VII. Phylum NEMERTEA (RHYNCHOCOELA) 40 



Key 40 



Checklist 43 



VIII. Other Unsegmented Worms: Phylum ASCHELMINTHES 46 



Phylum SIPUNCULOIDEA 46 



IX. Phylum ANNELIDA 47 



Classes Hirudinea, Oligochaeta, and Archiannelida 47 



Polychaete Terminology 48 



Key to Polychaete Families 51 



Keys and checklists of Polychaete Species 63 



X. Phylum ARTHROPODA, Subphylum Chelicerata 84 



Xiphosurida 84 



Key to Pycnogonida 84 



Checklist of Pycnogonida 85 



XI. Phylum ARTHROPODA, Lower Crustacea and Cirripedia 88 



Cephalocarida, Branchiopoda, Ostracoda, Mystacocarida, 



Copepoda , Branchiura 88 



Key to Cirripedia 89 



Checklist of Cirripedia 91 



Rhizocephala 92 




iv Table of Contents 



XII. Phylum ARTHROPODA, Peracaridan Crustaceans 93 



Key to Orders of Peracaridans 93 



Part 1. Mysidacea 93 



Key 94 



Checklist 94 



Part 2. Cumacea 98 



Key 98 



Checklist 99 



Part 3. Isopoda and Tanaidacea 102 



Key 102 



Checklist 105 



Part 4. Amphipoda 107 



Keys to Suborders 112 



Key to Families of Gammaridea 112 



Checklist of Gammaridea 114 



XIII. Phylum ARTHROPODA, Decapod and Stomatopod Crustaceans 117 



Key to Decapods 117 



Checklist of Decapods 121 



Order Hoplocarida (Stomatopoda) 127 



XIV. Phylum MOLLUSCA, Introduction 129 



Outline classification 130 



Glossary 131 



Classes Amphineura and Cephalopoda 133 



Key to Shelled Gastropoda 134 



Checklist of Shelled Gastropoda 139 



Key to Bivalvia 146 



Checklist of Bivalvia 150 



XV. Phylum MOLLUSCA, Shell-less Opisthobranchia 153 



Key 154 



Checklist 162 



XVI. Phylum ENTOPROCTA 165 



XVII. Phylum ECTOPROCTA 167 



Glossary 167 



Key 170 



XVIII. Phylum ECHINODERMATA 188 



Asteroidea, key 188 



Ophiuroidea, key 188 



Echinoidea, key 188 



Holothuroidea, key 189 



Asteroidea, checklist 189 



Ophiuroidea, checklist 189 



Echinoidea, checklist 192 



Holothuroidea, checklist 192 



XIX. Protochordates 193 



Phylum HEMICHORDATA 193 



Phylum CHORDATA, Subphylum Urochordata 193 



Key to Ascideans 194 



Checklist of Ascideans 198 



Glossary of Common Names 200 



Systematic Index (Genera and Higher Taxa) 202 




V 



LIST OF PLATES 



Plate Pa g e 



1. Porifera 5 



2. Hydrozoa 13 



3. Scyphozoa and Anthozoa 23 



4. Turbellaria (except Polycladida) 35 



5. Polycladida, Nemertea, Sipunculoidea, Nectonema 45 



6. Polychaete Setae 51 



7. Polychaeta (1) and Archiannelida 53 



8. Polychaeta (2) 55 



9. Polychaeta (3) 57 



10. Polychaeta (4) 59 



11. Pycnogonida; Cirripedia 87 



12. Mysidacea 97 



13. Cumacea 101 



14. Isopoda (1) and Tanaidacea 109 



15. Isopoda (2) ; Hyperiidea and Caprellidea Ill 



16. Decapod Crustacea (1) 123 



17. Decapod Crustacea (2) and Hoplocarida 125 



18. Mollusca (1) 143 



19. Mollusca (2) 145 



20. Shell-less Opisthobranchia (1) 157 



21. Shell-less Opisthobranchia (2) 159 



22. Shell-less Opisthobranchia (3) 161 



23. Ectoprocta (1) and Entoprocta 181 



24. Ectoprocta (2) 183 



25. Ectoprocta (3) 185 



26. Ectoprocta (4) 187 



27. Echinodermata 191 



28. Protochordates 197 




FOREWORD 



Cape Cod juts eastward over the continental shelf as the flexed arm of Massa- 

 chusetts, partly sheltered on its southern side by Monomoy, Nantucket, Martha's 

 Vineyard, and the Elizabeth Islands. The Cape, islands, eastern shores of the state 

 bordering the Cape, Cape Cod Bay, Nantucket Sound, Vineyard Sound, and Buzzards Bay 

 constitute the Cape Cod Region. Glacial in origin, the Region is dotted by myriad 

 small embayments and estuaries, and the clean tidal waters of the North Atlantic 



wash its shores a diverse ecologic setting accounting for the richness of the 



local marine biota, and for establishment of the Marine Biological Laboratory here 

 in 1888. 



On September 1, 1962, the Marine Biological Laboratory inaugurated the Syste- 

 matics -Ecology Program and embarked on a basic, year-round, long-term program of 

 research and training in marine systematics and ecology. The Program has as one 

 of its major objectives the gradual extension, in a broad sense and at a high lev- 

 el of excellence, of systematic and ecologic knowledge of organisms in the estuar- 

 ine and marine waters and bottoms of the Cape Cod Region. 



Early in the life of the Program we realized the lack of and recognized the 

 urgent necessity for illustrated, referenced, indexed sets of keys and check lists 

 of the commoner plants and animals of the Region for use by non-systematists in the 

 Woods Hole scientific community and neighboring areas. A start on this task was 

 provided in 1960 when Dr. Ralph I. Smith and others of the MBL Invertebrate Zoology 

 Course staff assembled a small loose-leaf collection of keys then existing in the 

 laboratory instructions of that course. These early keys had evolved over a period 

 of years, and the authorship of some could not be determined. 



It was a happy occasion for us when Ralph Smith agreed to compile and edit 

 this present publication. He arrived in Woods Hole early in the summer of 1963, 

 worked indefatigably with us during that summer, then returned to Berkeley where 

 he continued his labors, somehow sandwiched among his many duties at the Univer- 

 sity. Now, some ten months later, the manuscript is ready for publication. We 

 extend to Ralph our hearty thanks! A most sincere word of appreciation is also 

 due collaborators without whose excellent cooperation and zeal the manuscript 

 would never have been completed, and Mrs. San Lineaweaver for her patient and care- 

 ful typing and correcting of the master copy. The preparation of this publica- 

 tion •••as made possible by support of the Ford Foundation to the Systematics Di- 

 vision of the Systematics-Ecology Program; it is a pleasure to acknowledge this 

 aid. 



The first edition of the Invertebrate Keys is a beginning. We welcome sug- 

 gestions, and look forward to producing revised editions as the invertebrates of 

 the Region become better known. We are also planning to produce similar keys to 

 other organisms of the Woods Hole Region as this becomes possible. 



Melbourne R. Carriker, Director 

 Victor A. Zullo, Resident Systematist 



Systematics-Ecology Program 

 Marine Biological Laboratory 

 May, 1964 Woods Hole, Massachusetts 




EDITOR'S PREFACE vii 



This handbook of keys is an attempt to fill an obvious need at Woods Hole, the 

 need for a general reference on marine invertebrates for the use of students and in- 

 vestigators who want to know what is here and how to identify it. 



Relatively few present day biologists realize the difficulties involved in iden- 

 tifying with certainty the myriad species of marine invertebrates. Some species are 

 readily recognized by distinctive form or color, but in most cases the beginner will 

 experience difficulty in making a positive identification, and in many instances the 

 assistance of a specialist may be necessary. Keys are useful mainly in the identi- 

 fication of common and obvious animals, or in making preliminary identification of 

 less common animals (perhaps to family or genus) , or by indicating to the observant 

 non-systematist that he has something out of the ordinary which should be referred 

 to a specialist. The problem is akin to that of medical diagnosis; the alert zo- 

 ologist, like the general practitioner, need feel no shame if he makes some identi- 

 fications with confidence, but seeks consultation on others. 



The purpose of zoological classification is to arrange animals into groups on 

 the basis of fundamental similarities. The completion of this task will presumably 

 reveal evolutionary relationships, but the immediate objective of a set of keys is 

 more utilitarian, that of identifying and providing the names of the local inverte- 

 brate fauna as simply, accurately, and painlessly as possible. It cannot be too 

 strongly emphasized that keys are shortcuts and often very misleading; their func- 

 tion is merely to clear the way to an approximation, and identifications made by 

 keys, if to be of scientific reliability, should be checked by reference to the 

 original description or to recent monographs. A key is made to cover a selected 

 list of species, and any species not one of that group will not "key out" or, worse 

 yet, may key out as something which it is not, hence the need for a cross check in 

 all cases of doubt. 



The terminology of systematists may be difficult for the non-systematist to 

 grasp, owing to the independent evolution of descriptive jargon within the groups 

 of specialists on different animal phyla. Therefore each key will when necessary 

 be accompanied by a glossary and illustrations of the descriptive terms and by a 

 brief statement of the characteristics used in the taxonomy of that particular group 

 and how the student may locate and recognize them. The spicules of sponges, the se- 

 tae of polychaetes, the ossicles of sea cucumbers, are of basic importance to sys- 

 tematists in establishing the degrees of similarity which underlie classification; 

 the problem of the biological role of these structures as functional parts of the 

 animals concerned lies outside the immediate field of classification. 



An aspect of identification of animals that commonly proves annoying and frus- 

 trating to experimental biologists is the "name-changing" that seems so often to 

 occur in systematics, resulting in the production of synonyms for some of the com- 

 monly used experimental animals. In the annotated check lists we have attempted 

 to explain the more conspicuous synonymies. Experimentalists should realize that, 

 in an active field, terminology must change (it is no longer sufficient to speak 

 merely of "Vitamin B", and such terms as muriatic acid, yellow enzyme and even DPN, 

 while understandable in context are considered outdated today). In the same sense 

 it is not good current usage to apply such well-known older names as Nereis lim - 

 bata and Nassa obsoleta , although these particular names are perfectly understand- 

 able when encountered in the older literature. It is hoped that this manual will 

 provide useful information on the synonymies of local experimentally used animals 

 and contribute to a better understanding of the efforts of systematists to provide 

 a more rational and stable nomenclature. The short discussion of nomenclatorial 

 rules in Hyman ' s "The Invertebrates", Vol. I, 1940, pages 22-26 will be found use- 

 ful to those who wish to review this topic briefly, and the more extended discus- 

 sion in Mayr , Linsley and Usinger's "Methods and Principles of Systematic Zoology", 

 Mr-Graw-Hill (1953) provides a more complete account. In case there are any labora- 

 tory biologists who feel that animal classification is outside their proper sphere 




viii Editor's Preface 



of interests, we recommend "A Classification of Living Animals", Wiley (1961), by 

 no less an experimentalist than Lord Rothschild. And for those who decide to plunge 

 into serious systematic work, two more references must be mentioned: "International 

 Code of Zoological Nomenclature", published by the International Trust for Zoologi- 

 cal Nomenclature, London (1961); and Schenk and McMasters, "Procedure in Taxonomy", 

 third edition, Stanford University Press (1956). 



This manual does not pretend to be an exhaustive faunal survey of the Woods Hole 

 Region which, for our purposes, is that area in which one may reasonably collect, us- 

 ing Woods Hole as a base. Hence it includes not only the animals of Buzzards Bay 

 and Vineyard Sound, but also species commonly taken on the northern shore of Cape 

 Cod, as at Barnstable. Only by limiting its scope and content can the manual be 

 kept simple and inexpensive enough to be useful and available to the students and 

 beginning investigators who need it most. There are in existence two old but com- 

 prehensive faunal surveys which contain much valuable information for the field 

 worker : 



Verrill, A. E. and S. I. Smith, 1873. Report upon the invertebrate animals 

 of Vineyard Sound and the adjacent waters. Rept. U. S. Fish Comm. 1871- 

 1872: 295-778 (also published as a separate volume in 1874). 



Sumner, F. B., R. C. Osburn, and L. J. Cole, 1913. A biological survey of 

 the waters of Woods Hole and vicinity. Section III. A catalogue of the 

 marine fauna. Bull. Bur. Fisheries, 3_1: 545-794. 



A work much used at Woods Hole in recent years is Miner's "Field Book of Seashore 

 Life", Putnam (1950). This is illustrated and has much textual material, but since 

 it covers the wide area from Laborador to Cape Hatteras and is not provided with 

 diagnostic keys, it is inadequate for critical identification of many local species 

 and its terminology is not up to date. 



The present keys will be found to vary in ease of use and in completeness of 

 coverage, and will naturally become less reliable with increasing distance from 

 Woods Hole. Some groups, e.g. amphipods , are still too incompletely known to per- 

 mit the construction of specific keys that would be generally useful. 



For certain important groups which are intrinsically difficult because of the 

 number of species and small size of individuals, such as Protozoa, nematodes, os- 

 tracods, no keys have been attempted. Those wishing to embark upon studies of such 

 groups will need special instruction and more detailed literature than we can pro- 

 vide. Plankton, especially its component of immature stages, will not be treated 

 in these keys, although representatives of certain groups may be identifiable. In 

 other instances, the keys will serve not to provide answers, but to clarify the 

 problem. We regard this edition of the keys as tentative: they will be found inac- 

 curate or incomplete in many respects. We should appreciate receiving criticisms 

 or suggested revisions at any level. 



In Woods Hole at the present time the preponderance of experimentalists places 

 a burden of identification upon those who are undertaking systematic problems and 

 who are expected to make reliable identifications. With the aid of proper keys, 

 this load can be more fairly distributed, routine identifications accomplished, non- 

 identifiable animals more readily detected and referred to specialists, and the ex- 

 change of vital information between laboratory and field workers facilitated. 



This manual has been made possible only by the generous assistance and coopera- 

 tion of numerous individuals, actually too numerous to list fully. However, cer- 

 tain ones have given very liberally of help and advice, and are listed here, to- 

 gether with an indication of the areas in which they contributed. It should be 

 noted that there is no clear distinction between those listed as "authors" of chap- 

 ters and those who contributed heavily to chapters in which a good deal of editorial 




Editor's Preface ix 



compilation has taken place. It seems appropriate to acknowledge gratefully this 

 help, and to express the wish that users of this manual will feel free to pass on to 

 editors, and advisors alike, the criticisms and comments that will be inevitable. 



Porifera: Willard D. Hartman , Peabody Museum of Natural History, 

 Yale University, New Haven, Connecticut. 



Coelenterata (Hydrozoa) : Sears Crowe 11 , Department of Zoology, 

 University of Indiana, Bloomington, Indiana. 



Coelenterata (Hydrozoa, Stauromedusae) : G. F. Gwilliam , Department of Biology, 

 Reed College, Portland, Oregon. 



Coelenterata (Hydrozoa, Stauromedusae): Kay Werner Petersen , Systematics-Ecology 

 Program, Marine Biological Laboratory, Woods Hole, Massachusetts. 



Coelenterata (Anthozoa) : Cadet Hand , Department of Zoology, 

 University of California, Berkeley, California. 



Platyhelminthes : Louise Bush, Department of Zoology, 

 Drew University, Madison, New Jersey. 



Annelida (Polychaeta) : Marian H. Pettibone , Division of Marine Invertebrates, 

 U. S. National Museum, Washington, D. C. 



Pycnogonida: Joel W. Hedgpeth , Pacific Marine Station, 



University of the Pacific, Dillon Beach, Marin County, California. 



Crustacea (Cirripedia) : Victor A. Zullo , Systematics-Ecology Program 

 Marine Biological Laboratory, Woods Hole, Massachusetts. 



Crustacea (Mysidacea, Cumacea, Isopoda) : Roland L. Wig ley , Biological Laboratory, 

 U. S. Bureau of Commercial Fisheries, Woods Hole, Massachusetts. 



Crustacea (Isopoda): Thomas E. Bowman , Division of Marine Invertebrates, 

 U. S. National Museum, Washington, D. c 



Crustacea (Amphipoda) : Eric L. Mills , Department of Biology, 

 Queen's University, Kingston, Ontario, Canada. 



E. L. Bousf ield , Natural History Branch, 

 National Museum of Canada, Ottawa, Canada. 



Crustacea (Cephalocarida) : Howard L. Sanders , Biology Department, 



Woods Hole Oceanographic Institution, Woods Hole, Massachusetts. 



Mollusca (General) : W. Russell Hunter , Department of Zoology, 

 Syracuse University, Syracuse, New York. 



Stephen C. Brown 



709 Arch Street, Ann Arbor, Michigan. 



Mollusca (Shell-less Ophisthobranchia) : George M. Moore , Department of Zoology, 

 University of New Hampshire, Durham, New Hampshire. 



Entoprocta and Ectoprocta: Mary D. Rogick , Department of Biology, 

 College of New Rochelle, New Rochelle, New York. 




Editor's Preface 



Echinodermata: John M. Anderson , Department of Zoology, 

 Cornell University, Ithaca, New York. 



Urochordata and Mystacocarida: Donald J. Zinn , Department of Zoology, 

 University of Rhode Island, Kingston, Rhode Island. 



Urochordata: Donald P. Abbott, Hopkins Marine Station, 



Stanford University, Pacific Grove, California. 



Compiling and editing: Ra lph I . Smith , Department of Zoology, 

 University of California, Berkeley, California. 



Production of the manual: Melbourne R. Carriker , Systematics-Ecology Program, 

 Marine Biological Laboratory, Woods Hole, Massachusetts. 



Artists: Mrs . Ruth L. von Arx , Mrs . Emily Read , Bruce Shearer , Ann H. Miller 

 (cover design), and several of the above contributors. 



My thanks are due the staff and students of the MBL Invertebrate Zoology Class 

 of 1963, who cooperated extensively in collecting material and critically testing 

 keys. The Supply Department has also been most helpful, and I owe much to Mr. John 

 Valois for his help in the summer of 1963, and especially I am indebted to Mr. Mil- 

 ton Gray, as whose helper in 1939 I learned much that has proved useful in all my 

 work in marine zoology. Above all, the unstinting support given to the prepara- 

 tion of these keys by the Systematics-Ecology Program of the MBL has been the de- 

 cisive factor in their publication at this time. I wish to record my appreciation 

 for all that Dr. Melbourne R. Carriker and his entire group have done to facili- 

 tate this task, and especially am I grateful to Mrs. San Lineaweaver and Mrs. Vir- 

 ginia Smith for their extraordinary efficiency and cheerfulness in the typing in- 

 volved. 



Ralph I. Smith, Editor 

 May, 1964 




Chapter I ] 



PHYLUM PORIFERA 



By Willard D. Hartman 



There are about ten common sponges in the Woods Hole region. Some are identifi- 

 able on sight by form and color; others must be carefully examined before an identi- 

 fication is ventured. Miner's "Field Book" contains inaccuracies and is almost use- 

 less for identification of sponges. De Laubenfels (1949) has a selection on methods 

 of handling and observing sponges. Hartman (1958) has given a systematic account of 

 southern New England sponges together with notes on their natural history. 



Some knowledge of the terminology of sponge spicules is neccessary if the taxo- 

 nomic literature on the group is to be read. In the following glossary, terms com- 

 monly used are defined to aid those who may go further in this field, as well as to 

 make clear certain expressions used in the key. Most of these terms are illustrated 

 in Plate 1. 



GLOSSARY OF SPONGE TERMINOLOGY 



Acantho -: prefix meaning spined. 



Aniso -: prefix meaning unequal. 



Anisochela : a chela with unequal ends. 



Chela : a microsclere type resembling a pair of anchor flukes or a shovel with a blade 



at each end, the ends bent toward each other. 

 Isochela : a chela with equal ends. 

 Megascleres : the larger spicule types, comprising the major structural elements of a 



sponge skeleton. 

 Microscleres : relatively very small spicules of various form, cVij.-acteristic of cer- 

 tain sponges. 

 Monaxon ; an unbranched spicule. 



Oxea : a monaxon spicule (megasclere) pointed at both ends, often slightly curved. 

 Sigma : a microsclere of C- or S- shape. 

 Spiraster : angulate rod-shaped microscleres provided with spines which may be aligned 



in a spiral course arour.d the rod. 

 Sponqin : proteinaceous horny skeletal material, either alone (as in bath sponges), or 



binding siliceous spicu es together (as in Haliclona or Microciona ) . 

 Style : a monaxon spicule wi :h one end pointed, other end blunt. 

 Subtylostyle ; a monaxon spicule with one end pointed and the other with an indistinct 



swelling or knob (halfw y between tylostyle and style) . 

 Toxon : a bow-shaped microscvere (pi. toxa) . 

 Triaene a spicule with 4 rays, one of which is much longer than the other 3 (known as 



clads) . Anatriaenes have the clads directed backward; protriaenes have the clads 



directed forward. 

 Tylo : a prefix meaning a rounded or ball-shaped structure. 



Tylote : a monaxon spicule with rounded knobs on both ends (e.g., in Lissodendoryx ) 

 Tylostyle : a style with the blunt end in form of a little swelling or knob (e.g. in 



Cliona ) . 



A Note on Microtechnique 



Detailed studies of sponge anatomy may require the preparation of microscopic sec- 

 tions. For gross preservation 95% alcohol or neutralized formalin followed by 75% al- 

 cohol can be used. Neutral formalin is best prepared by adding hexamethylenetetramine 

 (= hexamine) to commercial formalin (37 to 40% formaldehyde) in the proportion of one 

 pound of hexamine to one gallon of formalin. This stock solution is then diluted with 

 water (9 parts water; 1 part neutral formalin) to give 10% formalin or 4% formaldehyde. 

 Formalin that has not been neutralized, or that has been neutralized with borax, should 

 be avoided for preserving sponges since both may cause maceration. When formalin neutra- 

 lized with hexamine is used, the sponges should be transferred to 75% alcohol after a 

 few days. Fixation of small pieces of each species in standard histological fixatives 




2 Porifera 



is desirable, as often histological work must follow. Thin, free-hand sections are 

 readily made with a razor blade if the specimen has been hardened in alcohol. Sections 

 perpendicular to the surface of the colony as well as tangential sections are useful. 

 Such sections can be directly dehydrated, cleared in xylol, and mounted in piccolyte 

 or damar or they can be stained with a saturated solution of basic fuchsin of safra- 

 nin in 95% alcohol before clearing and mounting. In studying sections, the various 

 types of spicules can be observed as well as their arrangement in the skeleton. Other 

 structures to look for are a cortex, often packed with spicules of one category, sub- 

 dermal spaces, tracts of spicules, and spongin fibers with or without enclosed spi- 

 cules. In some cases the shapes and dimensions of the flagellated chambers are im- 

 portant. 



In sections, certain spicule categories may be overlooked, and it is usually de- 

 sirable to make slides which have been freed from the cellular elements of the colony. 

 This can be done by treating a small part of the specimen with sodium hypochlorite 

 (clorox will serve) until the spicules are free. For temporary mounts a piece of 

 the sponge can be placed on a microscope slide with a drop or two of clorox. After 

 disintegration of the cells a cover slip is added and the spicules are ready for ex- 

 amination. If permanent mounts are desired, a piece of sponge can be placed in a 

 centrifuge tube along with a snail amount of clorox. After disintegration of the 

 cells, the sample is then washed several times with water, centrifuging between wash- 

 ings to make certain that the minute microscleres have settled. Finally the water 

 can be replaced by 95% alcohol, and the suspension of the spicules poured onto a 

 slide and allowed to dry on a warming plate (or the alcohol can be ignited). A drop 

 of xylene is added to the dry preparation, followed by piccolyte or damar and a co- 

 ver slip. A slide of clean spicules is now available for study and measurement of 

 spicule types. 



KEY TO COMMON SPONGES 



(Figure references are to Plate 1) 



1. Structure of sponge simple; tubular to urn-shaped; pale tan 



to whitish; spicules calcareous (test with 10% acetic acid under coverslip) .... 2 



1. Structure massive, fleshy, or spongy; encrusting or branching; 



color various; spicules siliceous 3 



2. Sponges in form of branching, cylindrical, pale tubes (fig. 1) 



Leucosolenia sp. 



2. Sponges in form of little urns or vases, usually clustered, 

 with fringe of spicules around the terminal osculum (fig. 2) 



Scvpha sp. 



3. Sponges obviously boring into and sometimes overgrowing shells 

 and other calcareous material; color brilliant sulfur -yellow 



to pale yellow Cliona 4 



3. Sponges not boring; form and color various 7 



4. Sponge brilliant sulfur-yellow, boring into calcareous sub- 

 strate or massive and free-living; external perforations in 

 substrate large (incurrent, 0.8-2.5 mm across; excurrent, 



2.0-4.5 mm across); tylostyles only (fig. 31 Cliona celata 



4. Sponge light or pale yellow, always boring into calcareous 

 substrate; external perforations small (incurrent, 0.2-0.5 

 mm across; excurrent, 0.6-1.6 mm across); microscleres pre- 

 sent in addition to tylostyles 5 



5. Spirasters only as microscleres (fig. 4) Cliona lobata 



5. Spined or smooth oxeas present as well as spirasters 6 




Porif era 



6. Spirasters usually angulate and larger (6-23n x 1.0-3.8u) 



(fig. 5) ; external perforations in substrate often arranged 



in circular patterns Cliona vastifica 



6. Spirasters less distinctly angulate and smaller (6-15(i x 



0.5-3. 2a.) ; tends to occur in brackish water Cliona truitti 



7. Megascleres oxeas only 8 



7. Megascleres other than oxeas 12 



8. Megascleres smaller «200u. in length) and conspicuously 

 joined together by more or less spongin to form a network 

 or a system of tracts (fig. 6); dermal skeleton absent 



Haliclona 9 



8. Megascleres larger (mean length > 200|i) , arranged in loose 



tracts with little spongin or occurring at random; distinct 



dermal skeleton present (figs. 9, 10) Halichondria 11 



Form branching into rounded or flattened fingers arising 

 from a narrow stalk; oscules distributed along sides of 

 branches; color yellowish to tan, often tinged with violet 



Form encrusting, often with low tubules arising from a 

 basal encrusting mass 



Haliclona oculata 



10 



10. 



10. 



Sponge a flat encrustation; oscules not raised on tubules; 

 excurrent channels converge on oscules to provide conspic- 

 uous stellate patterns beneath surface; gemmules absent; 



color light buff or tan to brown or gold Haliclona canaliculata 



Sponge an encrustation from which arise numerous low tubules 

 often bearing terminal oscules, consistency very soft; white 

 gemmules form at base of sponge in late summer; color dark 

 tan to gold, often tinged with pink or lavender (figs. 6-8) 

 Haliclona loosanof f i 



11. 



11. 



12. 



12. 



13. 

 13. 



Sponge encrusting and provided with numerous, low, upright 

 tubules each terminating in an oscule; dermal skeleton 

 tends to be a regular network of multispicular tracts (fig. 



9) ; color orange-yellow to greenish Halichondria panicea 



Sponge encrusting to massive, usually provided with upright 

 tubules which may bear terminal oscules; some colonies con- 

 sist of masses of anastomosing branches; dermal skeleton 

 tends to consist of a less regular network of multispicular 

 tracts with larger meshes (fig. 10); color orange-brown to 

 yellow-beige to olive-green 

 Halichondria bowerbanki 



Color bright red to orange-brown; sponge encrusting to com- 

 plexly branched; spicules include styles to subtylostyles 

 with spined or smooth heads, short acanthostyles, toxa, and 



isochelas (fig. 11) Microciona prolifera 



Color never bright red; spiculation otherwise 13 



Megascleres are tylostyles 14 



Megascleres are otherwise 16 



14. 



14. 



Microscleres absent; sponge a thin encrustation on rocks 

 and algae; basal layer of tylostyles arranged with heads 

 against substrate; color orange-brown, hazel, or olive- 

 brown Prosuberites epiphytum 



Microscleres present 15 




Plate 1 



PORIFERA 



Figs. 1,2,3,8 by Bruce Shearer; rest redrawn by 

 Mrs. Emily Reid after Hartman (H) ; fig. 13 after 

 Wilson. Scales as indicated on plate. 



Fig. 1. Leucosolenia sp., fragment of a colony. 



2. Scypha sp., three individuals. 



3. Cliona celata , colony overgrowing a Mercenaria shell. 



4. Cliona lobata : A. Tylostyles, B. Spirasters with spines (H) . 



5. Cliona vastifica : A. Tylostyles, B. Smooth and microspined 

 oxeas, C. Spirasters and a microspined style. 



6. Haliclona loosanoffi , spicule tracts joined by spongin (H) . 



7. Haliclona loosanoffi , spicules: oxeas, styles, strongyles (h) 



8. Haliclona loosanoffi , specimen growing on shell of living 

 Mytilus . 



9. Halichondria panicea , dermis, with spicules and pores (H) . 



10. Halichondria bowerbanki , dermis, with spicules and pores 

 (H). 



11. Microciona prolifera : A. Megascleres, B. Toxa, C. Isochelas 

 (H). 



12. Suberites ficus ; A. Styles and tylostyles, B. Microscler- 

 es (H) . 



13. Mycale fibrexilis ; A. Megascleres tylostyles, B. Micro- 

 scleres: sigmas, and anisochelas (after Wilson). 



14. Lissodendoryx isodictyalis : A. Megascleres: styles and ty- 

 lates, B. Microscleres: sigmas, C. Microscleres : isoche- 

 las (H) . 



15. Isodictya deichmannae : A. Megascleres: styles, strongyle, 

 centrotylote oxea, B. Microscleres: Isochelas (H) . 




Plate 



ca Imm 



ca 10 mm 



flft ft 



o 



n 



20/; 








6 Porifera 



15. Sponge massive, lamellate or lobate; microscleres small, 



rod shaped, with central swelling, spined or smooth, abun- 

 dant near surface (fig. 12); color yellow to yellowish- 

 gray Suberites f icus 



15. Sponge encrusting to massive; microscleres include sig- 

 mas, toxa, and anisochelas (fig. 13); color yellow-ochre, 

 hazel-brown, olive-brown ranging to gray-tan, olive-gray 



to slate -gray Mycale fibrexilis 



16. Megascleres are long oxeas and triaenes ; microscleres are 

 microspined sigmaspires; sponge biscuit shaped with termi- 

 nal osculum and flattened base made up of matted oxeas and 



anatriaenes Craniella gravida 



16. Styloid megascleres present 17 



17. Sponge encrusting to massive; color buff to olive-tan to 

 gray-brown, slate gray, or bluish-gray; dermal tylotes 

 present; microscleres are sigmas and isochelas (fig. 14) 



Lissodendorvx isodictyalis 



17. Sponge with upright flattened branches; oscules distri- 

 buted along sides of branches; skeleton a reticulation 

 of tracts of styles; microscleres are isochelas only 

 (fig. 15) Isodictya deichmannae 



ANNOTATED LIST OF SPONGES OF THE WOODS HOLE REGION 

 Class Calcarea 



Leucosolenia sp. An "asconoid" calcareous sponge, especially valuable in the labor- 

 atory. The specific identity of the common Leucosolenia at Woods Hole is at 

 present uncertain. 



Scypha sp. A "syconoid" calcareous sponge. Although often called (and sold as) 



" Grantia " , it does not have the distinct dermal cortex and incurrent canals of 

 Grantia . The Woods Hole species is not referable to the species lingua described 

 by Haeckel (1872) from Newfoundland and needs a new name. Scypha is a prior 

 name for Sycon , which is still used by many zoologists. 



Class Demospongiae 

 Order Haplosclerida 



Haliclona canaliculata Hartman, 1958. Not yet recorded from the Woods Hole region 



but to be expected as an encrustation on the lower surface of rocks. 

 Haliclona loosanof f i Hartman, 1958. Collected in run-out channel under bridge at 



Barnstable Harbor; records from Nonamesset Island and New Bedford area in the 



Gray Museum. 

 Haliclona oculata (Linnaeus, 1759) . (= Chalina oculata of past authors) . Seldom 



found intertidally ; common in offshore waters. 



Order Poecilosclerida 



I sodictya deichmannae (de Laubenfels, 1949) . (= Neosperiopsis deichmannae de L.) 

 An offshore species . 



Lissodendoryx isodictyalis (Carter, 1882) . Fairly common, but in field may be con- 

 fused with Halichondria . Excellent for demonstration of microscleres. 



Microciona prolifera (Ellis and Solander, 1786) . Common and easily recognized by 

 color; assumes branching form in subtidal waters. Extends into somewhat brack- 

 ish lagoons. 




Porifera 7 



My c ale fibrexilis (Wilson, 1891) . (= Esperella fibrexilis Wilson, 1891; - Carmia 

 f ibrexilis , de Laubenfels, 1949). Common on wharf pilings in the Woods Hole 

 region; often as a thin encrustation that might be confused with Lissodendoryx ; 

 sometimes massive. 



Order Halichondrida 



Halichondria bowerbanki Burton, 1930. The common Halichondria in the Woods Hole 



region. Extends into brackish lagoons. 

 Halichondria panicea (Pallas, 1766). Probably occurs at Woods Hole but difficult 



to distinguish from the previous species. Common north of Cape Cod. (See 



discussion in Hartman, 1958) . 



Order Hadromerida 



Cliona celata Grant, 1826. A common boring sponge which assumes a massive, free- 

 living condition as it grows older. Easily distinguished from other local clio- 

 nids by the large size of the openings in the calcareous substrate excavated for 

 the incurrent and excurrent papillae. 



Cliona lobata Hancock, 1849. Of common occurrence on oyster shells and other cal- 

 careous materials. 



Cliona truitti Old, 1941. Not recorded as yet from Woods Hole, but may occur in 

 brackish waters . 



Cliona vastifica Hancock, 1849. Of common occurrence on oyster shells and other 

 calcareous materials. 



Prosuberites epiphytum (Lamarck, 1816) . Not yet recorded from Woods Hole, but is 

 to be expected as a thin encrustation on the lower surfaces of rocks. 



Suberites ficus (Johnston, 1842) . A common subtidal species. 



Order Choristida 



Craniella gravida (Hyatt, 1877) . Reported common on mud bottoms in deeper waters 



of Buzzards Bay. De Laubenfels' synonymy (1949) of this species with the deep- 

 water North Atlantic C. crania is in error. 



REFERENCES IMPORTANT IN IDENTIFICATION OF WOODS HOLE SPONGES 



De Laubenfels, M. W. , 1949. The sponges of Woods Hole and adjacent waters. Bull. 

 Mus. Comp. Zool. Harvard, 103 (1) : 1-55. 



Hartman, W. D. , 1958. Natural history of the marine sponges of southern New Eng- 

 land. Peabody Mus. Nat. Hist., Yale Univ. Bull., 12: 155 pp. 



Old, M. C, 1941. The taxonomy and distribution of the boring sponges (Clionidae) 

 along the Atlantic Coast of North America. Chesapeake Biol. Lab. Publ., 44: 

 30 pp. 



A reference for sponges found north of Cape Cod is: Procter, 1933. Porifera. In: 



Biol. Surv. Mt. Desert Region. Part V. Marine Fauna. Philadelphia, Wistar Inst.. 

 78-115. 




8 Chapter II 



PHYLUM CNIDARIA 



Introduction and Class Hydrozoa 



The phylum Cnidaria is a large and complex group characterized by the produc- 

 tion of nematocysts, by a tubular or cup-like body of two layers (ectoderm and endo- 

 or gastroderm) separated by a mesogloeal layer, with the mouth as the sole opening 

 to the digestive cavity, and by enormous diversity of form and life history. The 

 best general account of the group is in Hyman ' s "The Invertebrates", Vol. 1. This 

 phylum is often called the Coelenterata, but it now seems best to give up the latter 

 term since it is used in some texts to include both Cnidaria and Ctenophora. The 

 latter group is generally considered quite distinct, and is treated as a separate 

 phylum in Chapter V of this manual. 



The present chapter deals with the Class Hydrozoa, characterized in many, but 

 not all, of its members by the development of both hydroid (polypoid) and medusoid 

 stages or forms in their life cycles. This class is the most numerous and diverse 

 of the cnidarian classes in the Woods Hole region. 



The two other cnidarian classes are the Scyphozoa (Chapter III), most of whose 

 members are large medusae, but which also includes an order (Stauromedusae) of at- 

 tached forms, and the Anthozoa (Chapter IV). The latter is the largest of the cni- 

 darian classes, but its members are mainly tropical, including corals and a host 

 of related forms. In the Woods Hole region, sea anemones make up the bulk of the 

 representation of anthozoans. 



THE SESSILE HYDROZOA 



The representation of sessile Hydrozoa in the waters of the Woods Hole Region 

 is extremely good. But, unfortunately, the class Hydrozoa, and in particular the 

 order Hydroida, has been plagued with a curious and troublesome double taxonomy. 

 Students of the benthic fauna have developed one system of families, genera, and 

 species based upon the polypoid or "hydroid" stages, while workers on the plankton- 

 ic community have tended to develop a system based upon the medusae. Since in num- 

 erous instances polyp and medusa of a single species have received different gen- 

 eric and specific names, and since in many cases the life histories are not com- 

 pletely known, the problem of synonymizing these separate stages has been diffi- 

 cult and will continue so. Furthermore, when the attempt is made to bring polyp 

 and medusa together under one name, the rule of priority may require that a less 

 well known prior name replace a familiar later name. This does not bother sys- 

 tematists greatly, but is frustrating and exasperating to the non-specialist. The 

 latter may take comfort, however, in the fact that progress toward a single inte- 

 grated taxonomy is being made. An excellent example of enlightened systematic 

 work based upon life history studies is to be seen in F. S. Russell's "The Medu- 

 sae of the British Isles" (1953) . 



GLOSSARY OF SESSILE HYDROZOA 



Adnate: One side of structure growing attached, as the hydrothecae of Sertularia . 



Annulated: Possessing a ringed appearance. 



Athecate: The hydranth is not protected by a chitinous cup or hydrotheca ; gymno- 



blastic hydroids are athecate. 

 Blastostyle: Modified zooid (gonozooid) from which the medusoids are budded; may 



be protected by a surrounding theca (gonotheca or gonangium) . 

 Calyptoblastea : The order of thecate hydroids, having each hydranth protected by 



a hydrotheca. 

 Capitate tentacle: Short tentacle with a very distinct terminal knob studded with 



nematocysts, as in Z anclea or Pennaria . 




Hydrozoa g 



Colony: The thecate hydroid colony is always a polymorphic system, consisting of 

 at least the gastrozooids (hydranths) or food-securing individuals, and the go- 

 nozooids or asexual individuals which produce by budding the sexual free or 

 attached medusoids. The various zooids form a unit arising from a single plan- 

 ula larva and connected by stems and branches; rootlike structures attach the 

 colony to the substrate. In most athecate hydroids the colony is not polymor- 

 phic, since all the hydranths alike produce medusa-buds, or else the medusa- 

 buds are produced on certain areas of stolon or stem. 



Dactylozooid: A mouthless polyp armed with nematocysts, and serving for protec- 

 tion or to aid in food catching, as in Podocoryne or Hydractinia . 



Distal tentacles: The set of tentacles farthest from the stalk of gymnoblasts 

 that possess two or more sets of tentacles. 



Fascicled: Hydroids in which several stems of the colony are closely bound to- 

 gether into a bundle or fascicle, as in some species of Eudendrium 



Filiform tentacle: Long threadlike tentacle, over which the nematocysts are usu- 

 ally evenly distributed. 



Gastrozooid: A nutritive polyp; a hydranth. 



Gonangium: The entire asexual reproducing individual of the hydroid colony, in 

 calyptoblasteans composed of the protecting gonotheca, the blastostyle, and 

 the medusoid forms which bud from the blastostyle. 



Gonophores : Sexual individuals, which in calyptoblasteans arise asexually by 



budding from the blastostyle, being either free medusae or reduced to sporo- 

 sacs; in gymnoblasteans they may arise from the stolons, hydranths, pedicels, 

 or stems. However, Fraser calls the blastostyle, which bears the sexual zo- 

 oids, a gonophore. 



Gonotheca: The peridermal protective structure surrounding the blastostyle and 

 gonophores in calyptoblasteans. 



Gonozooid: Another term applied to any individual of the colony which buds off 

 sexual individuals such as free medusae or the various degrees of reduced, 

 attached sporosacs. 



Gymnoblastea : The order of athecate hydroids, lacking protective thecae about 

 the hydranths. 



Hydranth: The hydranth (gastrozooid) is the feeding member of the colony, having 

 a terminal mouth surrounded by tentacles; may be either sessile or stalked. 



Hydrocaulus: The hydrocaulus is the main stem of that type of colony in which 

 the budding of new hydranths can take place on the stalks of the older hy- 

 dranths. This gives rise to erect, branched colonies. The term hydrocaulus is 

 sometimes used to refer to the type of colony developed in the above way, in 

 contrast to rhizocaulus , in which the new hydranths are developed from the 

 stolons only. 



Hydrocladium (-ia) : Lateral branch(es) growing from the hydrocaulus. 



Hydrorhiza: The rootlike structure, which may be more or less simple or a mass 

 of tangled tubes, attaching the colony to substrate. 



Hydrotheca: The peridermal, cuplike structure that surrounds the hydranth, and 

 into which the hydranth may be drawn when disturbed. 



Medusoid form: Inclusive term applied to the various types of sexual zooids (go- 

 nophores) ; it includes (1) free medusae with velum, tentacles, radial canals, 

 and manubrium ( Bougainvillia , Podocoryne , Obelia ) ; (2) gonophores (eumedusoid) 

 that resemble developing medusae but have no tentacles or other marginal struc- 

 tures, and which in some forms break away but soon die, since they lack a 

 mouth; however, in most cases they remain attached ( Tubularia ) ; (3) gono- 

 phores (cryptomedusoid) that are still further reduced, lacking radial canals 

 and other obvious medusaLd structures ( Clava ) ; and (4) the most reduced type, 

 in which the sex cells ripen directly on the sides of the blastostyle ( Ser - 

 tularia ) . Types 2, 3, and 4 are often called sporosacs. The condition in 

 Hydra is not unlike that in Sertularia , but there is no differentiated blas- 

 tostyle. 



Nematophore: The small, highly modified zooid (dactylozooid) of protective func- 

 tion which is characteristic of the family Plumulariidae (e.g . Schizotr.icha ) 




10 Hydrozoa 



Operculum: A lid closing the hydrotheca or gonotheca when the zooid is drawn in 



(Calyptoblastea) . 

 Pedicel: The stalk that bears a hydrotheca. 

 Proximal tentacles: The circlet of tentacles nearer the stalk in gymnoblasts that 



have two or more whorls of tentacles. 

 Rhizocaulus: See discussion under hydrocaulus . 

 Sessile: Hydrotheca or other structure attached directly to stem or branch of 



colony; lacking a pedicel ( Schizotricha , Sertularia ) . 

 Sporosacs: Reduced gonophores that do not develop into free medusae, but remain 



attached and produce the gametes ( Clava , Hydractinia ) . 

 Stolons: Tubular or rootlike processes that extend over the substrate; the 



stolons are a part of the hydrorhizal system. 

 Thecate: Hydroids that possess a protective, cuplike hydrotheca which surrounds 



the hydranth, as in the Calyptoblastea. 

 Zooid: A general term applied to any of the several types of individuals or "per- 

 sons" of the hydroid colony. 



KEY TO THE MORE COMMON HYDROIDS 



Modified after key and check list used by Invertebrate Zoology Course from 1942 

 through 1946. The assistance of Dr. Sears Crowell, Dr. Frank Gwilliam, Dr. Kay Pe- 

 tersen, and several others in this 1964 revision is gratefully acknowledged. Fig- 

 ure references in this key are to Plate 2. 



1. Hydranth naked, lacking a protective cup (hydrotheca) 



into which it can be retracted (but perisarc may extend 

 to base of tentacles in Bouqainvillia ) (fig. 1) 



Suborder GYMNOBLASTEA 



1. Hydranth with a protective hydrotheca into which it can 

 be withdrawn (but cup much reduced in Halecium) (figs. 18, 



19) Suborder CALYPTOBLASTEA 20 



2. Hydranths with filiform tentacles only 3 



2. Hydranths with distinctly capitate tentacles only 19 



2. Hydranths with both filiform and capitate tentacles (dis- 

 tal scattered capitate, basal filiform whorls) ; bushy 



colony, dark perisarc, pink hydranths (fig. 2) Pennaria tiarella 



3. Filiform tentacles scattered on hydranth (Clavidae) 4 



3. Filiform tentacles in distinct whorls 6 



4. Very small (2 cm or less) pinkish growths, sparsely 

 branched or with slender hydranths arising from a sto- 

 lon. Free medusae arise singly on short pedicels with 



perisarc near bases of hydranths Turritopsis nutricula * 



4. Gonophores (reduced medusoids or sporosacs) in clusters 



below tentacles or as ovoid bodies on branching stems 5 



5. In very low salinity or fresh water; colony branching, 

 perisarc brownish; gonophores ovoid, borne on stem be- 

 low hydranths (fig. 11) Cordylophora lacustris 



5. In marine or nearly marine salinities, pink hydranths in 

 clusters arising from basal stolons; clustered sporosacs 

 below tentacles Clava leptostyla 



5. (Note: a rare species, the large (2-3 cm) solitary Acaulis 

 primarius also has scattered filiform tentacles and sporo- 

 sacs) 



*A form answering this general description but with sporosacs instead of free 

 medusae was taken in 1963, but is as yet unidentified. 




Hydrozoa n 



6. Hydranths with a single whorl of filiform tentacles 7 



6. Hydranths large and showy, with two whorls of fili- 

 form tentacles, the proximal longer than distal 15 



6. (Note: the minute pelagic hydroid Margelopsis qib - 

 besi consists of a single swimming hydranth , with 



2 subequal whorls of tentacles, and bearing medusa- 

 buds) . 



7. Colonies arising from a basal mat of stolons, and 

 without perisarc around stems of zooids (Hydractini- 



idae) 8 



7. Colonies erect or branching, with perisarc extend- 

 ing out to bases of hydranths, or even to bases of 



tentacles 10 



8. Hydrorhizal spines rough; gonophores are sporosacs, 

 borne on individuals (gonozooids) with reduced ten- 

 tacles; colonies common on shells occupied by her- 

 mit crabs, but also on rocks, piles, etc; color 

 varies from white to salmon (fig. 17) 



Hvdractinia echinata 



8. Hydrorhizal spines smooth; gonophores are free medu- 

 sae, borne on gonozooids with well developed tentacles 

 (to see released medusae, let colony stand overnight 



in a small container of cool sea water) 9 



9. Medusae with 8 well developed tentacles and unripe 

 when liberated (fig. 15). Colony contains "spiral 

 zooids" (tentacle-less defensive individuals; look 

 for these within the aperture of the snail shell, 

 close to the hermit crab occupant, fig. 16); color 

 white to pink; generally on shells of Nassarius 

 trivittatus occupied by hermit crabs. 



Podocorvne carnea 



9. Medusae with ripe gonads but rudimentary tentacles 

 at time of release. No spiral zooids in colony. 

 Forms a sparse colony, generally on shells of liv- 

 ing Nassarius obsoletus Stylactis hooperi 



10. Perisarc ends below hydranths; hydranths with trum- 

 pet shaped hypostomes; gonophores are sporosacs (fig. 

 12) Eudendrium 11 



10. Perisarc continued as a thin expansion over base of 

 hydranth up to tentacles; hypostome conical; free medu- 

 sae liberated; at time of liberation medusae show 4 



pairs of tentacles (fig. 1) Bouqainvillia 14 



11. Main stem fascicled (fig. 12), colonies branched, bushy 



and fairly large 12 



11. Main stems not fascicled; colonies small and sparsely 



branched 13 



12. Tentacles of gonozooids (hydranths bearing gonophores) 

 showing little or no reduction; male gonophores 2- or 



3 -chambered ... „ , -, . 



19 n^~~„ ■ j t, ■ Eudendrium ramosum 



LZ. Gonozooids bearing gonophores tend (at least in some to 



be reduced ("aborted") (fig. 12); male gonophores 4- or 



5 -chambered „ , ' 



Eudendrium carneum 




12 



Plate 2 



HYDROZOA 



Sources: Fraser (F) , from living specimens (S) . Scale 

 bars all 1 mm, approximately. Somewhat simplified. 



Fig. 1. Bougainvillia carolinensis , with medusae; note perisarc (un- 

 stippled) up to tentacles (S) . 



2. Pennaria tiarella , hydranth with gonophores (medusae with rudimen- 

 tary tentacles (S) . 



3. Clytia edwardsi , hydrotheca and gonangium (F) . 



4. Clytia johnstoni , gonangium (F) . 



5. Schizotricha tenella , detail of lateral branchlet with hydrotheca 

 and 4 nematophores (S) . To scale of fig. 10. 



6. Zanclea costata , hydranth (S) . 



7. Campanularia f lexuosa , short internodes, immature and ripe gonan- 

 gia (S) . 



8. Campanularia calceolifera , hydranth (tentacles schematic) and male 

 gonangium, long internodes (S) . 



9. Same, female gonangium. 



10. Sertularia pumila, opposite, adnate, hydrothecae (S) . 



11. Cordylophora lacustris , with young gonangium (S) . 



12. Eudendrium carneum, fascicled stem, gonophores on gonozooid with 

 "aborted" tentacles (S) . 



13. Obeli a sp. , a "bottle-necked" gonangium (F) . 



14. Calycella syringa , hydrotheca with operculum (S) . 



15. Liberated medusa of Podocoryne carnea (S) . 



16. Part of colony of Podocoryne on shell used by hermit crab. Note 

 medusa-buds at left, and spiral zooids at angles of shell aperture 

 (those at right slightly enlarged) (S) . 



17. Individuals of Hydractinia echinata, among roughened spines. Note 

 that neither the reduced tentacles of dactylozooids and gonozooids 

 nor the feeding tentacles are classed as capitate (S) . 



18. Halecium halecinium,female gonangium bearing pair of hydranths (F) . 



19. Same, with gastrozooid and male gonangium (F) . 




Plate 2 




14 



Hydrozoa 



13. Tentacles of gonozooids not completely reduced; male 

 gonophores 2- or 3-chambered; colony small (1/2 inch) , 

 whitish Eudendrium album 



13. Male gonophores borne on fully reduced zooids; colony 



pink , 1/2 to 1 inch high Eudendrium tenue 



14. Stout bushy growths; stems fascicled; greenish peri- 

 sarc, reddish hydranths; tentacles in extension long, 

 taper.ing, and seeming to point in all directions; 2- 

 8 inches high; medusae budded singly from branches 

 (fig. 1). This is the Bougainvillia hydroid generally 



collected Bougainvillia carolinensis 



14. Delicate sparse growth with a single whorl of filiform 

 tentacles (Russell) . This species is well known by 

 its medusa, but the status of the hydroid at Woods 

 Hole is not clear Bougainvillia super ci liar is 



15. Zooids solitary, not commonly found; liberate free me- 

 dusae 



15. Zooids generally in branching form or clustered; medu- 

 sa-buds not released 



16 

 17 



16. Zooid with perisarc very weak or lacking; large (1-4 



inches) Corymorpha pendula 



16. Zooid with obvious brown perisarc; single or slightly 



branched; about 24 short distal (oral) tentacles, 30 



longer proximal tentacles; easily mistaken for Tubularia 



until medusae seen 

 Ectopleura dumortieri 



17. 



17. 



Colony branching; stems extensively annulated; hydranths 

 bright pink; colonies not large (1 to 1.5 inches) 



Colonies are clusters of long stems, unbranched or sparse- 

 ly branched; stem annulated only at intervals 



Tubularia larynx 



18 



18. Grows as a dense cluster of many sparsely or unbranched 

 stems; hydranths rose colored; 3-5 inches high 



18. Forms clusters of unbranched stems up to 7 inches tall; 

 hydranths scarlet; up to an inch across tentacles when 

 expanded; generally not found alive in summer 



Tubularia crocea 



Tubularia couthouyi 



Zanclea costata 



19. Colonies of very small, elongated hydranths with perisarc 



visible only at base; numerous capitate tentacles scattered 

 over hydranths (fig. 6), with an apical whorl of 4-6 ten- 

 tacles; color pink; height about 1 cm; free medusae budded 

 from hydranths, below tentacles 



19. Irregularly branching colonies, with shorter bodied hydranths 

 bearing about 16 capitate tentacles; free medusae produced 



from hydranth body close to tentacles Sarsia tubulosa 



20. Hydrothecae on pedicels or wineglass-like stems (fig. 3, 8) 21 



20. Hydrothecae lacking stems ("sessile", 'adnate "), closely 



appressed to stem or branch (fig. 5, 10) 31 




Hydrozoa 



15 



21. Hydrotheca, as expected, large enough to enclose hy- 

 dranth 



21. Hydrotheca aberrant in being very shallow saucer or 

 funnel-shaped, usually marked by circlet of bright 

 beadlike dots, not covering hydranths (fig. 19); stem 

 fascicled; fanlike branching colony up to 10 inches 

 high; female gonangia in rows on upper side of branch- 

 es, each surmounted by a pair of hydranths (fig. 18) 



22 



Halecium halecinum 



22. Hydrotheca tubular, and provided with a conical oper- 

 culum of toothlike flaps (fig. 14); family Campanulin- 

 idae, a difficult group of very small forms, of which 

 the most common local form may be Calycella syringa , 

 a tiny (1/g inch) species found on other hydroids, bry- 

 ozoans, etc. 



22. Hydrotheca bell or wine-glass shaped, with inner dia- 

 phragm or annular thickening at base of hydranth, but 

 lacking operculum (closing device) : A very numerous 

 family 



Campanulariidae 2 3 



Cautionary note: The only basic way to define the genera of Campanulariidae 

 is by their sexual stages. "It appears to be impossible to construct gener- 

 ic characters for the Campanulariidae on the basis of the trophosome. The 

 classification of the group is unnatural and unsatisfactory in the extreme, 

 but this is not the place to attempt its rectification". (Nutting, 1901, 

 p. 344). 



a. Produce free medusae having 4-8 tentacles at time of 



release Clytia (= Phialidium ) 



b. Produce tiny free medusae with 12-16 tentacles at time 



of release Qbelia 



c. Medusoids are very reduced and remain in gonotheca; 



hydrotheca with annular thickening at base Campanularia 



d. Medusoids are extruded from gonotheca in a sac (acro- 

 cyst) but are not released; hydrotheca with thin dia- 

 phragm at base of hydranth Gonothyraea (=Laomedea) 



23. Colonies consisting of unbranched or not regularly branched 

 growths arising from a more or less extensive hydrorhizal 

 system; hydrothecal margins toothed; gonangia borne on hy- 

 drorhiza and ringed (annulated) , Japanese lantern fashion 

 (figs. 3, 4); release 4-8 tentacled medusae 

 Clytia 24 



23. Colonies regularly branching (at least in terminal twigs); 



gonangia not ringed 25 



24. Colony of unbranched (or occasionally branched) white 

 growths arising from extensive rootstock; height about 

 V4 inch; hydrothecal rim with ca. 16 rounded teeth; gon- 

 angia deeply ringed (fig. 4) 



24. Colony white, profusely branched but without clear main 



stem; height about 1 inch; hydrothecal rim with 12-14 sharp 

 teeth; gonangia irregularly ringed (fig. 3) 



Clytia johnstoni 



Clytia edwardsi 




;L6 Hydrozoa 



25. Gonangia liberate small medusae with 12-16 tentacles; 



several species , of which only 3 are in key Obelia 26 



25. Gonangia contain the reduced medusoids (sporosacs) 



which are never released; only 4 of the several species 



are in key Campanularia 28 



25. Gonangia extrude the reduced medusoids inside a sac 



(acrocyst) Gonothyraea (= Laomedea ) loveni 



Note: Of the campanulariid genera occurring at Woods Hole, Laomedea and Obel - 

 ia can be distinguished by the possession of a thin diaphragm in the hydro- 

 theca at the base of the hydranth. In the others ( Clytia and Campanularia ) 

 this basal structure has the form of a ring shaped thickening. 



26. Main stem simple; hydrothecae smooth, shallow, tooth- 

 less; gonangia with constricted opening, "bottle necked" 



(fig. 13) 27 



26. Main stem fascicled; hydrothecae deep, longitudinally 

 ribbed, with 14-20 double-pointed teeth on rim; gonangia 

 with opening not constricted; colony may exceed 30 inches 



Obelia bicuspidata 



27. Colony of stiff, short (1 inch or less) unbranched, zig- 

 zag (geniculate) stems with short, stout internodes and 

 hydranths set alternately, in one plane; gonangia about 



5 times length of hydrothecae Obelia geniculata 



27. Colony much branched, with long slender internodes; gon- 

 angia about 3 times length of hydrothecae; height of col- 

 ony 6-8 inches Obelia commissuralis 



28. Main stem with many branches, which rebranch; gonothecae 

 with very small apertures; colony in absence of gonangia 

 closely resembles Obelia commissuralis ; height about 6 



inches Campanularia amphora 



28. Stem bearing only pedicels, or a few branches 29 



29. Stem brownish and stout, with short internodes (4-5 times 

 as long as thick, fig. 7); height about 1.5 inches; gono- 

 thecae of tubular form with apertures not constricted 



Campanularia f lexuosa 



29. Main stems slender with longish internodes (7-8 times as 



long as thick, fig. 8) ; gonangia with specialized apertures 30 



30. Stem strongly zigzag (geniculate) ; height about 3/4 inch; 

 gonangia irregularly wrinkled, bottle-necked 



Campanularia angulata 



30. Stem flexuose (weakly zigzag); height up to 1.5 inch; fe- 

 male gonangia with a distinctive folded-over tip (fig. 9) ; 

 male gonangia bluntly fusiform and irregularly bulging 



(fig. 8) Campanularia calceolifera 



31. Hydrothecae adnate on one side only of stem or branches 

 (family Plumulariidae) ; the species commonly taken has a 

 white, delicate feathery colony, 1-3 inches high; tiny 

 special zooids (nematophores) form small spout-like ex- 

 tensions set along branches between hydrothecae (fig. 5); 

 gonangia curved, set among branches 



Schizotricha tenella 



31. Hydrothecae arranged on both sides of stem or branches 



(Sertulariidae) 32 




Hydrozoa 17 



32. Hydrothecae set as opposite pairs (genus Sertularia ) ; 

 in the commonest local species, the members of each 

 pair of hydrothecae not in contact (fig. 10); gono- 

 theca bottle-necked, not annulated; dark brown, stiff 

 growths, usually on seaweeds; 0.5-1.5 inches high 

 Sertularia pumi la 



32. Hydrothecae set in alternating fashion 33 



33. Pinnately-branching brown colony, up to 12 inches tall; 

 hydrothecae with tubular necks, smooth-rimmed 



Abietinaria abietina 



33. Colony dichotomously branching; a handsome bushy form 

 ("squirrel-tail hydroid") with silvery branches, up to 

 12 inches tall; hydrothecal rims elevated into two op- 

 posite teeth Thuiaria argentea 



ANNOTATED LIST OF HYDROIDS IN THIS KEY 



In view of the large number of species alleged by Nutting and Fraser for this 

 region, it would be premature to attempt a complete list. The experimentalist 

 should be aware that species not on this list may be expected to turn up, that a 

 given genus, e.g. Tubularia , might be represented in Supply Department collections 

 by different species at different seasons, and that some species and even genera 

 in certain families, notably Campanulariidae, are impossible to identify without 

 sexually mature ("fruiting") material. 



Abietinaria abietina (Linnaeus, 1758) . Dredged. 



Acaulis primarius Stimpson, 1854. Rare, in dredgings north of Cape. 



Bougainvillia carolinensis (McCrady, 1858) . On rocks, pilings, algae; common. 



Bougainvillia superciliaris (L. Agassiz, 1849). Status unclear. According to Rus- 

 sell (1953), hydroid is tiny, with ca. 6 filiform tentacles in a whorl, hy- 

 dranths arising singly from stolon. Nutting (1901), following Agassiz, des- 

 cribed hydroid as up to 2 inches high with 15-20 tentacles, but did not see it 

 himself. If this species occurs here, it may occur chiefly as the medusa. 



Calycella syrinqa (Linnaeus, 1767). Common on other hydroids, bryozoans, algae, 

 but inconspicuous because of small size. 



Clava leptostyla L. Agassiz, 1862. Most commonly in small clusters on Ascophyllum 

 nodosum in low intertidal; of rather local, sporadic occurrence. 



Campanularia amphora (L. Agassiz, 1862). Common in shallow water. Easily confused 

 with Obelia commis sura lis . 



Campanularia angulata (Hincks, 1861) . Reported on Zostera . 



Campanularia calceolifera H incks, 1871. Common on Mytilus , seaweeds, and pilings. 

 The unique folded-over tip of female gonangium makes identification certain. 



Campanular ia f lexuosa (Alder, 1856) . On pilinqs, rocks, algae. Very common. 



Clytia edwardsi (Nutting, 1901). On pilings, etc. 



Clytia Johns ton i (Alder, 1857) . (= Clytia bicophora Nutting, 1901) . The medusae 



produced by the hydroid genus Clytia are known as Phialidium and Russell re- 

 fers Clytia johnstoni in British waters to Phialidium hemisphericum Linnaeus. 

 The disposition of the local Clytia johnstoni should await proper study. The 

 hydroid is found locally on intertidal brown algae and on rocks. 

 Note ; Clytia differs from Campanularia essentially only in the degree of de- 

 velopment of its medusa. It is possible that future practice will be to in- 

 clude Clytia within the genus Campanularia . 



Cordylophora lacustris Allman, 1844. An important experimental animal and the only 

 typical colonial hydroid found in fresh water. On pilings, under floats, and 

 in culverts in ponds and passages in areas of low salinity. 



C orynitis agassizi , see Z anclea costata . 



Corymorpha pendula L. Agassiz, 1862. Dredged quite rarely, from soft bottoms. 




18 Hydrozoa 



Ectopleura dumortieri (Van Beneden, 1844) . (= Ectopleura ochracea L. Agassiz, 1862) . 

 This is generally seen as the medusa. The hydroid is a solitary form resem- 

 bling Tubular ia , but producing free-swimming medusae. 



Eudendrium album Nutting, 1898. Small, inconspicuous; on rocks, piles, algae. 



Eudendrium carneum Clarke, 1882. A conspicuous species, with red hydranths and go- 

 nophores. This and the next species are common laboratory examples of hydroids 

 with greatly reduced medusoids. On piles and algae. 



Eudendrium ramosum Linnaeus, 1758. Also conspicuous. One of the commonest shallow 

 water forms on rocks and piles, and in deeper water. 



Eudendrium tenue A. Agassiz, 1865. Shallow water, on piles. 



Gonothyraea (= Laomedea ) loveni (Allman, 1859) . On shells, stones, pilings, floats, 

 in shallow water. 



Halecium halecinum (Linnaeus, 1767). Common in shallow water on shells, stones, 

 etc. 



Hydractinia echinata (Fleming, 1828) . Very common on shells of Littorina (see 



Crowell, 1945) and other snails occupied by hermit crabs, and also on rocks and 

 piles. Seems quite variable, both in roughness of spines and in color, which 

 varies from pure white to a rich salmon. 



Laomedea , see Gonothyraea . 



Obelia bicuspidata Clark, 1876. As with other campanulariids, generic identification 

 of Obelia may be impossible without mature material. On Zostera , piles, and in 

 deeper water. 



Obelia commissuralis McCrady, 1858. Widespread in shallow water on various sub- 

 strates . 



Obelia geniculata (Linnaeus, 1758). Grows profusely on floats, piles, and Lamin- 

 aria; on the latter the extensive stolon system is conspicuous. 



Pennaria tiarella (Ayres, 1854). A common and conspicuous species in clear shallow 

 water under rock ledges, etc. A favorite laboratory animal. Bears reduced med- 

 usae with 4 rudiments of tentacles. Medusae may be released, or may discharge 

 gametes while still attached. In laboratory this is usually seen between 7 and 

 9 P.M. 



Podocoryne carnea Sars, 1846. Generally collected on shells of Nassarius trivitta - 

 tus used by hermit crabs (see Crowell, 1945), although not confined to this 

 shell. Color pink to pure white. An important experimental animal in recent 

 years. Since Podocoryne differs from Hydractinia mainly in the development of 

 a free medusae, it is possible that future practice will be to include both in 

 the genus Hydractinia. 



Sarsia tubulosa (Sars, 1835). This species is probably not to be found at Woods 

 Hole in summer. Sumner ejt al^. cite records of its abundance in March and Ap- 

 ril, with the medusae most common in April and May. The hydroid has not been 

 included in the keys and lists of the Invertebrate Zoology Course for at least 

 25 years. The free medusa is one of a difficult group and Russell includes 

 Syncoryne mirabilis (L. Agassiz, 1849) as a synonym of Sarsia tubulosa . 



Schizotricha tenella (Verrill, 1874) . The delicate feathery form is easily recog- 

 nized. Common on pilings. 



Sertularia pumila Linnaeus, 1758. Common on intertidal brown algae in protected 

 waters . 



Stylactis hooperi Sigerfoos, 1899. Occurs on shells of living mud snails (Nas - 

 sarius obsoletus ) . Since Stylactis , like Podocoryne , differs from Hydractinia 

 mainly in the degree of development of its medusa, it is possible that future 

 practice will be to include all three within the genus Hydractinia. 



Syncoryne mirabilis , see Sarsia tubulosa . 



T huiaria argentea (Linnaeus, 1758). Dredged, but usually dead and empty when taken 

 in summer. 



Tubular ia : A difficult genus, but very important in experimental work. Specific 

 identification is often inadequate, an unfortunate situation when results of 

 different authors have to be compared. Experimentalists using Tubularia would 

 do well to record date, water temperature, and place of collection of labora- 

 tory material. Nutting lists five species; this key, three: 




Hydrozoa 19 



Tubularia couthouyi L. Agassiz, 1862. On sandy or stony bottom. This large and 

 beautiful species has generally died off by summer. 



Tubularia crocea (L. Agassiz, 1862). Subtidal, on pilings, sometimes in brackish 

 water. The same species is thought to occur in the Oakland Estuary (San Fran- 

 cisco Bay) . This is the species most used experimentally. 



Tubularia larynx Ellis and Solander, 1786. On rocks, piles, and algae. 



Turritopsis nutricula (McCrady, 1856). This is generally seen as the medusa. The 

 hydroids are small and inconspicuous. 



Zanclea costata Gegenbaur, 1856. The work of Russell makes it seem probable that 

 the hydroid " Corynitis agassizi " and the medusa Gemmaria gemmosa as recorded 

 from Woods Hole should be referred to Zanclea costata . This is found abun- 

 dantly on the red bryozoan nodules obtained by dredging. 



HYDROMEDUSAE 



Numerous small medusae occur seasonally in the plankton of Woods Hole and ad- 

 jacent waters, but their identification is a matter of considerable difficulty. 

 One may identify a good many simply by reference to the illustrations in Hargitt 

 (1905), but there remain problems of synonymy because life histories of medusae 

 were not well worked out at that time, and indeed are still very incompletely 

 known. Reference should be made to Mayer's "Medusae of the World" (1910). A use- 

 ful guide to the generic identification is the "Pictorial key to species of British 

 Medusae", pp. 42-45 in the excellent volume by Russell (1953). In the present man- 

 ual, no key has been attempted. 



1. Order HYDROIDA (includes most of the local hydromedusans) : 



a. Suborder ANTHOMEDUSAE : These are the medusae of the gymnoblastic or athe- 



cate hydroids, and are characterized by a deep, bell shaped form, lacking 

 statocysts, and with the gonads born on the manubrium. The medusae of 

 Bouqainvillia and Podocoryne are typical examples (Plate 2, figs. 1 and 15). 



b. Suborder LEPTOMEDUSAE : These are the medusae of such of the calyptoblas- 



tic or thecate hydroids as produce medusae (most do not) . They are of flat- 

 tened form with gonads born on the radial canals, and ectodermal statocysts. 

 Obelia and Phialidium (= Clytia ) are examples. 



c. Suborder LIMNOMEDUSAE : This group is not recognized as such by Hyman (1940) 



and is given ordinal rank by Russell (1953) . It includes the well known 

 Craspedacusta sowerbii , of sporadic occurrence in fresh waters; its polyp 

 stage is the minute, tentacle-less " Microhydra " . Another very famous rep- 

 resentative, and the subject of much experimental work at Woods Hole, is 

 Gonionemus vertens A. Agassiz, 1862. This was once very abundant in the Eel 

 Pond, but it became very scarce in the Woods Hole region with the dying off 

 of the eel grass ( Zostera ) about 1930, and, despite the general return of 

 the grass, is now of rather sporadic and unpredictable occurrence. In some 

 summers thousands may be seen in shallow, protected bays on Martha's Vine- 

 yard; in other years very few may be taken. Most of the Woods Hole papers 

 on this species refer to it as Gonionemus murbachi , which Kramp (1959) re- 

 gards as a synonym of G. vertens . 



2. Order TRACHYLINA (Suborders TRACHYMEDUSAE and NARCOMEDUSAE) : Trachyline medusae 

 are generally oceanic and seldom taken in the inshore waters near Woods Hole. 

 They lack a true hydroid stage, or may have a parasitic larval development; 

 adults may have a distinctive scalloped bell margin, or tentacles inserted above 

 the margin. Russell's pictorial key may be helpful if members of this group are 

 encountered. 



The last two yroups to be mentioned are commonly called "siphonophores " . 

 These (s ensu lato ) are floating or swimming colonies containing both polypoid 

 and medusoid individuals. The recent trend in classification is to split this 




2 Hydromedusae 



group into two orders : 



3. Order CHONDROPHORA, allied to the tubularian hydroids, and represented in this 

 region only by rare examples of the "purple sailor", Velella velella (Linnaeus), 

 which has an oval float with diagonal vertical sail, and the somewhat similar 

 Porpita porpita (Linnaeus) , which lacks a sail. 



4. Order SIPHONOPHORA proper, represented locally by the "Portuguese man-of-war", 

 Physalia physalia (Linnaeus) , which is well known and easily recognized by its 

 large purple and rose irridescent float. Physalia may be quite common in Vine- 

 yard Sound in certain summers, especially after long periods of southeast storms. 

 However, experimentalists are advised that in occasional summers it is virtually 

 not to be found. The sting is severe and, although they may be picked up by the 

 float, they should be handled with caution and avoided by swimmers. Other si- 

 phonophores are of rare or occasional occurrence. 



REFERENCES ON HYDROZOA 



Crowell, S., 1945. A comparison of the shells utilized by Hydractinia and Podo- 



coryne . Ecology, 26 :207. 

 Fraser, C. M., 1944. Hydroids of the Atlantic Coast of North America > Univ. of 



Toronto Press, 451 pp., 94 pi. 

 Hargitt, C. W. , 1905. The Medusae of the Woods Hole region. Bull. U. S. Bur. 



Fish., 1904, 24: 21-79, pi. 1-7. 

 Hyman, L. H., 1940. The Invertebrates, vol. I, Protozoa through Ctenophora, 



726 pp., McGraw-Hill. 

 Kramp, P. L., 1959. The Hydromedusae of the Atlantic Ocean and adjacent waters. 



Dana Rept. 46_: 1-283, Pi. I -II. 

 Mayer, A. G., 1901. The Medusae of the World. Vols. I and II, The Hydromedusae. 



Carnegie Inst, of Wash. Publ. 109 . 

 Nutting, C. C, 1899. The hydroids of the Woods Hole region. Bull. U. S. Bur. 



Fish., 1899, _19: 325-386. 

 Russell, F. S., 1953. The Medusae of the British Isles, Cambridge Univ. Press, 



530 pp., 35 pi. 

 Totton, A. K., and G. 0. Mackie, 1960. Studies on Physalia physalis (L.). Part I., 



Natural history and morphology. Part II. Behavior and histology. Discovery 



Repts, 30: 301-408. 




Chapter III 21 



PHYLUM CNIDARIA, CLASS SCYPHOZOA 



The commonly encountered members of the Class Scyphozoa are well known to the 

 general public as " jellyf ishes" , and are often feared unreasonably. And it is fair 

 to advise that any large medusa should be handled with due respect, for its sting- 

 ing powers despite exaggerations in popular literature, may be formidable (cf. 

 Hedgpeth, 1945). 



Scyphozoan jellyfish are commonly large and conspicuous, with scalloped bell- 

 margins and usually with long tentacles and/or mouth lobes. The attached or poly- 

 poid stages are absent or inconspicuous; these "scyphistoma" stages (Plate 3, fig. 

 3) may occasionally be found on eelgrass, rocks, or timbers, or can be reared from 

 larvae shed by medusae in the laboratory. 



Members of the order Stauromedusae are easily distinguishable from other mem- 

 bers of the Class in that they are sessile throughout their life cycle except for 

 a brief period during development when a creeping, vermiform, nonciliated planula 

 larva is produced. Two families have been designated, the Eleutherocarpidae, rep- 

 resented locally by Haliclystus , and the Cleistocarpidae, represented by Cr-atpro- 

 lophu s. The latter group possesses "claustra", or membranes, which divide the gas- 

 tric pockets (see figs. 162B, p. 502, and 165J, p. 510 in_ Hyman, The Invertebrates , 

 Vol. I, for the distinction between the two families). Two stauromedusans are found 

 locally early in the season (to the end of June) attached to Fucus at Nobska Point. 



The synonymy of Scyphozoa is extensive, and most of the names used by Hargitt 

 and by Mayer have been modified. In the keys below, the names in Kramp's synop- 

 sis (1961) have been used. For the key to attached scyphozoans we are indebted 

 to Drs. G. F. Gwilliam and Kay Werner Petersen; the key to scyphomedusae has been 

 derived from Mayer (1910). Figure references are to Plate 3. 



KEY TO ATTACHED SCYPHOZOA OF THE VICINITY OF WOODS HOLE 



1. Small (under 10 mm) soft individuals connected by stolons 

 (fig. 3); up to 16 or more very long filiform tentacles; 

 gastric cavity with 4 small radial septa 

 "Scyphistoma" stages of various scyphozoan medusae 



1. Larger (up to 30 mm) ; broadly bell shaped single indiv- 



uals; 8 marginal clusters of short knobbed tentacles . . Order STAUROMEDUSAE 2 



2. Stalk comparable in length to depth of bell; with conspic- 



uous marginal anchors (fig. 2) between tentacle-bearing 



arms Haliclystus auricula (Rathke, 1806) 



2. Stalk much shorter than depth of bell; no marginal anchors 



(fig. 1) Craterolophus convolvulus (Johnston, 1835) 



Note: If the stauromedusan was collected north of Cape Cod, consult 

 the paper of Berrill (1961) before concluding an identification. 



KEY TO LARGE AND COMMON FREE-SWIMMING SCYPHOMEDUSAE 



1. Bell flat, translucent grayish, with 4 horeshoe shaped 

 gonads; marginal tentacles very short and numerous 

 Aurelia aurita (Linnaeus, 1758) 



1. Bell deep and usually colored; marginal tentacles long 2 



2. Marginal tentacles long and numerous, arranged in 8 



clusters, each of several rows Cyanea capillata (Linnaeus, 1758) 



2. Marginal tentacles single 3 




22 



Plate 3 



SCYPHOZOA AND ANTHOZOA 



Fig. 1. Craterolophus convolulus , from a preserved specimen; 

 bar is 1 cm. 



2. Haliclystus auricula , from a preserved specimen; bar 

 is 1 cm. 



3. Scyphistoma stage of Aurelia aurita , grown in labora- 

 tory and sketched from life by Dr. Louise Bush. Scale 

 is about 1 millimeter. 



4. Astrangia danae , a small section of living colony, 

 sketched from life by Bruce Shearer. Scale is 5 mm. 



5. Haloclava producta , after Hargitt; this and following 

 3 figures redrawn by Mrs. Emily Reid. Scale bars of 

 figures 5-8 approximately 1 cm long. 



6. Sagartia modesta , after Hargitt. 



7. Nematos Leila vectensis , after Crowell. 



8. Edwardsia elegans , after Hargitt. 




Plate 3 



I cm 



M$Mk 




24 Scyphomedusae 



3. Eight marginal tentacles; 16 marginal lappets; bell 

 with numerous nematocyst bearing warts 



Pelagia noctiluca (Forskal, 1775) 



3. Up to 40 marginal tentacles; about 48 marginal lappets 



Chrysaora quinquecirrha (Desor, 1848) 



REFERENCES ON SCYPHOZOA 



Berrill, M., 1962. The biology of three New England Stauroraedusae, with a descrip- 

 tion of a new species. Canad. J. Zool., 4_1: 1249-1262. 



Hargitt, C. W„, 1905. The medusae of the Woods Hole Region. Bull. U. S. Bur. Fish. 

 1904, 24: 21-79. 



Hedgpeth, J. W. , 1945. Re-examination of the Adventure of the Lion's Mane. Sci. 

 Monthly, 60: 227-232. 



Kramp, P. L., 1961. Synopsis of the medusae of the world. J. Mar. Biol. Assoc. 

 U. K.j 40: 7-469. 



Mayer, A. G., 1910. Medusae of the World. Vol III, The Scyphomedusae. Carnegie 

 Inst, of Washington, Publ. no. 109. 




Chapter IV 25 



PHYLUM CNIDARIA, CLASS ANTHOZOA 



By Cadet Hand 



This, the largest class of the Cnidaria, has but a modest representation at 

 Woods Hole, chiefly in the group of sea anemones. 



A. Subclass ALCYONARIA (=OCTOCORALLIA) : 



Members of this subclass are at once identifiable by the possession of 8 pin- 

 nate tentacles. The group contains several orders, mostly of warmer waters, such 

 as sea pens, sea fans, gorgonians, "organ-pipe coral", the sea pansy ( Renilla ) , 

 well known in experimental work, and the precious red coral of jewelry. In the 

 Woods Hole region, dredging off Martha's Vineyard and in the Sound may yield two 

 species . 



1. Order ALCYONACEA ("soft corals"): Alcyonium carneum Agassiz. 1850. Grows 

 as fleshy, finger-like lobes attached to rocks and shells at depths of 20-60 me- 

 ters; the color varies from bright salmon to pink or flesh-colored. The tissue 

 contains calcareous spicules, but there is no firm skeleton. At collection the 

 polyps are retracted and the general appearance is describable by the common 

 name of "dead men's fingers". In the relaxed condition the delicate polyps re- 

 veal the 8 pinnate tentacles characteristic of the subclass. It survives only 

 moderately well under laboratory aquarium conditions. 



2. Order PENNATULACEA : Pennatula aculeata Danielson and Koren, 1858. This 

 "sea pen" has the form of a feather, with a bulbous base on which it stands in 



soft muddy bottoms. The local species, which is taken only occasionally, is 

 10-25 cm in height and of a purplish-red color. 



B. Subclass ZOANTHARIA: 



Here are placed the great assemblages of stony corals (Madreporaria) , sea 

 anemones (Actinaria) , and some other orders, examples of which are rare or lacking 

 in the Woods Hole region. 



1. Order MADREPORARIA ("true" or stony corals): Astrangia danae Agassiz , 1847 

 is the sole local representative. It is a typical coral in form (Plate 3, fig. 

 4) forming irregular encrustations or low branching growths almost everywhere on 

 rocks, shells and pilings from low-water mark to 30-40 meters. It is hardy, and 

 lives well in laboratory sea-water aquaria. 



2. Order CERIANTHARIA: Cerianthus americanus Verrill. 1866. A southern form, 

 this has been taken only very rarely at Woods Hole. It has the form of an elon- 

 gated (up to 20 cm) burrowing sea anemone with 2 whorls of tentacles, living in 

 a distinct mucoid tube. McMurrich (1890, J. Morph. , 4: 131-150) gives a good 

 colored illustration. See Field (1949) for additional information. 



3. Order ZOANTHIDEA: Members of this order resemble small sea anemones but 

 are generally colonial. Epizoanthus americanus (Verrill, 1864) is barely in- 

 cludable in the Woods Hole region, being common only at depths of 50 or more 

 meters, off Martha's Vineyard and Nantucket. It generally occurs on shells oc- 

 cupied by hermit crabs, and also on rocks. 



4. Order ACTINIARIA (sea anemones) : These are familiar animals, generally 

 recognizable as such. Several local species are readily identifiable from the 

 key My form, color, and habitat, but critical identification of the rest is made 

 difficult by the fact that classification is based upon the assemblage of nema- 

 tocyst types ("cnidome") and upon internal anatomy such as mesenterial arrange- 

 ment, musculature, and other details requiring microscopical sections. The stu- 

 dent who wishes to go beyond the following key would do well to consult the works 

 of Stephenson (1928, 1935) and Carlgren (1949). 




26 Anthozoa 



KEY TO SEA ANEMONES 

 (Figure references are to Plate 3) 



1. Burrowing or buried in sand, gravel, or mud with only 



the tentacles exposed; body elongate, even worm-like 2 



1. Attached on hard surfaces with most of body well ex- 

 posed 5 



2. Upper part of body with 20 rows of papillae (fig. 5); 

 tentacles 20 in number, blunt and tending to be swollen 

 at tips; up to 10-15 cm body length 



Haloclava producta 



2. Tentacles pointed and body without papillae 3 



3. Acontia* present; flattened base attached to pebbles or 



shells (fig. 6) Sagartia modes ta 



3. No acontia; aboral end rounded or pointed; no flattened 



base; normally 16 tentacles 4 



4. Small, not over 2 cm long; transparent when extended and 

 without adherent sand (fig. 7) 



Nematostella vectensis 



4. With middle portion of body covered by a rough brown 

 cuticle to which sand adheres; 8 longitudinal grooves (fig. 



8) ; body up to 3.5 cm long Edwardsia elegans 



5. Column green to grayish black, with or without orange, 



yellow, or white lines Haliplanella luciae 



5. Coiutin white to salmon or brown, not green or black, 



sometimes mottled with brown 6 



6. Large individuals with lobed or frilled tentacular 

 crown. Tentacles very numerous and short. In exten- 

 sion the column is usually less than twice as long as 



its diameter Metridium senile 



6. Column elongated when extended and usually 3 or more 

 times longer than its diameter. Tentacles elongate. 

 Color white to pinkish, sometimes showing a greenish 

 tinge in the tentacles and upper column. Some speci- 

 mens may show one or more larger and more opaque inner 

 tentacles known as "catch tentacles", of uncertain func- 

 tion Diadumene leucolena 



*) Acontia are ciliated, thread-like structures which arise from the free edges 

 of the mesenteries and project into the gastric cavity. When acontiate anemones 

 are roughly handled the acontia may be extruded through the mouth or through 

 special pores (cinclides) in the body wall. 



ANNOTATED LIST OF WOODS HOLE SEA ANEMONES 



With some exceptions the sea anemones of Woods Hole are not well known, and a 

 restudy of local species is needed. The original descriptions, based largely on 

 form and color, are inadequate by modern standards. 



Anemonia sargassensis Hargitt, 1908. Not in key; an occasional visitor upon drift- 

 ing Sargassum . 



Bicid ium parasitica , see Pea chia parasitica . 



Diadumene l eucolena (Verrill, 1866). Listed as Cylista in Hargitt (1914). Most 

 commonly found under stones on rocky beaches. See Hand (1955) for synonymy. 




Anthozoa 27 



Edwardsia elegans Verrill, 1869. Reported burrowing in intertidal sand flats (Har- 

 gitt) ; apparently not common. 



Edwardsia leidyi V errill, 1898. This name applies to a larval stage found parasit- 

 ic in the ctenophore Mnemiopsis leidyi . The adult has not been determined. 

 Length 2-3 cm, color pink. 



Eloactis producta , see Haloclava producta . 



Halcampa duodecimcirrata (Sars, 1851) . One specimen, reported by Verrill dredged 

 in mud off Gay Head, had 10 tentacles. Species was described as having 12 ten- 

 tacles, from Maine specimens. On present evidence, rare, not in key. 



Halcampa farinacea , see Ha lcampa duodecimcirrata . 



Haliplanella luciae (Verrill, 1898) . This common and well known species has a very 

 discouraging synonymy, having been assigned to the genera Sagartia , Chrysoela , 

 Diadumene , Aipaisiomorpha , and Haliplanella , without there being much question 

 of its specific name luciae (after Verrill's daughter Lucy) since Verrill's des- 

 cription. H. luciae is thought to be of Japanese origin; it appeared near New 

 Haven in 1892 and has since become one of the commonest anemones of New England; 

 the first British record was in 1896, and it has also become widespread on the 

 California coast. The color is variable: dark brown, olive or green, with or 

 without lines of orange, yellow, or white. The orange lines when present, are 

 diagnostic, but the unlined individuals are more difficult to identify. Very 

 common, on pilings, among mussels, in salt marshes, often in brackish water. 

 See Hand (1955) for synonymy. 



Haloclava producta (Stimpson, 1856). A burrowing form on intertidal sand flats. 



Metridium dianthus , fimbriatum , m arginatum , see Metridium senile . 



Metridium senile (Linnaeus) . In systematic work this is referred to as M. senile 

 senile , while the Pacific coast subspecies is M. senile fimbriatum . The spe- 

 cies at Woods Hole has also been variously called M. dianthus , M. marginatum , 

 and M. fimbriatum , a not unusual situation when a very widespread and variable 

 form is concerned. See Hand (1955) for synonymy. 



Nematostella vectensis Stephenson, 1935 (=N. pellucida Crowell, 1946) . A small deli- 

 cate form found in the Mill Pond, Woods Hole, where salinity may fluctuate great- 

 ly. Up to 20 mm long and 2-4 mm in diameter when extended. Lives in soft mud 

 with disc and tentacles exposed. Crowell' s account of anatomy is excellent. 

 See Hand (1957) for synonymy. 



Peachia parasitica (L. Agassiz, 1859) . Young stage reported parasitic in the jelly- 

 fish Cyanea . Adults not yet recorded south of Eastport, Maine. Not in key. 



Sagartia leucolena , see Diadumene leucolena . 



Sagartia luciae, see Haliplanella luciae . 



Sagartia modesta Verrill, 1866. There is some doubt as to the proper generic name 

 for this species; see Carlgren (1950) for discussion of this problem. 



REFERENCES ON SEA ANEMONES 



Carlgren, 0., 1949. A survey of the Ptychodactaria , Corallimorpharia . and Actin - 



iaria . K. Svenska Veten. Handl. 4th ser., _1(1) : 1-121. 

 Carlgren, 0., 1950. A revision of some Actiniaria described by A. E. Verrill. J. 



Wash. Acad. Sci., 40(1): 22-28. 

 Crowell, S., 1946. A new sea anemone from Woods Hole, Massachusetts. J. Wash. 



Acad. Sci., 3j6: 57-60. (good account of Nematostella ) . 

 Field, L. R., 1949. Sea anemones and corals of Beaufort, North Carolina. Dake 



Univ. Mar. Sta. Bull. 5, 39 pp, 10 pi. (useful for Cerianthus but otherwise 



not much help in the Woods Hole region) . 

 Hand, C, 1955. The sea anemones of central California. Part 111. The ^contia- 



rian anemones. Wasmann J. Biol., L3: 189-251. (synonymies and redescriptions 



of several Woods Hole species) . 

 Hand, C, 1957. Another seaanemone from California. J. Wash. Acad. Sci., 47 : 



411-14. (Nematostel la) . 




28 Anthozoa 



Hargitt, C. W., 1914. The Anthozoa of the Woods Hole region. Bull. U. S. Bur. 



Fish., 32 (for 1912): 223-54. PI. 41-44. 

 Stephenson, T. A, 1928. The British Sea Anemones. Vol. I, 148 pp. (Ray Soc. Vol. 



113) London. 

 Stephenson, T. A., 1935. The British Sea Anemones. Vol. II, 426 pp. (Ray Soc. 



Vol. 121) . London. 



Admonitory note : Generic name changes may occasionally lead the experimentalist 

 using this manual to give way to Frustration and Despair. Let him remember, how- 

 ever, that systematists are professional gentlemen who are doing the best they 

 can, supported by such declarations as the following: 



OPINIONS AND DECLARATIONS RENDERED 



BY THE INTERNATIONAL COMMISSION 



ON ZOOLOGICAL NOMENCLATURE 



VOLUME I. Part 4. Pp. 23-30. 



1943 



DECLARATION 4 



On the need for avoiding intemperate language 



in discussions on zoological nomenclature 



DECLARATION. — In the opinion of the Commission the tendency to enter into pub- 

 lic polemics over matters which educated and refined professional gentlemen might 

 so easily settle in refined and diplomatic correspondence is distinctly unfavor- 

 able to a settlement of the nomenclatorial cases for which a solution is sought. 

 It may be assumed that the vast majority of zoologists agree with the Commission 

 in desiring results rather than polemics, and the Commission ventures to suggest 

 that results may be obtained more easily by the utmost consideration for the usual 

 rules of courtesy when discussing the views of others. 



The dangers attending the use of sarcasm and intemperate language in discus- 

 sions on zoological nomenclature were specially considered by the International 

 Commission on Zoological Nomenclature at their Session held at Monaco in March 

 1913 during the Ninth International Congress of Zoology. The Commission consid- 

 ered that this guestion was sufficiently pressing to reguire special treatment in 

 their report to the Congress. In framing that report the Commission accordingly 

 devoted paragraphs (68) and (69) to this subject. 



2. Paragraph (68) of that report reads as follows: — 



(68) Intemperate Language . --Whether or not it be an actual fact, appearances 

 to that effect exist that if one author changes or corrects the names used by an- 

 other writer, the latter seems inclined to take the change as a personal offense. 

 The explanation of this fact (or appearance, as the case may be) is not entirely 

 clear. If one person corrects the grammar of another, this action seems to be in- 

 terpreted as a criticism upon the good breeding or education of the latter person. 

 Nomenclature has been called "the grammar of science" and possibly there is some 

 inborn feeling that changes in nomenclature involve a reflection upon one's educa- 

 tion, culture and breeding. Too freguently there follows a discussion in which 

 one or the other author so far departs from the paths of diplomatic discussion, 

 that he seems to give more of less foundation to the view that there is something 

 in his culture subject to criticism. It is with distinct regret that the Com- 

 mission notices the tendency to sarcasm and intemperate language so noticeable 

 in discussions which should be not only of the most friendly nature, especially 

 since a thorough mutual understanding is so valuable to an agreement, but which 

 are complicated and rendered more difficult of results by every little departure 

 from those methods adopted by professional gentlemen. 




Chapter V 



29 



PHYLUM CTENOPHORA 



The "comb jellies", although classified as coelenterates, are now generally regarded 

 as a phylum distinct from the proper coelenterates or Cnidaria. Ctenophores possess 

 biradial symmetry, an aboral sensory area, and 8 meridional rows of fused cilia (paddle- 

 plates) ; they lack the circumoral tentacles and nematocysts characteristic of the Cnidar- 

 ia, and show none of the polymorphism and attached "polypoid" stages so characteristic 

 of the latter phylum. They are essentially marine, although some are common in brack- 

 ish waters as well. 



KEY TO COMMON WOODS HOLE CTENOPHORA 

 1. Possessing a pair of tentacles, each with small side branches 

 1. Without tentacles; body in the form of a flattened sac with 



Class TENTACULATA 2 



wide mouth 



Class NUDA, Order Beroida 4 



2. Body of simple outline, without oral lobes; tentacles long but 



retractile into sheaths; gastric branches end blindly Order Cydippida 3 



2. Body with 2 large oral lobes, and 4 smaller lobes (auricles), 



body somewhat triangular in outline; tentacles inconspicuous, 



without sheaths; gastric branches fuse to form loops in oral 



lobes; Order Lobata, Mnemiopsis leidyi 



Body firm, egg shaped to nearly spherical; up to 20 mm long; 

 not flattened; tentacles long, with many side branches 



3. Body of oval outline but compressed, resembling a flattened 

 Pleurobrachia; rare 



Pleurobrachia pileus 



Mertensia ovum 



4. The side branches of the 8 meridional gastric canals beneath 

 the comb rows do not anastomose; generally north of Cape Cod 



4. Side branches of the 8 meridional gastric canals anastomose 



Beroe cucumis 



Beroe ovata 



ANNOTATED LIST OF CTENOPHORA 



Beroe cucumis Fabricius, 1780. A common species on the northern New England coast; rare 

 or occasional south of Cape Cod. 



Beroe ovata Chamisso and Eysenhardt, 1821. A southern species, irregular in occurrence 

 north of Delaware Bay. 



Mertensia ovum (Fabricius, 1780). An arctic species, the young of which occur occasion- 

 ally as far south as New Jersey. 



Mnemiopsis leidyi A. Agassiz , 1865. This is the commonest ctenophore of Woods Hole 



waters, especially in late summer and fall. Brilliantly luminescent when disturbed. 

 Often found to contain wormlike pink, immature stages of the sea anemone Edwardsia sp. 



Pleurobrachia pileus (Fabricius, 1780). An arctic species, found atWjocsHole in winter 

 and spring; usually not seen in July and August. 



REFERENCES 



Hyman, L. H. , Chapter VIII, Ctenophora, in_ "The Invertebrates", Vol. I, Protozoa through 



Ctenophora, 1940. 

 Mayer, A. G. , 1911. Ctenophores of the Atlantic Coast of North America. Carnegie Inst. 



of Washington, Publ. no. 162 : 1-58, 17 pi. 




30 Chapter VI 



PHYLUM PLATYHELMINTHES 



Class Turbellaria 



The Platyhelminthes comprise three classes of which two, the Trematoda (flukes) 

 and Cestoda (tapeworms), are parasitic and although well represented in the Woods 

 Hole region are not treated in this manual. Of the mostly free living class Tur- 

 bellaria, a few species of the orders Tricladida and Polycladida are well known to 

 investigators at the MBL, but there are a great many small forms belonging to the 

 orders Aceola, Rhabdocoela, and Alloeocoela which are not well known, and which 

 merit much further investigation. The work of Dr. Louise Bush in preparing the pre- 

 liminary key, check list, and illustrations of these smaller forms is gratefully 

 acknowledged. 



METHODS OF COLLECTING AND HANDLING TURBELLARIANS 



by Dr. Louise Bush 



Turbellarians may be collected in several ways. Many of the larger forms will 

 come to the top of the water or crawl to the surface of mud or debris which has been 

 allowed to stand in containers in the laboratory for several hours or days. This is 

 the time honored method and works well for large marine species and for many fresh 

 water forms, but the smaller marine species do not survive crowding or standing in 

 containers with other plants and animals for more than a few hours; to obtain these, 

 materials must be examined as soon after collection as possible. Stones, algae, de- 

 bris, and especially hydroids and other materials from pile scrapings should be washed 

 or stirred up thoroughly in sea water and the water poured off and examined under a 

 dissecting binocular. Turbellaria may be found in such washings swimming about, mov- 

 ing beneath the surface film, or crawling about on the bottom or sides of the con- 

 tainer. Hand sorting of debris under a dissecting microscope may also be resorted 

 to, but does not seem to be more effective than washing and is much more time con- 

 suming. 



Examination of the animals should first be made as they swim or crawl about. A 

 familiar species may often be recognized by color, shape, and type of movement, but 

 for exact determination, careful study of compressed specimens, of permanent mounts, 

 and often of serial sections is necessary. The general student may make a tentative 

 determination and learn something of the structure of these animals by mounting them 

 on a slide so that they are slightly flattened by the coverslip. This may be accom- 

 plished by judicious control of the amount of water on the slide or by ringing the 

 coverslip with vaseline and compressing the material while observing it under the 

 microscope. 



The following key uses characters which may be easily seen, and should enable 

 the student to identify some of the commoner species found at Woods Hole, but in 

 cases where examination of permanent mounts or sections is mandatory for specific 

 identification the key will lead only to some of the higher categories. Figure 

 references are to Plate 4. 



PRELIMINARY KEY TO COMMON TURBELLARIANS 



by Dr. Louise Bush 



1. Large: over 5 mm in length. Body flattened and leaflike 

 and usually showing the pattern produced by the ramifica- 

 tions of the gut (other color patterns may also be present) : 



Order TRICLADIDA, see annotated list on page 32. 



Order POLYCLADIDA, see keys to species on page 36. 



1. Small: under 5 mm and often from 1-2 mm in length. Body 

 sh-'-'pe varies from oval and flattened to cylindrical to 

 almost globular or egg shaped 2 




Turbellaria 31 



2. Without a clearly defined gut; food lies in center of 

 body more or less irregularly surrounded by parenchyma 

 cells. Statocyst present but eyes absent 

 Order ACOELA 3 



2. With a true gut which can be distinguished by its clear- 

 ly defined outer wall. Eyes may be lacking or one or 

 two pairs present. Statocysts only occasionally present 



Orders RHABDOCOELA and ALLOEOCOELA 7 



3. Posterior end of body with indentation in which are 

 found 1-5 small tail-like appendages (fig. la, b, c) . 

 Color reddish-orange to orange 



Polychoerus caudatus 



3. No tail-like appendage present 4 



4. Yellowish area at anterior end of body with dark red- 

 dish-purple to black pigment scattered in the middle 

 of body. Under higher magnification this pigment is 

 seen to be in violet to purple individual cells (fig. 2) 



Aphanostoma diversicolor 



4. Color otherwise 5 



5. Penis doubled and appearing as two distinct structures 

 side by side at the very posterior end of body (fig. 3) . 

 There may be more than one species of this genus in our 

 area but at least one has elongated hairs or spines over 

 the surface of the body and a yellow color from pigmented 

 cells in the parenchyma 



Childia groenlandica 



5. Penis single and this, with accessory structures, may be 



seen in posterior third of the body 6 



6. Color orange to dark orange or reddish -brown, the pig- 

 ment occurring in irregularly shaped little nodules 

 over the surface of the body. Found creeping on the 

 surface of mud below low tide (fig. 4) 



Anaperus gardineri 



6. Color pale tan to transparent. Sperm masses and eggs 

 easily seen scattered at posterior end of body: several 

 species of small acoels, mostly belonging to the family 



Proporidae 



7. Asexual repioduction evident as transverse partitions 

 formed or partly formed at intervals along the rather 

 transparent body (fig. 5). Sexual reproduction rare. 



Eyes lacking Micros tomum davenporti 



7. Sexual reproduction only; no transverse divisions 8 



8. Statocyst present. Body elongated with a squarish post- 

 erior end containing adhesive papillae, the whole being 

 used for attachment (fig. 6). See check list for com- 

 ment on this form Monocelis sp. 



8. Statocyst absent 9 



9. Body chalky white, with or without pigmented areas. 



Form "chunky", almost circular in cross section 10 



9. Body more or less transparent or otherwise colored but 

 not chalky white. Form usually somewhat flattened 

 or more or less elongated 11 




32 



Turbellaria 



10. 



10. 

 10. 



11. 



11. 



11. 

 12. 



12. 



13. 



13. 



13. 



One pair of eyes with a network of black pigment between 

 and around them so that the animal appears to have a 

 distinct black spot on the anterior end. Pharynx just 

 behind eyes. Penis without cuticular stylet at poster- 

 ior end of body (fig. 7) Plagiostomum sp. 



Two pairs of eyes. A ciliated groove extends across 

 body just behind the eyes. Pharynx in posterior half 



of body (fig. 8) Monoophorum sp. 



One pair of eyes without associated black pigment. 

 Ciliated groove lacking 

 young of Plagiostomum sp. or other alloeocoels 



Proboscis at anterior end of body, protruded through a 

 pore at the apex in catching prey. Pharynx is separate 



and located near the middle of the body 



Tongue-like process lying in front of the eyes in the 

 cavity with the pharynx, may be protruded through the 

 subapical mouth (fig. 9) 



12 



Woodsholia lilliei 



No protrusible proboscis or tongue-like process present 13 



A straight penis stylet appearing like a conspicuous 

 needle at posterior end of body (fig. 10) 



Gyratris sp. 



Penis stylet otherwise; may be curved or coiled 



other species of the KALYPTORHYNCHIA 



Pharynx simple, that is, not conspicuously muscular. 

 Mouth appears as a more or less oval opening just back 

 of eyes. Penis stylet curved, needle-like, at poster- 

 ior end of body. Adhesive papillae on rounded poster- 

 ior end of body (fig. 11) 



Macrostomum sp. 



Pharynx doliiform, that is, appears as a bulbous mus- 

 cular organ just posterior to the eyes (fig. 12) 



one of the species of DALYELLIOIDA 



Pharynx rosulate, that is, round and closing as if by a 

 purse string. Mostly fresh water species 



various species of the TYPHLOPLANOIDA 



ANNOTATED LIST OF ACOELA, RHABDOCOELA, and ALLOEOCOELA 

 by Dr. Louise Bush 

 Order Acoela 



Anaperus gardineri Graff, 1911. This species has been taken since 1953 for use in 

 the Invertebrate Zoology Course from mud brought in from below low tide mark 

 in Great Harbor. Many of these worms come to the surface after the mud has 

 stood for two or three days in the laboratory. They do not seem to be present 

 in the Eel Pond. 



Aphanostoma diversicolor Oersted, 1845. This species occurs on both sides of the 



North Atlantic, and is common at Woods Hole on algae. It is easily recognized 

 by its coloration and by the more pointed ends of the body as compared to other 

 common acoels. 



Childia groenlandica (Levinsen, 1879). Hyman (1959) considers the Childia spinosa 

 described by Graff (1911) from Woods Hole to be a synonym of the widespread 

 C_. groenlandica . 



P olychoerus caudatus Mark, 1892. Formerly common in the Woods Hole region and reg- 

 ularly taken both in dredgings and on Ulva from pilings and rocks. Recently 




Turbellaria 33 



it has not been reported. Its use in embryological studies is described in Cos- 

 tello et al. (1957) . 



Order Rhabdocoela 

 Suborder Opisthandropora 



Macros tomum spp. Species of this genus in the Woods Hole fauna are probably 



most easily recognized by the characteristic curved penis stylet and the simple 

 pharynx located at the anterior end of the gut close behind the eyes. Specimens 

 common on Fucus at Nobska Point have adhesive papillae at the caudal end and 

 conspicuous hairlike setae scattered among their cilia. 



Microstomum davenporti Graff, 1911. These animals have a characteristic appearance 

 and are easily recognized, since they are one of the few marine flatworms (the 

 only ones seen at Woods Hole) which regularly reproduce by transverse fission. 

 The cylindrical transparent body with the gut as a straight tube inside shows 

 clearly the development of transverse walls and new pharynges as division pro- 

 ceeds. When handled, those individuals in which division is nearly completed 

 usually break in two, so that one often gets only very short specimens on a 

 slide. 



Suborder Lecithophora 



Section Dalyellioida: Members of the family Dalyelliidae itself are mostly 

 fresh water forms, but the section includes a number of marine genera and species, 

 many of which are in the family Umagillidae and are endocommensal with marine in- 

 vertebrates, especially echinoderms. The group is poorly known at Woods Hole. 



Section Kalyptorhynchia : Includes Gyratrix sp. , characterized by having a pro- 

 boscis in a separate pocket opening anteriorly (fig. 10), and easily seen in the 

 living animal. 



Section Typhloplanoida: This group probably includes Woodsholia lilliei Graff, 

 1911, of which a few specimens are believed to have been taken in 1963. These have 

 a tongue-like process, difficult to see, in the pharynx. The penis sheath is char- 

 acteristic, and best seen in whole-mounts. 



Order Alloeocoela 



Suborder Cumulata: Species of this group seen at Woods Hole are thick and more 

 or less cylindrical in body form, chalky white in color, sometimes with black or 

 brown spots, stripes, bands, or reticulations. 



Monoophorum sp. Common on Ulva ; resembles a chalky white lump until disturbed, when 



it swims slowly away as a short cylindrical animal with two pairs of eyes and a 



stumpy tail. 

 Plagiostomum sp. Longer than Monoophorum , and with only one pair of eyes, which are 



so surrounded with black pigment that the head appears to have a single large 



dorsal spot. 



Suborder Seriata 



Monocelis sp. In 1911, Graff described from the Eel Pond amonoce lid which he placed 

 in a new genus, Myrmeciplana , distinguished from Monocelis by having sensory 

 hairs born on sensory papillae on the rostral end of the body; his species was 

 reported as being eyeless. Animals collected from the Eel Pond in 1963 resemble 

 Myrmeciplana , but have a pair of eyes in most cases, and also have the anterior 




34 



Figure 1. 



lb and lc . 

 Verrill 



Plate 4 



TURBELLARIA (except for po lye lads) 



Figures lb, lc, and 15 are redrawn from Verrill 

 (1892); rest redrawn from sources as cited or from 

 life by Dr. Louise Bush. Scale bars on all fig- 

 ures equal 1 mm. 



Polychoerus caudatus , with one "tail", after Graff. 



Rear of Polychoerus caudatus with 5 and 3 "tails", after 



2. Aphano stoma diversicolor , after Graff. 



3. Childia qroenlandica , from life. Actual size under one mm long. 



4. Anaperus qardineri , from life. 



5. Microstomum davenporti , from life. 



6. Monocelis sp. , from life. 



7. Plagiostomum sp., from life. 



8. Monoophorum sp., from life. 



9. Woodsholia lilliei (?)', from life. 



i 



10. Gyratrix sp., with proboscis shown extended at right, from life. 



11. Macrostomum sp. , from life. 



12. Unidentified dalyellioid, from life. 



13. Bdelloura sp., probably Candida , from life. 



14. Syncoelidium pellucidum , from life, showing the diagnostic fusion of 

 the hinder branches of the triclad gut. 



15. Procerodes wheatlandi , reconstructed outline from figures in Verrill. 



Abbreviations : 



a - adhesive papillae 



br - brain 



e - eyes 



eg - egg 



ge - genital pore 



m - mouth 



mp - muscles of proboscis 



o - ovary 



p - penis 



ph - pharynx 



pr - proboscis 



ps - penis stylet 



pu - purple cells 



s- sensory hairs 



sb - seminal bursa 



sp - sperm 



st - statocyst " 



su - sucker 



v - seminal vesicle 



vd - vas deference 



y - yolk gland 




Plate 4 



eg 



if 



7 




36 Turbellaria 



sensory hairs set in a thin area of epidermis and not on papillae. The worms 

 from the Eel Pond should be good class material: they are large (up to 4 mm 

 long) , can be reared in the laboratory, and regenerate readily. When kept in 

 Syracuse dishes and fed small bits of annelid worms, they laid eggs which dev- 

 eloped in about one week into small worms, like the adults except for undevel- 

 oped reproductive structures. 



Order Tricladida 



Although marine triclads are in general uncommon, Woods Hole has several spe- 

 cies. Bdelloura spp. (fig. 13) and Syncoelidium (fig. 14) are very easily found 

 as commensals on the gill-books and around the leg bases of Limulus . The follow- 

 ing annotated list may aid in the identification of the more common local triclads 

 (figure references are to Plate 4) : 



Bdelloura Candida (Girard, 1850) . Abundant on Limulus ; the name is usually applied 

 to any Bdelloura collected, although another species is also present. B. Can- 

 dida reaches a length of 15 mm, and has 60-100 testicular sacs on each side of 

 body. 



Bdelloura propingua Wheeler, 1894. This is described by William Morton Wheeler in 

 his paper on Syncoelidium. B. propingua reaches a length of 8 mm, and has a- 

 bout 170 testicular sacs on each side. 



Syncoelidium pellucidum Wheeler, 1894. Also found on Limulus but much less numer- 

 ous than Bdelloura spp. Length 3 mm with about 15 testicular sacs on each side. 

 The distinguishing feature of Syncoelidium is the fusion of the two posterior 

 branches of the gut, and the lack of a distinct posterior sucker. 



Procerodes wheatlandi (Girard, 1850) is considered by Hyman (1944) "to be at best 

 a geographic variant of P. littoralis " (Strom, 1768) which extends from New- 

 foundland to Scandinavia. P. littoralis in turn may or may not be conspecific 

 with Procerodes ( Gunda ) ulvae, which tolerates low and variable salinities and 

 is well known as an experimental animal in European studies of osmoregulation. 

 It is reported to be a small (5 mm long) dark animal with a pair of antero- 

 lateral tentacles and 2 eyes (fig. 15). 



Order Polycladida 



Several species of polyclads are common at Woods Hole, and others occur less 

 frequently. The key that follows is restricted to the commoner forms plus a couple 

 that were easily included; consult the annotated list for forms that do not "key 

 out" readily. Polyclads are in some cases very difficult to identify alive, and 

 well cleared whole mounts or even sagittal sections are needed for serious work. 

 In the key, only superficially visible chacteristics are employed; while this fac- 

 ilitates an approximation to an identification, anyone doing experimental work on 

 polyclads should be sure to fix material for determination by a qualified syste- 

 matist before publication. 



For fixation, Hyman recommends hot seawater saturated with mercuric chloride, 

 followed by thorough washing, dehydration in alcohol, and clearing in oil of win- 

 tergreen. (For details consult Bull. Amer. Mus. Nat. Hist., 100 : 269 e_t seq . ) 



KEY TO SOME OF THE POLYCLADS OF WOODS HOLE 

 (Figure references on polyclads are to Plate 5) 



1. Tentacles absent 7 



1. Tentacles present (either "marginal" at front edge, or 



arising dorsally near the brain) 2 




Polycladida 37 



2. Tentacles formed by upfolded anterior margin; thin undulated 

 margin; tentacles brownish on pale flesh colored ground; body 

 10-12 mm long (fig .1) Prostheceraeus maculosus 



2. Tentacles dorsal, in region of brain (not always obvious 



when one looks directly down on living animal (figs. 2-4) 3 



3. Marginal eyes present on edge of body in addition to more 



centrally placed eyes 4 



3. Marginal eyes absent (but others may be present) 5 



4. Body somewhat elongated, with distinct pattern of white or 



yellowish and brown cross-bars Stylochus zebra 



4. Body broadly elliptical, of various shades of cream, yellow, 



gray, or brown (figs. 3,4) Stylochus ellipticus 



5. Body oval, tentacles do not contain scattered eyes 6 



5. Body elongated, widened anteriorly, pointed posteriorly; 

 6-8 mm long; tentacles contain scattered eyes (fig. 2) ; 



body yellowish to pellucid with brownish spots Gnesioceros f loridana 



6. Generally found in mantle cavity of Busycon; color white 



Hoploplana inquilina 



6. Occasionally drifts in on Sargassum weed; color pattern of 



white reticulation on a brown ground Hoploplana qrubei 



7. Body yellowish to gray-brown; 8-12 mm long; slender, res- 

 embling a fresh-water planarian; eyes near brain, typically 

 4-5 on each side in a lengthwise row, and 2 set closely 



together a little to rear of each row (fig. 5) Euplana gracilis 



7. Eyes in 4 conspicuous clusters in area of brain (fig. 6); 



to be expected only north of the Cape Notoplana atomata 



ANNOTATED LIST OF POLYCLADS OF THE WOODS HOLE REGION 



Acerotisa baiae Hyman, 1940. Taken (Goodchild) at Lagoon Pond bridge (Hyman, 1952). 

 The genus Acerotisa lacks tentacles and has 2 eye clusters. A. baiae is small 

 (3 mm), translucent whitish. Not in key. 



Acerotisa notulata (Bosc, 1801) . A minute species that might occasionally drift 

 into Woods Hole on Sargassum (Hyman, 1952). Not in key. 



Coronadena mutabilis (Verrill, 1873) . A rare southern form; status at Woods Hole 

 uncertain. C. mutabilis lacks tentacles and has marginal eyes around anterior 

 half of body; gray to yellowish brown; 18 by 5 mm. Not in key. 



Euplana gracilis (Girard, 1850) . Reported abundant in Eel Pond and among masses of 

 sponges and hydroids on pilings. 



Eurylepta maculosa , see Prostheceraeus maculosus . 



G nesioceros f loridana (Pearse, 1938). A southern species, but recorded from eel 

 grass in Woods Hole and Quissett Harbors, also on sandy bottoms at 8-10 meters 

 (Hyman, 1939, 1940). There has been confusion about the name; it was once 

 wrongly referred to Imogine oculif era , and in Hyman ' s good description (1939) 

 it is called Gnesioceros verrilli . 



Gnesioceros sargassicola (Mertens, 1833). Has been taken from Sargassum in Vine- 

 yard Sound (Hyman, 1939). Color pellucid with brownish spots; shape charact- 

 eristic of genus, widened anteriorly, tapering to a pointed posterior end. 



Gnesiceros verrilli , see G. f loridana . 



Hoploplana qrubei (Graff, 1892) . Has been collected (Hadley) from Sargassum in 

 Vineyard Sound (Hyman, 1939). 



Hoploplana inquilina (Wheeler, 1894) . Described by William Morton Wheeler as Plano - 

 cer a inquilina , under which name its embryology was described by Surface in a 

 well known study. Occurs locally in the mantle cavity of Busycon canaliculatum 




38 Polycladida 



but further south has been reported from Thais and Urosalpinx (Hyman, 1944) . 



Imoqine oculif era . see Gnesioceros f loridana . 



" Leptoplana " . used by E. B. Wilson (1894) in an often cited cell lineage study, is 

 not a Woods Hole flatworm, but an unidentified species from Puget Sound, whose 

 actual genus cannot be determined. 



Leptoplana variabilis . see Notoplana atomata . 



Notoplana atomata (0. F. Muller, 1776). Hyman (1939) calls this the commonest poly- 

 clad of the North Atlantic shores, from northern Massachusetts to Scandinavia, 

 but there is doubt that it extends south into inshore waters of Woods Hole. It 

 has been reported from Nantucket. 



Planocera elliptica . see Stylochus ellipticus . 



Planocera inquilina . see Hoploplana ellipticus . 



Planocera nebulosa ; considered by Hyman (1944) a synonym of Stylochus ellipticus . 

 P. nebulosa was used in the Invertebrate Zoology Course Keys during the 1940 ' s 

 to refer to a greenish polyclad without marginal eyes, apparently following the 

 usage in Pratt's Manual (p. 188). Verrill (1892, p. 472) points out thaf'P. 

 nebulosa " has eyes that are difficult to see in the deeply colored living ani- 

 mals. It is probably a color variant of S. ellipticus . 



Prosthecereaus maculosus (Verrill, 1892) . Reported "in some abundance" on pilings 

 of Lagoon Pond bridge (Hyman, 1952) . This has been known as Eurylepta maculosa 

 up until 1952, when an anatomical restudy by Hyman necessitated its transfer to 

 Prosthecereaus . 



Stylochus ellipticus (Girard, 1850) . Under stones in shallow water and in tide 

 pools. Feeds on oysters and barnacles (Hyman, 1940). 



Stylochus zebra (Verrill, 1882) . Easily recognized by color pattern. Usually col- 

 lected from shells of Busycon occupied by the large hermit crab Pagurus polli - 

 carus . but also found free living on rocks and pilings. 



REFERENCES ON WOODS HOLE TURBELLARIA 



Bresslau, E., 1933. Turbellaria, in_ Kukenthal and Krumbach (eds.) Handbuch der Zo- 

 ologie , vol. II, Pt. l.(Wery complete general account with bibliography and 

 most complete outline available of classification, including lists of genera) . 



Costello, D. P., et al. , 1957. Methods of Obtaining and Handling Marine Eggs and 

 Embryos , MBL, Woods Hole (for Polychoerus and Hoploplana embryology and refer- 

 ences) . 



Graff, L. von. 1882. Monographie der Turbellarian I. Rhabdocoelida - 2 vols. Leip- 

 zig. (Many changes have made this classification out of date but the second 

 volume of plates is worth looking over) . 



Graff, L. von, 1911. Acoela, Rhabdocoela and Allocoela des Ostens der Vereinigten 

 Staaten von Amerika. Arbeiten aus den Zoologischen Institut zu Graz . IX Band, 

 no. 8_: 321-428, 6 pi. (Of interest because of descriptions and drawings of Ana - 

 perus, Childia and Woodsholia) . Same title, 1911, Z. wiss. Zool., 9J3: 1-108. 



Hyman, L. H. , 1939. Some polyclads of the New England coast, especially of the 

 Woods Hole region. Biol. Bull. 76_: 127-52. 



, 1940. The polyclad flatworms of the Atlantic coast of the United 



States and Canada. Proc. U. S. Nat. Mus . 89_: 449-95. 



. 1944. Marine Turbellaria from the Atlantic coast of North America. 



Amer . Mus. Novitates, no. 1266: 1-15. 

 , 1951. The Invertebrates, Vol. II. Platyhelminthes and Rhynchocoela. 



McGraw Hill, N. Y. (The most useful general reference on Turbellaria) . 

 , 1952. Further notes on the turbellarian fauna of the Atlantic coast 



of the United States. Biol. Bull. 103_: 195-200. 



, 1959. Some turbellarians from the coast of California. Amer. Mus. 



Novitates, no. 1943: 1-17 (Synonymy of Childia). 

 Meixner, J., 1938. Turbellaria, in Die Tierwelt der Nord- und Ostsee . Leipzig 



part IV: 1-146. (Mostly on biology and ecology of the turbellaria but includes 




Turbellaria 39 



an outline of classification which differs from that of Bresslau and has some 



advantages as a system) . 

 Verrill, A. E. , 1892. Marine planarians of New England. Trans. Conn. Acad. Arts 



& Sci., 8: 459-520, Pi. 40-44. 

 Wheeler, W. M. , 1894. Syncoelidium pellucidum , a new marine triclad. J. Morph. , 



9: 167-94, PI. VIII. (Contains also the description of Bdelloura propinqua ) . 




40 Chapter VII 



PHYLUM NEMERTEA (RHYNCHOCOELA) 



Nemertean worms are almost always easily recognized as such by their soft, elon- 

 gated, narrow, highly contractile, unsegmented bodies, lacking setae and covered by 

 cilia. A few species are common in the Woods Hole region, but about 30 may occur. 

 The group is excellently discussed in Coe ' s "Biology of the Nemerteans of the Atlan- 

 tic Coast of North America" (1943), which anyone making a serious study of the group 

 must have at hand. However, identification by the beginner attempting to use the 

 extensive keys in Coe ' s work is made difficult by the fact that the division of ne- 

 merteans into orders is based in part upon such internal features as the arrange- 

 ment of muscle layers in the body wall. The general descriptive features below may 

 be useful in deciding the probable order in which to place an unknown specimen. 

 Figure references on nemerteans are to Plate 5. 



Class ANOPLA: Mouth posterior to brain; proboscis not armed with stylets. 



Order Paleonemertea. In general, paleonemerteans are slender, soft, and ex- 

 tensile, heads somewhat blunt, bodies not much flattened; ocelli and long- 

 itudinal cephalic slits are lacking. 



Order Heteronemertea. Heads characteristically rather snakelike, with marked 

 lateral slits (figs. 7, 12), but Parapolia and Zvqeupolia are exceptions. 

 A small caudal cirrus (fig. 12) is found in Cerebratulus , Micrura , and 

 Zvqeupolia . 



Class ENOPLA: Mouth anterior to brain; proboscis armed with one or more stylets 

 (figs. 8-10) except in Bdellonemertea. 



Order Hoplonemertea. The stylets are diagnostic (flatten animals cautiously 

 beneath cover slip or between microscope slides and examine by transmit- 

 ted light) . 



Order Bdellonemertea. One species, commensal in mantle cavities of bivalve 



molluscs. Does not much resemble a nemertean, but has a leech-like form 

 with posterior sucker (fig. 11). 



KEY TO THE MORE COMMON NEMERTEANS OF THE WOODS HOLE REGION 



1. Free-living 3 



1. In mantle cavity of bivalves or in egg mass or gills of crabs 2 



2. In mantle cavity of bivalves; intestine convoluted and with- 

 out diverticula; stylet apparatus absent; mouth and proboscis 

 opening united; posterior sucking disk present (fig. 11); 



uncommon: Order BDELLONEMERTEA Malacobdella qrossa 



2. Among eggs or gills of crabs; proboscis rudimentary, with no 



accessory stylets Carcinonemertes carcinophila 



3. In marine or brackish waters 4 



3. In fresh water; with 4 or 6 ocelli; color reddish or pink- 

 ish; length up to 20 mm Prostoma rubrum 



4. Generally small worms, with blunt, flattened heads; usually 

 oblique cephalic grooves mark rear corners of head; ocelli 

 usually obvious (4 or numerous) ; presence of proboscis sty- 

 lets diagnostic Order HOPLONEMERTEA 5 



(Note: Prostoma and Carcinonemertes , keyed out above, are also 



in this order) 

 4. Not referable to Hoplonemertea 15 




Nemertea 41 



5. Ocelli 4, set as corners of a square; small worm, often 



colorful 6 



5. Ocelli otherwise 11 



6. Body of slender cylindrical form; of firmer consistency 



than other nemerteans of similar small size (10-20 mm); color 

 varies; head not demarcated from body; 4 ocelli in a square 

 Oerstedia dorsalis 



6. Body of short, flattened form; head demarcated by incon- 

 spicuous transverse grooves; 4 large, occasionally frag- 

 mented, ocelli; worms small and variously colored Tetrastemma 7 



7. Body usually with more or less conspicuous longitudinal 



stripes 8 



7. Body lacking well defined longitudinal stripes 9 



8. Body rather slender, yellow, with 2 broad longitudinal 



brown stripes Tetrastemma elegans 



8. Body short and broad; usually green, with one or 2 longi- 

 tudinal yellow stripes and 6 green stripes near tip of head 



Tetrastemma vittatum 



9. White or translucent with superficial flecks of white . . Tetrastemma wilsoni 



9. Yellow, rosy, red, or green 10 



10. Pale green or yellowish, head white or cream colored . . . Tetrastemma candidum 



10. Yellow or rosy, often spotted with brown; with band of 

 dark pigment connecting the 2 ocelli on the same side of 



the head Tetrastemma vermiculus 



11. Ocelli extend posteriorly along lateral nerve cords beyond 

 brain; basis of central stylet cylindrical and sharply trun- 

 cated or concave at posterior end (fig. 9) Zygonemertes virescens 



11. Ocelli do not extend posteriorly beyond brain; basis of 

 central stylet truncate-conical or pear shaped and usually 



rounded at posterior end 12 



12. Only one pair of ocelli, situated near tip of head; color 



of body orange-red Amphiporus bioculatus 



12. Ocelli 6 to 12 on each side of head 13 



13. Ocelli in a single row along each side of head (fig. 10); 

 blood vessels bright red, and conspicuous in life; color 



of body usually pale yellow or rosy /Amphiporus cruentatus 



13. Ocelli in an irregular double row on each side or scat- 

 tered 14 



14. Epidermis very thick and soft, secreting much viscid mucus 



when stimulated; movements of body often leech-like .... Amphiporus griseus 



14. Epidermis thin and firm, secreting but little mucus when 



stimulated; moves by creeping Amphiporus ochraceus 



Note: The following dichotomy involves separating the orders PALEONEMERTEA 

 and HETERONEMERTEA . The mouth in both is posterior to brain; proboscis 

 stylets are absent. 



15. Not possessing ocelli, or longitudinal cephalic grooves, or 

 caudal cirrus; worms slender and not over 150 mm long 

 probably Order PALEONEMERTEA 16 



15. Any large local nemerteans; any nemerteans with deep longi- 

 tudinal cephalic slits, or with a caudal cirrus (but this is 

 often broken off), o_r with ocelli but without stylets 

 probably Order HETERONEMERTEA 18 




42 Nemertea 



16. Bodies filiform (lengths up to 150 mm, diameter up to one mm 17 



16. Body much flattened in posterior region (width 2-5 mm) ; 

 head changeable in shape, broader than adjacent body, flat, 

 rounded or emarginate anteriorly; color pale reddish or yel- 

 lowish Car i noma tremephoros 



17. Very slender, filiform body; head broad; mature worms up 

 to 25 mm long; color whitish; forms delicate mucoid tubes 



Tubulanus pellucidus 



17. Very slender, filiform body; head long, pointed; mouth far 

 back of brain; length up to 100 mm; characteristically coils 



body into a close spiral Procephalothrix spiralis 



fclote: A worm of similar appearance, but not tending to con- 

 tract into a spiral, is Cephalothrix linearis , not reported 

 south of Cape Cod) . 



18. Without longitudinal cephalic grooves 19 



18. With longitudinal cephalic grooves 20 



19. Caudal cirrus present; head narrow, without oblique ceph- 

 alic grooves Zygeupolia rubens 



19. Caudal cirrus absent; head broad; with oblique cephalic 



grooves Parapolia aurantiaca 



20. Caudal cirrus absent; body long and slender, filiform in 

 some species, rounded or flattened in others, very contrac- 

 tile; ocelli present in most species Lineus 21 



20. Caudal cirrus present; body not very slender, ocelli pre- 

 sent or absent 23 



21. With conspicuous median dorsal stripe, but without trans- 

 verse markings; reddish brown or olive, with median dorsal 

 stripe of white or yellow extending whole length of body 



and head (fig. 7) Lineus bicolor 



21. Without conspicuous median dorsal stripe 22 



22. Head rather broad, cephalic grooves short; body contracts 



by shortening and thickening -- not by coiling in spiral .... Lineus ruber 



22. Head narrow, cephalic grooves long; body contracts by 



coiling in spiral Lineus socialis 



23. Body firm, long and ribbon-like, sometimes very large; much 

 flattened in intestinal region, with thin lateral margins 

 and well adapted for swimming; body less contractile than in 

 other genera; mouth large and elongated, ocelli absent (fig. 



12 ) Cerebratulus lacteus 



23. Body slender, flattened in intestinal region, but with lateral 

 margins not thin; incapable of swimming; mouth small and round; 



ocelli present or absent Micrura 24 



24. Head with a row of 4-6 ocelli on each side Micrura af finis 



24. Head without ocelli 25 



25. Color of body red or reddish 26 



25. Color of body whitish or pale yellowish; may show a tinge of 



red or orange anteriorly Micrura albida 



26. Deep red or purplish red; common Micrura leidy i 



26. Pale red, yellowish-red, or brownish-red Mi crura caeca 




Nemertea 43 



ANNOTATED LIST OF NEMERTEANS 



CLASS ANOPLA 



Order Paleonemertea 



C arinoma tremaphoros Thompson, 1900. Common in sand, clay, mud, or under stones. 

 Cepha lothr ix linearis (Rathke, 1799) . Not reported south of Cape Cod. 

 Proce p halothrix spir alis (Coe, 1930) . Common. 

 Tub ulanus pel lucidus (Coe, 1895) . Not very common. 



Order Heteronemertea 



Cerebratulus lacteus (Leidy, 1851) . The commonest large nemertean; classical embry- 

 ological material. 



Lineus bicolor Verrill, 1892. Common; usually subtidal. 



Lineus ruber (O. F. Muller, 1771). Often in low or variable salinity; color varies. 



Lineus socialis (Leidy, 1855). Common; often gregarious. 



Micrura aff inis (Girard, 1853). A northern species; below 10 m off Martha's Vine- 

 yard. 



Micrura albida Verrill, 1879. Not reported south of Cape Cod. 



Micrura caeca Verrill, 1895. Under stones or in sand. 



Micrura leidyi (Verrill, 1892) . Common in protected bays. 



Parapolia aurantiaca Coe, 1895. 



Zygeupolia ru bens (Coe, 1895). Abundant in sand in bays and estuaries. 



CLASS ENOPLA 

 Order Hoplonemertea 



Amphiporus bioculatus Mcintosh, 1873. Common, subtidally in Vineyard Sound. 



Amphiporus cruentatus Verrill, 1879. Common locally in Woods Hole area. 



Amphiporus griseus (Stimpson, 1857). Occasional at Woods Hole. 



Amphiporus ochraceus (Verrill, 1873) . Common in Woods Hole area. 



Carinonemertes carcinophila (Kolliker, 1845). 



Oerstedia dorsa lis (Abildgaard, 1806) . Locally abundant, among growth on rocks and 



pilings . 

 Ototyph loneme rtes pellucid a Coe, 1943. A minute form. Not in key . The genus is 



unique in possessing statocysts. 

 Prostoma rubrum (Leidy, 1850). In fresh water swamps and ponds. Coe reports a 



green variety in a cedar swamp near Woods Hole. 

 T etrastemma candid um (Muller, 1874). Common. 

 T etrastemma eleqans (Girard, 1852) . Occasional. 

 Tetrastemm a vermiculus (Quatref ages , 1846). Common. 



T etrastemma vittatum Verrill, 1874. Occasional, in protected muddy situations. 

 Tetrastemma wilsoni Coe, 1943. Among Bryozoa, sponges, etc. on pilings. 

 Zygonemertes virescens (Verrill, 1879) . Common. 



Order Bdellonemertea 



Mala cobdella g rossa (0. F. Muller, 1776). In mantle cavity of Mya . Mercenaria , 

 O stre a and other bivalves. Not common around Woods Hole. M. obesa and M. 

 mercenaria of Verrill are synonyms. 



REFERENCES 



Coe, W. R., 1943. Biology of the Nemerteans of the Atlantic Coast of North Amer- 

 ica. Trans. Conn. Acad. Arts & Sci., 3_5: 129-328. 



Verrill, A. E. , 1892. The marine nemerteans of New England and adjacent waters. 

 Trans. Conn. Acad. Arts & Sci., 8: 328-456, pi. 33-39. 



McCaul. W. E. , 1963. Rhynchocoela : Nemerteans from marine and estuarine waters of 

 Virginia. J. Elisha Mitchell Sci. Soc . , 79: 111-124. 




44 



Plate 5 



VARIOUS UNSEGMENTED WORMS 



Polycladida (figs. 1-6), Nemertea (figs. 7-12), Sipuncul- 

 oidea (figs. 13, 14), Nematomorpha (figs. 15-18). Figs. 

 11, 12, 15 by Mrs. Emily Reid; figs. 13, 14, 16-18 by 

 Bruce Shearer. Scales various. 



Fig. 1. Prostheceraeu s maculosus . outline to show marginal tentacles; 

 note cerebral and tentacular eyes. 



2. Gnesioceros f loridana , simplified after Hyman (1939) to show body 

 outline, cerebral and tentacular eyes. 



3. Stv l ochus ellipticus , simplified, showing tentacles and eyes. 



4. Stvlochus ellipticus . viewed from side to show dorsal tentacles, and 

 marginal, tentacular, and cerebral eyes. 



5. Euplana gracilis , from life, showing pattern of cerebral and 

 "tentacular" eyes. Note that actual tentacles are absent. 



6. Notoplana atomata, outline of body and pattern of eyes, simplified 

 after Hyman (1939). 



7. Lineus bicolor (Heteronemertea) , head in dorsal view, from life, 

 showing left cephalic slit and eyes. 



8. Amphiporus ochraceus (Hoplonemertea) , proboscis stylets as seen in 



a worm flattened on a slide; central stylet on pear shaped basis and 

 accessory stylets in 2 lateral pouches. Drawn from a photo taken by 

 Dr. W. E. McCaul. 



9. Zvqonemertes virescens , head of older animal with many eyes, stylet 

 with truncated basis. After Coe. 



10. Amphiporus cruentatus , head and stylet. After Coe. 



11. Malacobdella grossa . After Verrill. 



12. Cerebratulus lacteus (Heteronemertea), whole animal with head in 

 ventral view, showing mouth, left cephalic slit, proboscis pore an- 

 teriorly, and caudal cirrus. After Verrill. 



13. Golfingia gouldi , from life; one with extended introvert showing 

 tentacles, other with introvert withdrawn; about half natural size. 



14. P hascolion strombi , with extended introvert; much enlarged (scale 

 bar equals one mm) . 



15. N ectonema agilis , impression of the worm as seen swimming. About 

 natural size. 



16. Nectonema agilis , anterior end of living specimen much contracted 

 after shedding eggs. Note 2 rows of natatory bristles. 



17. Nectonem a agilis , anterior end of relaxed, living specimen, prior 

 to shedding of eggs. 



18. Nect onema agilis , posterior end of the above specimen. 




Plate 5 




46 Chapter VIII 



OTHER UNSEGMENTED WORMS 



1. PHYLUM ASCHELMINTHES 



Here are included a number of classes (sometimes regarded as phyla) of pseudo- 

 coelomate types, most of which are either absent from the local marine fauna (Pria- 

 pulida) or of such small size, diversity, and great number of species as to make 

 their inclusion in these keys impractical (Rotifera, Gastrotricha, Kinorhyncha, 

 Nematoda) . The best general reference on aschelminth groups, and the first source 

 of information when one encounters an unfamiliar member of them, is Hyman's "The 

 Invertebrates", Vol. Ill: "Acanthocephala, Aschelminthes, and Entoprocta" , 1951. 



The remaining class, Nematomorpha or Gordiacea, has one marine order, Nectone- 

 matoidea, represented by the single genus Nectonema . N. agilis Verrill, 1879 can 

 be taken at a night light near the breakwater at the U. S. Fish and Wildlife lab- 

 oratory in Woods Hole. It resembles a whitish "horsehair snake" provided with a 

 double row of fine natatory bristles (Plate 5, figs. 15-18) with a body up to one 

 mm in diameter and 20 cm long, and swims with a remarkable rapid, undulatory mo- 

 tion. The young stages are reported to be parasitic in several species of true 

 crabs and hermit crabs on the coast of France, but the life cycle at Woods Hole 

 has never been observed. Hyman (loc. cit) provides the most helpful general ac- 

 count of Nectonema . 



2. PHYLUM SIPUNCULOIDEA 



The unsegmented wormlike creatures formerly lumped as "Gephyreans" include 

 three groups now commonly accorded phylum status: Priapulida, Sipunculoidea, and 

 Echiuroidea (the last, however, is again joined to the annelids by Hyman). At 

 Woods Hole, only the Sipunculoidea are represented, intertidally and in shallow 

 water, by Golf ingia g ouldi (Pourtal^s, 1851) (Plate 5, fig. 13), and by Phasco - 

 lion strombi (Montagu, 1804) (fig. 14), a very small worm from 10 meters and 

 deeper off the Elizabeth Islands near Woods Hole, living in deserted gastropod 

 shells or in tubes of Hydroide s , Pectinari a , Hyalinoecia , or other worms. 



Golf ingia oouldi has long been known as Phascolosoma gouldi and since there 

 is no question about the species, experimental biologists should be careful to 

 use the specific name to avoid confusion with certain common sipunculids to which 

 the generic name Phascolosoma has now been transferred (e.g. Phascolosoma agassizi , 

 formerly Physcosoma, of the West Coast, a species far less euryhaline than the 

 Woods Hole Golf ingia gouldi ) . The reasons for the unfortunate shift of names 

 are, in brief: Phascolos oma was established as a genus in 1828 by Leuckhart, 

 with type species Phascolosoma granulatum of the Mediterranean. Later, in 1866, 

 Quatref ages broke Leuckhart ' s genus into subgenera and used P_. granulatum as the 

 type of a new subgenus Phymosomum . This was amended to Phymosoma by Salenka, 

 and raised to generic rank in 1883. Phymosoma , being found preoccupied, was 

 changed in 1897 to Physcoso ma. This whole procedure was in clear violation of 

 nomenclatorial rules, according to which the type species of Phascolosoma should 

 have retained its name. In 1952, Fisher put P hyscosoma back into its proper 

 category of Pha scolosoma , but this left the group long known as Phascolosoma with- 

 out a name. The "next available" name for Phascolosoma gouldi was Golf ingia , and 

 this solution seems to have been generally accepted. 



REFERENCES ON SIPUNCULIDS 



Fisher, W. K. , 1952. The Sipunculid Worms of California ... , Proc. U. S. Nat. 



Mus. , 102 : 371-450. 

 Gerould, J. M. , 1913. The sipunculids of the eastern coast of North America. 



Proc. U. S. Nat. Mus., 4±: 373-437. 




Chapter IX 47 



PHYLUM ANNELIDA 



The Annelida or segmented worms have, as a phylum, shown remarkable evolutionary 

 success in adapting to the marine, fresh water, and terrestrial habitats. Among the 

 classes of Annelida, the Polychaeta are the typical marine representatives, although 

 members of the other classes are to be found as well. 



Class Hirudinea (Leeches) 



Leeches are far less common in the sea than in fresh water, except for one fam- 

 ily, Ichthyobdellidae. In the Woods Hole region the following may be encountered 

 attached to fishes; the group, however, needs restudy in this area: 



Branchellion raveneli (Girard, 1851) . On the sting ray, Myliobatis fremmviller . 

 Easily recognized by the leaf like gills along the sides of its body. 



Ichthvobdella funduli Verrill, 1872. Reported on Fundulus heteroclitus . Body 

 smooth, annulated, greenish; 2 large and 2 small eyes. 



Ichthyobdella rapax (Verrill, 1873). On the summer flounder, Paralichthys dentatus . 

 Body in extension long, slender, rounded, 3-4 cm, long, dark olive with row of 

 rectangular white spots along each side. 



Trachelobdella vividus (Verrill, 1872). Body with two distinct regions; narrow an- 

 teriorly and wide posteriorly; brown to purplish; about 2.5 cm long. On skates 

 and rays; apparently not common. 



Reference: Knight -Jones, E. W. , 1962. The systematics of marine leeches. App. B. 



in "Leeches (Hirudinea) Their Structure, Physiology, etc.", K. H. Mann, Pergamon 

 Press. 



Class Oligochaeta 



Oligochaete annelids are characteristically fresh water or terrestrial; however 

 there are some 10 species reported from marine or brackish waters of the New England 

 coast, and some are very commonly encountered in shore collecting in the region of 

 Woods Hole. Identification requires study of the internal anatomy, and no key is at 

 present available other than that given by Moore: 



Moore, J. P., 1905. Some marine Oligochaeta of New England. Proc. Acad. Nat. Sci. 

 Phi la., 5J7: 373-399, pi. 32-33. 



Class Archiannelida 



Archiannelids have, as the name implies, been regarded as possibly primitive 

 forms, although many zoologists now prefer to regard them as secondarily simplified 

 and very small derivatives of various polychaete families. They are characteristic- 

 ally tiny marine worms, in sand, mud, or among algae, with few setae, parapodia re- 

 duced or lacking, and often with external ciliation persisting in the adult. Be- 

 cause of their very small size, archiannelids may be more common than is generally 

 supposed; however, only one species of Dinophilus is collected regularly at Woods 

 Hole. The morphology of Dinophilus (although not of a species reported from Woods 

 Hole) is described by Nelson (1907). 



The species of archiannelids reported from the Woods Hole region include: 



Dinophilus gardineri A. Moore, 1899. Reddish in color; 6 segments; body with cil- 

 iated rings but with no setae; occurs in brackish water such as Lillie's Ditch 

 and the Eel Pond at Woods Hole. Figure 49 (Plate 8) is probably of this species. 



Dinophilus pygmaeus Verrill, 1892. Described as whitish, of 5 body segments, about 

 0.7 mm long, and occurring on pilings at Woods Hole. 



Chaetogordius canaliculars J. P. Moore, 1904. Slender, filiform, 30 mm long, with 

 a pair of small tentacles; posterior 10-12 segments with setae. 




48 Annelida 



REFERENCE 



Nelson, A. J., 1907. The morphology of Dinophilus conklini n. sp. Proc. Acad. Nat. 

 Sci. Phi la., 59: 82-143, PI. 12-13. 



Class Polychaeta 



Polychaetes of the Woods Hole area are extremely numerous and diverse. Their 

 treatment in a key is rendered difficult by the fact that, although the polychaetes 

 can be divided into a large number of families, there is no real agreement as to how 

 these families may be grouped into orders. The concept of a Family in the Polychaeta 

 is important and practical for the student to grasp, for the reason that the basic 

 structural features that determine a family also determine a way of life. With a 

 little practice, most families may be readily recognized on sight, and many problems 

 of keying are thus reduced to the level of genera and species, where even the spec- 

 ialist may have to make a close examination. The problem of identifying certain fam- 

 ilies is simplified by attention to the very characteristic tubes formed by some. 



There is still no completed monograph of the polychaetes of the Woods Hole region, 

 but this need will be met by the publication of Pettibone ' s 'Warine Polychaete Worms 

 of the New England Region", of which Part 2 is now in preparation. Until this appears, 

 the most useful complete work is the two volumes by Fauvel; these deal with the poly- 

 chaetes of France, but are exceedingly useful in identifying families and genera, as 

 well as some of our local species. There also exist Dr. Pettibones mimeographed pre- 

 liminary check list and key to Polychaeta of New England; copies of this are available 

 in the invertebrate class laboratory, and should be consulted for forms which do not 

 clearly "fit" in the simpler key presented below for general use. This key is not in- 

 tended to satisfy the specialist, but rather to bridge the gap between the general 

 biologist and the polychaete systematist. It will probably satisfy neither group, and 

 as a result of this irritation, it is hoped that improved versions will arise. 



Much remains to be learned. Polychaete families are of convenient dimensions for 

 individual student projects, and offer much of interest to the comparative physiologist 

 and ecologist. The following key is frankly a preliminary attempt, and will need much 

 revision in the future. We are grateful to Dr. Marian Pettibone for much help and ad- 

 vice in the preparation of the key and check list. 



A Note on Polychaete Terminology 



There is no generally accepted scheme for dividing the Polychaeta into orders. 

 One method has been to recognize one order of more or less sedentary forms (Poly- 

 chaeta Sedentaria) and another of free living types (Polychaeta Errantia) . Actually, 

 such a division is arbitrary, since the families of polychaetes present a spectrum of 

 adaptions, ranging from free swimming types, through crawlers, burrowers and temporary 

 tube builders, to those which construct fixed tubes which they never leave. In prac- 

 tice it is more useful to recognize the principal family types, such as nereid, poly- 

 noid, spionid, syllid, sabellid, serpulid, etc. 



A typical free living polychaete such as Nereis (which will serve as an example, 

 although members of other families differ greatly in detail) has paired locomotor ap- 

 pendages or parapodia (sing., parapodium) (Pi. 7 , figs. 12-15), each composed of an 

 upper lobe, the notopodium, and a lower, neuropodium. Each lobe typically contains 

 a bundle of slender chitinous setae (sing, seta) which project from the parapodium, 

 together with a larger dark spine known as the aciculum ( pi . acicula) . The shape, 

 size, number, and position of the setae are of importance in classification. Arising 

 from the base of the notopodium above and the neuropodium below, there are often slen- 

 der flexible outgrowths, the dorsal cirrus (pi. cirri) and ventral cirrus, respectively. 

 The notopodium consists of a dorsal lobe or ligule and a middle lobe, between which are 

 the aciculum and the setae; the neuropodium consists of a neuroacicular lobe provided 

 with setae and an aciculum, and a ventral lobe. In many polychaetes, gills or branch- 




Polychaeta 49 



iae, made conspicuous by the red or green blood within, arise from or near the para- 

 podia in certain parts of the body. 



Setae vary widely in form, and furnish very precise characters for the determina- 

 tion of species. The use of such characters has been avoided where possible in the 

 key but is necessary in some cases. Common types and their names should be recognized. 

 Plate 6 gives some idea of the wide variety of types. First we may distinguish sim- 

 ple setae (figs. 1-20, 29-42) from composite or jointed setae (figs. 21-28). Long 

 slender simple setae are spoken of as capillary setae (fig. 6) . The tips of setae, 

 whether simple or composite, may be entire, bifid (fig. 8), or trifid. If bent like 

 a sickle they are termed falcate (fig. 11) ; if flattened like an oar blade, limbate 

 (fig. 10). Some simple setae have stubby, bent, usually bifid ends. These are spo- 

 ken of as hooks or crochets (figs. 29-32). These are usually relatively stout setae 

 and grade into short, broadened types known as uncini (figs. 33-42), usually set in 

 close rows, which are especially characteristic of the Sedentaria. 



Composite setae may be multiarticulate, as in the long bristles of some flabel- 

 ligerids (fig. 21), but are characteristically two-jointed, composed of a shaft and 

 a blade (figs. 22-28). This blade in turn may have various shapes and may itself be 

 a crochet (fig. 28) . The blade rests in a notch in the end of the shaft. If the two 

 sides of the notch are equal, it is spoken of as homogomph (fig. 27) ; if unequal, 

 as heterogomph (fig. 26). Finally setae, either simple or compound, may be embedded 

 at their tips in a clear matrix and are then spoken of as hooded. Thus, we may have 

 simple hooded crochets (figs. 20, 29), or composite hooded crochets (fig. 28). 



The heads of polychaetes are exceedingly diverse. As an example of the head of 

 an errant polychaete we may take the head of Nereis (Plate 7 , figs. 8-11). This 

 consists of a preoral prostomium, provided at its anterior margin with a pair of small 

 antennae, and at its sides with paired, fleshy, biarticulated palps (palpi) . The seg- 

 ment just behind the prostomium is the peristomium (in Nereis it represents a fusion 

 of two segments). It bears, in Nereis , four pairs of peristomial cirri (tentacular 

 cirri) on short stalks at its anterior margin. The usage of the terms palp, antenna , 

 and cirrus varies greatly. Antennae, unless otherwise specified, are usually dorsal 

 or marginal on the prostomium (the terra tentacle may also be used). Palpi are usually 

 associated with the mouth and tend to be lateral or ventral to the prostomium and bor- 

 dering the anterior margin of the mouth. However, certain dorsal structures, especial- 

 ly if these are large, elongated, grooved, or prehensile (as in the spionids) are fre- 

 quently called palps. The term cirrus is usually applied to structures arising dor- 

 sally or ventrally on the parapodia, whereas comparable structures on the anterior 

 part of the body, if elongated, may be designated tentacular cirri (or peristomial ten- 

 tacles) . Tentacle is a very general term and is used to signify any of a variety of 

 elongated sensory or feeding structures, usually on the head. 



The prostomium of Nereis bears two pairs of eyes; other polychaetes may have one 

 pair or none, and in some there are numerous eyespots scattered on the peristomium or 

 even on the tentacles or sides of the body. 



The first parapodia of Nereis are borne on the segment behind the peristomium. 

 The first two pairs of parapodia are uniramous, that is, each contains a single acicu- 

 lum and setal fascicle (bundle). All succeeding parapodia are biramous . In other 

 polychaetes the parapodia vary, some having only uniramous, others only biramous pa- 

 rapodia, some with both types, some with parapodia greatly reduced. 



In most free living polychaetes the pharyngeal region may be everted (pushed for- 

 ward and turned inside out) to form a proboscis, which often bears stout jaws and small 

 horny teeth (paragnaths) . A study of the arrangement of paragnaths is a necessary step 

 in the identification of nereids; in other families the pattern is less complex, but 

 may be referred to. 



The sedentary polychaetes depart widely from the body form which characterizes 

 free living types. Prostomium and eyes are often reduced, proboscis and jaws may be 

 absent, and the anterior end, especially in types dwelling in fixed tubes, greatly 




50 Polychaeta 



elaborated for feeding and respiration. In sabellids and serpulids the peristomial 

 cirri (or tentacles) form a "branchial crown" of feather-like "gills", which serves 

 both for feeding and respiration. Cilia pass water between the branches of the plumes 

 and transport food, entangled in mucus, down to the mouth. In other forms such as 

 terebellids, the peristomial tentacles are long, filamentous, and extensile, serving 

 to bring in food by ciliary action in a groove running along each filament; just be- 

 hind the head there arise blood-filled branchiae which serve in respiration. Para- 

 podia in tubicolous (tube dwelling) polychaetes tend to be small and are provided 

 with rows of hooklike setae (uncini) for gripping the sides of the tube. Uncini 

 may be set on a low mound or uncinigerous torus. Special glands may secrete tube- 

 forming material. One or more peristomial cirri may, in serpulids, which form a 

 rigid calcareous tube, be modified to a pluglike operculum that can block the tube 

 entrance. The body in tube dwelling forms is often divisible into a more anterior 

 and specialized thorax and a less specialized posterior abdomen. The thorax may 

 bear anteriorly a collar, and this may be extended rearward to the posterior end of 

 the thorax as a pair of folds, the thoracic membranes. The preceeding accounts are 

 of extreme types, free living and tubiculous respectively, and can convey but a poor 

 idea of the actual diversity of pattern that characterizes the numerous annelid 

 families . 



The key that follows begins as a key to separate families, and a study of it will 

 give an impression of the characteristics of each family type. Since the ability 

 to recognize families in the field is of great practical value to the zoologist, the 

 student should early learn the family types commonly encountered. Generic and spe- 

 cific identification requires more careful study. (For setal types see Plate 6; other 

 figure references are to Plates 7-10) . 



KEY TO COMMONER FAMILIES OF POLYCHAETES 



I. Instead of presenting only a pair of choices, this key presents several choices 

 at certain steps. Figure references in Keys are to Plates 7-10. 



II. Effective use of this key requires practice. We suggest that the beginner, with 

 the advice of the instructor, run an assortment of well known species through the 

 key step by step, in order to acquaint himself with the terminology. The tendency 

 of beginners to skip steps when the worm at hand is known interferes with learn- 

 ing to use the key. 



Ill . In most families only those species are keyed out which are commonly collected. 

 The student is referred to the more detailed key of Dr. Pettibone for the rarer 

 species, or those in which identification must be based upon more details than 

 given here. 



IV. The keys to members of families having more than one common or readily identifi- 

 able species will be found under the separate families, together with annotated 

 lists of species reported from this region. No attempt has been made to key out 

 all the rare or deeper water species. 



V. Unidentifiable and otherwise "interesting" polychaetes may be sent to Dr. Marian 

 Pettibone, Division of Marine Invertebrates, U. S. National Museum, Washington 

 25, D. C. 



1. Dorsal surface with overlapping scales (elytra, fig. 1), flat- 

 tened setae (paleae, fig. 22), or overlain by a thick felty layer 2 



1. Dorsal surface not with elytra, paleae, or felt 4 



(Key continued on page 60) 




Plate 6 



21 22 23 25 26 28 29 32 



38 



37 42 




52 Plate 7 



POLYCHAETA 



Polynoidae, Euphrosinidae, Spintheridae, Ampharetidae, 

 Flabelligeridae, Nereidae, Onuphidae, Eunicidae, Scali- 

 bregmidae, Dorvilleidae , Spionidae. 



Note: In this and in Plates 8, 9, and ID, objects are not 

 to any scale size. Figure sources are: (F) Fauvel, 

 (B) Berkeley and Berkeley, (P) Pettibone, (S) from 

 specimens . 



Fig. 1. Lepidonotus squamatus . Polynoidae, showing 12 pairs 

 of elytra (singular is elytron) (S) . 



2. Head of Harmothoe imbricata (F) . 



3. Euphrosine borealis , dorsal view of anterior end (P) . 



4. Spinther citrinus , dorsal view of anterior end (P) . 



5. Hypaniola grayi , Ampharetidae (S) . 



6. Anterior end of Polydora sp. (Spionidae), showing modified 

 fifth setiger (after Verrill) . 



7. Pherusa af finis , Flabelligeridae, anterior end in lateral view (S) 



8. Nereis ( Neanthes ) succinea , head and everted proboscis in 

 dorsal view (S) . 



9. Platervnereis meqalops . proboscis of male in ventral view 

 (S). 



10. Nereis ( Neanthes ) arenaceodonta . proboscis, ventral view (S) . 



11. Head and proboscis of same, dorsal view (S) . 



12. Parapodium from posterior part of body of N. succinea (S) . 

 In this and figs. 13-15, parapodia are from left side, 

 viewed from front. Acicula are shown in black: omitted 



in figs. 13-15. 



13. Parapodium from mid-body of Nereis ( Nereis ) pelagica , show- 

 ing 2 ligules in notopodium (S) . 



14. Same, from N. ( Neanthes ) virens . showing 3 ligules in noto- 

 podium. (S) . 



15. Same, from N. (Neanthes ) arenaceodonta (S) . 



16. Head of generalized onuphid, showing pair of nuchal ten- 

 tacles on peristome (P) . 



17. Eunice pennata , Eunicidae. diagram of head (P). 



18. Marphysa sanguinea , same (S) . 



19. Marphysa belli , same (P) . 



20. Scalibregma inf latum , Scalibregmidae, same (P) . 



21. Stauronereis rudolphi , Dorvilleidae (F) . 




Plate 7 




54 Plate 8 



POLYCHAETA AND ARCHI ANNELIDA 



Chrysopetalidae, Syllidae, Terebellidae, Cirratulidae 



Fig. 22. Dvsponetus pygmaeus (Chrysopetalidae), dorsal view of 

 whole animal showing dorsal fans of setae (P) . 



23. Syllis gracilis , head (P) . 



24. Same, parapodium (P) . 



25. Same, compound setae. 



26. Same, heavy bifurcated simple setae (P) . 



27. Amblyosvllis formosa (European) to show nuchal epaulettes (F) 



28. Odontosvllis fulgurans , head showing nuchal hood (F) . 



29. Same, armature of proboscis (F) . 



30. Streptosyllis , diagram of parapodium with knobbed aciculum 

 (P). 



31. Eusyllis lamelligera, head (F) . 



32. Same, armature of proboscis (F) . 



33. Brania clavata , head (P) . 



34. Exogone hebes , head (P) . 



35. Exogone dispar , head (P) . 



36. Sphaerosyllis e rinaceus . head (P) . 



37. Autolvtus prismaticus . head (P) . 



38. Arborescent (branching) gill of a terebellid (S) . 



39. A terebellid gill of unbranched filaments (B) . 



40. Head of adult Nicolea venustula , simplified (P) . 



41. Head of Pista maculata , simplified (P) . 



42. Head of Pista cristata . simplified (B) . 



43. Head of Terebellides stroemi , simplified (B) . 



44. Gill-like branching parapodium of Enoplobranchus sanguinea 

 (note setae) (P) . 



45. Dodecaceria coralii , Cirratulidae, whole animal (S) . 



46. Cirratulus cirratus , anterior end (P) . 



47. Tharyx , sp., anterior end (F) . 



48. Chaetozona setosa , head (P) . 



49. Dinophilus sp., Archiannelida, drawn from life by Dr. 

 Louise Bush. 




Plate 8 




56 Plate 9 



POLYCHAETA 



Sabellidae, Phyllodocidae, Serpulidae, 

 Maldanidae, Hesionidae, Paraonidae 



Fig. 50. Fabricia sabella , whole worm, dorsal view (F) . 



51. Chone infundibuliformis . simplified, anterior end, view of mid-dorsal slit 

 in collar (F) . 



52. Sabella crassicornis , anterior end viewed from left; note 4-lobed collar (P) . 



53. Sabella microphthalma , collar region dorsal view; irregular rows of eyes (S) . 



54. Same, ventral view; note absence of lateral slits (S) . 



55. Potamilla renif ormis , dorsal view of collar region, showing mid-dorsal and 

 lateral notches; "compound eyes" on branchial filaments (S) . 



56. Eteone sp., anterior end (P) . 57. Phyllodoce sp., anterior end (S) . 



58. Notophvllum americanum , anterior end (P) . Note nuchal lappets at rear of 

 prostomium, and large imbricated dorsal cirri. 



59. Eulalia viridis . anterior end (P) . 



60. Eumida sanquinea , anterior end (P) . 61. Paranaitis speciosa , anterior 



end (P) . 



62. Spirorbis ( Dexiospira ) spirillum , dextrally coiled tube with end elevated (F) 



63. Same, dextral, flat coil (P) . 



64. Spirorbis ( Paradexiospira ) violaceus , dextral tube (F) . 



65. Spirorbis ( Laeospira ) borealis , sinistral tube (F) . 



66. Operculum of above (P) . 67. Spirorbis ( Laeospira ) granula - 



tus , sinistral tube (P) . 



68. Operculum of 67 (P) . 69. Operculum of Filograna implexa 



(P). 



70. Operculum of Hydroides ( Eupomatus ) uncinata (P) . 



71. C lvmenella torquata , anterior end viewed from right, showing collarette on 



4th setiger (P) . 



72. Posterior end of same, showing anal funnel (P) . 



73. Posterior end of Maldanopsis elongata (P) . 



74. Posterior end of M aldane sarsi (P) . 



75. Nephtys incisa , head end (P) . 76. Nephtys bucera , head end (P) . 



77. Aglaophamus circinata , parapodium with branchia curved inwards (P) . 



78. Nephtys caeca , parapodium from middle region, posterior view, showing 

 branchia curved outward (P) . 



79. Podarke obscura , head (S) . 80. A ricidea jeffreysii , head (B) . 




Plate 9 




58 Plate 10 



POLYCHAETA 



Spionidae, Goniadidae, Glyceridae, Arabellidae, 

 Lumbrineridae, Orbiniidae, Oweniidae, Pectinariidae, 



Sabellariidae . 



Fig. 81. Polydora ligni , head with occipital antenna (P) . 



82. Spiophanes bombyx , prostomium (P) . 83. Scolecolepides viridis , head (P) . 



84. Dispio uncinata , head (P) . 85. Scolelepis squamata , head (P) . 



86. Spio filicornis , head (P) . 87. Hooded neuropodial crochet of Spio 



f ilicornis (P) . 



88. Goniada maculata , head with extended proboscis, showing chevrons (Mcintosh). 



89. Glycera capitata , anterior parapodium seen from rear, showing single post- 

 setal lobe (P) . 



90. Glycera dibranchiata , parapodium seen from rear, showing 2 postsetal lobes 

 and 2 branchiae (P) . 



91. Glycera americana , parapodium from middle body, seen from rear, showing the 

 branchiae extended (P) . 



92. Ophioglycera gigantea (Goniadidae), anterior uniramous parapodium seen from 

 front, showing presetal lobe (P) . 



93. Same, posterior biramous parapodium, seen from front, also with bilobed pre- 

 setal lobe (P) . 



94. Lumbrineris fragilis , capillary 95. Same, hooded seta (P) . 

 limbate setae (P). 



96. Ninoe nigripes , hooded seta (S) . 97. Same, branchia bearing para- 

 podium seen from front (P) . 



98. Lumbrineris acuta , head (P) . 99. Lumbrineris tenuis , head (P) . 



100. L. tenuis , posterior parapodium (P) . 101. Arabella iricolor , head (P) . 



102. Driloneris longa , anterior para- 103. Same, posterior parapodium (P) . 

 podium (P) . 



104. Orbinia ornata , right hand parapodium in thoracic region, seen from rear, 

 showing palisaded neurosetae and postsetal row of papillae (P) . 



105. Scoloplos robustus , abdominal parapodium, showing undulate subpodial flange (P) 



106. Scoloplos fragilis , abdominal parapodium showing incised subpodial lobe (P) . 



107. Owenia fusiformis , anterior end seen from side, showing slashed branchial 

 membrane (P) . 



108. Pectinaria gouldii , seen in dorsolateral aspect; note operculum of golden 

 paleae (S) . 



109. Sand tube of Pectinaria , about natural size (S) . 



110. Sabellaria vulgaris , living specimen removed from tube (S) . 




Plate 10 




60 Polychaeta 



2. Dorsal surface with a felty layer over elytra; "sea mice" 



APHRODITIDAE (p. 64) 



2. Dorsal surface with simple, exposed elytra; "scale worms" 3 



2. Dorsal surface more or less concealed by notosetae in fan- 

 shaped groups or transverse rows; minute worms CHRYSOPETALIDAE 



The only species reported locally is Dysponetus pygmaeus 



Levinsen, 1879; dredged; up to 3 mm long (fig. 22). 



3. With filiform dorsal cirri on non-elytra bearing segments 



POLYNOIDAE (p. 75) 



3. Without filiform dorsal cirri on non-elytra bearing segments 



SIGALIONIDAE (p. 78) 



The only common species is Sthenelais boa , easily told from 

 other common scale worms by its elongated body and 100 or more 

 pairs of scales. 



4. Dorsal surface convex, bristly; elongated setigerous dorsal 



lobes covering the dorsum 5 



4. Dorsal surface otherwise 6 



5. Notopodium a wide transverse ridge with 2 dorsal cirri and 

 forked notosetae in transverse rows; with a dorsal crestlike 



"caruncle" on head (fig. 3) EUPHROSINIDAE (p. 67) 



With 6-7 branchiae on each notopodium, each with 1-4 branches: 

 Euphrosine borealis . 



5. Notopodia with transverse membranous ridges supported by 

 numerous spinelike setae (fig. 4); small, flattened, ellip- 

 soidal SPINTHERIDAE 



The only reported species is Spinther citrinus (Stimpson, 1854) , 



a small dredged form, lemon yellow, resembling in color the 

 sponges with which it is associated. 



6. Anterior end bearing conspicuous filaments, or feathery ten- 

 tacles, or conspicuous bristles, or golden setae (paleae) , so 



that prostomium is usually more or less concealed 7 



6. Anterior end with prostomium not concealed by such special 



outgrowths as may be present 12 



7. Anterior tentacles (branchial crown) are pinnate (feather- 

 like) ; worms almost always form tubes 8 



7. Anterior end with flattened golden setae (paleae) forming 

 an operculum (figs. 108, 110) ; tubes are of cemented sand 

 grains, stiff and brittle 9 



7. Anterior end bearing many long filamentous (threadlike) out- 

 growths; tubes of some are distictive, but lacking in ethers 10 



7. Anterior end somewhat concealed by a cage of long setae di- 

 rected forward; body heavily papi Hated 



FLABELLIGERIDAE (p. 67) 



8. Tubes calcareous; one of tentacles modified to a pluglike 



stalked operculum SERPULIDAE (p. 77) 



8. Tubes flexible, leathery, parchment-like, sandy, or mucoid 



(except in the tiny Fabricia ) ; no operculum SABELLIDAE (p. 76) 



9. Tubes of sand, of regular conical form, open at both ends 



. „ ............ .PECTINARIIDAE (p. 74) 



The commonly taken species is Pectinaria gouldii (figs. 109, 

 110) . 

 9. Tubes of sand, convoluted and solidly cemented onto stones, 



shells, or into masses; common SABELLARIIDAE (p. 76) 




Polychaeta 61 



10. Filamentous outgrowths much concentrated on the head end; the 

 body is divisible into two distinct regions ("thorax" and "ab- 

 domen"); branching gills may be present in addition to filaments 11 



10. Filamentous outgrowths start back of the head (actual prostomium 

 is bare) and are also borne on several to many segments of the 

 body; never branching gills near anterior end; body not divis- 

 ible into two distinct regions CIRRATULIDAE (p. 66) 



11. Anterior filaments not retractile into mouth, but tend to creep 

 out radially if worms are undisturbed; prostomium seen only by 

 lifting aside filaments; branchiae often present on dorsum be- 

 hind filaments; well represented locally TEREBELLIDAE (p. 81) 



11. Anterior tentacles retractile into mouth, leaving pointed 

 branchiae exposed and extending over anterior end; tapering 



at rear; not common in most collecting AMPHARETIDAE (p. 63) 



12. Anterior end with pair of long, coiling tentacular processes 

 (often referred to as "palps") which may, however, be missing 



if specimen has been handled roughly 13 



12. Prostomium with obvious antennae (not minute relative to size 



of prostomium) ; with or without fleshy oral palps 15 



12. Prostomium with minute antennae; without fleshy oral palps 21 



12. Prostomium without antennae, or with a single median antenna; 



without tentacular cirri; or prostomium is indistinct 23 



13. Body segments similar in size and setae (except that the 5th 

 may be much modified in Polydora ) ; body, although showing grad- 

 ual transition, is not sharply divisible into distinct regions 



SPIONIDAE (p. 78) 



13. Body divisible into 2 or 3 distinct regions with dissimilar seg- 

 ments 14 



14. Small, slender worms with spatulate prostomium; coiling ten- 

 tacles bear a fringe of papillae or short branches on one side; 



no tube MAGELONIDAE (p. 69) 



14. Larger worms in distinctive leathery or chitinous tubes; para- 

 podia are complexly lobed CHAETOPTERIDAE (p. 65) 



15. Dorsal cirri flattened, leaf like, often overlapping; prostomium 

 with 2 eyes and 4-5 antennae; lacking oral palps; smallish, elong- 

 ate worms of delicate build PHYLLODOCIDAE (p. 74) 



15. Dorsal cirri of typical tentacular or slender tapered form 16 



16. (With one rare exception) always with parapodial ligules (rounded, 

 leaflike, or straplike dorsal lobes of parapodia) bearing dorsal 

 cirri; prostomium with 4 eyes and 2 antennae; 2 biarticulated oral 



palps NEREIDAE (p. 70) 



16. Lacking parapodial ligules 17 



17. With 1-8 lateral pairs of tentacular cirri on peristomial seg- 

 ment; small worms 18 



17. Without such peristomial cirri, or with a pair of short dorsal ten- 

 tacles on nuchal region (fig. 16); dark complex jaw apparatus 19 




62 Polychaeta 



18. Prostomium with biarticulate oral palps; 2-3 antennae, 4 eyes, 



2-8 pairs of peristomial cirri HESIONIDAE (p. 68) 



Several species present locally, some of which are commensal. 

 The most common species is the small, dark, short-bodied Podarke 

 obscura (fig. 79) . 



18. Prostomium with 2 oral palps (sometimes reduced or fused), 3 

 antennae, and 4-6 eyes; 1-2 pairs of peristomial cirri; the 

 dorsal parapodial cirri often long, moniliform (beaded) , and 

 conspicuous; a large and difficult family of small and beauti- 

 ful worms SYLLIDAE (p. 79) 



19. Prostomium with 2 articulated antennae and 2 elongated palps; 



without branchiae DORVILLEIDAE (p. 66) 



19. Prostomium with 1-7 antennae, 2 low globular palps, best seen 



ventrally; branchiae simple, spiral, pectinate, or lacking 20 



20. With 5 occipital antennae (seem to be borne at rear of prosto- 

 mium, but without frontal antennae; sometimes a pair of short 



nuchal tentacles (figs. 17-19) EUNICIDAE (p. 66) 



20. With 5 occipital antennae plus 2 frontal antennae on prostomium; 

 occipital antennae with distinctly ringed bases (fig. 16) 



ONUPHIDAE (p. 71) 



21. Prostomium subquadrate, 1 pair of small pointed antennae at 

 front corners, a second concealed at sides; parapodia biramous 

 with lamellae well developed; body flattened, with distinctive 



"shimmying" motion NEPHTYIDAE (p. 70) 



21. Prostomium conical, long and tapering, with 4 minute antennae 

 set in a cross at tip; parapodia small and lack lamellae; bodies 



pink, cylindrical, and pointed at both ends, coiling 22 



22. Segments bi- or triannulate; parapodia either uni- or biramous, 

 but of one form for whole length of body; common 



GLYCERIDAE (p. 67) 



22. Segments uni-annulate; parapodia of front part of body uniramous, 



biramous in rear GONIADIDAE (p. 68) 



23. Some of body segments much longer than wide 24 



23. Segments shorter than, or not much longer than, wide 25 



24. Segments remarkably long; anal segment with a funnel, or a 

 flattened plate, or spatulate (spoon-like) ; prostomium hood-like 



or with flattened plate; "bamboo worms" MALDANIDAE (p. 69) 



24. Anal segment otherwise; prostomium with or without a slashed 



branchial membrane (fig. 107) OWENIIDAE (p. 73) 



25. Body very long and with small parapodia, somewhat resembling 

 elongated earthworms; proboscis has dark jaw-pieces (not visible 



unless everted) ; 2 superficially very similar families 26 



25. Form various; proboscis without dark jaw-pieces 27 



26. Setae consisting of (1) simple, pointed, "limbate" setae 

 (flattened back of tips) and (2) "hooded" setae (hooked 



setae with tips encased in a transparent drop of material) 



LUMBRINERIDAE (p. 68) 



26. Setae limbate, with or without stout aciculum-like setae; 



without hooded setae ARABELLIDAE (p. 64) 




Polychaeta 63 



27. Parapodia of at least some segments bear typical uncinigerous tori 

 (a torus is a simple raised area representing a low parapodial 

 ramus; uncini are short embedded hooklike setae set in rows) 28 



27. Parapodia with capillary (simple, pointed) setae; typical 



uncinigerous tori absent, but palisaded rows of crochets (elong- 

 ■ate hooked setae) on low mounds may be present anteriorly 29 



27. Parapodia with filiform postsetal notopodial lobes, with strap- 

 like branchiae dorsal to notopodia on some segments; prostomium 

 subconical, with or without a median antenna; small, threadlike 

 worms, living in mucous tubes in mud or sand 



PARAONIDAE (p. 73) 



28. Without branchiae, or when present, only in posterior region; 

 body extremely long, slender, and fragile; characteristically 



purplish-red, found in mud CAPITELLIDAE (p. 65) 



28. With 11-13 pairs of dorsal branchiae in middle part of body; 



heavy-bodied; "lug worms" ARENICOLIDAE (p. 64) 



29. Prostomium bilobed or T-shaped; branchiae usually 4 pairs 

 limited to anterior few segments, arborescent; integument 



checkered SCALIBREGMIDAE (p. 77) 



29. Prostomium pointed; branchiae are either numerous pairs or 



lacking altogether 30 



30. More or less short bodied, pointed at both ends; parapodia re- 

 duced to bundles of setae, all simple, capillary; a ventral 

 groove present in some; branchiae along sides of body or lack- 

 ing „ OPHELIIDAE (p. 72) 



30. Elongate worms with pointed, actively inquiring heads; an- 

 terior thoracic part of body often with flattened dorsum with 

 parapodia lateral; posterior abdominal segments with parapodia 

 dorsal; with paired branchiae dorsal to parapodia, the para- 

 podia and branchiae covering the back like a furry coat 

 ORBINIIDAE (p. 72) 



KEYS TO SPECIES AND ANNOTATED CHECK LIST OF THE MORE COMMON POLYCHAETES , 



ARRANGED BY FAMILIES 



1. Family Ampharetidae 

 List of Species 



Amage auricula Malmgren, 1866. Dredged. 



Ampharete arctica Malmgren. 1866. Dredged. 



Ampharete acutif rons (Grube, 1850) . Dredged. 



Amphicteis qunneri (Sars, 1835). Dredged. 



Asabellides oculata (Webster, 1879). Dredged. 



Hypaniola gravi Pettibone, 1953. In shallow ponds of low salinity. Figure 5. 



Melinna cristata (Sars, 1851) . Dredged. 



Samytha sexcirrata (Sars, 1856) . Dredged. 



Samythella elongata Verrill, 1873. Dredged. 



2. Family Amphinomidae (not in key; rare) 

 List of Species 



Amphinome rostrata (Pallas, 1766). Gulf Stream fauna, on floating weed, etc. 

 Hipponoe gaudichaudi Audouin and Milne Edwards, 1830. On floating objects-, barnacles, 



etc . 

 Paramphinome pulchella Sars, 1872. Dredged. 

 Pareurythoe borealis (Sars, 1862) . Dredged. 




64 Polychaeta 



3. Family Aphroditidae 

 Key 



1. Thick felty layer completely covers elytra; dredged in 



mud Aphrodita hastata Moore, 1905. 



1. Loose felty layer, not completely concealing elytra; 



dredged in sand Laetmatonice f ilicornis Kinberg, 1855. 



4. Family Arabellidae 

 Key 



1. Parapodia without heavy projecting acicular setae; pro- 

 stomium with four eyes in row on posterior margin (may 

 be overlooked under fold of peristomium) (fig. 101) 

 Arabella iricolor 



1. Parapodia provided with stout projecting aciculum-like 



setae (fig. 102) 2 



2. Prostomium conical, with four eyes in row on posterior 



margin Notocirrus spiniferus 



2. Prostomium spatulate, flattened dorsoventrally, without 



eyes Drilonereis 3 



3. Parapodia small, inconspicuous on anterior segments (fig. 

 102); in far posterior region, parapodia distinctly bi- 

 labiate (fig. 103) Drilonereis lonqa 



3. Parapodia prominent from first setiger on, similar through- 

 out length of body Drilonereis magna 



List of Species 



Arabella iricolor (Montagu, 1804) . Formerly called A. opalina . Common in sandy 

 mud. 



Drilonereis lonqa Webster, 1879. Common in sandy mud. 



Drilonereis magna Webster and Benedict, 1887. Rare, dredged. 



Notocirrus spiniferus (Moore, 1906) . Low water and dredged. Young stages are 



thought to live parasit.ically in body cavity of Diopatra cuprea (Pettibone, M., 

 1957. Endoparasitic polychaetous annelids of the family Arabellidae with de- 

 scriptions of new species . Biol. Bull., 113 : 170-187). 



5. Family Arenicolidae 

 Key 



1. 19 setigerous segments; 12-13 pairs of gills; found north of 



Cape Cod Arenicola marina 



1. 17 setigerous segments; 11 pairs of gills 2 



2. Firm, stout, dark blackish-green; commonly 15-30 cm long; 

 castings formless; egg mass a gelatinous streamer up to a 



meter long Arenicola cristata 



2. Soft and limp; color pale pinkish-tan; length rarely exceeds 

 15 cm; castings cylindrical, coiled; gelatinous egg mass firm 

 and egg shaped Arenicola brasiliensis 



List of Species 

 Arenicola b rasiliensis Nonato, 1958 (= A. caroledna Wells, 1961). This species 




Polychaeta 65 



prior to 1961 was not formally recognized as distinct from A. crista ta . al- 

 though the difference had been noted years previously by the MBL's distin- 

 guished former Collector, Mr. Milton "Sam" Gray. " Caroledna " is generally 

 found in sand. 



Arenicola cristata Stimpson, 3 856. See above. This large Arenicola is the form 

 traditionally used for dissection in the MBL Invertebrate Zoology Course. 

 It prefers quieter waters and muddier sand than does A. brasiliensis , and 

 is becoming increasingly scarce, in part because of dredging of harbors. 



Arenicola marina (Linnaeus, 1758). Occurs north of Cape Cod. 



6. Family Capitellidae 

 Key 



1. Capillary (slender, pointed) setae on first 5 setigers; 



body very slender Heteromastus f iliformis 



1. Capillary setae on first 7 setigers Capitella capitata 



1. Capillary setae on first 11 setigers Notomastus 2 



2. Capillary setae in both noto- and neuropodia of first 

 setiger; body blood-red anteriorly, light yellowish 



posteriorly Notomastus latericeus 



2. Setae only in notopodium of first setiger; body dark 

 purplish -brown with bluish iridescence anteriorly 

 Notomastus luridus 



Note: Capitellids, because of their extreme length and thinness, are diffi- 

 cult to collect entire, and hence to identify. 



List of Species 



Capitella capitata (Fabricius, 1780). Common, in sandy mud. 

 Heteromastus f iliformis (Claparede, 1864) . Common, in mud. 

 Notomastus latereus Sars, 1851. In muddy sand. 

 Notomastus luridus Verrill, 1873. In muddy sand. 



7. Family Chaetopteridae 

 Key 



1. Tube U-shaped, parchment-like, with both ends open to sur- 

 face; worm large, thick, well known 



Chaetopterus variopedatus 



1. Tube long, slender, transparent, annulated; buried ver- 

 tically in sand; worm long and slender 

 Spiochaetopterus oculatus 



List of Species 



Chaetopterus variopedatus (Renier, 1804) . Formerly C. perqamentaceus . Is fairly 

 common, but not entirely dependable for experimental work because it may be- 

 come very scarce in certain years. The distinctive tube may have led to over- 

 collecting . 



Spiochaetopterus oculatus Webster, 1879. Uncommon; dredged in mud in Buzzards Bay 



and has been found by Mr. Gray on certain flats both north and south of the Cape. 




66 Polychaeta 



8. Family Cirratu lidae 

 Key 



1. With 2 elongate grooved tentacles ("palps") arising from 

 forward of the first setiger, in addition to the other 

 filamentous outgrowths 3 



1. With numerous filaments , but without the differentiated 



grooved palps Cirratulus 



2. Prostomium bluntly conical with 2-9 eyes on each side in 

 a transverse row or united in an arc (fig. 46) 



Cirratulus cJLrratus 



2. Prostomium conical, slightly acute; without eyes 



Cirratulus grandis 



3. Only 4-6 pairs of rather short filaments in addition to 

 palps (fig. 45) ; dark, almost black; forms a calcareous 

 tube mass; in calcareous shell or coral matrix 



Dodecaceria coralii 



3. With numerous filaments in addition to 2 tentacular palps 



(figs. 47, 48) 4 



4. With capillary (simple, pointed) setae exclusively in both 



rami of parapodia (fig. 47) Tharvx acutus 



4. With acicular setae or unidentate crochets in addition to 

 capillary setae; crochets in rows almost encircling the 

 body in posterior region (fig. 48) Chaetozone setosa 



List of Species 



Chaetozone setosa Malmgren, 1867. Dredged. 

 Cirratulus cirratus (0. F. Muller, 1776) . Dredged. 

 Cirratulus grandis Verrill, 1873. Common. 

 Dodecaceria coralii (Leidy, 1855) . Dredged. 

 Tharvx acutus Webster and Benedict, 1887. Dredged. 



9. Family Dorvilleidae 

 Key 



1. Prostomium without eyes; in sand 



Stauronereis caecus (Webster and Benedict, 1884) 



1. Prostomium with 4 eyes (fig. 21) ; in sandy mud and in "weed" 

 in Lagoon Pond (Martha's Vineyard) 



Stauronereis rudolphi (Delle Chiaje, 1828) 



10. Family Eunicidae 

 Key 



1. With 2 short nuchal tentacles on the dorsal side of 



second segment (fig. 17) Eunice 3 



1. Without such nuchal tentacles Marphysa 2 



2. Prostomium bilobed (fig. 18); branchiae start on about seg- 

 ment 20 (19-40) and continue nearly to end of body with 1-8 



filaments per branchia Marphysa sanguinea 



2. Prostomium rounded (fig. 19); branchiae start on segments 

 12-15, relatively few in number (12-21 pairs) with 7-19 

 filaments per branchia Marphysa bellii 




Polychaeta 67 



3. Acicula and subacicular hooks black; branchiae begin on 



setigers 7-9, and continue nearly to rear of body; tube 



papery Eunice norveqica 



3. Acicula and subacicular hooks yellow; branchiae begin on 



third setiger, and continue on to setigers 40-50, leaving 



middle and rear of body without branchiae; tubes thin, 



rough with debris Eunice pennata 



List of Species 



Eunice norveqica (Linnaeus, 1767). Includes E. f loridana Ehlers. Dredged. 

 Eunice pennata (0. F. Muller, 1776) . Dredged. 



Marphysa bellii (Audouin and M. Edwards, 1833) . Rare, in muddy sand. 

 Marphysa sanguinea (Montagu, 1815) . Common, in muddy sand. 



11. Family Euphrosinidae 

 List of Species 



Euphrosine cirrata Sars, 1862. Dredged. 



Euphrosine borealis Oersted, 1843. Dredged; fig. 3. 



Euphrosine armadillo Sars, 1851. Dredged. 



12. Family Flabelligeridae 

 Key 



1. Body covered with thick mucous mantle containing long, 

 stalked papillae; neurosetae are compound hooks 

 Flabelligera af finis 



1. Body without mucous mantle, covered with simple (not 



stalked) papillae; neurosetae are simple 2 



2. Both neuro- and notosetae are long, capillary; papillae 



numerous and remarkably long Diplocirrus hirsutus 



2. Neurosetae are stout simple hooks 3 



3. Hooked neurosetae begin on fourth setiger; body covered 

 with elongate papillae, agglutinated with sand and mud 



Pherusa plumosa 



3. Hooked neurosetae begin on fifth setiger; body covered 



with short papillae (fig. 7) Pherusa affinis 



List of Species 



Brada granosa Stimpson, 1854. Dredged. 



Brada villosa (flathke, 1843) . Dredged. 



Diplocirrus hirsutus (Hansen, 1879) . Dredged. 



Flabelligera affinis Sars, 1829. Dredged. 



Pherusa affinis (Leidy, 1855) . Formerly Trophonia affinis ; in mud, shallow water, 



and has been taken at night light at WHOI dock. 

 Pherusa plumosa (Muller, 1776). Dredged. 



13. Family Glyceridae 

 Key 



1. Without branchiae; parapodia with single postsetal lobe 



and two unequal presetal lobes (fig. 89) 



Glycera capita ta 



1. Branchiae present (but may be retracted); parapodia with 



two presetal and two postsetal lobes (figs. 90, 91) 2 




68 



Polychaeta 



Glycera dibranchiata 



Glycera americana 



Branchiae non-retractile at upper and lower edges of 

 parapodia (fig. 90) 



Branchiae completely retractile, many lobed (fig. 91) , 

 arising from grooves on posterior side of base of noto- 

 podia (opening visible when branchia is retracted) 



List of Species 



Glycera americana Leidy, 1855. Common in muddy sand. 

 Glycera capita ta Oersted, 1843. Dredged, in muddy sand. 

 Glycera dibranchiata Ehlers, 1868. Common, in muddy sand. 



14. Family Goniadidae 



Key 



1. Presetal lobes of neuropodia bilobed (may be simple 



on some 18 of anterior segments) (figs. 92, 93) 2 



1. Presetal lobes of neuropodia simple, not bilobed; 

 proboscis with about 28 chitinous, V-shaped, black 



chevrons Goniadella gracilis 



2. Proboscis without chevrons Ophioglycera gigantea 



2. Proboscis with 7-11 chevrons (fig. 88) 



Goniada maculata 



List of Species 



Goniada maculata Oersted, 1843. Dredged in mud. 



Goniadella gracilis (Verrill, 1873). Small, usually escapes notice; in fine sand. 



Ophioglycera gigantea Verrill, 1885. Rare, in mud flats. 



15. Family Hesionidae 

 List of Species 



Gyptis vittata Webster and Benedict, 1887. Rare; under rocks. 



Microphthalmus aberrans (Webster and Benedict, 1887) . In sand; associated with 



terebellids Lysilla alba and Enoplobranchus sanguineus . 

 Microphthalmus sczelkowii Mecznikow, 1865. In sand. 

 Nereimyra punctata (0. F. Muller, 1776) . Dredged. 

 Parahesione luteola (Webster, 1880). In sands, mud, commensal with Upogebia af - 



f inis . 

 Podarke obscura Verrill, 1873. Common .in muddy sand and eel grass; may swarm 



at surface or to night light. Easily recognized by its very dark brown color. 



16. Family Lumbrineridae 

 Key 



1. With palmately branched branchiae on some parapodia 



(figs. 96, 97) Ninoe nigripes 



1. Without branchiae Lumbrineris 2 



2. Prostomium extremely elongated, 2 to 3 times as long 



as wide (fig. 98) Lumbrineris acuta 



2. Prostomium short, conical (fig. 99) 3 




Polychaeta 69 



3. Body long, slender, small; acicula yellow; posterior 

 parapodia with elongated finger like process (Fig. 100) 

 Lumbrineris tenuis 



3. Body stouter; acicula black; parapodia without espec- 

 ially elongated process Lumbrineris fragilis 



List of Species 



Lumbrineris acuta (Verrill, 1875). Rare. In muddy sand. 

 Lumbrineris fragilis (0. F. Miiller, 1776) . Common in muddy sand. 

 Lumbrineris tenuis (Verrill, 1873) . Common in muddy sand. 

 Ninoe nigripes Verrill, 1873. Common. Dredged in mud. 



17. Family Magelonidae 



Magelona rosea Moore, 1907. Common in muddy sand. The only polychaete genus re- 

 ported to have haemerythrin as a blood pigment. 



18. Family Maldanidae 

 Key 



1. Anus within a funnel shaped structure (fig. 72) 2 



1. Anus associated with (dorsal to) an obligue structure 



(figs. 73, 74) 3 



2. With deep membranous collarette (fig. 71) on fourth 

 setigerous segment; 18 setigerous segments; two color 

 phases: pale with red nodes, or green (in mud) 



Clvmenella torguata 



2. Without collarette on fourth setiger; setigerous seg- 

 ments variable in number (19-42) 



Clvmenella zonalis 



3. Anus dorsal to anal disc; anal segment forms a spatu- 

 late lobe dorsally and funnel-like concavity ventrally 

 (fig. 73) ; anterior end speckled with black or dark 



purple; mud tube • Maldanopsis elonqata 



3. Pygidium an obliquely truncated flat oval plate (fig. 74) 

 with short lateral marginal incisions 

 Maldane sarsi 



List of Species 



Asychis biceps (Sars, 1861) . Dredged. 

 Axiothella catenata (Malmgren, 1856) . Dredged. 



Clymenel 1 a tnrqiiaha (Leidy, 1855). Very common in sand; forms sandy tubes. 

 Clymenella zonalis (Verrill, 1874) . 

 Leiochone dispar (Verrill, 1873) . Dredged. 



Maldane sarsi Malmgren, 1865. Common in very muddy sand. 

 Maldanopsis elongata (Verrill, 1873) . Common in mud. 

 Nicomache lumbricalis (Fabricius, 1780). Dredged. 

 Petaloproctus tenuis (Theel, 1879) . Dredged. 



Praxillella gracilis (Sars, 1861). Dredged. One sp of Praxillella reported com- 

 mon in mud beTow water at Hadley Harbor (Mr. Gray) . 

 Praxillella praetermissa (Malmgren, 1866). Dredged. 

 Praxillella ornata Verrill, 1880. Dredged. 

 Rhodine loveni Malmgren, 1865. 




70 Polychaeta 



19. Family Nephytidae 

 Key 



1. Branchiae (in form of a sickle shaped cirrus between 

 dorsal and ventral ramus of each parapodium) curved 

 inwards (fig. 77) ; not common Aglaophamus circinata 



1. Branchiae (see above) curved outwards (fig. 78) ; common 



Nephtys 2 



2. Tentacular segment with enlarged neuropodial lobe later- 

 al to the setigerous lobe; dorsal tentacular cirri lack- 

 ing on notopodium (fig. 76) 3 



2. Tentacular segment without enlarged neuropodial lobe; 

 tiny dorsal tentacular cirri present on first notopodium 



(fig. 75) 4 



3. Ventral tentacular cirri anterior to widest part of 



enlarged tentacular segment Nephtys pi eta 



3. Ventral tentacular cirri lateral and continuous with 

 widest part of enlarged tentacular segment (fig. 76) 



Nephtys bucera 



4. Both anterior and posterior parapodial lamellae about 

 equally well developed, enclosing the conical acicular 



lobes ; setae dark Nephtys incisa 



4. Anterior parapodial lamellae rudimentary; posterior 



lamellae large, foliaceous; setae light Nephtys caeca 



List of Species 



Aglaophamus circinata (Verrill, 1874) . Dredged in mud. 

 Nephtys bucera Ehlers, 1868. Common, in sand. 

 Nephtys caeca (Fabricius, 1780) . Common, in muddy sand. 

 Nephtys incisa Malmgren, 1865. Dredged. Common in mud. 

 Nephtys picta Ehlers, 1868. Common, in muddy sand. 

 Nephtys ciliata (0. F. Mullcr, 1789) . Dredged in mud. 



20. Family Nereidae 

 Key 



1. Parapodia essentially uniramous , without ligules 



Lycastopsis pontica 



1. Parapodia biramous, with ligules (figs. 12-15) 2 



2. Paragnaths (denticles) (fig. 9) of proboscis small and 

 pectinate (in comblike rows) ; peristomial cirri very long , 

 to segments 10 or 15; often seen in heteronereid form at 



night lights Platynereis dumerilii mega lops 



2. Paragnaths of proboscis larger, conical (figs. 8, 10, 11) 3 



3. Notopodia of anterior parapodia with 2 ligules 4 



3. Notopodia of anterior parapodia with 3 ligules, the 



upper ligule (bearing cirrus) flattened 5 



4. Parapodial ligules sharply conical 



Nereis ( Nereis ) grayi 



4. Parapodial ligules short, thick, evenly rounded (fig. 13); 

 worm may occur as a heteronereid 

 Nereis ( Nereis ) pelagica 




Polychaeta 71 



5. Upper ligules of posterior parapodia elongated, strap- 

 like, with cirrus near tip (fig. 12) ; often seen as the 

 heteronereid at night light 

 Nereis ( Neanthes) succinea 



5. Upper ligule large, broadly leaf-like, with cirrus in- 

 serted near base (fig. 14) ; the most common large local 

 nereid Nereis ( Neanthes ) virens 



5. Upper ligule triangular, with cirrus inserted near base 

 (fig. 15) ; a small pale worm; very numerous tiny para- 

 gnaths in oral ring (figs. 10, 11) 

 Nereis ( Neanthes ) arenaceodonta 



List of Species 



Lycastopsis pontica (Bobretzky, 1872). Found in high intertidal. A primitive, 

 aberrant nereid. 



Nereis ( Neanthes ) arenaceodonta Moore, 1903. Small; common in pilings and in al- 

 gae; occasionally at night light. Includes N. caudata Delle Chiaje. 



N. ( Neanthes ) succinea (Frey and Leuckart, 1847) . Well known to embryologists 

 as Nereis limbata . Common in brackish waters and in the peaty banks of es- 

 tuaries. Usually taken as heteronereids at night light. 



N. ( Neanthes ) virens Sars, 1835. Very common in muddy sand and in more saline con- 

 ditions than N. succinea . 



N. (Nereis ) grayi Pettibone, 1956. In mud, in tubes of Maldanopsis elongata . 



N. ( Nereis ) pelaqica Linnaeus, 1758. Common. On algae. 



Platynereis dumerilii mega lops (Verrill, 1874) . This form exhibits a unique 

 copulation and internal fertilization well known to Woods Hole embryologists. 

 It is regarded by Pettibone as a subspecies of P. dumerilii , but its method 

 of reproduction is such that it is reproductively isolated from the exter- 

 nally fertilizing typical P_. dumerilii of Europe. 



21. Family Onuphidae 

 Key 



1. Peristomial segment without a pair of cirri; tube horny, 



transparent Hyalinoecia tubicola 



1. Peristomial segment with a pair of short tentacular 



cirri (fig. 16) 2 



2. Branchiae large and spiraled; worm large and wonder- 

 fully iridescent; forms long stout vertical tube in 

 sand, the projecting end cluttered with attached debris 

 and shells 



Diopatra cuprea 



2. Branchiae not spiraled Ormphi .q 3 



3. Branchiae pectiniform or with 2 or more filaments where 



best developed subgenus Onuphis 5 



3. Branchiae simple, cirriform subgenus Nothria 4 



4. Branchiae begin on segments 10-13; parapodia of first 

 segment greatly enlarged; tube free, parchment-like, 

 flattened, covered with pebbles and shells 



Onuphis ( Nothria ) conchy lega 



4. Branchia begin on first segment; parapodia of first 

 segment not enlarged; muddy tube 

 Onuphis ( Nothria ) opalina 




72 Polychaeta 



5. Branchiae begin on segments 5-6 , with a maximum of 

 4-5 pectiniform filaments 



Onuphis ( Onuphis ) quadricuspis 



5. Branchiae begin on first segment, with a maximum of 

 5-7 pectiniform filaments 

 Onuphis ( Onuphis ) eremita 



List of Species 



Diopatra cuprea (Bosc, 1802). The prominent tubes, set in sand, are common and 



easily recognized. 

 Hyalinoecia tubicola (0. F. Miiller, 1776). Dredged in mud. 

 Onuphis ( Nothria ) conchyleqa Sars, 1835. Dredged in mud; tube free, scabbard 



shaped. 

 Onuphis ( Nothria ) opalina (Verrill, 1873) . Dredged in mud; tube of mud. 

 Onuphis ( Onuphis ) eremita Audouin and M. Edwards, 1833. Dredged in sand and mud; 



tube of sand or mud. 

 Onuphis ( Onuphis ) quadricuspis Sars, 1872. Dredged; tube of mud. 



22. Family Opheliidae 



Key 



1. Body stout, grub like; no ventral groove 



Travisia carnea 



1. Body Amphioxus shaped, with ventral groove for whole 



length Ammotrypane aulogaster 



1. Ventral groove only behind segments 10-12 



Ophelia 2 



2. Branchiae 18 pairs, crenulate on sides 



Ophelia denticulata 



2. Branchiae 11-15 pairs, smooth Ophelia bicornis 



List of Species 



Ammotrypane aulogaster Rathke, 1843. Dredged. 



Ophelia bicornis Savigny, 1818. Only north of Cape. 



Ophelia denticulata Verrill, 1875. 



Travisia carnea Verrill, 1873. On sand flats, Naushon Island (Mr. Gray). 



23. Family Orbiniidae 



Key 



1. Thoracic neuropodia with numerous postsetal papillae in ver- 

 tical rows (fig. 104) ; branchiae begin on fifth seti- 

 ger; large and robust worms Orbinia ornata 



1. Thoracic neuropodia without rows of papillae (1-3 

 postsetal papillae present in some) ; branchiae start 



on setigers 9-32 Scolopios 2 



2. With a cirrus between the dorsal and ventral para- 

 podial rami of anterior abdominal parapodia (figs. 



105, 106) 3 



2. Without an interramal cirrus Scolopios acutus 




Polychaeta 



73 



3. With ventral papillae on some anterior segments 

 (up to 9 in a row on each side of segments 14- 

 24) Scoloplos riseri 



3. Without ventral papillae 4 



4. With 2-3 subpodial papillae in transitional region 

 between thoracic and abdominal regions, followed 

 by an entire flattened subpodial flange (may be 

 undulate but not incised; fig. 105) 



Scoloplos robustus 



4. With 2 subpodial papillae in transitional region, 

 continuing as 2 subpodial lobes (thus a notched or 

 incised subpodial lobe; fig. 106) 



Scoloplos fragilis 



List of Species 



Naineris quadricuspida (Fabricius, 1780). Dredged in mud. 



Orbinia ornata (Verrill, 1873) . Formerly called Aricia ornata , common in sandy 



shoals . 

 Scoloplos acutus (Verrill, 1873) . Dredged in soft mud. 

 Scoloplos fragilis (Verrill, 1873) . 

 Scoloplos riseri Pettibone, 1957. 

 Scoloplos robustus (Verrill, 1873). Common. In vertical burrows in muddy sand; 



has been called Haploscoloplos robustus . 



24. Family Oweniidae 



Key 



1. Prostomium rounded, without appendages; dredged 



Myriochele heeri Malmgren, 1867- 



1. Prostomium with a slashed branchial membrane (fig. 

 107); tube distinctive, with a dense coating 

 of flattened sand grains and bits of shell set 

 in overlapping fashion like shingles; dredged 



Owenia fusiformis Delle Chiaje, 1844. 



25. Family Paraonidae 



Key 



1. Without dorsal antenna Paraonis 2 



1. With dorsal median antenna (fig. 80); branchiae 

 begin on fourth segment 



Aricidea 



2. Branchiae begin on segments 6-7, 9-14 pairs 



Paraonis gracilis 



2. Branchiae begin on fourth segment, 16-25 pairs 



Paraonis fulgens 



3. Median antenna long, filiform, extending to about 



segments 4-6; branchiae 9-10 pairs Aricidea quadrilobata 



3. Median antenna short (fig. 80), extending to first 

 segment; branchiae 11-18 pairs 

 Aricidea jef freysii 




74 Polychaeta 



List of Species 



Aricidea jef freysii (Mcintosh, 1879) . Dredged in mud. 



Aricidea quadrilobata Webster and Benedict , 1887. Dredged in soft mud. 



Paraonis fulgens (Levinsen, 1883). In sandy beaches. 



Paraonis gracilis (Tauber, 1879) . Dredged in soft mud. 



26. Family Pectinariidae 



List of Species 



Pectinaria ( Cystenides ) gouldii (Verrill, 1873) (fig. 108) . Intertidal; common. 

 This is often referred to as Cystenides gouldii ; Cystenides is a subgenus of 

 Pectinaria . Conical sand tube (fig. 109) is distinctive of family. 



Pectinaria granulata (Linnaeus, 1767). Dredged. 



Pectinaria hyperborea (Malmgren, 1866) . Dredged. 



27. Family Phyllodocidae 



Key 



1. Two pairs (one pair on each side) of peristomial cirri; 

 prostomium triangular with 4 small antennae (fig. 56) 

 Eteone 2 



1. Four pairs (2 pairs on each side) of peristomial tenta- 

 cular cirri (figs. 60, 61) 3 



2. Elongate, slender; pale or yellow; dorsal cirri of 

 middle region on body asymmetrical 



Eteone lactea 



2. Robust, dark green with light green transverse bands 

 between segments; dorsal cirri of middle region sym- 

 metrical, almost triangular Eteone longa 



3. Four prostomial antennae (figs. 57, 61) 4 



3. Five prostomial antennae (figs. 58, 59, 60) 6 



4. Prostomium cordiform (heart shaped) , with an occipital 

 tubercle in the posterior notch (fig. 57) 



Phyllodoce ( Anaitides ) 5 



4. Prostomium oval, without an occipital tubercle (fig. 61) 



Paranaitis speciosa 



5. Ventral cirri oval, blunt, or only slightly pointed dis- 

 tally, with a pointed ventral projection; body heavily 



pigmented Phyllodoce groenlandica 



5. Ventral cirri acutely pointed distally; green, banded 

 with brown, with white marks on dorsum; dorsal cirri 



spotted Phyllodoce mucosa 



6. With 4-5 paired nuchal lappets posterior to prostomium; 

 parapodia biramous; dorsal cirri plate-like, imbricated, 

 resembling elytra of scale worms (fig. 58) 



Notophyllum americanum 



6. Without nuchal lappets; parapodia uniramous 7 



7. Three tentacular segments distinct dorsally (fig. 59) 



Eulalia 8 



7. First tentacular segment not distinct dorsally (fig. 

 60) ; dorsal cirri cordiform; body greenish and yel- 

 lowish, banded with grayish-green, reddish- brown, or 

 light brown Eumida sanguinea 




Polychaeta 75 



8. Dorsal cirri elongate-lanceolate; greenish; body 



rather short Eulalia viridis 



8. Dorsal cirri thick, oval-obtuse; greenish with 



darker longitudinal lateral bands; very slender, 



elongate Eulalia bilineata 



List of Species 



Eteone lactea Claparede, 1868. Common in sandy mud. Includes E. alba Webster. 



Eteone lonqa (Fabricius, 1780). Includes E. robusta Verrill. 



Eulalia bilineata (Johnston, 1840) . In algae. May form epitokous sexual form. 



Eulalia viridis (Linnaeus, 1767). Common, on pilings. 



Eumida sanguinea (Oersted, 1843). Common, on pilings. 



Notophyllum americanum Verrill, 1885. Rare. Dredged. 



Paranaitis speciosa (Webster, 1880) . Rare. In sand. 



Phyllodoce ( Anaitides ) arenae W ebster, 1879. In muddy sand. May swarm at surface 



of water. 

 Phyllodoce ( Anaitides ) qroenlandica Oersted, 1842. Dredged. 



Phyllodoce ( Anaitides ) maculata (Linnaeus, 1767). Common among rocks and algae. 

 P hyllodoce ( Anaitides ) mucosa Oersted, 1843. Common in muddy sand. 



28. Family Polynoidae 

 Key 



1. Elytra 12 pairs (fig. 1) 2 



1. Elytra, more than 12 pairs 3 



2. Elytral tubercles small, widely spaced; commensal in 

 shells occupied by Pagurus pnllicaris 



Lepidonotus sublevis 



2. Elytral tubercles larger, crowded; very common, 



free living Lepidonotus squamatus 



3. 15 pairs of scales 4 



3. 40-50 pairs of scales; commensal in tubes of Amphi - 



trite ornata Lepidametria commensalis 



4. Anterior pair of eyes antero-ventral on prostomium, 

 not visible dorsally (fig. 2) 



Harmothoe imbricata 



4. Anterior pair of eyes antero-dorsal on prostomium, 



visible dorsally Harmothoe extenuata 



List of Species 



Alentiana aurantiaca (Verrill, 1885). Dredged; commensal with anemone, Bolocera 



tuediae . 

 Antinoella angusta (Verrill, 1874) . Dredged in mud. 

 Arcteobia anticostiensis (Mcintosh, 1874) . Dredged in mud. 

 Enipo gracilis Verrill, 1874. Dredged in mud; commensal with maldanid, Nicomache 



lumbricalis . 

 Gattyana amondseni (Malmgren, 1867) . Dredged in mud. 

 Gattyana cirrosa (Pallas, 1766) . Dredged in mud. 

 Harmothoe ( Eunoe ) nodosa (Sars, 1860) . Dredged. 

 Harmothoe ( Eunoe ) oerstedi (Malmgren, 1865) . Dredged. 

 Harmothoe (Eunoe) spinulosa (Verrill, 1870) . Dredged. 




-jr Polychaeta 



Harmothoe ( Lagisca ) extenuata (Grube, 1840). Common; under stones, algae. 



Harmothoe imbricata (Linnaeus, r?67)Very common. This is the species usually en- 

 countered; under stones, algae. 



Harmothoe fraqilis Moore, 1910. Dredged. 



Lepidametria commensalis Webster, 1879. Commensal in tubes of Amphi trite ornata . 



Lepidonotus squamatus (Linnaeus, 1758). Very common. Under stones. 



Lepidonotus sublevis Verrill, 1873. Dredged. Commensal in snail shells occu- 

 pied by hermit crab Paqurus pollcaris . 



29. Family Sabellariidae 



Sabellaria vulgaris Verrill, 1873. Common. Dredged; on shells or in bryozoan 

 nodules (fig. 110) . 



30. Family Sabellidae 

 Key 



1. Tiny, of 10-12 setigerous segments; eyes on first segment 

 and on rear of body (fig. 50) ; poorly defined muddy tubes, 

 which worms may leave and move about, tail first 

 Fabricia sabella 



1. Larger, of more than 12 setigerous segments 2 



2. Branchial filaments united by membrane for most of 

 length; tube of mucus, transparent and thick 



Myxicola infundibulum 



2. Branchial filaments united by membrane for at least 

 half their length; tubes inconspicuous, usually 

 buried in sand or mud 3 



2. Branchial filaments often with eyes and united only 

 at bases; tubes obvious, leathery, usually coated 



with sand 4 



3. Large ventral groove with flared sides on about 9 

 posterior segments; collarette bilobed: notched 

 mid-dorsally and with a small ventral slit 



Euchone rubrocincta 



3. Without ventral groove; collarette entire ventrally, 

 with only a small mid-dorsal slit (fig. 51) 



Chone infundibuliformis 



4. Branchial filaments without eyes 



Potamilla neglecta 



4. Branchial filaments with eyes 5 



5. Eyes in pairs, 2-6 on each branchial filament, situa- 

 ted in the transverse color bands; collarette 4-lobed 

 by a small lateral notch on each side in addition to 

 the dorsal and ventral slits (fig. 52) 



Sabella crassicornis 



5. Eyes not paired 6 



6. Branchial filaments with 2 irregular rows of many 

 eyespots ; collarette bilobed by ventral and dorsal 

 slits; body short and thick (figs. 53, 54) 



Sabella microphthalma 



6. Branchial filaments with 1-8 large "compound eyes" 

 in a single row; collarette 4-lobed; body long and 

 thin (fig. 55) Potamilla reniformis 




Polychaeta 77 



List of Species 



Chone infundibuliformis . Kr6"yer, 1856. 



Euchone rubrocincta (Sars, 1861) . 



Fabricia sabella (Ehrenberg, 1837) . This is the only one of our sabellids that can 



leave its tube and move about. 

 Myxicola infundibulum (Renier, 1804). Dredged; noted for its giant axon. 

 P otamilla neglecta (Sars, 1851). Dredged. 



Potamilla renif ormis (Linnaeus, 1788). Common; dredged on shells. 

 Sabella crassicornis Sars, 1851. Dredged. 

 Sabella microphthalma Verrill, 1873. 



31. Family Scalibregmidae 

 Key 



1. Prostomium T-shaped, with frontal horns (fig. 20); body inflated 



anteriorly. In mud; intertidal and dredged. . Scalibregma inf latum Rathke, 1843. 



1. Prostomium bilobed; without frontal horns; body short and fusi- 

 form Polyphysia crassa (Oersted, 1843) . 



32. Family Serpulidae 

 Key 



1. Minute, flat coiled tubes on stones, algae. Spirorbis 2 



1. Irregular tubes up to several inches long, on rocks and shells 5 



2. Tubes coiled "dextrally" (figs. 62, 63, 64) 3 



2. Tubes coiled 'sinistrally" (figs. 65, 67) 4 



3. Tube white, opaque, shiny, smooth (figs. 62, 63) 



Spirorbis ( Dexiospira ) spirillum 



3. Tube white, opaque, thick and tough with 3 rounded longitudinal 

 ridges produced into blunt teeth at opening (fig. 64); lined with 



dark layer Spirorbis ( Paradexiospira ) violaceus 



4. Tube without luster, chalky, without longitudinal ridges (fig. 65); 



eggs incubated in tube Spirorbis ( Laeospira ) bo realis 



4. Tube with 2-3 longitudinal ridges to almost smooth (fig. 67); 

 eggs incubated in a brood pouch in operculum (fig. 68) 



Spirorbis ( Laeospira ) granulatus 



5. Operculum a two-tiered structure on a smooth peduncle (fig. 70); 

 common; tube usually attached for most of length 



Hydroides ( Eupomatus ) dianthus 



5. Without an operculum; tube large white, cylindrical; erect and 



almost straight in its unattached distal portion Protula tubularia 



5. Two opercula, each a thin shallow membraneous cup with barbules 

 on peduncle (fig. 69); tubes very slender (ca. 1 mm) in an inter- 

 twining mass F iloqrana imp lexa 



List of Species 



F iloqrana i mplexa Berkeley, 1828. Dredged. 



Hydroides ( Eupomatus ) dianth us (Verrill, 1873) . This has been called Hydroi des hex- 



agonas , Serpula dianthus , Eupomatus dianthus , and Hydroides uncina ta . 

 Protula tubularia (Montagu, 1803) . Dredged. 

 Spirorbis ( Dexiospira ) spirillum (Linnaeus, 1758). Common. 

 Spiro r bis ( Laeospira ) borealis Daudin, 1800. Common. 

 Spirorb is ( Laeospira ) granulata (Linnaeus, 1767). Dredged. 

 Spirorbis (P aradexiospira ) violaceus Levinsen, 1883. Dredged. 




78 Polychaeta 



33. Family Sigalionidae 

 List of Species 



Leanira hystricus Ehlers, 1875. Dredged in mud. 



Leanira tetragona (Oersted, 1845) . Dredged in mud. 



Pholoe minuta (Fabricius, 1780). Dredged. 



Sigalion arenicola Verrill. 1879. Rare, in sand. 



Sthenelais boa (Johnston, 1873). Common, in Zostera root masses in certain areas, 



e.g., Lagoon Pond. 

 Sthenelais limicola (Ehlers, 1864) . Dredged in sand and mud. 



34. Family Spionidae 

 Key 



1. Fifth setiger very modified, with large dorsal setae 



(fig. 6) i Polydora 2 



1. Fifth setiger like the rest, unmodified 4 



2. Branchiae begin on setiger 6, continuing nearly to 

 posterior end of body; color orange; pygidium with 

 many papillae; bores in shells used by hermit crabs 



Polydora commensalis 



2. Branchiae begin on setiger 7, continuing nearly to 

 posterior end; pygidium with an anal cup notched 



dorsally 3 



3. Prostomium clearly bifid anteriorly, and with a median 



occipital antenna (fig. 81) Polydora liqni 



3. Prostomium indistinctly bifid anteriorly; without a 



median occipital antenna Polydora ciliata 



4. Without branchiae; prostomium T-shaped (fig. 82) 



Spiophanes bombyx 



4. With 1 pair of branchiae dorsal to the 2 coiling palps 



Streblcspio benedicti 



4. With 4-5 pairs of branchiae, some pinnate, others 



smooth Prionospio spp. 



4. With numerous branchiae 5 



5. Branchiae begin on or about 13th setiger (11-20); 



about 14 pairs (7-28) Pyqospio eleqans 



5. Branchiae begin on first setiger, absent from last 

 half or third of body; in brackish water (fig. 83) 



Scolecolepides viridi s 



5. Branchiae begin on second setiger, continue to rear 

 of body; in sandy beaches (fig. 85) 

 Scolelepis squama ta 



5. Branchiae begin on first setiger, continue to rear 



of body 6 



6. Prostomium conical; eyes nearly in a transyerse line 



(fig. 84) Dispio uncinata 



6. Prostomium inflated anteriorly; eyes set in a square 



(fig. 86) Spio 7 



7. Ventral lamellae greatly reduced; about 16 hooded cro- 

 chets in each neuropodium; body dull green with red 

 branchiae held erect over dorsum; common in thick fragile 



sand tubes on beaches Spio setosa 



7. Ventral lamellae little reduced; about 6 hooded crochets 



in each neuropodium (fig. 87) Spio f ilicornis 




Polychaeta 79 



List of Species 



Dispio uncinata Hartman, 1951. Burrows in sand. 



Laonice cirrata (Sars, 1851). Dredged. 



Polydora ciliata (Johnston, 1838). In shells. 



Polydora commensalis Andrews, 1891. A bright orange-red worm, commensal with her- 

 mit crabs in snail shells; penetrates columnella of shell and not seen with- 

 out breaking shell. Orange eggs attached in clusters in burrow. 



Polydora liani Webster, 1879. Makes vertical burrows in stiff mud or clay, often 

 in estuaries. Eggs laid in capsules in burrows. 



Prionospio heterobranchia Moore, 1907. At low water mark and dredged, in mud. 



Prionospio steenstrupi Malmgren, 1867. Dredged in mud. 



Scolecolepides viridis (Verrill, 1873) . Penetrates further up estuaries than any 

 other local polychaete. 



Scolelepis squamata (0. F. MiJller, 1789) . Includes Nerinides aqilis (Verrill, 

 1873). Makes vertical tubes in sandy beaches. 



Spio f ilicornis (0. F. Miiller, 1776) . Dredged. 



Spio setosa Verrill, 1873. The fragile chimney-like sandy tubes are distinctive 

 in beach areas. Common. 



Spiophanes b ombyx (Clax^arede, 1870) . Slender, branched, sandy tube. 



Streblospio benedicti Webster, 1879. Characteristically in estuaries. 



35. Family Sternaspidae (not in key) 



Sternaspis scutata (Renier, 1807). Distinctive, gray, grub- like worms, with a 

 pair of horny ventral plates. Dredged in soft bottoms. 



36. Family Syllidae 

 Key 



1. Without ventral cirri; palps reduced or lacking; often 

 collected at night lights as sexually dimorphic males 

 ( " Polybostrichus ") and females ( "S acconereis " ) , the 

 latter bearing sacs of white or brilliantly colored 

 eggs Subfamily AUTOLYTINAE 4 



1. With ventral cirri; palps better developed 2 



2. Antennae and cirri moniliform (beaded); oral palps free 



or fused at base only Subfamily SYLLINAE 5 



2. Antenna and dorsal cirri smooth or indistinctly beaded 3 



3. Palps not fused, or fused only at base 



Subfamily EUSYLLINAE 7 



3. Palps fused for entire length; eggs and larvae attached 

 along dorsal or ventral surfaces of the female 



Subfamily EXOGONINAE 11 



Subfamily Autolytinae 

 Key 



4. Without long capillary swimming setae: the "stem" or 

 asexually reproducing form of Autolytus (fig. 37) ; see key in 

 Pettibone (1963) . 



4. With long capillary swimming setae; in "heterosyllid" 



form with body in 2 or 3 distinct regions; sexually di- 

 morphic; both males and the females, carrying 1-3 sacs 

 of eggs, are often taken at night-lights. The specific 

 identification of the tiny worms is difficult; consult 

 the more complete treatment by Pettibone (1963). 




80 Polychaeta 



Subfamily Syllinae 

 Key 



5. Parapodia with simple setae only, few (2-5) in number, 



with bifid tips; dorsal cirri with - 60 articles Syllis spongiphila 



5. At least some of parapodia have compound setae 6 



6. Dorsal cirri alternately longer and shorter, with 20-40 

 articles; blades of upper compound setae fringed, appear- 

 ing bifid Syllis cornuta 



6. Dorsal cirri with 7-16 articles (figs. 23, 24); blades 

 of compound setae do not appear bifid (fig. 25), but 

 there may be heavy bifurcated simple setae (fig. 26) in 

 some of the median segments Syllis gracilis 



Subfamily Eusyllinae 

 Key 



7. With occipital or nuchal epaulettes; body short, of few 

 segments; proboscis long, sinuous, armed with a complete 

 circle of bicuspid teeth Amblyosyllis finmarchica 



7. Without occipital or nuchal epaulettes; proboscis straight 



8 



8. Occipital flap or nuchal hood covers rear of prostomium 

 (fig. 28); proboscis armed with semicircle of 6-7 large 



recurved teeth (fig. 29) Odontosyllis fulgurans 



8. Without nuchal hood 9 



9. Proboscis armed with a large anterior tooth and with 

 numerous denticles (fig. 32); prostomium with 6 eyes 



(fig. 31) Eusyllis lamelligera 



9. Proboscis unarmed 10 



10. Antennae and dorsal cirri cylindrical; acicula large, 



knobbed (fig. 30) Streptosyllis sp. 



10. Antennae and dorsal cirri swollen, club shaped; with- 

 out large knobbed acicula Syllides spp. 



Subfamily Exogoninae 

 Key 



11. Two pairs of tentacular {peristomial) cirri ; 3 pairs of 

 eyes; antennae and dorsal cirri fusiform (fig. 33) 



Brania clavata 



11. One pair of tentacular cirri 12 



12. Tentacular cirri 1 pair, similar to antennae; dorsal 

 cirri swollen at base, tapering to narrow tip (fig. 36) 



Sphaerosyllis erinaceus 



12. Tentacular cirri 1 pair, rudimentary ; dorsal and ven- 

 tral cirri cylindrical or club shaped, not swollen at 

 base, median antenna fusiform, reaching nearly to end 

 of palps (fig. 34) Exoqone 13 




Polychaeta 



81 



13. Two pairs of eyes (fig. 35) Exogone dispar 



13. Three pairs of eyes (fig. 34) Exogone hebes 



Subfamily Autolytinae 

 List of Species 



Autolytus alexandri Mal'!>gren, 1867. On algae. 

 Autolytus cornutus A. Agassiz, 1863. Common on algae. 

 Autolytus emertoni Verrill, 1881. Taken in plankton. 

 Autolytus fasciatus (Bosc, 1802). Includes A. ornatus Verrill. 

 Autolytus prismaticus (Fabricius, 1780). Dredged; in sponges. 

 Autolytus prolifer (0. F. Muller, 1788). Common on pilings. 



Common on pilings. 



Subfamily Syllinae 

 List of Species 



Syllis cornuta Rathke, 1843. Dredged; in sponges. 



Syllis gracilis Grube, 1840. Common, under stones or algae. 



Syllis spongiphila Verrill, 1885. Dredged; in muddy sand. 



Subfamily Eusyllinae 

 List of Species 



Amblyosyllis f inmarchica (Malngren, 1867) . Includes Pterosyllis cincinnata Verrill) 



Eusyllis blomstrandi Malmgren, 1867. Dredged. 



Eusyllis lamelligera Marion and Bobretsky. Includes E. fragilis Webster. Common; 

 dredged among shells, bryozoans. 



Odontosyllis fulgurans Claparede, 1864 . Common on pilings. Reproduces by lumin- 

 escent swarmers at surface. 



Streptosyllis sp. 



Syllides longocirrata Oersted, 1845. Includes S_. convoluta Webster and Benedict. 

 In sand. 



Syllides setosa Verrill, 1882. In mussel beds. 



Subfamily Exogoninae 

 List of Species 



Brania clavata (Claparede, 1863) . Common, in mud, mussel beds. 



Brania wellfleetensis Pettibone, 1956. 



Exogone dispar (Webster, 1879) . Common, in mussel beds. 



Exogone hebes (Webster and Benedict, 1884) . 



Exogone veruqera (Claparede, 1868) . 



Parapionosyllis longicirrata (Webster and Benedict, 1884) . Common in muddy sand. 



Sphaerosyllis erinaceus Claparede, 1863. In sand or on pilings. 



37. Family Terebellidae 

 Key 



With dorsally placed gills just behind tentacular fila- 

 ments (usually contrasting with filaments in color) ; 

 body usually with pronounced thickening of "thoracic" 



region 



Lacking dorsal gills (branchiae) on anterior part of body; 

 bodies less stout, and departing more from the fully ex- 

 pressed "typical" terebellid form than the above group . . 



11 




82 Polychaeta 



2. Gills arborescent or branching in tree-like fashion (fig. 



38) 3 



2. Gills consisting of one to many unbranched filaments 



(fig. 39) 8 



3. Three pairs of branching branchiae (note: one member of 



a pair may be very small or lacking) 4 



3. Two pairs of branching branchiae (note: as above) 6 



3. One pair of branching branchiae; numerous eyespots (fig. 



41) ; 16 thoracic setigerous segments 

 Pista maculata 



3. With a single large branchia formed of 4 branchiae fused 

 into one large trunk bearing 4 pectinate lobes (fig. 43) ; 



18 thoracic setigers Terebellides stroemi 



4. Setae on 40-50 segments; a large and common worm 



Amphi trite ornata 



4. Setae on 23-45 segments Amphi trite Johns toni 



4. Setae extend to posterior end of body 



Terebella lapidaria 



4. Setae on 17 segments 5 



5. Buccal segment with large lateral lobes, joined ventrally; 

 the first of the three pairs of branchiae with long main 

 stems, much longer than the last two pairs 



Loimia medusa 



5. Without enlarged lateral lobes on buccal segment; branchiae 



subequal Amphi trite af finis 



6. Setae on 17 segments (note: first setigerous segment 

 lacks the neuropodial uncini) ; with lateral lobes on 



anterior segments 7 



6. Setae on 15 segments; numerous eyespots (fig. 40); with- 

 out lateral lobes on anterior segments 



Nicolea venustula 



Note: The young of Nicolea are commonly seen as 'hydra-worms" in washings of 

 Fiimis : they resemble creeping brown hydras with eyespots on cephalic ridge. 



7. Branchiae spirally branched, making (when contracted) a 

 compact oval red pompom on a stalk (fig. 42); one branchia 

 usually much larger than rest 



Pista crista ta 



7. Branchiae arborescent, not spirally branched, with large 



main trunk, usually unequal in size Pista palmata 



8. With 3 pairs of branchiae, each consisting of one simple 

 long filament; numerous eyespots; 15 thoracic setigers 



Trichobranchus qlacialis 



8. With 2-3 pairs of branchiae, each made up of transverse 



rows of unbranched filaments (fig. 39) 9 



9. Two pairs of branchiae; numerous eyespots; notosetae be- 

 gin on second gill bearing segment and continue to post- 

 erior end Thelepus cincinnatus 



9. Three pairs of branchiae; no eyespots 10 



10. Notosetae begin on third branchial (gill bearing) seg- 

 ment, continue on 17 segments; uncini begin on second 

 setiger; tube membranous, encrusted Amphi trite cirrata 



10. Notosetae begin on first branchial segment and continue 

 over a large part of body; uncini begin on fourth seti- 

 ger; tube hard, coiled Streblosoma spiralis 




Polychaeta 83 



11. Very soft and fragile; transparent to yellowish; no 



setae; somewhat resembles a damaged Leptosvnapta when 



collected, but tentacles are terebellid-like Lysilla alba 



11. Fragile, elongate, blood-red body; setae on all seg- 

 ments, but no uncini; branching red parapodia in mid 

 body region: these look like gills, but note setae! 

 (fig. 44) Enoplobranchus sanguineus 



11. Small worms, enveloped in their tentacles, in which 

 red corpuscles circulate, but lack actual branchiae; 



setae and uncini present in part of body Polycirrus 12 



12. Red; setae on 18-25 segments; common Polycirrus eximius 



12. Red; setae on 11-13 segments Polycirrus medusa 



12. Lemon-yellow; setae on 24-32 segments Polycirrus phosphoreus 



List of Species 



Amphitrite af finis Malmgren, 1866. Dredged. 



Amphi trite cirrata 0. F. Miiller, 1771. Dredged. 



Amphitrite Johns toni Malmgren, 1866. Dredged. 



Amphitrite ornata (Leidy, 1855). Common. Forms muddy mounds on intertidal flats. 



Enoplobranchus sanguineus (Verrill, 1873). In mud; easily recognized by the bril- 

 liant color. 



Loimia medusa (Savigny, 1818) . Dredged. 



Lysilla alba W ebster , 1879. In guite muddy sand, where it makes a surface depres- 

 sion much like that of Leptosynapta . 



Nicolea venustula (Montagu, 1818). Usually seen as the tiny (immature) "hydra 

 worms" in washings from algae. 



Pista cristata (0. F. Muller, 1776) . Occurs in mud, but tube is very rough and en- 

 crusted with coarse pebbles. Common. 



Pista maculata (Dalyell, 1853). Dredged. 



Pista palmata (Verrill, 1873) . 



Polycirrus eximius (Leidy, 1855) . The commonly taken form. Red cells circulate 

 in tentacles. 



Polycirrus medusa Grube, 1850. Dredged. 



Polycirrus phosphoreus Verrill, 1880. 



Streblosoma spiralis (Verrill, 1874) . Dredged. 



Terebella lapidaria (Linnaeus, 1767). 



Terebellides stroemi Sars, 1835. Dredged. 



Thelepus cincinnatus (Fabricius, 1780). Dredged. 



Tr i chobr anchu s glacialis Malmgren, 1866. Dredged. 



CRITICAL REFERENCES ON POLYCHAETES 



Fauvel, P., 1923. Polychetes E rrantes . Faune de France, Paris, _5: 1-488. 



Fauvel, P., 1927. Polychetes Sedentaires . Faune de France, Paris, j^: 1-494. 



Pettibone, M. H., 1963 . Marine Polychaete Worms of the New England Region, Part 1, 

 Families Aphroditidae through Trochochaetidae . Bull. U. S. Nat. Mus., 227 : 

 1-356. 



Pettibone, M.H., Ibid . Part 2, in preparation. 



Hartman, O., 1951. Literature of the Polychaetous Annelids. Vol. 1. Biblio- 

 graphy. 



Hartman, 0., 1959. Catalogue of the polychaetous annelids of the world. Allan 

 Hancock Foundation Publ., Occas . Paper 2_3: 1-628. (For additional bibliography 

 and synonymy) . 




84 Chapter X 



PHYLUM ARTHROPODA 



Subphylum Chelicerata 



In the great group of chelicerates are included a variety of "arachnoid" types , most 

 of which are in highly specialized terrestrial groups. Marine representatives include 

 the primitive and ancient Xiphosur J da ("horseshoe crabe") , the small and specialized or- 

 der of Pycnogonida ("sea spiders") of obscure affinities, and the marine mites (Order 

 Acarina, Family Halacaridae) . Of the latter, about 20 species have been recorded from 

 southern New England, but the study of these small creatures presents difficulties, and 

 the interested student is referred to the comprehensive work of Newell, I. M. , 1947. 

 A systematic and ecological study of the Halacaridae of eastern North America. Bull. 

 Bingham Oceanogr. Coll., 1J3: 1-232. 



Class Xiphosurida 



Limulus Polyphemus (Linnaeus), the common "horseshoe crab", has been almost univer- 

 sally known as Limulus , except for a brief period in which the name Xiphosura polyphe - 

 mus was unfortunately used. Briefly: in 1928 the International (iommission on Zoological 

 Nomenclature placed Limulus of 0. F. Miiller 1785 on the "Official List of Generic Names 

 in Zoology" in the mistaken belief that this name was available and valid. However, 

 Xiphosura was later found to have been used by Brunnich in 1771 for this animal, and so 

 had priority. The discovery that the 1928 Opinion was made in error led some workers 

 to consider it "not binding", and in the period around 1950 the authors of several works 

 (including "Selected Invertebrate Types") used Xiphosura . In 1955, the International 

 Commission, acting under its plenary powers (suspension of the rules) invalidated the 

 priority of Xiphosura as a generic name of the American horseshoe crab. Opinion 320, 

 including the letters expressing the views of specialists, makes instructive reading. 



Class Pycnogonida 



Despite the abundance of pycnogonids (about 50 genera and 500 species) in the seas 

 of the world, the fauna of Woods Hole includes only three common species: Tanystylum 

 orbiculare , Callipallene brevirostris , and Anoplodactylus lentus . This group has re- 

 ceived little attention in recent years, although the first good systematic report on 

 them in America was that on New England Pycnogonida by E. B. Wilson, and their embry- 

 ology was described by T. H. Morgan in his doctoral thesis (1891). Most shore pycno- 

 gonids feed upon hydroids and the young stages of many species encyst or form galls 

 in hydroids. Since our information is still incomplete, collectors would do well to 

 note the associated coelenterate in making collections. The following key will sep- 

 arate the common local species, plus one common north of the Cape; for anything that 

 will not key out, consult Hedgpeth (1948). 



KEY TO COMMON PYCNOGONIDS 

 (Figure references are to Plate 11) 



1. Chelifores present; palpi lacking (fig. 1) 2 



1. Chelifores absent; palpi present, of 4-7 joints (fig. 4); 



small species (TANYSTYLIDAE) Tanystylum orbiculare 



2. Ovigerous legs 10- jointed and present in both sexes; 



(fig. 3) (PALLENIDAE) Callipallene brevirostris 



2. Ovigerous legs less than 10- jointed, and lacking in 



females (fig. 6) PHOXICHILIDIIDAE 3 




Pycnogonida 



85 



3. Cephalic segment extended forward as a short neck, 



overhanging base of proboscis (fig. 5) Anoplodactyius lentus 



3. Cephalic segment not forming a neck (fig. 2) (common 



north of Cape) Phoxichilidium femora turn 



ANNOTATED LIST OF PYCNOGONIDS REPORTED FROM 

 THE CAPE COD REGION 



Anoplodactyius lentus Wilson, 1878. Breeds in August at Woods Hole. Dawson has described 

 the colored blood corpuscles (Biol. Bull., 66_: 1934). Rare north of Cape. In Morgan's 

 embryological work, called Phoxichilidium maxillare . 



Callipallene brevirostris (Johnson, 1837) . The smallest of the common pycnogonids at 

 Woods Hole. Found among hydroids and on pilings. Referred to by Morgan as Pallene 

 em pus a . 



Endeis spinosa (Montagu, 1808) . Not in key. Occasional at Woods Hole upon drifting Sar - 

 gassum . 



Pvcnogonum littorale (Strom, 1762). Not in key. No record for Woods Hole, although with- 

 in the reported range. 



Phoxichi lidium femora turn (Rathke, 1799) . Has been taken abundantly on Tubularia north 

 of the Cape. 



Tanvstylum orbiculare Wilson, 1878. Common but small and easily overlooked; found on 

 pilings and among ascidians and hydroids. 



REFERENCES 



Hedgpeth, J. W. , 1948. The Pycnogonida of the western North Atlantic and the Caribbean. 



Proc. U. S. Nat. Mus., 9J7_: 157-342. 

 Morgan, T. H. , 1891. A contribution to the embryology and phylogeny of the pycnogonids. 



Studies from the Biol. Lab., Johns Hopkins Univ., 5_: 1-76, pi. I -VIII. 

 Wilson, E. B., 1878. Synopsis of the Pycnogonida of New England, Trans. Conn. Acad. 



Arts & Sci. , 5: 1-26. 




86 



Plate 11 



PYCNOGONIDA, CIRRIPEDIA 



(1-6) Pycnogonids after Hedgpeth (scale bars = 1 mm); 

 (7-19 barnacles after Zullo; all redrawn by Bruce 



Shearer . 



1. Anatomy of a generalized pycnogonid: Abdomen (ab) 



Eye tubercle (et) 



2. Phoxichilidium f e moratum . Chelifore (ch) 



Palp (pa) 



3. Callipallene brevirostris . Proboscis (pr) 



Ovigerous leg (ov) 



4. T anystylum orbicular e. Femur (f) 



Tarsus (t) 



5. Anoplodactylus lentus . Tibia, first, second (t-^, t 2 ) 



Propodus (p) 



6. Ovigerous leg of male A. lentus ■ 



7. Generalized lepadomorph barnacle with capitular sheath cut away to show 

 cirri and filamentary appendages. 



8. Balanus balanus , base of shell wall seen from below, showing internal 

 ribs and septa. 



9. Balanus improvisus , shell only, showing radius only partly overlapping 

 ala. 



10. Balanus eburneus , shell only, show- ala (a) 



ing extensive overlap of ala by carina (car) 

 radius. carinolateral plate (clp) 



cirri (c) 



11. Lepas anserifera , seen from right excavation of tergum (e) 

 side. filamentary appendages (f) 



lateral plate (lp) 



12. Diagram of plate arrangement paries (p) 

 in Chthamalu s. radius (r) 



rostral plate (rp) 



13. Diagram of plate arrangement (rp = fused ros f rip) 

 in Balanus . rostrolateral plate (rip) 



rostrum (ros) 



14. Balanus amphi trite niveus , showing scutum (s) 

 color pattern of longitudinal striae. tergal spur (ts) 



tergum (t) 



15. Exterior of tergum of Balanus impro- 

 visus , showing tergal spur. 



16. Exterior of scutum of _B. eburneus , showing radial striations. 



17. Interior of tergum of _B. eburneus , showing excavation on carinal side 

 of basal margin. 



18. Interior of scutum of _B. amphi trite a mph i trite , showing adductor ridge 

 diagonal line near center) . 




Plate 




88 Chapter XI 



PHYLUM ARTHROPODA 



Class Crustacea 



Lower Crustacea and Cirripedia 



Keys are available only for some of the numerous and varied crustacean groups. 

 Branchiopods in general are found in fresh water, and may be worked out with the 

 aid of Ward and Whipple or of Pennak ' s guide to fresh water life. Copepods and 

 ostracods, because of the number of species and their small size, do not lend them- 

 selves to keying at the level of this guide. Cirripedes, amphipods , and isopods 

 will prove difficult. The decapods, on the other hand, are well known and large 

 forms, and, with some exceptions, can be identified with a fair degree of certain- 

 ty. A key to the subclasses and major orders of crustaceans is not presented; the 

 reader is referred to a basic reference text on invertebrate zoology. 



In matters of classification and nomenclature, these keys follow the system 

 outlined by Waterman and Chace in Chapter I, Vol. I, of "The Physiology of Crus- 

 tacea", edited by T. H. Waterman. The excellent systematic indices of the two 

 volumes are very helpful in respect to the synonymy of experimentally used crusta- 

 ceans . 



Subclass Cephalocarida (no key) Hutchinsoniella macracantha Sanders, 1955 is found 

 in soft sediments at 10-30 meters depth. Not rare but very small (2-3.5 mm). 

 See figure in Sanders, H. L., 1963. Cephalocarida. Functional morphology, lar- 

 val development, comparative external anatomy. Mem. Conn. Acad. Arts & Sci., 

 15 : 1-80. 



Subclass Branchiopoda 



Order Anostraca (no local marine representatives) 

 Order Notostraca (no local marine representatives) 

 Order Conchostraca (no local marine representatives) 



Order Cladocera (no key) : The genera Evadne and Podon occur in the marine plank- 

 ton. 

 Subclass Ostracoda (no key) : Numerous marine representatives. 



Subclass Mystacocarida (no key) : Derocheilocaris tvpicus Pennak and Zinn (Smithson- 

 ian Misc. Coll., 103(9): 1943) is the type of this subclass. It is minute (0.4- 

 0.5 mm) and lives in the spaces between sand grains on Nobska and Falmouth bea- 

 ches. 



Subclass Copepoda (no key) : Extremely numerous in sea, both free living and para- 

 sitic. See Wilson, C. B. , 1932. The copepods of the Woods Hole Region, Massa- 

 chusetts. U. S. Nat. Mus. Bull. 158 : I-XIX, 1-635. 



Subclass Branchiura (no key): "Fish lice"; the genus Argulus occurs on fish in 



both fresh and salt water. Formerly considered an order (Arguloida) of the Co- 

 pepoda, but now separated on the basis of their compound eyes and other fea- 

 tures. For local species see Wilson (1932; cited above) pp. 11-18. 




Subclass Cirripedia 89 



by Victor A. Zullo 



Order Thoracica 

 (Figure references are to Plate 11) 



Classification and identification of thoracic barnacles is based primarily on 

 three sets of criteria: 1) mode of attachment to the substrate, 2) number, morpho- 

 logy and arrangement of the calcareous plates forming the shell wall ( compartmental 

 plates ) and closing the orifice ( opercular valves ) , and 3) morphology of the mouth 

 parts ( trophi ) and appendages ( cirri ) . The Thoracica of this region are easily di- 

 vided into two suborders on the basis of the mode of attachment. Members of the Sub- 

 order Lepadomorpha are distinguished by the presence of a conspicuous, fleshy attach- 

 ment stalk ( peduncle ) below the distal, expanded end ( capitulum ) which is more or less 

 completely sheathed by calcareous plates. The shell in members of the Suborder Bal- 

 anomorpha, on the other hand, is attached directly to the substrate, and it is to 

 this group that most of the common barnacles of the Cape Cod Region belong. 



The lepadomorphs included in the key are all of the genus Lepas . Specific deter- 

 mination is based 1) on the form and ornamentation of the plates ( scutum , terqum . and 

 carina ) sheathing the capitulum (fig. 11), and 2) on the number of filamentary appen- 

 dages present at the base of Cirrus I and on the prosoma. This latter feature can 

 only be observed by removing one side of the capitular sheath to expose the body of 

 the barnacle (fig. 7). 



The balanomorphs commonly found in this region ( Chthamalus and Balanus) have a 

 shell wall composed of six compartmental plates and the orifice filled by four oper- 

 cular valves (2 scuta and 2 terga) (figs. 12-13). Both end plates of the shell wall 

 ( rostrum and carina ) are overlapped by the adjacent compartmental plates in the genus 

 Chthamalus (fig. 12), but in the genus Balanus , one of the end plates ( rostral plate ) 

 overlaps the adjacent plates (fig. 13). 



Specific identification of balanomorph species requires a more detailed examina- 

 tion of the opercular valves and shell. In some species, the basal plate sealing the 

 barnacle to the substrate is membranous, but in others a calcareous plate is laid down 

 and often remains attached to the substrate upon removal of the barnacle. The shell 

 wall in many species of Balanus is formed of vertical inner and outer laminae separ- 

 ated by longitudinal septa. These septa are usually reflected on the inner shell wall 

 as regularly spaced, longitudinal ribs, which are especially evident near the base of 

 the shell wall. In some instances the number of ribs exceeds the number of septa, and 

 this character is used to differentiate certain species (fig. 8). The development of 

 the articulation between adjacent compartmental plates is also a useful character in 

 the identification of some taxa. In B. improvisus , for example, the overlapping sec- 

 tion of the plate ( radius , plural radii ) is narrow and does not cover the overlapped 

 section (ala, plural alae ) or extend to the central part of the adjacent plate ( par - 

 ies , plural parieties ) (fig. 9). 



The removal and examination of opercular valves is necessary for proper identifi- 

 cation of most species. The presence or absence on the scutum of an adductor ridge, or 

 external radial striae (figs. 16, 18), and the degree of development of the tergal spur 

 (figs. 15, 17) are characters which are used in the key. However, there are many oth- 

 er features of these valves which are equally significant in specific determination. 



KEY TO COMMON BARNACLES OF THE WOODS HOLE REGION 



1. Animal enclosed in shell composed of varying numbers of plates 2 



1. Animal without shell, found in burrow with comma shaped aper- 

 ture in the shells of gastropods occupied by hermit crabs . . Trypetesa lampas 



2. Shell attached directly to substrate Suborder BALANOMORPHA 3 



2. Shell attached to substrate by fleshy stalk or peduncle Suborder LEPADOMORPHA 9 




90 Cirripedia 



3. Both end plates of shell wall (rostrum and carina) over- 

 lapped by adjacent plates (fig. 12); shell dull brown or 

 grey; basis membranous Chthamalus fragilis 



3. Only one end plate (carina) overlapped by adjacent compart- 

 mental plates, the opposing rostral plate overlapping ad- 

 jacent plates (fig. 13) Balanus 4 



4. Basis membranous Balanus balanoides 



4. Basis calcareous 5 



5. Exterior of scutum distinctly striate longitudinally (fig. 16) 6 



5. Exterior of scutum lacking distinct longitudinal striae 7 



6. Ribs at base of interior of parieties more numerous than 

 parietal septa (fig. 8); basis solid; basal margin of tergum 



entire Balanus balanus 



6. Ribs at base of interior of parieties a continuation of par- 

 ietal septa; basis porose; carinal side of basal margin of 



tergum deeply excavated (fig. 17) Balanus eburneus 



7. Adductor ridge of scutum absent Balanus crenatus 



7. Adductor ridge of scutum well developed (fig. 18) 8 



8. Radii not extending to parieties of adjacent compartmental 

 plates, with oblique summits (fig. 9); tergal spur narrow, 

 less than V4 width of basal margin (fig. 15); parieties white 



Balanus improvisus 



8. Radii extending to parieties of adjacent compartmental plates, 

 with slightly sloping summits (fig. 10); tergal spur at least 

 l/l width of basal margin; exterior of parieties with regular- 

 ly arranged gray, purple, or red-purple longitudinal striae 



(fig. 14) Balanus amphi trite niveus 



9. Carina terminating below in an expanded disk, with umbo pro- 

 jecting angularly; valves thin, papery Lepas fascicularis 



9. Carina terminating below in a fork; umbo basal; valves well 



calcified 10 



10. Valves radially furrowed or strongly striate (fig. 11) 11 



10. Valves smooth or minutely striate 12 



11. Occludent margin of scutum arched, protuberant, forming wide 

 shelf between margin and umbonal-apical ridge; 5-6 filamentary 



appendages on either side of body Lepas anserifera 



11. Occludent margin of scutum not arched, nearly parallel with 

 umbonal-apical ridge, leaving comparatively narrow area be- 

 tween margin and ridge; 0-2 filamentary appendages on either 



side of body at base of Cirrus I Lepas pectinata 



12. One or 2 filamentary appendages (fig. 7) on either side of 



body Lepas anatifera 



12. Three filamentary appendages on either side of body 



Lepas hilli 




Cirripedia 91 



ANNOTATED LIST OF COMMON BARNACLES 



Order Thoracica 



Suborder Lepadomorpha 



Lepas anatif era Linnaeus, 1758. Common during July and August on floating wood and Sar - 

 gassum . 



Lepas anserif era Linnaeus, 1767. Occasionally associated with L. pectinata on drift- 

 wood. 



Lepas fascicularis Ellis and Solander, 1786. Found attached to floating Sargassum dur- 

 ing the summer months. 



Lepas hilli Leach, 1818. Some of the records of this species from the Cape Cod Region 

 may be based on misidentif ications of L. anatif era . 



Lepas pectinata Spengler, 1793. This species is often associated with L_. anatifera on 

 floating wood in Buzzards Bay and Vineyard Sound during the summer months. 



Suborder Balanomorpha 



Balanus ( Balanus ) amphi trite niveus Darwin, 1854. ( = B. venustus niveus ) . The most 



common barnacle in the subtidal waters of Buzzards Bay and Vineyard Sound. Found 



on stones and shells, especially those of gastropods occupied by hermit crabs. Not 



known north of Cape Cod nor in Cape Cod Bay. 

 Balanus ( Balanus ) balanus (Linnaeus 1758) . (- B. porcatus ) . A large, strongly ribbed 



barnacle in the lower intertidal zone north of and throughout the Cape Cod Canal. 



Occasional specimens are found subtidally in Vineyard Sound. 

 Balanus (Balanus ) crenatus Brugui&re, 1789. Occasionally associated with B. amphi - 



trite niveus in the subtidal waters of Vineyard Sound, but more common in Cape Cod 



Bay. 

 Balanus ( Balanus ) eburneus Gould, 1841. Common in the lower intertidal of protected 



inlets and bays, and especially in waters of lower salinity with B. improvisus . 

 Balanus (Balanus ) improvisus Darwin, 1854. Common in waters of low salinity on the south- 

 ern coast of Cape Cod, and often associated with B. eburneus . 

 Balanus ( Semibalanus ) balanoides (Linnaeus, 1767). The most abundant and ubiquitous 



barnacle in the intertidal zone of the Cape Cod Region, but drops out in brackish 



waters . 

 Balanus ( Chirona ) hameri (Ascanius , 1761) . Not in key. Common on the large commercial 



scallop, Placopecten magellanicus , abundant in deeper water, as on fishing banks. 



Potentially important to physiologists because it is by far the largest barnacle 



in this region, over 5 cm in basal diameter. 

 Chthamalus f ragilis Darwin, 1854. Abundant in the upper intertidal zone of Buzzards 



Bay and Vineyard Sound. Also present in limited numbers along the southern shore 



of Cape Cod Bay, but not known to occur north of this area. 



Order Acrothoracica 



Trypetesa lampas (Hancock, 1849) . (= Alcippe lampas ) . Found only in the floor and side 

 of the interior of the body whorl of gastropod shells such as Lunatia heros and Ne - 

 verita duplicata occupied by hermit crabs. 



REFERENCES 



A monograph on the sub-class Cirripedia, Lepadidae. Ray Society, 

 1-400, pis. 1-10. 

 A monograph on the sub-class Cirripedia, Balanidae, Verrucidae. 

 Ray Society, London, i-viii, 1-684, text figs. 1-11, pis. 1-30. 

 Genthe, K. W. , 1905. Some notes nn Alrippp lampas. and its occurence on the American 

 Atlantic shore. Zool. Jahrb. (Anat.), 21: 181-200. 




92 Cirripedia 



Pilsbry, H. A., 1907. The barnacles (Cirripedia) contained in the collections of the 

 U. S. National Museum, Bull. U. S. Nat. Mus. 60: i-x, 1-122, text figs. 1-36, pis. 

 1-11. 



Pilsbry, H. A., 1916. The sessile barnacles (Cirripedia) contained in the collections 

 of the U. S. National Museum; uncluding a monograph of the American species. Ibid . , 

 93 ; i-xi, 1-366, text figs. 1-99, pis. 1-76. 



Zullo, V. A., 1963. A preliminary report on systematics and distribution of barnacles 

 (Cirripedia) of the Cape Cod region. Systematics-Ecology Program, Marine Biologi- 

 cal Laboratory, Woods Hole, Mass., 33 pp. 



Order Rhizocephala 



The Rhizocephala are parasitic cirripeds which infest decapod crustaceans and iso- 

 pods. The adult rhizocephalan is highly modified in body form and bears no resemb- 

 lance to other cirripeds. The affinities of this group are exhibited only by the lar- 

 val stages which include a nauplius with characteristic frontal horns (although lack- 

 ing an alimentary canal) and a cypris. 



The life history of the common European species Sacculina carcini (Thompson) was 

 worked out by G. Smith in 1907. The fertilized eggs mature and develop into cirri- 

 pedan nauplii within the "mantle cavity" of the parent. The nauplii are released and 

 swim actively for four days during which they pass through four molts. On the fifth 

 day the nauplius undergoes metamorphosis into the cypris stage which is also active- 

 ly free-swimming and lasts from two to three days. About the third day the cypris 

 attaches itself by the antennules to the base of a seta of the portunid crab Car - 

 cinus maenas . The thoracic appendages and musculature are cast off and a new larva, 

 the kentrogen, composed of a mass of mesodermal cells surrounded by an ectodermal 

 chitinous bag is produced under the old cypris shell. A hollow, dart-like ectoderm- 

 al process pierces the base of the seta to which the kentrogen is attached, and the 

 enclosed mesodermal cells pass through into the haemocoel of the crab and settle near 

 the midgut. The cells rapidly divide and form a tumor about the midgut with numer- 

 ous divergent roots which eventually extend into the extremities of the crab. The 

 main body mass of Sacculina emerges from the interior after the following molt of 

 the host at a point near the ventral juncture of the thorax and abdomen. Further 

 molting is inhibited by the parasite, whose adult organs (including paired ovaries 

 and testes, and a neural ganglion) now differentiate. 



Rhizocephalans have not been reported from the Cape Cod Region, although Sac - 

 culina carcini parasitizes the green crab Carcinus maenas , and Peltogaster the her- 

 mit crab Pagurus bernhardtus in European waters. The works of Erof essor Hilbrand 

 Boschma (1925-1963) may be consulted for details on the Rhizocephala. A complete 

 bibliography is given in Zool. Meded. (1964), vol. 39, pp. XLI-XLVI. 




Chapter XII 93 



PHYLUM ARTHROPODA 



Class Crustacea 



The Lower Malacostraca (Peracarida) 



The successful, abundant, and varied peracaridan crustaceans are most commonly 

 represented in shore collecting by isopods and amphipods, the general features of 

 which are well known to the average zoologist. In their rather specialized morpho- 

 logy these orders depart somewhat from the more generalized and shrimp-like body 

 form which is basic to the Subclass Malacostraca. However, certain other peracari- 

 dan orders, the swimming Mysidacea and the small, bottom-dwelling Cumacea, retain 

 an essentially shrimp-like form, with carapace and elongated abdomen. The Key to 

 Orders given below will aid in the separation of these groups. The diverse peracari- 

 dan orders share one feature, namely, the brood pouch or "marsupium" formed of plates 

 (oSstegites) borne by the thoracic legs of the female, and used to house the eggs and 

 developing young. 



KEY TO THE ORDERS OF PERACARIDA 



1. Body having the "caridoid" (shrimplike) form, with a dis- 

 tinct carapace over the thorax and an elongated abdomen 2 



1. Body having thorax and abdomen not sharply distinguishable; 



carapace lacking or very small 3 



2. Eyes stalked when present; carapace covering all or most of 



thorax; swimming forms MYSIDACEA (p. 93 ) 



2. Eyes sessile when present; carapace covering only 3 or 4 

 thoracic segments and inflated into a branchial chamber on 



each side; in bottom sediments CUMACEA (p. 98 ) 



3. A small carapace present, covering only 2 thoracic segments; 

 resemble small isopods but have first pair of legs chelate 



TANAIDACEA (CHELIFERA) (p. 102) 



3. Carapace lacking 4 



4. Body usually dorsoventrally flattened; thoracic legs (except 

 for maxilliped) essentially alike; abdomen with 5 pairs of 



pleopods with unsegmented rami, and 1 pair of uropods ISOPODA (p. 102) 



4. Body usually laterally compressed; thoracic limbs of more 

 than one form, with the 2nd and 3rd pairs usually prehen- 

 sile; abdominal appendages consist of 3 pairs of pleopods and 

 3 pairs of uropods AMPHIPODA (p. 107) 



PART I . ORDER MYSIDACEA 



By Roland L. Wigley 



The mysids are the most typically shrimp-like ('caridoid") of the various pera- 

 caridan orders. They are adapted for swimming, with elongated bodies and a well dev- 

 eloped carapace covering almost the entire thorax. The lightly calcified integument 

 is thin and flexible. The antennules are biramous, having multi-segmented flagellar 

 antennae have an exopod, usually in the form of a flattened scale (antennal scale) ; 

 the endopod is f lagelliform, composed of numerous segments. Eyestalks are cylindri- 

 cal, well developed, terminating in a prominent brown or black (rarely red) cornea. 

 The eight thoracic segments each bear biramous appendages; branchiae are absent in 

 the species listed here. Females bear a large marsupium (hence the common name 

 Opossum Shrimp) composed of 2-7 pairs of oostegites attached to the thoracic limbs. 

 The pleopod structure varies, depending on sex and species. 




94 Mysids 



Mysids inhabit a wide variety of benthic and planktonic habitats. They are com- 

 mon in brackish and marine waters, but no freshwater forms are known in this region. 

 Mysids are an important link in littoral and continental shelf food webs, and are par- 

 ticularly valuable as food for small species of fish as well as the young of larger 

 fishes. Seasonal inshore-offshore migrations and other horizontal movements have been 

 observed for a few species. Pronounced vertical migrations in which they swim upward 

 during hours of darkness are characteristic of this group. 



KEY TO MYSIDACEA OF THE CAPE COD REGION 

 (Figure references are to Plate 12) 



1. Telson with posterior end cleft (figs. 4, 8, 9, 11) 2 



1. Telson with posterior end entire (figs. 5-7, 10) 5 



2. Antennal scale with setae present on both inner and outer 



margins (fig. 2) 3 



2. Antennal scale with outer margin devoid of setae and termin- 

 ating in an articulated spine (fig. 4) Praunus f lexuosus 



3. Telson with the entire lateral margins armed with spines. 

 Antennal scale elongate, width 9 to 12 times length, produced 



into an acute apex (figs. 8, 9) 4 



3. Telson with basal one-half of the lateral margins devoid of 

 spines; antennal scale elliptical, apex blunt, 3.5 times as 



long as broad (figs. 3, 11) Heteromysis formosa 



4. Antennal scale approximately 9 times as long as broad, outer 

 margin nearly straight, telson lateral margin spines more than 



30, extending posteriorly to apex (fig. 8) Mysis mixta 



4. Antennal scale approximately 12 times as long as broad, outer 

 margin concave in outline; telson lateral margin spines 25, ex- 

 tending posteriorly as far as the cleft (fig. 9) Mysis stenolepis 



5. Antennal scale with setae present on both inner and outer mar- 

 gins; telson lateral margins armed with numerous spines (figs. 



7, 10) 6 



5. Antennal scale with setae absent on outer margin, terminating in 

 a strong spine; telson without spines on lateral margins (figs. 



5, 6) 7 



6. Antennal scale about 10 times as long as broad (fig. 10); telson 



subequal in length to endopod of the uropod Neomysis americana 



6. Antennal scale about 5 times as long as broad (fig. 7); endopod 



of the uropod 1.5 times as long as the telson Mysidopsis bigelowi 



7. Eyes dorso-ventrally flattened, cornea kidney-shaped, red color; 

 telson length subequal to its greatest width (fig. 5) 



Erythrops ery throphtha lm a 



7. Eyes globular not dorso-ventrally flattened, cornea black; 

 telson elongate, length 2 times its greatest width (fig. 6) 

 Meterythrops r obusta 



ANNOTATED LIST OF MYSIDS 



Erythrops ery throphtha lma (Goes, 1863). Occasionally referred to as Erythrops 



goesii . Inhabits deeper waters, 40-2 75 meters, from Cape Cod to the Arctic. One 

 of the most beautifully colored New England mysids. Eyes brilliant carmine red; 

 opaque white pigment spots scattered over the body; an orange-red dorsal patch 




Mysids 95 



on the carapace and clear bright yellow pigment spots on the ventral body surface. 

 Adult length 9-11 mm. 



Heteromysis formosa S. I. Smith, 1873. A common species from New Jersey to Canada. 



Frequently in small swarms inside dead bivalve shells such as Spisula . Intertid- 



al to 248 meters. Males semi-translucent, but parts of the females are a rose 

 color. Adult length 6-9 mm. 



Metervthrops robusta S. I. Smith, 1879. Uncommon; in the western Atlantic, occurs 

 from Cape Cod to Greenland. 66-300 meters. Adult length 14-16 mm. 



Mysidopsis biqelowi Tattersall, 1926. A warm water species, from Louisiana to Cape 

 Cod. Most common at shallow shelf depths, 16-50 meters, but has been found to 

 196 meters. Adult lenqt-h 7.5 mm or somewhat more. 



Mysis mixta Lilljeborg, 1852. Occasionally referred to as Michtheimysis mixta . 



A common species of the east coast from Woods Hole to Canada. Closely related to 

 Mysis stenolepis ; however, in contrast, M. mixta inhabits areas where algae and 

 Zostera are absent. Intertidal to 200 meters. Adult length 20-25 mm. 



Mysis stenolepis S. I. Smith, 1873. Sometimes referred to as Michtheimysis stenolep - 

 is and Mysis spinulosus . Inhabits intertidal and shallow shelf waters from New 

 Jersey to Gulf of St. Lawrence. Closely related to M. mixta (see above), but is 

 a more strictly littoral weed inhabitinq species. Adult length 25-30 mm. 



Neomysis americana (S. I. Smith, 1873). Mysis americana is a synonym. Very common, 

 from Virginia to the Gulf of St. Lawrence. Intertidal to 214 meters. Adult 

 length 10-12 mm. 



Praunus f lexuosus (Muller, 1776) . A European species of relatively large size, first 

 found in American waters in 1960. Has been reported only in the harbor at Barn- 

 stable, Mass. In Europe is one of the commonest species in brackish waters and 

 tidal zones along the coast. Adult length 24-25 mm. 



REFERENCES ON MYSIDS 



Lochhead, J. H., 1950. Heteromysis formosa . In : Selected Invertebrate Types. Frank 

 A. Brown, Jr., ed. John Wiley and Sons, Inc., N. Y. 



Smith, S. I., 1879. The stalk-eyed crustaceans of the Atlantic coast of North America 

 north of Cape Cod. Trans. Conn. Acad. Arts and Sci., 5_: 27-138, pis. 7-12. 



Tattersall, W. M. , 1951. A review of the Mysidacea of the United States National Mu- 

 seum. U. S. Nat. Mus. Bull. 201 . : I-X, 1-292. 



Tattersall, W. M. , and Olive S. Tattersall, 1951. The British Mysidacea. Ray Society, 

 London. 



Verrill, A. E. , S. I. Smith, and O. Harger, 1873. Catalogue of the marine inverte- 

 brate animals of the southern coast of New England, and adjacent waters. Sec- 

 tion D. Ijn: Report upon the invertebrate animals of Vineyard Sound and adjacent 

 waters, with an account of the physical characters of the region. By A. E. Ver- 

 rill. Rept. U. S. Comm. Fish and Fisheries, 1871-72: 537-749, pis. 1-38. 




96 



Plate 12 



MYSIDACEA 



Figures mainly from Tattersall (1951) and 

 Tattersall and Tattersall (1951), redrawn 

 by Ruth L. von Arx. 



Fig. 1. Side view of a typical mysid, ovigerous female, thoracic 

 legs 1-7 omitted. 



2. Antennal scale and basal portion of antenna of a typical mysid. 



3. Heteromysis formosa , dorsal view. 



4-11. Upper row shows telsons, lower row shows antennal scales, 

 both in dorsal view, of the following species: 



4 . Praunus f lexuosus . 



5 . Erythrops erythrophathalma . 



6 . Meterythrops robusta . 



7. Mysidopsis bigelowi . 



8. Mysis mixta . 



9. Mysis stenolepis . 



10. Neomysis americana . 



11. Heteromysis formosa . 




Plate 12 



cornea eyestalh 



horacic somites ( I - 8) 



abdominal somites (l — 6) 



4 



7 



8 



10 II 



Prounus 



f leiuosus 



Erythrops 



erythrophthalmo 



Melerythrops 

 robu5ta 



Mysidopsts 



bigelowi 



Mysis 

 mlitto 



Mysis 



stenolepis 



Neomysis 



amencana 



Heteromysis 



formoso 



fl 



:** 




98 Cumaceans 



PART 2. ORDER CUMACE& 



By Roland L. Wig ley 



Cumaceans, although widespread in marine situations and with some species in 

 brackish waters, are not well known to the average zoologist because of their small 

 size and habit of living buried in sand or mud. The general body form is distinc- 

 tive, characterized by an inflated cephalothorax and a slender, cylindrical abdomen. 

 The carapace is moderately large, covering the anterior half of the cephalothorax. 

 The integument in many species is rather heavily calcified and brittle. The first 

 thoracic limb (maxilliped) bears a membranous epipodite, usually furnished with res- 

 piratory lamellae. A pseudorostrum is present in many species, formed by carapace 

 lateral plates coming together above and in front of the head. Eyes are present in 

 some species, sessile and usually coalesced to form a single organ on a lobe located 

 mid-dorsally on anterior portion of carapace. First antenna with inner flagellum 

 usually reduced or absent; second antenna vestigial in females, well developed in 

 males. First 3 thoracic appendages modified as maxillipeds; remaining 5 as peraeo- 

 pods. One pair of large styliform uropods present. Telson is distinct, or coa- 

 lesced with last abdominal somite. Adults in this region generally range from 3 

 to 15 mm in length. 



There is pronounced sexual dimorphism; pleopods are absent in all females and 

 in males of some species, but males generally have from 1 to 5 pairs. Eggs are in- 

 cubated in a marsupium, and hatch as postlarvae in which the past pair of peraeo- 

 pods is undeveloped. 



Cumaceans are primarilv marine, but a few species occur in brackish waters. They 

 are widely distributed in all oceans from intertidal zone to great depths in mid- 

 ocean, most common subtidally. Basically benthic in habit, they commonly burrow in 

 mud or sand. They occasionally undertake pelagic excursions, chieflv at night, at 

 which time males greatly outnumber females. 



KEY TO CUMACEANS OF THE CAPE COD REGION 

 (Figure references are to Plate 13) 



1. Independent telson present (figs. 23-26) 2 



1. Without independent telson (figs. 15-22) 7 



2. Uropod inner ramus 1- jointed; telson without spines 



(figs. 13, 23) Petalosarsia declivi s 



2. Uropod inner ramus 2- or 3- jointed; telson with lateral and 



apical spines (figs. 24-26) 3 



3. Telson with 5 apical spines; male without pleopods . . . Lamprops quadriplicata 



3. Telson with or 2 apical spines; male with 2 pairs of pleo- 

 pods Family Diastvlidae 4 



4. Telson apex upturned, without apical spines (figs. 11, 26) 



Oxyurostylis smithi 



4. Telson apex not upturned, 2 apical spines (figs. 24, 25) Diastylis 5 



5. Carapace with 4 large spines on dorsal surface (figs. 1, 24) 



Diastylis quadrispinosa 



5. Carapace without dorsal spines (figs. 6, 7) 6 



6. Carapace with 3 oblique lateral ridges; horizontal ridge on 

 postero-lateral section of carapace in male (fig. 6) Diastylis p olita 



6. Carapace with 4 oblique lateral ridges; without horizontal 

 ridge on postero-lateral section of carapace in male (figs. 

 7 25) Diastylis sculpta 




Cumaceans 99 



7. Mandibles broadly truncate at base (fig. 14) ; male with 2 



pairs of pleopods Family Leuconidae 8 



7. Mandibles narrow or acuminate at base (fig. 13); male with 



0, 3, or 5 pairs of pleopods 12 



8. Pseudorostrum well developed Leucon americanus 



8. Carapace truncate anteriorly without pseudorostrum 9 



9. Uropods with outer ramus longer than inner ramus (fig. 18) 



Eudorellopsis deformis 



9. Uropods with outer ramus shorter than inner ramus (figs. 



15, 16) Eudorella 10 



10. Body setose; approximately 14-18 teeth on carapace ventral 



margin (figs. 8, 15) Eudorella hispida 



10. Body not setose; less than 14 teeth on carapace ventral margin 11 



11. Anterior margin of carapace deeply emarginate in female, 



slightly emarginate in male (figs. 2, 3, 20) Eudorella emarqinata 



11. Anterior margin of carapace slightly emarginate in female, 



serrate or entire in male (figs. 9, 16) Eudorella truncatula 



12. Endopod of uropod 2- jointed; 3 pairs of pleopods in male 



(figs. 10, 17) Leptocuma minor 



12. Endopod of uropod 1- jointed; or 5 pairs of pleopods in 



male (figs. 19, 22) 13 



13. Male has no pleopods and a rudimentary second antenna; in 

 female, uropod peduncle length about equal to maximum width 



of last abdominal somite (figs. 4, 22) Almyracuma proximoculi 



13. Male has 5 pleopods and well developed second antenna; in fe- 

 male, uropod peduncle length greater than 2 times maximum width 

 of last abdominal somite (figs. 5, 19) Cyclaspis varians 



ANNOTATED LIST OF CUMACEANS 



Almyracuma proximoculi Jones, 1959. Brackish water species, known only from Pocas- 



set River. Adult size 3-4 mm. 

 * Campy las pis af finis G. 0. Sars, 1869. Not yet reported from Cape Cod waters, but 



expected to occur in deeper portions of this area. 

 * Campylaspis rubicunda (Lilljeborg, 1855) . Not yet reported from Cape Cod waters, 



but expected to occur in the deeper portions of this area. 

 Cyclaspis varians Caiman, 1912. Brackish water species found in surface waters of 



Woods Hole Harbor and Vineyard Sound. Adult size 3-4 mm. 

 * Diastyli s abbreviata G. 0. Sars, 1871. Not yet reported from Cape Cod waters, but 



expected to occur in deeper portions of this area. 

 Diastylis polita S. I. Smith, 1879. Found at depths less than ca. 35 meters from 



Nova Scotia to Block Island Sound. Adult size 12-14 mm. 

 Diastylis quadrispinosa G. 0. Sars, 1871. Occurs from the Gulf of St. Lawrence to 



New Jersey in depths of 4-400 meters. Adult size 11 mm. 

 Diastylis sculpta G. 0. Sars, 1871. In American waters occurs from Gulf of St. 



Lawrence to Long Island; low water to ca. 400 meters. Adult size 9-10 mm. 

 Eudorella e marginata (Kroyer, 1846). In American waters occurs from the Arctic to 



Martha's Vineyard in depths from 2-130 meters. Adult size 10-12 mm. 

 Eudorel la h ispida G. 0. Sars, 1871. Occurs from the Arctic to Martha's Vineyard, 



in depths from 30-130 meters. Adult size 5-6 mm. 

 Eudorella truncatula (Bate, 1856). On U. S. coast reported from Massachusetts Bay 



to Block Island Sound, in depths of 30-100 meters. Adult size 4-5 mm. 




100 



Plate 13 



CUMACEA 



Figures mainly from Sars (1900) and Caiman 

 (1912), redrawn by Ruth L. von Arx. 



Fig. 1. Diastylis quadrispinosa , female, dorsal view. 



2. Eudorella emarqinata, female, lateral view. 



3. Eudorella emarqinata , male, lateral view 



4-12. Carapace in lateral view of the following species: 



4. Almyracuma proximoculi , male. 



5. Cyclaspis varians , female. 



6. Diastylis polita , male. 



7. D iastylis sculpta , male. 



8. Eudorella hispida , female. 



14. Eudorellopsis deformis , mandible. 



15-26. Dorsal view of last abdominal somite, uropod, and telson of the 

 following species: 



9. Eudorella truncatula , female. 



10. Leptocuma minor , male. 



11. Oxyurostylis smithi , male. 



12. Petalosarsia declivis, male. 



13. Petalosarsia declivis , mandible. 



15. Eudorella hispida , female. 



16. Eudorella truncatula , female. 



17. Leptocuma minor , female. 



18. Eudorellopsis deformis , female. 



19. Cyclaspi s varians , male. 



20. Eudorella emarginata, female. 



21. Leucon americanus , male. 



22. Almyracuma proximoculi , male. 



23. Petalosarsia declivis , female 



24. Diastylis quadrispinosa , female. 



25. Diastylis sculpta , female. 



26. Oxyurostylis smithi, female; 

 (inset: telson tip in side view) 




Plate 13 




102 Cumaceans 



Eudorellopsis deformis (Kroyer, 1846) . In American waters reported from the Arctic 

 to Long Island in depths of ca. 2-100 meters. Adult size 4-5 mm. 



Lamprops quadriplicata S. I. Smith, 1879. Occurs from Newfoundland to southern New 

 England, in depths from ca. 2-150 meters. Adult size 8-9 mm. 



Leptocuma minor Caiman, 1912. Occurs from Gloucester, Mass. to Woods Hole, in depths 

 of ca. 2-100 meters. Adult size 6-7 mm. 



Leucon americanus Zimmer, 1943. A brackish water species reported from Woods Hole 

 and Chesapeake Bay. Adult size 4-5 mm. 



Oxyurostylis smithi Caiman, 1912. A euryhaline species, Maine to Louisiana, from 

 surface to 20 meters. Adult size 6-7 mm. 



Petalosarsia declivis (G. 0. Sars, 1864) . In American waters occurs from the Arc- 

 tic to Buzzards Bay, in 20-200 meters. 



*Not in key. 



REFERENCES ON CUMACEANS 



Caiman, W. T., 1912. The Crustacea of the order Cumacea in the collection of the 



United States National Museum. Proc. U. S. Nat. Mus . 41: 603-676, text figs. 



1-112. 

 Jones, N. S. and W. D. Burbanck, 1959. Almyracuma proximoculi gen. et sp. nov. 



(Crustacea, Cumacea) from brackish water of Cape Cod, Massachusetts. Biol. 



Bull. 116: 115-124.. 

 Sars, G. 0., 1900. An account of the Crustacea of Norway, vol. 3, Cumacea, pp. 



I-X, 1-115, pis. 1-72. 

 Smith, S. I., 1879. The stalk-eyed crustaceans of the Atlantic coast of North 



America north of Cape Cod. Trans. Conn. Acad. Arts and Sci. 5_: 28-138, pis. 



8-12. 



PART 3. ORDERS ISOPODA AND TANAIDACEA (CHELIFERA) 



Isopods are readily recognizable in most instances, except for the grossly modi- 

 fied parasitic forms. Since isopods are so common they are of great ecological sig- 

 nificance, and certain species have been widely used in experimental work, hence 

 their identification is a practical matter of much importance. Fortunately, the 

 group is reasonably well known in the Woods Hole region, and specific identifica- 

 tion does not offer such difficulties to the average zoologist as does the identi- 

 fication of amphipods . Tanaidaceans, because of their small size, are less fre- 

 quently noticed. Since they have often been classified as a group within the Iso- 

 poda, and since they are so similar in general form, the two orders are combined 

 in the following key. The advice of Thomas E. Bowman and of Roland L. Wigley in 

 the preparation of the following key and check-list is gratefully acknowledged. 

 Figure references on isopods and tanaidaceans are to Plates 14 and 15. 



KEY TO THE MORE COMMON TANAIDACEA AND MARINE ISOPODA 



First pair of legs chelate (figs. 1-3); 6 free thoracic seg- 

 ments; tiny creatures Order TANAIDACEA (CHELIFERA) 



Not well known locally; possibly species include: 



a) 3 pairs of pleopods Tanais cavolinii 



b) 5 pairs of pleopods Leptochelia saviqnyi 



First pair of legs simple or subchelate; 7 free thoracic seg- 

 ments Order ISOPODA 




Isopods 103 



2. Parasitic on Crustacea; body may be grossly modified; males 



tiny Suborder Epicaridea (Bopyroidea) 26 



2. Not parasitic on crustacea (a few are ectocommensal) ; body 



easily recognizable as that of an isopod 3 



3. Uropods terminal, set at rear (figs. 17-19, 29, 30) 22 



3. Uropods set laterally or ventrally (figs. 4-16, 26-28) 4 



4. Uropods lateral, visible from above, flattened, forming with 



telson a caudal fan in most instances 5 



4. Uropods ventral, not visible dorsally, turned inwards to form 



the cover of a chamber encasing the pleopods (fig. 11) . . .Suborder Valvifera 14 



5. Thorax with only 5 pairs of normal walking legs; not reported 



locally Suborder Gnathiidea 



5. Thorax with 7 pairs of more or less normal walking legs 6 



6. Exopodal part of uropod arched over telson; body very long 



(7 times the width) : Suborder Anthuridea; one species common 



locally in brackish situations (fig. 4) Cyathura polita 



6. Uropodal exopods lateral; body length seldom if ever more than 



5 times width Suborder Flabellifera 



7. Pleotelson (abdomen and telson) shows 6 segments (figs. 6-9) 10 



7. Pleotelson with segments fused so as to have only two complete 



segments, the terminal one of which is large and conspicuous 8 



8. Uropods each with two flattened branches; all legs simple; 



animals able to roll themselves into a complete ball 9 



8. Uropods each a single slender pointed process, lacking 

 outer branches (exopods) ; terminal segment of abdomen tri- 

 angular, with truncated apex (fig. 26); first and second 



pairs of legs subchelate Ancinus depressus 



9. Terminal segment of abdomen rounded at rear; exopods of uro- 

 pods with outer serrated margin (fig. 27) Sphaeroma quadridentatum 



9. Terminal segment bluntly triangular; exopods of uropods with 



smooth outer margin (fig. 28) Exosphaeroma papillae 



10. Exopod of uropod flattened (not clawlike) and comparable 



to endopod in size, forming a normal caudal fan 12 



10. Exopod of uropod clawlike and much smaller than endopod 

 (fig. 7); uropods very small relative to telson; animals 



burrow in wood ("gribbles") Limnoria 11 



11. Telson lacking tubercles and with a Y-shaped ridge (fig. 7) 



Limnoria liqnorum 



11. Telson with tubercles on posterior margin and with three tuber- 

 cles on dorsal surface (fig. 8) Limnoria tripunctata 



12 . Bases of antennae seem to meet in front of the head as seen 

 from above (fig. 5) ; head terminating in a small point; front 

 3 legs with slightly hooked tips; endopod of uropod notched 



laterally Cirolana c oncharum 



12. Bases of antenna not meeting in midline (figs. 6, 9); all 

 thoracic legs end in hooked dactyls; animals usually found 

 clinging to fish or around fish-landing docks 13 




104 Isopods 



13. Form regular and oval; 2 longitudinal light stripes run 



length of body; head subquadrate with trilobed rear margin 



and distinct eyes; abdomen and uropods well developed; body 



to 13 mm long (fig. 9) Nerocila munda 



13. Form oval but with a slight asymmetry; head relatively small 

 with eyes indistinct; abdomen with relatively small uropods; 



body stout, to 25 mm long (fig. 6) Lironeca ovalis 



14. Sides of head entire (figs. 10, 12); eyes lateral 18 



14. Sides of head notched or incised (figs. 23-25); eyes dorsal; 



body broad, with pointed telson Chiridotea 15 



(Note: see Bowman (1955) and Wigley (1961) for additional details 

 on identification of Chiridotea species) . 



15. Second (more ventrally placed) antennae decidedly longer than 



the first pair (figs. 23, 24) 16 



15. Second antennae nearly equaling in length the first pair (fig. 



25) 17 



16. Sides of telson curved; finger of first large gnathopod with 

 a single spine back of the terminal claw (fig. 23 A-C) ; ani- 

 mal occurs in brackish water Chiridotea almyra 



16. Sides of telson straight, telson wedge shaped; finger of first 

 gnathopod with several spines along the inner margin (fig. 24 



A-C) ; animal marine Chiridotea tuf tsi 



17. Clefts in sides of head deep (fig. 25A) ; antero-lateral margins 



of head with numerous bristles; body color light Chiridotea coeca 



17. Clefts in sides of head shallow; antero-lateral margins of head 

 only sparsely provided with bristles; body color dark; occurs in 



brackish waters Chiridotea nigrescens 



18. Pleotelson seems to consist of 3 parts (plus grooves showing a 



4th partly coalesced segment) ; common Idotea 19 



18. Pleotelson seems to consist of one part (plus grooves suggest- 

 ing one partly coalesced segment) 20 



19. Rear of telson bracket-shaped, with a central point (fig. 10) 

 Idotea baltica 



19. Rear of telson truncated (cut square across) (fig. 12) . . Idotea me tallica 



19. Rear of telson pointed (fig. 13) Idotea phosphorea 



20. Pleotelson sides tapering to a point; in side view shows 2 

 rounded elevations separated by a depression (fig. 14); sec- 

 ond antennae short, reaching back only to second thoracic 



segment Edotea tri loba 



20. Pleotelson with more or less parallel sides cut off to a tri- 

 angular point at rear; second antennae long, reaching to 5th 



thoracic segment Erichsonella 21 



21. Pleotelson with a pronounced tubercle on either side (fig. 15) 

 Erichsonella f ilif ormis 



21. Pleotelson with only a suggestion of a tubercle on either side 



(fig. 16) Erichsonella attenuata 




Isopods 105 



22. Aquatic forms; pleotelson consisting of 2 sections .... Suborder Asellota 25 



22. Terrestrial or high-beach forms; pleotelson showing 



6 sections Suborder Oniscoidea 2 3 



(Most terrestrial forms are not in this key; members of the 

 fully terrestrial genera Porcellio , Armadillidium , etc., may 

 often be washed into bays and estuaries, to confuse the col- 

 lector) . 



23. Less than 1 cm long; uropods decidedly shorter than pleotel- 

 son 24 



23. Length may exceed 2 cm; uropods as long as pleotelson, each 

 with 2 slender terminal articles (fig. 29) ; animals may be 

 very active, running about like young cockroaches near high 



tide marks Liqia oceanica 



24. Under boards, rubbish, etc. above high tide marks; small 



(up to 6.5 mm long) ; body surface smooth (fig. 19) .... Philoscia vittata 



24. In beach sand; very small (up to 4.5 mm long); body sur- 

 face thickly covered with small, spine-tipped tubercles 



(fig. 30) Scyphacella arenicola 



25. Uropods very small (fig. 18), in a posterior notch of 

 telson; all thoracic legs simple; very small (to 5 mm long); 



in marine situations ffaera marina 



25. Uropods at least as long as telson (fig. 17); first legs sub- 

 chelate; up to 15 mm long; in fresh water or water of quite 



low salinity Asellus sp. 



26. On Callianassa ; female with six pairs of jointed branching 

 abdominal processes; small male with elongated appendages 



at sides of abdomen (fig. 20) lone thompsoni 



26. On Palaemonetes , forming a bulge in wall of gill chamber; 

 female and male with short abdominal processes (fig. 21) 

 Probopyrus pandalicola 



26. On Paqurus longicarpus ; female with pleopods and with 



6th thoracic segment longer than others; male with unseg- 



mented abdomen (fig. 22) Steqophryxus hyptius 



LIST OF MORE COMMON SHALLOW WATER ISOPODA AND TANAIDACEA 

 Order Tanaidacea (Chelifera) 



Leptochelia savignyi (Kroyer, 1842). 

 Tanais cavolinii Milne-Edwards, 1829. 



Order Isopoda 



Suborder Anthuridea 



Calathura branchiata (Stimpson, 1853). Rare south of Cape. Not in key. 



Cyathura polita (Stimpson, 1855) . Common in areas of low or very low salinity, as 



in the tidal drainages from ponds. Until recently has been called C. carinata 



Kroyer (see Miller and Burbanck, 1961) . 

 Ptilanthura tenuis Harger, 1879. Rare. Not in key. 




106 Isopods 



Suborder Flabellifera 



Ancinus depressus (Say, 1818) . Reported from Woods Hole (see Richardson, 1909) . 



Exosphaeroma papillae Bayliff , 1938. A brackish water species, reported from Long 

 Island, and from Sandwich, on Cape Cod. 



Cirolana concharum (Stimpson, 1853). A scavenger, often very common around fish 

 landing docks. 



Cirolana polita (Stimpson, 1853). Not in key. Reported north of Cape. 



Limnoria lignorum (Rathke, 1799) . Found burrowing into surface layers of sub- 

 merged, untreated wood. 



Limnoria tripunctata Menzies, 1951. 



Lironeca ovalis (Say, 1818) . An ectoparasite on fish; uncommon. 



Livoneca , see Lironeca . The commonly used name Livoneca is the result of a typo- 

 graphical error; the group of names including Lironeca , Cirolana , and Nerocila 

 was intended as a series of anagrams on Caroline and Carolina. 



Nerocila munda Harger, 1873. Uncommon; an ectoparasite on various fish. 



Sphaeroma quadridentatum Say, 1818. Along shores, under stones, among algae, on 

 peat banks. 



Suborder Valvifera 



Chiridotea almyra Bowman, 1955. In water of low salinity, as in the Pocasset Riv- 

 er, along with Cyathura polita . 



Chiridotea coeca (Say, 1818) . Burrows like a little mole beneath the surface of 

 intertidal sand flats. Common. 



Chiridotea nigrescens Wigley, 1961. Recently described from brackish waters of 



tidal marshes, North Falmouth to Chatham, on the southern side of the Cape. Re- 

 sembles the more common C_. coeca , which is more marine in its habitat. 



Chiridotea tuf tsi (Stimpson, 1883) . On subtidal sand and mud bottoms in marine 

 situations; sometimes concealed by mud adhering to rough back. 



Edotea triloba (Say, 1818) . On muddy shores, usually with adherent dirt. Edotea 

 montosa (Stimpson, 1853) is probably a synonym (Wallace, N. A., 1919. Univ. 

 Toronto Studies, Biol. Ser. no. 18: 42 pp.) 



Erichsonella attenuata (Harger, 1873). Apparently uncommon. 



Erichsonella f iliformis (Say, 1818) . Among eelgrass and algae. Common. 



Idotea balthica (Pallas, 1772). ifbiquitous. 



Idotea metallica Bosc, 1802. Common, swimming or clinging to vegetation. 



Idotea phosphorea Harger, 1873. Among weeds and on gravelly bottoms. 



Suborder Asellota 



Asellus sp. or spp.. Asellus is characteristic of fresh waters or of very low sal- 

 inities. Although the name Asellus communis Say, 1818, has been the most widely 

 used in the past (see, for example, Van Name, 1939) it now seems that Asellus 

 militaris is the most common eastern American species (Van Name, 1942) . For 

 specific determination, the assistance of a specialist is advised. 



J aera marina (Fabricius, 1780). Very common if looked for among weeds, mussels. 



Suborder Oniscoidea 



Ligia oceanica (Linnaeus, 1767) . Has been reported in numbers near high tide mark 

 on rocky shores and under boards north of Boston. Its reported occurrence at 

 Woods Hole needs confirmation. 



Phi l osc ia vittata Say, 1818. Found along the shore near high water mark, under 

 boards and rubbish. 



S cyphacella ar enico la Smith, 1873. Found in the sand of beaches 



Note: See Van Name, 1936, for other terrestrial as well as fresh water isopods. 




Isopods 107 



Suborder Epicaridea (Bopyroidea) 



lone thomp_sqivi Richardson, 1904. On Calliana ssa; the type locality is North Fal- 

 mouth . 



Probopyru s p andalicola (Packard, 1879) . On Palaemonetes . in the gill chamber. 



St egophryxus hypti us Thompson, 1902. Thompson reported 3-4% of hermit crabs Pag - 

 uru s lonaicarpuB at Hadley Harbor infested, and 1.5% at Woods Hole. Parasite 

 occurs on the abdomen of its host. 



REFERENCES ON ISOPODA AND TANAIDACEA 



Bayliff, W. H., 1938. A new isopod crustacean (Sphaeromidae) from Cold Spring Har- 

 bor, Long Island. Trans. Amer. Micr. Soc, 5^.: 213-217. 

 Bowman, T. E., 1955. The isopod genus Chiridotea Harger, with a description of a 



new species from brackish waters. J. Wash. Acad. Sci., 45_: 224-229. 

 Menzies, R. J., 1957. The marine borer family Limnoriidae (Crustacea, Isopoda) . 



Part I. Northern and Central America: systematics, distribution, and ecology. 



Bull. Marine Sci. Gulf and Caribbean, 7: 101-200. 

 Miller, M. A. amd W. D. Burbanck, 1961. Systematics and distribution of an es- 



tuarine isopod crustacean, Cyathura polita . Biol. Bull., 120 : 62-84. 

 Richardson, H. , 1905. A monograph on the Isopods of North America. Bull. U. S. 



Nat. Mus., No. 54: 1-727. 

 Richardson, H. , 1909. The isopod crustacean, Ancinus depressus (Say). Proc. U.S. 



Nat. Mus., 36. : 173-177. 

 Swan, E. F., 1956. Isopods of the genus Ligia on the New England coast. Ecology, 



37: 204-206. 

 Van Name, W. G. , 1939. The American land and fresh-water isopod Crustacea. Bull. 



Amer. Mus. Nat. Hist., 71: 1-535. 

 Van Name, W. G., 1942. A second supplement to the American land and fresh-water 



isopod Crustacea. Ibid ., 80: 299-329. 

 Wallace, N. A., 1919. The Isopoda of the Bay of Fundy. Univ. Toronto Studies, 



Biol. Ser. no. 18: 42 pp. 

 Wigley, R. L. , 1961. A new isopod, Chiridotea nigrescens , from Cape Cod, Massa- 

 chusetts. Crustaceana, 2_: 286-292. 



PART 4. ORDER AMPHIPODA 



By Eric L. Mills 



Amphipods are a widespread and important group of crustaceans. That they are 

 poorly known is mostly due to their wide limits of morphological variation, making 

 taxonomy difficult, and partly due to lack of patience in investigators, since 

 long and careful scrutiny is sometimes necessary. Since members of the group are 

 found in a wide variety of ecological niches, they are of interest to students of 

 taxonomy, ecology, physiology, genetics, and behavior. 



GENERAL MORPHOLOGY 



Amphipods have the basic malacostracan body plan of 6 head, 8 thoracic, and 

 6 abdominal segments, but there appear to be only 7 free thoracic segments because 

 of the fusion of the first thoracic segment with the head capsule. This first tho- 

 racic segment bears the maxillipeds, and each of the 7 free thoracic segments bears 

 a pair of limbs. The abdomen is divided into a pleon of 3 segments, each bearing 

 a pair of pleopods and a urosome of three segments, each with a pair of uropods. 

 A terminal telson projects from the rear of the urosome. The appendages are as 

 follows : 




108 



Plate 14 



ISOPODA AND TANAIDACEA 



Sources in Plates 14 and 15: Redrawn from Richard- 

 son (R) , from Kunkel (K) , from specimens (S) , or 



as noted. 



Fig. 1. Tanais cavolini , with chela 

 at greater scale (R) . 



3. L. savignyi , female (R) . 



5. Cirolana concharum (S) . 



7. Limnoria liqnorum , with details 

 of pleotelson, after Menzies. 



9. Nerocila munda (R) . 



2. Leptochelia savignyi , male (R) . 



4. Cyathura polita (R) . 



5. Lironeca ovalis (K) • 



8. Limnoria tripunctata , details 

 of pleotelson, after Menzies. 



10. Idotea baltica (S) . 



11. Same, ventral view of pleotelson 12. Idotea metallica (R) . 

 with valve-like left uropod raised, 

 exposing pleopods. 



13. Telson of Idotea phosphorea (R) 



15. Erichsonella f ilif ormis (R) . 



17. Asellus militaris (R) . 



19. Philoscia vittata (R) . 



14. Edotea triloba (R) . 



16. Telson of E. attenuata (R) . 



18. Jaera marina (R) . 



20. lone thompsoni , female in dor- 

 sal view at left, male enlarged 

 at right (S) . 



21. Probopyrus thompsoni , female at left with male beside it to same scale; 

 male enlarged at right (R) . 



22. Steqophryxus hyptius , female in dorsal view at left, in ventral view 

 at right with male indicated at same scale, male enlarged in center (R) 




Plate 14 




110 



Plate 15 



ISOPODA (cont.), HYPERIIDEA, CAPRELLIDEA 



Fig. 23, Chiridotea almyra ; A. head, B. first 

 pereipod of male, C. pleotelson; redrawn 

 after Bowman. 



24. Chiridotea tuftsi : A, B, C, as above. 



25. Chiridotea coeca : A, B, C, as above. 



26. Ancinus depressus (R) . 



27. Sphaeroma quadridentatum (R) . 



28. Exosphaeroma papillae , redrawn after Bayliff. 



29. Ligia oceanica (R) . 



30. Scyphacella arenicola (R) . 



31. Hyper i a ga lba , hyperiid amphipod (K) . 



32. Aeqinella lonqicornis , caprellid amphipod (K) 



33. Caprella geometrica , caprellid amphipod (K) . 




Plate 15 



23a 



23 b 



24a 



24 b 



25a 



25b 



23 c 



27 



24 c 



25 c 



28 




112 Amphipods 



1-2: Antennae - (two pairs) - both with peduncles and flagella, first antenna often 

 with accessory flagellum. 



3; Mandibles - with molar and incisor surfaces and a palp. 



4: First maxillae - with inner and outer lobes and a 2-segmented palp. 



5: Second maxillae - simple, of inner and outer lobes. 



6: Maxillipeds - with inner and outer plates and a 4-segmented palp. 



7-13: Seven peraeopods, each 7-segmented, including flattened coxal plates which con- 

 tribute to the sides of the body. The first 2 pairs of peraeopods are often called 

 gnathopods and are subchelate, with the 6th segment expanded as a hand. When this 

 "gnathopod 1 and 2" terminology is used, the remaining peraeopods are numbered from 

 1-5. . 



14-16: Pleopods (3 pairs) - with a basal peduncle and 2 many jointed setose rami. 



17-19: Uropods (3 pairs) - with a basal peduncle and 2 more or less spinose single 

 segmented rami. 



For illustrations, see Chevreux and Fage (1925, figs. 1 and 2). 



KEY TO THE SUBORDERS OF AMPHIPODA 

 (After Kunkel, 1918) 



1. Eyes absent, but articulated eye lobes present INGOLFIELLIDEA 



1. Eyes present, sessile 2 



2. Eyes large, covering side of head; uropods with laminate 



rami, forming a tail fan with telson HYPERIIDEA 



2. Eyes not covering whole side of head 3 



3. Abdomen well developed GAMMARIDEA 



3. Abdomen rudimentary; body very slender (typical caprellids) 



or very much flattened ("whale-lice") CAPRELLIDEA 



The Hyperiidea are mostly pelagic; some are commensals with scyphozoan jelly- 

 fish (Plate 15, fig. 31). Caprellidea (figs. 32, 33) are common inhabitants of 

 weedy areas in littoral and sub-littoral zones. See Chevreux and Fage (1925) for 

 common families and genera of these two suborders. Ingolf iellidea are rare, highly 

 aberrant, mostly abyssal forms, unfamiliar to most taxonomists. Gammaridean amphi- 

 pods are abundant and obvious members of all aquatic communities, but at present 

 it seems advisable to present only a key to families. For figures, the references 

 must be consulted. 



KEY TO COMMON FAMILIES OF GAMMARIDEAN AMPHIPODA 

 (Based on Stebbing, 1906) 



1. Antenna 1, first joint stout, with accessory flagellum; 

 mandible cutting edge almost smooth; gnathopod 2 with 3rd 

 joint elongated LYSIANASSIDAE 



1. These characters not combined 2 



2. Head tapering, truncate; eyes simple, usually 4; antennae 



1 without accessory flagellum; telson cleft AMPELISCIDAE 



2 . These characters not combined 3 



3. Peraeopods 3-5 with heavy armature of spines and setae, 



joints greatly expanded 4 



3. Peraeopods 3-5 less setose, joints not greatly expanded 5 




Amphipods 113 



4. Peraeopod 4 not greatly longer than peraeopod 5 HAUSTORIIDAE 



4. Peraeopod 4 greatly longer than peraeopod 5 PHOXOCEPHALIDAE 



5. Antenna 1 without accessory flagellum; maxillipeds abnormal; 



telson entire; fourth coxal plates greatly enlarged STENOTHOIDAE 



5. These characters not combined 6 



6. Mandible with molar weak or wanting; telson divided; maxilli- 



ped inner plate small LILJEBORGIIDAE 



6. These characters not combined 7 



7. Eyes dorsally continuous or confluent; pronounced rostrum; 



peraeopod 5 elongated OEDICEROTIDAE 



7. Eyes lateral, rostrum not well developed, peraeopod 5 not 



greatly elongated 8 



8. Side plate 4 excavate behind; peraeopods 1& 2 not glandu- 

 lar; animal not tube dwelling 9 



8. Side plate 4 usually not excavate behind; peraeopods 1 & 2 



glandular; animal often tube dwelling 13 



9. Mandible with palp 10 



9. Mandible without palp 12 



10. Telson entire CALLIOPIIDAE 



10. Telson usually cleft, antenna 1 with accessory flagellum, 



urosome with patches of dorsal spines GAMMARIDAE 



10. Telson cleft; other features unlike previous combination 11 



11. Gnathopod 1 without hand BATEIDAE 



11. Gnathopods 1 & 2 without hands, telson cleft, antennae of 



male with calceoli PONTOGENEIIDAE 



12. Uropod 3, both rami well developed DEXAMINIDAE 



12. Uropod 3, one ramus small or wanting TALITRIDAE 



13. Pleon compressed 14 



13. Pleon usually depressed; tubicolous animals, often band- 

 ed with color COROPHIIDAE 



14. Uropod 3 uncinate, i.e. with short hooks 15 



14. Uropod 3 not uncinate PHOTIDAE 



15. Inter-antennal lobes small; gnathopod 2 palm usually simple, 



hand not expanded AMPITHOIDAE 



15. Inter-antennal lobes prominent; gnathopod 2 palm often com- 

 plex, hand expanded ISCHYROCERIDAE 



Animals may be most readily placed at least to genus by using the keys in Steb- 

 bing (1906) and by reference to Sars (1895), Holmes (1905), Kunkel (1918) and Chev- 

 reux and Fage (1925). Kunkel is particularly useful for local species. The follow- 

 ing list of local genera and species is by no means complete but may aid in narrow- 

 ing the search, and is presented merely as an aid to those starting a study. The 

 development of keys to the species of amphipods in the Woods Hole region must await 

 further studies. We are indebted to Dr. E. L. Bousfield for assistance in the com- 

 pilation of the following list. 




114 Amphipods 



A PRELIMINARY LIST OF THE COMMONER LOCAL AMPHIPODS 



Lysianassidae 



Lysianopsis alba Holmes, 1903. In sand, gravel or mud in shallow subtidal. 

 Orchomenella pinguis (Boeck, 1861) . 

 Tmetonyx nobilis Stimpson, 1853. 



Ampeliscidae 



Ampelisca macrocephala Liljeborg, 1852. 

 Ampelisca vadorum Mills, 1963. 

 Byblis serrata Smith, 1873. 



Haustoriidae 



Found burrowing in sandy beaches. A complex family of several genera, current- 

 ly being revised. 



Phoxocephalidae 



Paraphoxus epistoma (Shoemaker, 1938) . 

 Paraphoxus spinosus Holmes, 1903. 

 P hoxocephalus holbolli (Kroyer, 1842). 



Stenothoidae 



Stenothoe spp. 



Lil jeborgiidae 



Listriella clymenellae (Mills, 1961) . Commensal in tubes of Clymenella torquata . 



Oedicerotidae 



Monocu lodes edwardsi Holmes, 1903. 



Calliopiidae 



Calliopius laeviusculus (Kroyer, 1838) . Commonly taken swimming at night lights. 



Gammaridae 



Carinogammarus mucronatus (Say, 1818). In both marine and brackish waters. 



Cr angonyx spp. In fresh water. 



Elasmopus laevis (Smith, 1873) . 



Gammarus annulatus Smith, 1873. Marine. 



Gammarus f asciatus Say, 1818. In fresh water. 



Gammarus oceanicus Segerstrale, 1947. Marine and brackish water. 



Gammarus tiqrinus Sexton, 1939. Brackish waters. 



Melita nitida Smith, 1873. 



Bateidae 



Batea c atharinensis Fr. Muller, 1865. 



Pontogeneiidae 



Pontogeneia inermis (Kroyer, 1838) . 




Amphipods 



115 



ripyami np the a Boeck, 1861. 



Dexaminidae 



Talitridae 



Allorchestes littoralis Stimpson, 1853. Intertidal. 

 Hyale spp. Intertidal. 



Hvalella azteca (Sausseure, 1818). In fresh water. 

 Orchestia spp. Rather small, dark, beach hoppers. 



Talorchestia longicornis (Say, 1818). The common, large whitish beach hopper. 

 Talorchestia megalophthalma (Bate, 1862) . A beach hopper similar to the above but 

 smaller and less common. 



Corophiidae (a family of tube dwellers) 



Cerapus tubular is Say, 1818. Among masses of Amaroucium , and among eelgrass. Said 



to carry tubes about. 

 Corophium spp. In soft tubes. 

 Eric thonius spp. 

 Unciola irrorata Say, 1818. Often found in tubes of polychaetes or other amphipods. 



Photidae 



Leptocheirus pinguis (Stimpson, 1853) . 

 Leptocheirus plumulosus Shoemaker, 1932. 

 Photis spp. 



Ampithoidae 



Ampithoe lonqimana Smith, 1873. 

 AmpithQe rubricata (Montagu. 1808) 

 Cymadusa compta (Smith, 1873) . 



Ischyroceridae 



Ischyrocerus spp. 



Jassa falcata (Montagu, 1808) . 



Cheluridae 

 Chelura terebrans Philippi, 1839. A wood borer. 



Pleustidae 

 Sympleustes qlaber (Boeck, 1861) . 



Aoridae 



Lembos smithi (Holmes, 1905). 

 Microdeutopus damnoniensis (Bate, 1856) . 

 Microdeutopus gryllotalpa Costa, 1853. 



REFERENCES ON AMPHIPODS 



Barnard, J. L. , Index to the families, genera and species of Gammaridean Amphipoda 

 (Crustacea). Allan Hancock Publications, Occas . Papers _19: 1-145. Very useful 

 in literature searches. 




116 Amphipods 



Bousfield, E. L., 1963. Studies on amphipod crustaceans of the Cape Cod region. 



Preliminary report, Systematics-Ecology Program, MBL, Woods Hole (unpublished) . 

 Chevreux, E., & L. Fage, 1925. Amphipodes, _in Faune de France, Paris, 9^: 1-488; 



438 text figures. Very useful for fauna of this region. Includes Hyperiidea 



and Caprellidea. 

 Holmes, S. J., 1905. The Amphipoda of southern New England. Bull. Bur. Fisheries 



for 1904: 457-529, pi. 1-8. 

 Kunkel, B. W. , 1918. The Arthostraca of Connecticut. Conn. Geol. and Nat. Hist. 



Survey 26^: 1-261. Standard work on Amphipoda of New England. 

 Mills, E. L., 1962. A new species of Lil jeborgiid amphipod with notes on its bio- 

 logy. Crustaceana, 4: 158-162. 

 , 1963. A new species of Ampelisca (Crustacea: Amphipoda) from eastern 



North America, with notes on other species of the genus. Canad. J. Zool., 41 : 



971-989. 

 Sars, G. 0., 1895. The Crustacea of Norway. Christiania & Copenhagen, _1: 1-711; 



240 pis. A standard reference, illustrations excellent. 

 Stebbing, T. R. R., 1906. Amphipoda 1. Gammaridea. Das Tierreich (Berlin) 21 : 



1-806; 127 text figures. The basic reference work in amphipod taxonomy. 




Chapter XIII H 7 



PHYLUM ARTHROPODA 



Class Crustacea 



The Higher Malacostraca (Decapoda and Stomatopoda) 



The great majority of the well known crustaceans collected and studied at Woods Hole 

 are in the order Decapoda, although the group also includes some little known forms and 

 presents problems of identification in certain families, such as in the Xanthidae and 

 Pinnotheridae . The "mantis shrimps" of the order Hoplocarida or Stomatopoda (see page 

 127) are represented only by two species, not commonly collected. 



Figure references in this chapter are to Plates 16 and 17. 



KEY TO THE MORE COMMON DECAPOD CRUSTACEANS 



I. Small animals of shrimp-like form; abdomen well developed, with tail fan; pleopods 

 used for swimming; pleura (side plates) of 2nd abdominal segment overlapping those of 

 first segment; the typical shrimps and prawns (fig. 41) Section CARIDEA 1 



II. Animals of heavier form, with well developed abdomen; pleopods not used for swim- 

 ming; thoracic legs adapted for walking; chelipeds large and strong. 



A. Abdomen not much (if at all) wider or longer than cephalothorax; body firm, well 

 armored and well pigmented; the familiar fresh water crayfishes and, as the only 

 local marine representative, the lobster Homarus americanus 

 Subsection ASTACURA or NEPHROPSIDA 



B. Abdomen markedly wider and/or longer than cephalothorax; bodies soft, seemingly 

 weak; burrowing forms with tendency to reduced eyes and pigmentation; sometimes 

 placed with Anomura Subsection THALASSINIDEA 4 



III. Animals of typically crablike form, with 5th (last) pair of thoracic legs not 

 markedly reduced; abdomen reduced, lacking uropods, and folded under body; antennae 

 short and set medial to eyes; the "true crabs" Section BRACHYURA 5 



IV. Fifth pair of thoracic legs very reduced and folded up above bases of 4th pair; 

 form varies from guite crablike to not very crablike; abdomen in some is asymmetrical 



or twisted, or reduced, but with uropods Section ANOMURA 27 



I. Caridea 



1. Carpus (the segment next to the claw or hand) of 2nd pair 



of legs not annulated (fig. 40) 2 



1. Carpus of 2nd pair of legs annulated into 3 parts (fig. 39); 



with humped abdomen (Family HIPPOLYTIDAE) Hippolyte zostericola 



2. Rostrum short, not compressed; first pair of legs subchelate 

 (fig. 31); 2nd pair of legs chelate (as in fig. 41); eyes set 



close together (Family CRANGONIDAE) Crangon septemspinosus 



2. Rostrum long and laterally compressed; first and 2nd pair of 



legs chelate; eyes set widely apart (Family PALAEMONIDAE) .... Palaemonetes 



There are three local species, of which P. vulgaris is much the most common; the tabula- 

 tion below should separate the three: 




118 



Decapoda 



Dorsal rostral 

 teeth 



Ventral rostral 

 teeth 



Dorsal rostral 

 teeth lying post- 

 erior to orbits 



Teeth of chelae 



of second legs : 



movable finger 



fixed finger 



P_. vulgaris 

 (figs. 33. 34) 



to tip 



4-5 



P_. intermedius 

 (figs. 35. 36) 



to tip 



4-5 



P. pugio 

 (figs. 37. 38) 



tip naked 



2-3 



II. Thalassinidea 



3. Chelipeds unequal in size; body very pale 



Callianassa atlantica 



3. Chelipeds of equal size 4 



4. Chelipeds with fingers not deflexed (fig. 30); fairly 



common and of good size (ca. 100 mm long) Upogebia af finis 



4. Chelipeds with fingers deflexed (subchelate, fig. 29) ; 



a rare animal of small size (to ca. 35 mm) Naushonia crangonoides 



Note: The Hoplocarida (Stomatopoda) or "mantis shrimps" have somewhat the same habitat 

 and body build as the above 3 species, but are at once distinguished by their for- 

 midable mantis-like claws, large eyes, and by the short carapace which does not cover 

 the last 4 thoracic segments (see page 127 and fig. 32). 



III. Brachyura 



5. Carapace triangular or globose, with apex projecting for- 

 ward to form a rostrum; "spider crabs" 6 



5. Carapace usually broader than long; rostrum small or want- 

 ing 9 



6. Carapace triangular, resembling small chip of stone (fig. 3); 

 walking legs very small but chelipeds relatively huge (Family 



PARTHENOPIDAE) Heterocrypta granulata 



6. Walking legs long and conspicuous 



(Family MAIIDAE or INACHIDAE) 7 



7. Carapace with medial dorsal spines 8 



7. Carapace surface smooth, without median dorsal spines; splotched 



with red Pelia mutica 



8. With 6 spines in the median dorsal row; few dorsal tubercles 



(fig. 1) Libinia dubia 



8. With 9 spines in median dorsal row; many dorsal tubercles 



(fig. 2) Libinia emarginata 




Decapoda 119 



9. Free living crabs, well pigmented, with eyes not reduced 10 



9. Small crabs with reduced eyes; commonly but not always with 

 reduced body pigmentation; usually commensal in worm tubes or 

 bivalves, but some may wander free; carapaces either subcir- 

 cular or markedly widened from side to side; small, rarely 



reaching 2.5 cm across carapace 19 



10. Carapace outline varies, but characteristically front mar- 

 gin is curved, and bears a series of teeth between the eye 

 and the (antero) lateral corner on each side; size varies, 

 but several over 5 cm across carapace belong here; "can- 

 croid" crabs 11 



10. Carapace outline squarish, with a more or less straight 

 front margin; most are active, semi-terrestrial crabs, 

 rarely over 4 cm across carapace; free living "grapsoid" 



crabs 23 



11. First antennae (antennules) folded longitudinally or nearly 



so (fig. 4) Family CANCRIDAE 12 



11. First antennae folded transversely or obliquely (fig. 5) 13 



12. Edges of antero-lateral teeth entire; chelipeds granulate, 



not denticulate (fig. 6) Cancer irroratus 



12. Edges of antero-lateral teeth denticulate; upper margin of 



palm denticulate (fig. 7) Cancer borealis 



13. Last pair of walking legs not markedly adapted for swimming; 



tips sharp, for walking (fig. 10) 14 



13. Last pair of legs flattened and paddle-like; tips rounded, 



for swimming (figs. 8, 9) 18 



14. Front (region between eyes) produced into 3 low teeth; 5 

 very prominent sharp anterolateral teeth (fig. 10); hind 

 pair of legs slightly flattened; an active long legged crab 

 commonly 5-7.5 cm across carapace; the common "green crab" 



but color varies from greenish-black to orange Carcinus maenas 



14. Front not produced into teeth; generally small crabs, but 

 more heavily built and less active than Carcinus , with shorter 

 legs and heavier chelae; tips of chelae dark in some species; 



a group in which specific identification requires care 

 Family XANTHIDAE 15 



15. Frontal margin (between eyes) with a single edge, not seem- 

 ing double; fingers of chelae dark 16 



15. Frontal margin transversely grooved so as to appear double; 

 fingers of chelae whitish; carapace with 4 and 3 distinct 

 transverse lines of granules on anterior half 



Rhithropanopeus harrisi 



16. Movable finger of major cheliped with a heavy blunt tooth 

 near base (fig. 26); carapace width often exceeds 2.5 cm 



(fig. 25) Panopeus herbsti 



16. Movable finger of major cheliped without such a tooth 17 



17. With an elongated dark red spot on the inner (concealed) 

 surface of each maxilliped (note: Panopeus herbsti some- 

 times but not always has a comparable spot, but it is 

 small, circular, and located near base of maxilliped) ; fin- 

 gers of minor chela "spooned" (fig. 28) ; carapace rather 

 flattened and oval in outline (fig. 27) ; uncommon 



Eurypanopeus depressus 



17. Without such red spot on maxillipeds; fingers of minor chela 

 not "spooned" (Fig. 24); carapace outline nore angular (fig. 

 23) not oval; very common Neopanope texana 




120 Decapoda 



18. Antero-lateral teeth on carapace 3 to 5 in number (fig. 9); 



carapace not usually broad; color cream to tan with red mark- 

 ings ("lady crab") Ovalipes ocellatus 



18. Antero-lateral teeth 9 in number (fig. 8); carapace extremely 

 broad; outermost lateral tooth especially long and sharp; with 

 some blue coloration, particularly on chelipeds ("blue crab") 



Callinectes sapidus 



19. Fifth (last) pair of thoracic legs very small and tucked up 

 under carapace; you are in the wrong part of key; animal is 

 a brachyurous anomuran ; go on to no. 30. 



19. Fifth (last) pair of thoracic legs is not especially reduced, 

 useful in locomotion. This is a difficult family with marked 



sexual dimorphism Family PINNOTHERIDAE 20 



20. Carapace thin and shiny; body almost circular (fig. 12); com- 

 mensal in mantle cavity of bivalves or in Chaetopterus tubes 



Pinnotheres maculatus 



20. Carapace much wider than long, generally commensal 



Pinnixa 21 



21. Propodus (2nd segment from tip) of 3rd walking leg slender, 

 twice as long as wide (figs. 13, 14) 



Pinnixa sayana 



21. Propodus of 3rd walking leg not slender; less than twice as 



long as wide 22 



22. Body and legs smooth, not especially hairy; propodus of 3rd 

 leg only slightly if at all longer than wide (figs. 15, 16) 



Pinnixa cylindrica 



22. Body and legs distinctly hairy; propodus of 3rd leg clearly 

 longer than wide, and with edge granular or serrated (figs. 



17, 18) Pinnixa chaetopterana 



23. A gap is left between the 3rd maxillipeds when they are held 

 at rest; front very or moderately broad; eyestalks short 



Family GRAPSIDAE 24 



23. The 3rd maxillipeds almost or quite close over the mouth region 

 when held at rest; front moderately or very narrow; eyestalks 

 long; one cheliped of male very large; local representatives 



are the typical "fiddler crabs" Family OCYPODIDAE 



24. Carapace very square (fig. 19); dark plum colored to bluish black 

 (the 'square backed fiddler"); found burrowing in salt marshes 



Sesarma reticulatum 



24. Carapace with corners rounded off (fig. 20) ; color variably 

 blotched olive-green; drifts in on Sargassum ('Columbus crab", 



"Gulf-weed crab") Planes minutus 



25. Inner surface of large claw of male with an oblique ridge 



(fig. 22) 26 



25. Inner surface of large claw of male without such oblique 

 ridge (fig. 21) ; carapace mottled in grays and purple 

 ("calico back") Uca pugilator 




Decapoda 121 



26. Carapace uniformly dark, almost black; not exceeding as a 



rule 22 mm in width; very numerous (the "black fiddler crab') 

 Uca pugnax 



26. Carapace grayish, lighter at front, with central brown 

 mark; size very much larger than in the common fiddler crabs; 

 carapace commonly over 23 mm, even 36 mm wide; reddish spots 

 at joints of chelipeds, especially in males ("big fiddler 



crab" red- jointed fiddler crab") Uca minax 



IV. Anomura 



27. Animals inhabit gastropod shells; abdomen soft and twisted 



Chermit crabs") 28 



27. Abdomen symmetrical and tucked under thorax 30 



28. Chelipeds slender; hands subcylindrical 29 



28. Hands broad, flat, tuberculate Paqurus pollicaris 



29. Chelae with 4 or 5 distinct purplish bands on whitish back- 

 ground Paqurus annulipes 



29. Chelae without such distinct banding Paqurus lonqicarpus 



30. Form essentially crablike, except for having 5th (last) 

 thoracic legs reduced and hidden under carapace (fig. 11) ; 

 small, rounded; chelipeds directed forward in resting posi- 

 tion (not transversely as in Brachyura) ; antennae long and 

 set lateral to eyes (Family PORCELLANIDAE) 



Polyonyx macrocheles 



30. Body egg shaped; carapace gray and shining; telson forms 

 a long triangular white ventral shield; burrows in wave- 

 swept sandy beaches (Family HIPPIDAE; "mole crabs", "sand 

 bugs") Emerita talpoida 



ANNOTATED LIST OF DECAPOD CRUSTACEANS 

 I. Caridea (shrimps) 



Craqo , see Crangon . The re-establishment of the old (1798) generic name Crangon for the 

 common shrimps is the result of the suppression in 1955 of the name Craqo by the In- 

 ternational Commission on Zoological Nomenclature (Opinions and Declarations, 10( 1) : 

 1-44) . This action terminated a most confusing situation, briefly: In 1904 Rathbun 

 (Proc. Biol. Soc. Wash. 17 : 170) reported that the name Crangon had first been used 

 in an obscure work by Weber (1795) for the "snapping shrimps" known since 1798 as 

 Alpheus , and in consequence she redesignated Alpheus as Crangon . This left the com- 

 mon shrimps without a name, so she adopted for them the "next available" name, Craqo . 

 The remarkable 3 -way confusion included the use of the family name Crangonidae for 

 the snapping shrimps and Cragonidae for the common shrimps. Under the 1955 ruling 

 our common shrimp is secure under the generic name Crangon (Family Crangonidae) , and 

 the snapping shrimps (which do not occur at Woods Hole) are Alpheus , and restored to 

 the arms of their family Alpheidae. 



Crangon septemspinosus Say, 1818. Found in sand, in which it buries itself, below tide 

 marks. Common, the name Crangon vulgaris Fabricius, 1798 has been used by those who 

 believe the local form to be conspecific with the common European shrimp. 



Hippolyte zostericola (Smith, 1874) . Particularly common among eel grass ( Zostera ) , its 

 green body color rendering the shrimp inconspicuous. 



Palaemonetes intermedius Holthius, 1949. Prior to 1949 this species and the' next were 

 confused with and included in P. vulgaris . Found in brackish water, and mainly 

 southern. 




122 



Fig 

 2. 

 3. 

 4. 



6. 



7. 



8. 

 9. 



11. 

 13. 

 15. 

 17. 

 19. 

 21. 



23. 



25. 

 27. 



Plate 16 



DECAPOD CRUSTACEA 



Sources: Redrawn from Rathbun (R) , from 

 Ryan (Ry) , from specimens (S), all but nos. 

 13-14 by Bruce Shearer. 



. 1. Libinia dubia , young male, carapace (R) . 



Libinia emarginata , young male, carapace (R) . 



Heterocrypta granulata (R) . 



Lower side of front of Cancer irroratus to show first antennae folded 

 longitudinally or obliquely (S) . 



Same region of Carcinus maenas to show first antennae folded transversely 

 (S). 



Carapace of Cancer irroratus , to show smooth edged anterolateral teeth (S) 



Anterolateral margin only of Cancer borealis , showing denticulate antero- 

 lateral teeth (S) . 



Callinectes sapidus , carapace and fifth leg (S) . 



Ovalipes ocellatus , carapace and 10. Carcinus maenas , carapace and 

 fifth leg (S) . fifth leg (S) . 



Polyonyx macrocheles (S) . 12. Pinnotheres maculatus , male (S) . 



Pinnixa sayana , male, ventral (S) . 14. Same, female (S) . 



Pinnixa cylindrica , male (S) . 



Pinnixa chaetopterana , male (S) . 



Sesarma reticulatum (S) . 



Inside of large claw of male Uca 

 pugilator , lacking oblique ridge 

 (S). 



Carapace of Neopanope texana 

 (S). 



Carapace of Panopeus herbsti 

 (points exaggerated) (S) . 



Carapace of Eurypanopeus depres - 

 sus, to show oval outline (Ry) . 



16. Same, female (S) . 



18. Same, female (S) . 



20. Planes minutus (S) . 



22. Same, but of Uca pugnax , with 

 oblique ridge (S) . 



24. Major chela of same, with area 



of black outlined extending onto 

 palm (S) . 



26. Major chela of same, to show blunt 

 tooth on movable finger (S) . 



28. Minor chela of same, to illustrate 

 "spooned" condition (Ry) . 




Plate 16 






124 



Plate 17 



DECAPOD CRUSTACEA (cont.); STOMATOPODA 



Figs. 29-40: Redrawn from Kingsley (K) , Holthius 

 (H) , specimens (S) , by Bruce Shearer. 



Fig. 29. Naushonia cranqonoides . carapace and left chela (K) . 



30. Upoqebia af finis {S\ left cheliped only. 



31. Crangon septemspinosus , "subchelate" first chela (S) . 



32. Squilla empusa (order Stomatopoda, not Decapoda) (S) . 



33. Second chela of Palaemonetes vulgaris (H) . 



34. Rostrum of same (S) . 



35. Second chela of Palaemonetes intermedius (H) . 



36. Rostrum of same (H) . 



37. Second chela of Palaemonetes pugio (H) . 



38. Rostrum of same (S) . 



39. Second leg of Hippo lyte to show annulated carpus (S) . 



40. Second leg of Palaemonetes ; carpus not annulated (S) . 



41. Lateral view of a generalized decapod, redrawn after Schmitt, 

 showing the typical shrimp-like ("caridoid") form and append- 

 ages . 




Plate 17 




126 Decapoda 



Palaemonetes pugio Holthius, 1949. In brackish to almost fresh water. 



Palaemonetes vulgaris (Say, 1818). This is the species usually collected and used at Woods 

 Hole. Tends to occur in more saline water than the two less common species above. 



II A. Astacura or Nephropsidea 



(Crayfish and lobsters) 



Homarus americanus Milne-Edwards, 1837. The familiar lobster, generally taken commercial- 

 ly in subtidal water; uncommon locally because of fishing. A point for comparative 

 physiologists to bear in mind is that the lobster is more closely related to the fresh 

 water crayfishes than to any other of the local marine crustaceans. 



II B. Thalassinidea 

 (Mud shrimps) 



Callianassa atlantica (Smith, 1874) . A burrower in muddy sand, intertidal and in shallow 

 water. The name C. atlantica replaces the name C. stimpsoni , which has prior appli- 

 cation to a Pacific coast fossil species (see Schmitt, 1935) . 



Naushonia crangonoides Kingsley, 1895. Rare; has been found in intertidal or shallow 

 subtidal, in muddy sand. 



Upogebia af finis (Say, 1817) . Habitat similar to that of Callianassa , but muddier. 



III. Brachyura 

 (True crabs) 



Callinectes sapidus Rathbun, 1895. The blue crab. Common in grassy bays and salt water 

 ponds. An important commercial and experimental animal, whose wide range on our east 

 coast has been extended by accidental introduction into France, Holland, Denmark, and 

 Israel. Penetrates into waters of very low salinity, especially in the warmer parts 

 of its range. 



Cancer borealis Stimpson, 1859. Northern rock crab, Jonah crab. Despite name, is not 

 confined to rocky areas but is often found in sand. 



Cancer irroratus Say, 1817. Rock crab. Similar to the above, but perhaps more charact- 

 eristic of rocky areas . 



Carcinides , see Carcinus . " Carcinides " is now a rejected synonym of Carcinus . The facts 

 are briefly: in 1897 Rathbun (Proc. Biol. Soc. Wash., 11 : 164) substituted Carcinides 

 for the well known name, Carcinus , of the common green crab on the grounds that the 

 name Carcinus had been given prior use by Latreille in 1796 for an essentially unrec- 

 ognizable genus of amphipods . However, Latreille described no species under Carcinus , 

 and the term in his sense was never subsequently used. In Opinion 330 (Opinions and 

 Declarations, ... 9^(24): 321-338, 1955) the International Commission on Zoological 

 Nomenclature suppressed Carcinus of Latreille 1796 and validated the Carcinus of 

 Leach 1314 as applied to the green crab. 



Carcinus maenas (Linnaeus) . The green crab. The commonest crab of this area, in marine 

 and brackish water. 



Eurypanopeus depressus (Smith , 1869) . Apparently uncommon or of doubtful occurrence in 



Woods Hole region; reported by Verrill and Smith but not taken by Sumner survey (1913) 

 nor in the summer of 1963. It is extremely common further south (e.g. Delaware Bay), 

 and is often associated with oysters or oyster shells in muddy areas where salinity 

 may be lowered. 



Heterocrypta granulata (Gibbes, 1849) . Dredged on bottoms of shingles or pebbles, which 

 the animal much resembles. 



Libinia dubia Milne Edwards, 1834. On muddy shores and flats. Stenohaline. 



Libinia emarginata Leach, 1815. Common on muddy shores and flats. This is the species 

 more commonly used at Woods Hole. Stenohaline. 




Decapoda and Hoplocarida 127 



Neopanope texana sayi (Smith, 1869) . Extremely common. This subspecies ranges from 

 Canada to Florida, where it merges and is confused with N. texana texana . 



Ovalipes ocellatus (Herbst, 1799) . Found in sand at low water mark and subtidally. 



Buries itself with only the eyes showing. Ranges from Cape Cod to South Carolina. 



Panopeus herbs ti Mi lne -Edwards , 1834. The species (as several "forms") ranges from 

 Boston to Brazil. 



Pelia mutica (Gibbes, 1850) . Dredged, on gravelly and shelly bottom. 



Pinnixa chaetopterana Stimpson, 1859. Commensal in tubes of Chaetopterus , Amphi trite , 

 and probably other worms. 



Pinnixa cylindrica (Say, 1818) . Said to occur in burrows of Arenicola crista ta . Young 

 found free on low inter tidal muddy shores. 



Pinnixa sayana Stimpson, 1860. Reported to be dug out of mud, but probably actually 

 in worm or other burrows. 



Pinnotheres maculatus Say, 1818. Commensal in Mytilu s , Modiolus , and several other bi- 

 valves, as well as in Chaetopterus tubes. 



Planes minutus (Linnaeus) . A visitor that drifts into Woods Hole on Sarqassum ; may 

 be found on shore occasionally. 



Rhi thr opanopeus harrissi (Gould, 1841) . This has never been reported from Woods Hole, 

 but has probably been overlooked since its range is from Mexico to Maine and New 

 Brunswick. It is found in waters of very low salinity, even fresh water, and has 

 been introduced and become common in other regions, where it has been used in phy- 

 siological research (e.g. San Francisco Bay, Holland, Germany) . 



Sesarma reticulatum (Say, 1817) . A southern form, of spotty ocurrence in certain fid- 

 dler crab marshes, rather to landward. May be looked for in or near Uca minax hab- 

 itats. 



Uca minax (LeConte 1855) . A southern species, in this area near the extreme of its 

 range and found only in a few localities. May occur in very low salinities. 



Uca pugilator (Bosc, 1801-02). In salt marshes; tends to make burrows in sand and in 

 Salicornia areas. Less gregarious than U. puqnax . 



Uca puqnax (Smith, 1870). In salt marshes. Tends to make burrows in muddy areas. 



IV. Anomura 



Emerita talpoida (Say, 1817). Very common on exposed sandy beaches; intertidal. 



Pagurus annulipes Say, 1817. Dredged. 



Paqurus lonqicarpus Say, 1817. The commonest shallow water hermit crab; found everywhere. 



Pagurus pollicaris Say, 1817. The large hermit crab; common. 



Polyonvx macrocheles (Gibbes, 1850) . Lives in Chaetopterus tubes. 



Order Hoplocarida (Stomatopoda) 



(Mantis -shrimps) 



Members of this order differ greatly from decapods in structure, having only a 

 short carapace that does not cover the last 3 or 4 segments of the thorax, and having 

 the second maxillipeds modified to remarkable mantis-like, raptorial claws. They bur- 

 row in subtidal or low intertidal mud, and are not commonly taken. There are two local 

 species, distinguished as follows: 



1. Carapace and abdomen with several longitudinal carinae or keels; 

 size large, up to 25 cm; 6 teeth on finger of raptorial claw; 

 fairly common subtidally, but rare intertidally (fig. 32) 



Squilla empusa Say, 1818 



2. Carapace and abdomen smooth, without carinae; small, up to 

 4 cm long; raptorial claw with 11-15 teeth; rare 



Nannosquilla grayi (Chace, 1958) 



(Described as Lysiosquilla grayi ; see Manning, 1963) 




128 Decapoda 



REFERENCES ON DECAPODS AND STOMATOPODS 



Chace, F. A., Jr., 1958. A new stomatopod crustacean of the genus Lysiosquilla from 

 Cape Cod, Massachusetts. Biol. Bull., 114 : 141-145. 



Hay, W. P. and C. A. Shore, 1918. The decapod crustaceans of Beaufort, N. C, and the 

 surrounding region. Bull. U. S. Bur. Fish. 35.(1915-1916): 371-475. 



Holthius, L. B., 1952. A general revision of the Palaemonidae (Crustacea, Decapoda, 



Natantia) of the Americas. II. The subfamily Palaemoninae. Allan Hancock Founda- 

 tion Occ. Papers no. ^^2: 1-396. 



Kingsley, J. S., 1899. Synopsis of North American Invertebrates. III. The Caridea of 

 North America. Amer. Nat. 3_3: 709-720. 



Manning, R. B. , 1963. Preliminary revision of the genera Pseudosquilla and Lysio - 

 squilla . . . Bull. Mar. Sci. Gulf and Caribbean, J,3_: 308-328. 



Rathbun, M. J., 1917. The grapsoid crabs of America. Bull. U. S. Nat. Mus., 97 : 

 i-xxii, 1-461. 



, 1925. The spider crabs of America. Ibid , 129 : i-xx, 1-613. 



, 1930. The cancroid crabs of America of the farailies Euryalidae, Port- 



unidae, Atelecyclidae, Cancridae, and Xanthidae. Ibid , 152 : i-xvi, 1-609. 



Schmitt, W. L., 1935. Mud shrimps of the Atlantic coast of North America. Smithson. 

 Misc. Coll., 93: 1-21, 4 pi. 




Chapter XIV 129 



PHYLUM MOLLUSCA 

 by W. Russell Hunter and Stephen C. Brown 

 PART 1. INTRODUCTION, CLASSIFICATION, GLOSSARY, AND REFERENCES 



INTRODUCTION 

 (Figure references in this chapter are to Plates 18 and 19 ) 



Among the relatively few patterns of animal construction (Phyla) which have 

 been highly successful, in terms both of numbers and of diversity of habitats, is 

 the molluscan plan. Along with the Chordata and the Nematoda, the Mollusca must 

 rank just after the Arthropoda in terms of evolutionary "success". Most molluscs 

 are readily recognizable — the soft body within a hard calcareous shell is usually 

 diagnostic (as is the extensive use of ciliary and mucous mechanisms in feeding, 

 locomotion, and reproduction) . The basic molluscan plan of structure and function 

 is remarkably uniform throughout the group, but there is no single standard mollus- 

 can shape. An extreme diversity in external body form has been based upon this 

 plan — clam, chiton, snail, and squid are all molluscs. In an evolutionary sense, 

 the molluscan plan has proved plastic, and the adaptive modifications of structure 

 and function to fit particular environmental circumstances provide material for a 

 wide variety of biological studies. 



There are probably about 90,000 living species of molluscs, mostly belonging 

 to the three major classes, Gastropoda, Bivalvia, and Cephalopoda. In the mollus- 

 can fauna of the Woods Hole area, the majority of orders and superfamilies are rep- 

 resented, but students and visiting investigators should note that certain groups 

 are absent and others represented by a single common species. For example, in the 

 class Gastropoda, no two gilled aspidobranchs (Haliotidae, Fissurellidae, etc.) 

 occur, and of the one gilled aspidobranchs only the limpet Acmaea testudinalis is 

 available. There are no shallow water trochaceans (the group including Marqarites 

 and Tegula ) such as are common on other coasts. Representatives of the class Sca- 

 phopoda ("tusk shells", e.g. Dentalium ) can only be dredged from deeper water and 

 are not available for experimental studies. Although most bivalve groups are well 

 represented, including three typical genera of the subclass Protobranchia, the sub- 

 class Septibranchia is not found locally. Among the Cephalopoda, neither octopods 

 nor sepioids are available locally, though Octopus has been dredged from deeper 

 water offshore. 



This chapter includes an outline classification of Mollusca, a glossary of 

 terms relating particularly to shelled forms, some general references, a short sec- 

 tion on local amphineurans and cephalopods, and detailed keys and annotated lists 

 of species for the two large groups, the shelled gastropods and the bivalves. For 

 nudibranchs and other shell-less ophistobranch gastropods, see Chapter 15. 



Much molluscan systematics in the past has been based on shell characteristics, 

 and previously available keys have been almost entirely conchological - the vital 

 soft parts and environmental circumstances being ignored. We have deliberately 

 tried to design the present keys to be used on molluscs collected alive - and 

 therefore they will not be so useful for the identification of stray empty shells 

 found cast up on the beach. We feel, however, that by using such characters as the 

 siphons of bivalves, we have created less artificial keys. We have tried to use 

 criteria of more fundamental biological significance than the detailed dimensions 

 of shells, and attempted to avoid the artificial separation of naturally related 

 genera. In almost all cases, the specific names used follow those of Abbott (1954). 

 Occasionally, where a well known generic name is no longer correctly applied to a 

 particular species, we have given this after an "equals" sign in parentheses , e.g. 

 ( = Venus ) . These "former" genera should be clearly distinguished from the few sub- 

 genera quoted, which are placed in parentheses following accepted usage. 



The outline classification given below is that which has been used in teaching 




130 Mollusca 



at Woods Hole for three years, and reflects modern reconsideration of phylogeny in 

 the light of functional morphology (see, for example, the classification of the bi- 

 valves) . Typical genera (local if possible) are given in parentheses, aid are marked 

 "*" if species occur in the Cape Cod area, "n" if non-marine. 



OUTLINE CLASSIFICATION OF THE MOLLUSCA 



A. Class MONOPLACOPHORA ( Neopilina) 



B. Class AMPHINEURA 



I. Subclass APLACOPHORA ( * ChaetodermaJ 



II. Subclass POLYPLACOPHORA (* Chaetopleura) 



C. Class SCAPHOPODA (* Dentalium) 



D. Class GASTROPODA 



i I. Subclass PROSOBRANCHIA 



a. Order Archaeogastropoda 



(Diotocardia or Aspidobranchia) (* Acmaea ) 



b. Order Mesogastropoda 

 (Monotocardia I or Taenioglossa) 



(* Littorina , * Lacuna , * Crepidula ) 



c. Order Neogastropoda 

 (Monotocardia II or Stenoglossa) 



(* Busycon , * Nassarius , * Urosalpinx ) 



II. Subclass OPISTHOBRANCHIA (key to shell-less forms is in Chapter XV) 



a. Order Cephalaspidea (* Acteon , * Philine ) 



b. Order Anaspidea (* Haminoea , * Aplysia ) 



c. Order Thecosomata (Thecosomatous Pteropods) . . . . (* Cavolin a) 



d. Order Gymnosomata (Gymnosomatous Pteropods) (* Clione ) 



e. Order Sacoglossa (* Elysia ) 



f. Order Acochlidiacea ( Hedylopsis ) 



g. Order Notaspidea ( Pleurobranchus ) 



h. Order Acoela (Nudibranchia) . . . . ( * Acanthodoris , * Aeolidia ) 



III. Subclass PULMONATA 



a. Order Basommatophora (* Melampus , n* Lymnaea ) 



b. Order Stylommatophora (n* Cepaea ) 



E. Class BIVALVIA (Lamellibranchia or Pelecypoda) 



I. Subclass PROTOBRANCHIA (* Nucula , * Yoldia , * Solemya ) 



II. Subclass LAMELLIBRANCHIA (no longer used to designate whole class) 



a. Order Taxodonta (* Anadara ) 



b. Order Anisomyaria (* Mytilus , * Chlamys , * Crassostra ) 



c. Order Heterodonta (* Tellina , * Mercenaria ) 



d. Order Schizodonta (n* Anodonta , n* Unio ) 



e. Order Adapedonta ( * Mya , * Ensis ) 



f . Order Anomalodesmata (* Lyonsia , * Pandora) 




Mollusca 131 



III. Subclass SEPTIBRANCHIA ( Cuspidaris ) 



F. Class CEPHALOPODA 



I. Subclass NAUTILOIDEA (TETRABRANCHIA) ( Nautilus ) 



II. Subclass AMMONOIDEA (entirely extinct) 



III. Subclass COLEOIDEA (DIBRANCHIA) 



a. Order Decapoda (* Loligo ) 



b. Order Octopoda (* Octopus ) 



c. Order Vampyromorpha ( Vampyroteuthis ) 



GLOSSARY OF MOLLUSCAN TERMINOLOGY 



Adductor muscle ( s ) : The major muscles (usually two in number) of the bivalve body, 

 inserting on each valve, the contraction of which closes the shell valves. 



Aspidobranch ctenidium: (Gastropods) A "shield" or "feather shaped" gill with 

 leaflets or filaments alternating on either side of the axis (figs. 1, 2) 



Body whorl: The last and largest whorl which terminates at the aperture (Gastro- 

 pods) (fig. 9) 



Byssus : (Bivalves) A permanent (or more usually temporary) attachment of tough or- 

 ganic threads secreted from a gland in the foot. 



Callus: A local area of shell thickening ( a callus may occur near the umbilicus 

 in certain snails) . 



Cardinal teeth: Hinge teeth immediately below the umbo. 



Chondrophore: (Bivalves) An internal shelf near the hinge line, often spoon shaped 

 which bears the "resilium", or internal ligament in certain groups of clams. 



Columella: The thickened axis of the shell about which the whorls are developed 

 (Gastropods) (fig. 9) . 



Concentric sculpture: Centering around the umbo and parallel to the shell margin 

 (Bivalves) . 



Ctenidia (sing. - ctenidium): The characteristic gills, present and structurally 

 homologous in all major groups of the Mollusca. 



Dimyarian: (Bivalves) With two approximately equal adductor muscles (figs. 5, 17). 



Exhalent siphon: (Bivalves) The more dorsal (nearer the hinge line) tubular ex- 

 tension of the mantle edge through which water passes out from the mantle cav- 

 ity, actually from the so-called "suprabranchial chambers" above and within the 

 gill lamellae. 



Foot: The muscular locomotory organ in all molluscs. (In Cephalopoda it is rep- 

 resented by the siphon and possibly the tentacles) . 



Growth lines or rings: (Bivalves) Lines concentric to the umbo on each valve which 

 mark the successive positions of the shell margin during earlier growth. 



Heteromyarian : (Bivalves) With two markedly unequal adductor muscles (figs. 7, 16). 



Hinge teeth: See cardinal teeth, lateral teeth. 



Inhalent siphon: (Bivalves) The more ventral tubular extension of the mantle edge 

 through which food bearing water is drawn into the mantle cavity. 



Inhalent siphon: (Gastropods) The gutter shaped extension of the thickened edge 



of the mantle through which water is drawn into the mantle cavity in some snails. 



Labial palps: Paired ciliated triangular flaps on either side of the mouth in bi- 

 valves . 



Lamellar gills: Enlarged, flattened plate-like gills (ctenidia) which form the feed- 

 ing organs of most bivalves (figs. 7, 8). 



Lateral teeth: Hinge teeth (anterior and posterior to the cardinals). 



Ligament: The elastic horny hinge of the bivalve shell. 



Longitudinal sculpture: Crossing the direction of growth of the whorls, essential- 

 ly axial to the spiral (Coiled gastropods) . 



Lunules: (Bivalves) Heart shaped impressions (fig. 28 ) in the midline of the shell 

 anterior to the umbones (Venerid clams) . 




132 Mollusca 



Monomyarian: (Bivalves) Apparently with only a single large adductor muscle 



uniting the valves (fig. 18). 

 Operculum: A horny or calcareous plate attached dorsally to the posterior end 



of the foot in gastropods, which forms a trap door closing the aperture of 



the shell on withdrawal of the animal. 

 Pallets: Paired flat shelly plates (figs . 25-2 7) secreted at the distal end of the 



elongate siphons in the worm-like wood borers (important in species syste- 



matics) . 

 Palp proboscides: Long ciliated grooved tentacles extending from the labial 



palps (found only in protobranchiate bivalves) (fig. 5). 

 Pectinibranch ctenidium: (Gastropods) A "comb shaped" gill with leaflets or 



filaments extending from one side of the gill axis only, the axis usually 



being fused to the "roof" of the mantle cavity (figs. 3, 4). 

 Radula: A tough chitinous ribbon bearing teeth of various forms, part of the 



buccal apparatus in all molluscs except bivalves, used to obtain food by a 



rasping, "licking" action. 

 Radial sculpture: Radiating from the umbo (Bivalves). 

 Ribs: (Bivalves) Radial sculpture. 

 Ribs: (Gastropods) Longitudinal sculpture. 

 Spiral sculpture: Running from the shell apex to the aperture along the whorls 



(Coiled gastropods) . 

 Siphonal canal, siphonal notch: A tube-like extension or notch-like infolding 



of the lip of the aperture in a gastropod shell through which the inhalent 



siphon is extended in life (figs. 9, 12). 

 Sculpture: See concentric, longitudinal, radial, ribs, spiral. 



Taxodont dentition: A long row of many small uniform teeth in the hinge line (Bi- 

 valves) (fig. 17) . 

 Umbilicus: A pit or chink in the shell next to or within the base of the colum- 

 ella, occurring in gastropods in which the largest whorls are not closely 



wound against each other axially(fig. 10). 

 Umbo (pi. - umbones) : (Bivalves) The apparent "apex" or "beak" of each valve 



around which "radial" growth has proceeded. 



REFERENCES ON MOLLUSCA 



Abbott, R. Tucker, 1954. American Seashells 541 pp., Van Nostrand, Princeton. 



Abbott, R. Tucker, 1961. How to Know the American Marine Shells , 222 pp. Sig- 

 net Key Books, New York. 



Fretter, V., and Graham, A., 1962. British Prosobranch Molluscs , their Function - 

 al Anatomy and Ecology. 755 pp., Ray Society, London. 



Gould, A. A., and W. C. Binney, 1870. Report on the Invertebrata of Massachusetts, 

 2nd Ed., vi + 524 pp., Boston. 



Heath, H. , 1918. Solenogastres from the eastern coast of North America. Mem. Mus. 

 Comp. Zool. Harvard, 4_5: 183-261. 



Johnson, C. W. , 1934. List of marine Mollusca of the Atlantic Coast from Laborador 

 to Texas. Proc. Bost. Soc. Nat. Hist., 40: 1-204. 



Miner, Roy Waldo, 1950. Field Book of Seashore Life , 888 pp., G. P. Putnam's 

 Sons, New York. 



Morris, P. A. , 1947. A F ield Guide to the Shells of our Atlantic and Gulf Coasts 

 236 pp., Houghton Mifflin, Boston. 



Morton, J. E., 1958. Molluscs , 232 pp., Hutchinson, London. 



Pelseneer, P., 1906. Mollusca , 355 pp. in "A Treatise on Zoology " (ed. E. R. 

 Lankester) , A. and C. Black, London. 



Thiele, J., 1931-1935. Handbuch der systematischen Weichtierkunde 4 vols., Gus- 

 tav Fischer, Jena. 



Verrill, A. E., 1882. Report on the cephalopods of the northeastern coast of Amer- 

 ica. Rept. U. S. Fish. Comm, 1879. 



Verrill, A. E. and S. I. Smith, 1873. Report upon the Invertebrata of Vineyard 

 Sound and Adjacent Waters, etc. Rept. U. S. Comm. Fish., 1871-72, pt. I: 

 295-778, PI. 1-38. 




Mollusca 133 



Wilbur, K. M. and Yonge, C. M. , 1964. Physiology of Mollusca , 2 vols., Academic 



Press, New York. 

 Yonge, C. M. , 1947. The pallial organs in the aspidobranch Gastropoda and their 



evolution throughout the Mollusca. Philos. Trans. Roy. Soc. London. B, 232 : 



443-518. 



PART 2. CLASSES AMPHINEURA AND CEPHALAPODA 



Class Amphineura 

 (Chitons and Solenogastres) 



The Polyplacophora (chitons) are more or less flattened animals bearing eight 

 transverse calcareous plates dorsally. They possess a broad creeping foot, a well 

 developed radula, and a variable number of paired ctenidia within the pallial grooves 

 along each side of the foot. Chitons are typically found on hard substrates, such 

 as the larger rocks of exposed shores or on shells in more protected waters. 



The Aplacophora (Solenogastres) are small shell-less forms that might not be 

 recognized as molluscs by the general student. They have not been reported from the 

 Woods Hole region proper, but a few species are known from deeper waters off the New 

 England coast, the most common being Chaetoderma nitidulum Loven, 1845, from 50 me- 

 ters or greater depths off Martha's Vineyard (Heath, 1918). 



In contrast to Solenogastres, chitons are well known to zoologists, and in some 

 regions make up a conspicuous element of the intertidal fauna. The forty genera of 

 Polyplacophora are, however, largely Indo-Pacif ic, and the only member of the group 

 common at Woods Hole is: 



Chaetopleura apiculata (Say). "Common Eastern Chiton". Elongate-ovate; plates with 

 15-20 rows of raised beads in the central area, with fine diagonal sculpture on 

 the margins; tan or brown in color, girdle with reddish-brown to green mottling 

 and covered with scattered short "hairs"; up to 3 cm in length; very common in 

 shallow waters on stones and shells. 



A rarer species which has been reported taken from the gutters of Hadley Harbor is: 



Ischnochiton (= Trachydermon ) ruber (Linnaeus). "Northern Red Chiton". Elongate- 

 ovate; surface of plates smooth except for growth lines, plates externally buff 

 colored with reddish marblings, internally colored bright pink; girdle reddish- 

 brown with minute elongate scales; up to 2.5 cm long; more common in deeper wa- 

 ters north of the Cape. 



Class Cephalopoda 



The only local cephalopods are the squids. The common species, regularly avail- 

 able for experimental work is: 



Loligo pealei Lesueur . "Common Squid" or "Long-finned Squid". Fins more than half 

 the length of the trunk (fig. 30); without eyelids; color translucent gray with 

 obvious chromatophores (mostly red and black) ; up to about 60 cm long; common, 

 Cape Cod southward. 



Another squid occasionally but not regularly taken near Woods Hole is: 



Hex (= Ommastrephes ) illacebrosus (Lesueur) . "Northern", "Summer", or "Short-fin- 

 ned Squid". Fins about V3 length of the trunk (fig. 31) ; with eyelids; color 

 deep blue, ranging to red; up to about 45 cm long; common north of Cape Cod, 

 but taken occasionally in Woods Hole waters in summer. 




134 



PART 3. SHELLED GASTROPODS 

 KEY TO SHELLED GASTROPODS OF THE WOODS HOLE REGION 



1. Single aspidobranch ctenidium (figs. 1 and 2) and other arch- 

 aeogastropod characters, simple conical shell without internal 

 shelf or recurved apex, "tortoise-shell" coloring Acmaea testudinalis 



1. Single pectinibranch ctenidium (figs. 3 and 4), shells of var- 

 ious forms -- coiled, conical, or reduced 3 



1. No ctenidium, mantle cavity as a lung, (and other Pulmonate 

 characters), shiny ovoid shells with no operculum, small 



salt marsh or high littoral snails 2 



2. Squat, egg shaped, widest behind aperture, with very short 

 conical spire, translucent brown, adult is about 15 mm long 



with 5-6 whorls, abundant in salt marshes Melampus bidentatus 



2. Top shaped, widest at aperture, with longer conical spire 

 one-third length of shell, shiny brownish-yellow, adult is 

 about 7.5 mm long with 7-8 whorls and incised suture, less 



common than Me lampus Ovatella .(^ Alexia ) myosotis 



3. Snails with an inhalent pallial siphon and an extensible pro- 

 boscis bearing a narrow radula, mostly active predaceous car- 

 nivores or carrion feeders, turbinate coiled shells with a 

 canal or rudimentary notch next to the columella to accomodate 



the pallial siphon, (Neogastropoda - "Whelks" and "Drills") 31 



3. Snails other than above 4 



4. Shells with only apex as regular turbinate spiral shell, con- 

 tinuing to grow as cylindrical tube which may be irregularly 



worm-like or minute cucumber shaped 7 



4. Cap shaped conical shells with internal shelf 5 



4. Snails other than above 9 



5. Almost circular "limpet" shell with central cup shaped shelf 



internally Crucibulum striatum 



5. Ovate "slipper limpet? shells with posterior shelf 6 



6. Robust "slipper limpet", shell opaque dirty white to tan, 

 often with brownish blotches, shell height about one third 

 of length, concave white shelf occupies about one half of 



aperture, often found in "stacks"; up to 5 cm long .... Crepidula fornicata 

 6. Very flat "slipper limpet", always pearly white, variably 

 flexed white shelf occludes less than one half of aperture, 

 never forms "stacks", often inside shells or on Limulus ; 

 up to 3.3 cm long Crepidula plana 



6. Small, relatively high "slipper limpet", apex obvious and 

 often overhanging posterior margin of shell, oblique brown 

 shelf occluding about one third of aperture; up to 13 mm long 



Crepidula convexa 



7. Attached tubular shell drawn out distally and irregularly 

 twisted to resemble a large serpulid worm tube, relatively 

 large, up to 7.6 cm long; only one species recorded near 



Woods Hole Vermicularia spirata 



7. Minute cucumber shaped molluscs with only a tiny spiral apex 



which may be eroded 8 



8. Glossy opaque white, with about 15 longitudinal ribs, about 



5 mm in length Caecum cooperi 



8. Translucent tan when alive, chalky white when dead, with about 



20-30 circular ribs; about 2 mm in length Caecum pulchellum 




Shelled Gastropoda 135 



9. Snails with no operculum, and reduced shell which is usually 



enclosed within expanded pallial or pedal tissues in life, 



animal usually incapable of withdrawing completely within 



shell 10 



9. Snails with normal operculum and shell, though expanded soft 



parts appear disproportionately large and may conceal shell 



almost completely; but animal is capable of total withdrawal 



into shell 15 



9. Snails with normal operculum and shell, soft parts are readily 



contained within shell 22 



10. Shell totally enclosed within animal 11 



10. Shell may be partially or largely exposed upon retraction of 



animal 12 



( Note : Pteropods and other pelagic gastropods with reduced 

 shells are omitted from this key.) 



11. With internal saucer shaped horny shell, extensible mantle 

 lobes used for swimming, the only species of "sea hare" 



recorded in this area; up to 20 cm long Aplysia willcoxi 



11. With fragile glassy bean shaped turbinate shell within man- 

 tle, living animal characteristically exhibiting four fleshy 



lobes when viewed dor sally; up to 13 mm long Phi line lima 



12. Shell visible externally, with a prominent spire and ornamented 

 with fine spiral rows of dots at level of aperture, shell up 



to 8 mm long Acteon punctostriatus 



12. Shells not usually visible externally when animals are active, 

 spire low or absent, thin glassy shell lacking ornamentation, 



"Bubble-shell" Tectibranchs 13 



13. Shells with a small but elevated spire 14 



13. Shells with spire depressed into pit, that is, body whorl 



completely encloses the rest of the shell 15 



14. Stubby, fragile shell with very low spire, white with yel- 

 lowish-brown staining, columella smooth; up to 3 mm shell 



length Retusa obtusa 



14. Moderately elongate, stronger shell with more obvious spire 

 except when eroded; white with dark rust-brown staining; 

 columella with strong spiral ridge; up to 6 mm shell length 



Retusa canaliculata 



15. Larger globose shell, fragile bluish-white; relatively large 



aperture; up to 13 mm shell length Haminoea solitaria 



15. Smaller elongate cylindrical shell; white with brown perio- 



stracum; relatively narrow aperture; up to 5 mm shell length . . Cylichna alba 

 (Note: Other species of "Bubble-shell" Tectibranchs may occur 

 in this area. ) 



16. Globose shells (shaped like Helicid land snails), lacking any 

 siphonal canal on shell, with brown horny operculum character- 

 istically D-shaped; in living animal enormous expanded foot 

 partially encloses shell as animal plows along on sandy sub- 

 strate; proboscis extrusible but not usually visible, short 

 retractible fleshy inhalent pallial siphon; predaceous carni- 

 vores (Naticid "Moon-shells") 17 



16. Other than above, recheck alternative characters at 3 and at 9. 




136 Shelled Gastropoda 



17. Shell umbilicus clearly open (fig. 10) 18 



17. Shell umbilicus totally or nearly occluded by callus 



(fig. 11) 20 



18. With no obvious callus 19 



18. With obvious ivory white thickened callus which does en- 

 croach on the umbilicus; shell white with yellowish perio- 



stracum; up to 1 cm long Polinices immaculatus 



19. Coarse heavy shell, with no callus; brownish-gray; often 

 with attached algal filaments; up to 12 cm shell diameter; 



common Lunatia heros 



19. Thin clean shell, with inconspicuous white callus on inner lip, 

 light brown or white with th^ee characteristic rows of squar- 

 ish dark brown spots on last whorl; up to 13 mm shell diame- 

 ter; less common Lunatia triseriata 



20. Shell considerably wider than high with flat spire; clean 

 bluish-gray, with obvious purple (or more rarely brown or 

 pink) callus almost completely occluding umbilicus; up to 

 7.5 cm diameter; often abundant inter tidally and in shallow 



W ater Polinices duplicatus 



20. Shells slightly higher than wide with obvious spire; white 

 with pale brown periostracum; white callus closing or nearly 

 closing umbilicus; opercula more calcified than other Nati- 



cids above; smaller species, less co..onon and usually subtidal 21 



21. Larger globose shell; polished white flat callus always com- 

 pletely sealing over umbilicus; up to 3.8 cm shell height . . . Natica clausa 



21. Smaller ovate shell; white callus usually leaving open chink 

 at umbilicus; shell usually with faint bands of light brown; 



up to 8 mm shell height Natica pusilla 



22. Elongate turret shells (fig. 15); usually more' than 5 obvious 



whorls; height more than 1.5 times diameter 23 



22. Globose shells (fig. 14); height less than 1.5 times diameter 29 



23. Shells coiled dextrally 24 



23. Shell coiled sinistrally; 10-12 whorls, dark brown with three 



spiral rows of prominent beads; up to 6 mm long Triphora niqrocincta 



24. About 11 markedly globose whorls, expanding rapidly to give a 

 conical shell, each whorl bearing about 16 strong longitudinal 

 ribs; circular aperture with thickened lip; up to 2.5 cm long; 



the only true "Wentletrap" recorded in this area Epitonium rupicola 



24. Whorls not markedly globose; whole shell awl or spindle shaped; 



mostly under 15 mm shell length 25 



25. Without obvious shell sculpture; about 5 somewhat globose 

 whorls separated by a clear suture; aperture ovate-circular; 



up to 5 mm in length 26 



25. With obvious shell sculpture of various forms; more than 6 

 somewhat flatter whorls; aperture flattened or rectangular; 



up to 18 mm long 27 



26. Minute; smooth yellow-brown shells with no markings apart 

 from growth lines; up to 5 mm long (several species may occur 



in this area, including some in brackish waters) Hydrobia spp. 



26. Minute; light yellow to brown shell with microscopic spiral 

 sculpture of incised lines; also tiny riblets near suture; 

 up to 2.5 mm long Cingula aculeus 




Shelled Gastropoda 137 



27. Shell with rounded aperture with barely perceptible siphonal 

 notch; 6-8 whorls when adult; about 5 nun long; common species 

 which can be abundant intertidally Bittium alternatum 



27. Shells with obvious siphonal notch at anterior of aperture; 

 10-15 whorls when adult; lengths 3 mm to 15 mm; rarer species, 



usually subtidal 28 



28. Minute species; glossy brown; later whorls bearing 2-3 rows 



of glassy beads; 10 whorls when adult; about 3 mm long. . Cerithiopsis greeni 

 28. Larger species; more elongate; chocolate brown; flattish whorls 

 each bearing 3 rows of distinct raised beads which are lighter 

 in color; 14-15 whorls when adult; about 15 mm long . . Cerithiopsis subulata 



28. Larger species; more elongate; flattish whorls each bearing 



3 strong continuous squarish spiral cords; 10-12 whorls when 



adult; about 13 mm long (fig. 15) Seila adamsi 



29. Medium sized (up to 3 cm); coarser shells, lacking umbilicus 



or apertural groove; adults rarely translucent 30 



29. Very small, fragile, smooth shell with groove in inner lip 

 extending into chink-like umbilicus; color variable from pink 



to brown with purple or dark brown markings ; up to 8 mm long . Lacuna vincta 

 ( Note : Minute specimens suspected of being spat (juveniles) 

 of Littorina spp. or of Lacuna are best identified by comparing 

 them closely with the apical parts of the shells in known spe- 

 cimens of adults of all four species.) 



30. Spire flattened; shell very smooth and shiny; color variable 

 but commonly uniform clear yellow-orange; often banded; up to 



1 cm across; in lower littoral associated with fucoid seaweeds 



Littorina obtusata 



30. Moderate spire, expanding more rapidly after first tiny whorls 



with raised spiral threads when young; usually black when young; 

 variable but dull as adult; with planktonic larvae (thus apical 

 shell is small and if not eroded in adult is very sharply point- 

 ed) ; up to 3 cm across; thecommonest and most abundant "peri- 

 winkle" at all tidal levels Littorina littorea 



30. Obvious but variable spire; shell rough with irregular raised 

 lines; color variable but commonly greenish-yellow; viviparous 

 (thus apical shell relatively large) ; up to 13 mm long; higher 



littoral (fig. 14) Littorina saxatilis 



31. Snails with protrusible proboscis and inhalent siphon, but with 

 unsculptured globose shells lacking any siphonal canal or notch 



(almost certainly naticid "moon-shells") see 16 



31. Snails with protrusible proboscis and inhalent siphon, but with 

 turreted shells usually with sculpture and with a siphonal canal 



or notch near the columella 32 



32. Minute turreted snails less than 5 mm shell length as adult 33 



32. Snails usually larger than 12 mm s>>ell length when adult (most 



species much larger) 34 



33. Smooth glossy shell; gray or yellow-brown with darkened marbl- 

 ing; narrow oval aperture; with siphonal notch; up to 5 mm 

 shell length, common free living species on eel grass and 



elsewhere in littoral Mitrella lunata 



33. White glossy shells with considerable ornamentation, usually 

 no obvious siphonal notch; up to 5 mm shell length; usually 



ectoparasites (often on specific invertebrates) PYRAMIDELLIDACEA 



(See note overpage) 




138 Shelled Gastropoda 



Two species have been positively identified in this region: 

 Odostomia ( Menestho ) bisuturalis - host unknown 

 Odostomia ( Chrysallida ) seminuda - parasitic on Crepidula fornicata 



34. Siphonal canal short, forming conspicuous notch in apertural 



lip (fig. 13) 35 



34. Siphonal canal elongate, forming an obvious extension of the 



apertural lip (fig. 12) 39 



35. Larger "whelk"; solid chalky-gray shell, with rough yellowish 

 periostracum; low but obvious sculpture consisting of about 5 

 spiral cords crossed by about 12 longitudinal ribs in each 

 whorl; flesh of living animal startling white with black blot- 

 ches; up to 10 cm shell length; common offshore, rarely in 



littoral Buccinum undatum 



35. Smaller snails with conspicuous siphonal notch; less than 



2.5 cm long 36 



36. Stout "dirty" shell often eroded, dark brown or black with 

 neither suture nor sculpture obvious; often with ad- 

 herent debris or organisms; up to 2.5 cm long; often abundant 



on mud flats intertidally Nassarius obsoletus 



36. Clean shells with obvious sculpture 37 



37. Essentially conical shell with 8-9 whorls in adult, bearing 

 about 5 spiral rows of ranked beads giving "waffle -like" pat- 

 tern; off- white in color; up to 2 cm long(fig. 13); usually 



living on sand Nassarius trivittatus 



37. Sguat solid pear shaped shell with 4-5 whorls in adult, each 

 bearing about 12 pronounced longitudinal folds; off-white in 

 color; up to 13 mm long; less common in this area, living in 

 muddy sand Nassarius vibex 



37. Slimmer spindle shaped shells, with 6-7 whorls in adult, with 



less complex sculpture; up to 18 mm long 38 



38. With about 12 low rounded longitudinal folds on each whorl; 



usually dark grayish-brown; up to 13 mm long; lower littoral . Anachis avara 



38. With about 24 narrow longitudinal folds on each whorl crossed 

 by incised spiral lines; usually drab yellow in color; up to 



18 mm long; lower littoral and shallow water Anachis translirata 



( Note ; Specific identification of minute specimens suspected 

 of being spat (juveniles) of Nassarius spp. or Anachis spp. 

 is aided by comparing them with the apical parts of the shell 

 in known - and not eroded - specimens of all five species) . 



39. Smaller "drills" etc. under 4 cm shell length as adults (most- 

 ly about 2.5 cm long) ; common in littoral 40 



39. Larger "whelks" all over 6 cm length as adults (may be up to 



23 cm long) ; mostly sublittoral and offshore 43 



40. Relatively thin shelled with 6-8 globose whorls in adult; gray 

 with greenish periostracum; no obvious shell sculpture; siphon- 

 al canal of moderate length bent back from aperture; up to 2.5 



cm long Colus pygmaea 



40. Stout shelled "drills" with obvious shell sculpture 41 



41. With 5 angular whorls and deep suture, giving sharp "shoulders" 

 to spire, and relatively long siphonal canal which is almost 



closed over; up to 2.5 cm long (fig. 12) Eupleura caudata 



41. With rounded but ornamented whorls, siphonal canal relatively 



short and open 42 




Shelled Gastropoda 139 



42. Very thick polished white shell with thickened lip (rarer color 

 variants - clear yellow, orange -brownish or striped) ; about 5 

 whorls in adult with rounded spiral ridges giving corrugated ap- 

 pearance; up to 3.5 cm long; less common, on exposed rocky shores 

 Thais ( = Nucella) lapillus 



42. Thick duller grayish, yellowish, or brown shell; about 6 whorls 

 in adult, each with 9 to 12 strong longitudinal ribs crossed 

 by spiral grooves giving knobby appearance; up to 2.5 cm long; 



the commonest local "drill," on all hard substrates .... Urosalpinx cinerea 

 ( Note : Minute specimens suspected of being spat (juveniles) of 

 Eupleura , Thais , or Urosalpinx can best be separated by the rela- 

 tive lengths of their siphonal canals. Comparison with apical 

 parts of the shells of known adults is less useful here) . 



43. Combined length of aperture and siphonal canal about one half 



shell length 44 



43. Combined length of aperture and siphonal canal markedly greater 



than one half shell length 46 



44. Heavy grayish shell with 6-7 whorls as adult, bearing up to 

 10 conspicuous reddish-brown spiral ridges; up to 10 cm long 

 Neptunea decemcostata 



44. Lighter shells with simple globose whorls 45 



45. Shells more elongate, sharper spired; 6-7 whorls in adult; 

 siphonal canal straight; thin semi -glossy periostracum; up to 



13 cm long Colus stimpsoni 



45. Shells less elongate, blunter spire; 5-6 whorls in adult; siphon- 

 al canal usually twisted away from aperture; hairy periostracum; 



up to 6.5 cm shell length Colus pubescens 



46. Suture channeled giving broad flat "shoulders" to whorls; up 



to 20 cm long Busycon canaliculatum 



46. Suture not deeply incised; single row of knobby tubercles on 



inclined "shoulders" of whorls; up to 23 cm long Busycon carica 



ANNOTATED LIST OF SHELLED GASTROPODS 

 OF THE WOODS HOLE REGION 



Acmaea testudinalis (Muller) . "Tortoise-shell limpet". On hard substrata only, in 

 the lower littoral and immediate sublittoral of exposed shores, the only true 

 limpet in this area, and the single local gastropod species which retains the 

 primitive feather shaped ctenidium of the rchaeogastropods . 



Acteon punctostriatus (C. B. Adams) . Near low water mark and offshore, preferred 

 substrata not known. 



Anachis avara (Say). Lower littoral, common in some places. Both species of Ana - 

 chis are predaceous carnivores and are more abundant in the south. 



Anachis translirata (Ravenel) . Lower littoral, but more commonly dredged in shal- 

 low water . 



Aplysia willcoxi Heilprin. "Sea Hare". Probably rare, this is the only large 



tectibranch whih has been recorded in this area. The group is better repre- 

 sented on more southern Atlantic coasts. 



Bittium alternatum (Say) . Common and often extremely abundant on tidal flats and 

 in shallow water offshore, on a variety of substrata but especially organic 

 muds arid eelgrass. 



Buccinum undatum L. "White helk" or "Buckie". Not uncommon offshore in colder 

 waters, rarely in littoral, on a variety of substrata. 



(Note: *- Busycotypus canaliculars ; **- Busycon aruanum ; Hollister, S. C, 1958. 

 Paleont. Amer. 4: 59-125) 




140 Shelled Gastropoda 



Busycon canaliculatum (L.) . "Channeled Whelk". Dredged in shallow water on sandy 

 bottoms, more common than B. carica in this area. 



Busycon carica (Gmelin) . "Knobbed Whelk". Dredged in shallow water on sandy bot- 

 toms , not uncommon . 



Caecum cooperi S. Smith, and 



Caecum pulchellum Stimpson. Minute cucumber shaped gastropods found interstitial- 

 ly in sand or in dead sponges, detailed ecology unknown, inshore in warmer 

 waters. 



Cerithiopsis qreeni (C. B. Adams), and 



Cerithiopsis subulata (Montagu) . Less common in Cape area than in warmer waters 

 to the south, in shallow water, detailed ecology unknown. 



Cingula aculeus Gould. In shallow water; other species of the Rissoacea may be 

 discovered in this area. 



Colus pubescens (Verrill) and 



Colus pvgmaea (Gould) and 



Colus stimpsoni (Morch) . Dredged subtidally and offshore. 



Crepidula convexa Say. Littoral and offshore, the least common of the three local 

 "slipper-limpets", occasionally on eelgrass and more commonly on a variety 

 of shells. 



Crepidula fornicata (L.). "Common Slipper-limpet". Littoral and offshore, the com- 

 monest and largest local "slipper-limpet", often found in stacks, showing char- 

 acteristic sex change with size and position. 



Crepidula plana Say. Littoral and offshore, never forming stacks, variably flexed 

 to fit their substratum which may be the inside surface of a larger molluscan 

 shell, or the exoskeleton of Limulus . 



Crucibulum striatum (Say) . Dredged in shallow water, with an enlarged ctenidium 

 like the closely related Crepidula spp. , probably also a filter feeder. 



Cylichna alba (Brown) . Low water mark and shallow water, the detailed ecology of 

 this and other species of "Bubble-shell tectibranchs" is unknown. 



Epitonium rupicola Kurtz. "Brown-banded Wentletrap" . Near low water mark and fur- 

 ther offshore, not uncommon, this is the only local species of a genus more 

 common to the south. 



Eupleura caudata (Say). "Thick-lipped Drill". Hard substrata, lower littoral and 

 subtidal, probably more common in warmer waters. This is the least common of 

 the three local species of "drills" which are predaceous carnivores with radu- 

 la and proboscis modified for boring and an accessory boring organ in the foot. 



Haminoea solitaria (Say). Low water mark and shallow water, probably the commonest 

 "Bubble-shell tectibranch" in this area, may occur mainly in muddier inlets 

 with eelgrass, detailed ecology and reproductive behavior unknown. 



Hydrobia spp. Several species of this difficult but widespread genus may occur in 

 this area, some in brackish waters. 



Lacuna vincta (Montagu). "Chink-shell". Lower littoral and shallow water, often 

 abundant, a cold water species. 



Littorina littorea (L. ) . "Common Periwinkle". Typically at midlevel littoral, in . 

 this area the largest, commonest, and most abundant "periwinkle" at all tide 

 levels, with planktonic larvae and less capacity to resist desiccation and to 

 respire in air than L. saxatilis . 



Littorina obtusata (L.). "Smooth Periwinkle". At lower levels at the littoral, us- 

 ually associated with fucoid seaweeds including Ascophyllum . This periwinkle 

 is referred to in modern European physiological literature as L. littoralis 

 (L.) (not to be confused with the distinct species L. littorea which also occurs 

 in Europe), and in early U. S. conchological literature as L. palliata (Say). 



Littorina saxatilis (Olivi) . "Rough Periwinkle". Typically high level littoral, 

 of variable shell form and color, in this periwinkle females have a brood 

 pouch and give birth to shelled young resembling miniature adults, the gill 

 is reduced and the mantle cavity more lung-like, and all stages have a great- 

 er capacity to resist dessication than the other littorinids. L. rudis (Maton) 

 is simply a synonym of L. saxatilis . 



Lunatia heros (Say). "Moon-shell". Not uncommon on sand intertidally but more abun- 

 dant subtidally, this is the largest of the six local species of predaceous 




Shelled Gastropoda 141 



carnivores belonging to the Naticidae. It is less resistant than Polinices du - 

 plicata to higher temperatures and lower salinities. 



Lunatia triseriata (Say). Less common and usually subtidal, this small naticid 

 occurs, however, intertidally in Lagoon Pond, Martha's Vineyard, and elsewhere 

 in this area. 



Melampus bidentatus (Say) (- M. lineatus (Say)). Usually living around the high wa- 

 ter mark of spring tides, and abundant in the high levels of Cape Cod salt mar- 

 shes, Melampus is a pulmonate belonging to the family Ellobiidae and thus prob- 

 ably related to the gastropod stock which gave rise to most land snails and to 

 the freshwater pulmonates like Lymnaea . 



Mitrella lunata (Say) . Near low water mark and in shallow water on a variety of 

 substrata, often extremely abundant, this minute snail is closely related to 

 Anachis spp. and is a predaceous carnivore using its extensible rasping and 

 sucking proboscis to prey on various small sessile invertebrates such as Bot - 

 ryllus . 



Nassarius obsoletus (Say). "Common Mud Snail". In shallow water subtidally, in- 

 tertidally on mud flats, and even in estuarine conditions, this is often an ex- 

 tremely abundant species congregating in packed masses which can temporarily 

 cover acres. Embryologists have tended to refer to this snail as Ilyanassa 

 obsoleta (using its subgeneric name) , and certain older books place it in the 

 genus Nassa . 



Nassarius trivittatus (Say). Intertidally and in shallow water, usually on clean 

 sand in sheltered localities, this species is common but less abundant than N. 

 obsoletus . 



Nassarius vibex (Say) . Occurs on sand and mud flats intertidally, less common in 

 this area than the other two Nassarius spp. 



Natica clausa Broderip and Sowerby. Dredged subtidally and offshore in the Cape 

 Cod area, interti^al on some more northern shores. 



Natica pusilla Say. Dredged subtidally and offshore. 



Neptunea decemcostata (Say) . Dredged offshore, shells occasionally washed up. 



Odostomia (Menestho ) bisuturalis (Say) . Identified here, see below. 



Odostomia ( Chrysallida ) seminuda (Say) . Identified here, and found by the writers 

 to live as an ectoparasite on Crepidula fornicata . 



( Note : Other species of the PYRAMIDELLIDACEA will probably be found in this 

 area: they are usually ectoparasites and often highly specific as regards their 

 host invertebrates.) 



Ovate 11a (= Alexia ) myosotis (Draparnaud) . Living around the high water mark of 



spring tides (for example, in crevices of wharfs and docks, and under the "trash 

 line" of high salt marshes) , this minute pulmonate snail is related to Melam - 

 pus . 



Phi line lima Brown. Not common in this area, dredged in colder waters. 



Polinices duplicatus (Say). "Shark Eye" or 'Moon-shell" . Most abundant intertidal- 

 ly on sand, this is the commonest of the local species of the Naticidae. Unlike 

 Lunatia heros , it survives lowered salinity and high temperatures, and is thus 

 able to colonize estuarine and high littoral habitats. All naticid snails are 

 predaceous carnivores using the radula in the extensible proboscis to drill 

 through the shells of other molluscs. 



Polinices immaculatus (Totten) . Less common naticid, subtidal in this area, occur- 

 ing more frequently to the south. 



Pteropods (and other pelagic gastropods with reduced shells) are omitted from this 

 list. 



Retusa canaliculata (Say) . Sand and mud flats intertidally and in shallow water, 

 this minute species plows along the surface like a tiny naticid and is prob- 

 ably the commonest shelled tectibranch in this area. 



Retusa obtusa (Montagu) . Not uncommon in habitats similar to those of R. canali - 

 culata . 



Seila adamsi (H. C. Lea). Not uncommon around low water mark and subtidally; like 

 the related Cerithiopsis spp., this small "turret-shell" is less common in the 

 Cape area than in warmer water to the south. 




142 



Plate 18 



MOLLUSCA (1) 



Figures 1-8: Mantle cavity and ctenidium in represent- 

 ative molluscs. Figures 1-9 by Stephen C. Brown; 10-15 

 by Ruth L. von Arx. 



Fig. 1. The aspidobrancb ctenidium as in the limpet, Acmaea testud - 

 inalis . 



2. Face view of ctenidial leaflets in Acmaea . 



3. The pectinibranch ctenidium as in Littorina littorea . 



4. Face view of ctenidial leaflet in Littorina . 



5. The protobranch ctenidium, associated with large labial palps 

 and palp proboscides, as in Nucula . 



6. Face view of ctenidial leaflets in Nucula . 



7. The true lamellibranch ctenidium, as in Mytilus . 



8. Face view of ctenidial filaments in Mytilus . 



9. Sectional view of the shell of BUCCJ nl1TTI undafcmi , showing whorls 

 surrounding central columella from apical whorl at top to largest 

 "body" whorl with prominent siphonal notch. 



10. The naticid "Moon-shell", Lunatia heros , showing the shell umbi- 

 licus clearly open. 



11. The naticid "Moon-shell", Polinices duplicatus , showing the obvious 

 pigmented callus nearly occluding the umbilicus. 



12. Eupleura caudata, showing the elongate siphonal canal forming an 

 obvious extension of the apertural lip. 



13. Nassarius trivittatus , showing the short siphonal canal forming a 

 prominent notch in the apertural lip. 



14. Littorina saxatilis , showing a typical "globose" shell with height 

 less than 1.5 times diameter. 



15. Seila adamsi . showing a typical elongate "turret-shell" with height 

 more than 1.5 times diameter. 




• Plate 18 



15 




144 



Plate 19 



MOLLUSCA (2) 



Figures 16-20 and 25-29 by Mrs. R. von Arx; 

 21-24 by W. Russell Hunter; 30-31 by Bruce 

 Shearer . 



Fig. 16. Modiolus demissus , shell valve showing the heteromyarian 



condition of the adductor muscles, and a long external ligament. 



17. Anadara transversa , shell valve showing dimyarian condition of 

 the adductor muscles, and taxodont dentition in the hinge line. 



18. Aequipecten irradians , shell valve showing monomyarian condition, 

 of adductor muscle, and internal triangular ligament or "resiliuin" 



19. Thyasira gouldi , dorsal view of shell valves with characteristic 

 prominent radial folds running posteriorly from anterior umbones. 



20. Macoma tenta . dorsal view of shell valves with characteristic 

 posterior twist. 



21-24 (following). Siphonal types, and natural posture in substrate, 

 of various bivalves. 



21. My a arenaria , a sedentary deep burrowing bivalve with massive fused 

 siphons . 



22. Tellina aqilis , a deposit feeding bivalve with separate extensible 

 siphons . 



23. Mercenaria mercenaria , an active shallow burrowing bivalve with 

 short fringed siphons and a relatively massive foot. 



24. Ensis directus , a typical razor clam with short fringed siphons 

 and massive powerful foot emerging terminally like a "mushroom" 

 anchor . 



25. Bankia gouldi , a typical "Shipworm" bivalve; the elongate body 

 bears reduced valves anteriorly and calcareous pallets at the si- 

 phonal openings. 



26. Bankia gouldi , plume like compound pallet. 



27. Teredo navalis . simple paddle shaped pallet. 



28. Mercenaria mercenaria . anterior view of shell showing obvious 

 deeply incised lunules below umbones. 



29. Pitar morrhuana . anterior view of shell showing large but indis- 

 tinct lunules below umbones. 



30. Loligo pealei, showing characteristic lateral fins more than half 

 the length of the trunk and large eyes without eyelids. 



31. I lex illa c ebrosus , showing characteristic short lateral fins and 

 eyes with eyelids. 




Plate 19 



29 




146 



Thais (= Nucella ) lapillu s (L.). "Dogwinkle". Hard substrata, lower littoral and sub- 

 tidal, common only in the Cape area on certain beaches exposed to wave action. 

 This is another carnivorous "drill", feeding on barnacles as well as molluscs. 



Triphora nigrocincta (C. B. Adams). Around low water mark on seaweeds, not uncom- 

 mon, this is the only local gastropod species with a sinistrally coiled shell. 



Urosalpinx cinere a (Say). "Oyster-drill". Hard substrata, lower littoral and sub- 

 tidal, often abundant, this is the commonest of the three local species of drills 

 but, besides using radula, proboscis, and pedal accessory boring organ to bore 

 through the shells of other molluscs, this predaceous carnivore also feeds ex- 

 tensively on barnacles, using muscular action by the proboscis to force apart 

 the plates of the barnacle test without actual boring. 



Vermicularia spirata (Philippi) . Probably living in shallow water, detailed ecolo- 

 gy unknown. "Worm-shells" of this type are rare in this area. Tucker Abbott 

 (1954) records this species only for "Southeast Florida and the West Indies", 

 but shells have been found in the Cape Cod area on several occasions and liv- 

 ing specimens found once in 1961 and twice in 1963. 



PART 4. CLASS BIVALVIA 



KEY TO BIVALVED MOLLUSCS OF THE WOODS HOLE REGION 



1. Without lamellar gills, ctenidia resembling those of aspido- 



branch gastropods (figs. 5 and 6) Order Protobranchia 2 



1. With lamellar gills clearly modified for filter feeding (figs. 



7 and 8) 4 



2. Protobranchiates feeding by palp proboscides, without lamellar 



gills, with taxodont dentition (fig. 5) 3 



2. Modified protobranchiate with reduced palps, hinge of elongate 

 shell without dentition, with lustrous yellow-brown periostra- 



cum, radially marked and extending beyond shell margins Solemya velum 



3. Obliquely ovate globose shell, usually greenish-gray Nucula proxima 



3. Asymmetric elongate shell, narrowing posteriorly, usually green- 

 ish-brown Yoldia lima tula 



4. With lamellar gills, but retaining taxodont dentition (fig. 17) 5 



4. With lamellar gills, with other than taxodont dentition 6 



5. Rhomboidal shell (up to 3.8 cm); 30-50 ribs; gray-brown perio- 

 stracum usually worn, longer stouter ligament clearly distinct, 



left valve overlapping right valve Anadara transversa 



5. Ovate shell (up to 5.9 cm); 26-35 ribs; hairy black-brown perio- 



stracum persistant; narrow ligament less distinct Anadara ovalis 



6. Monomyarian condition of adductor muscle (fig. 18) 7 



6. Markedly heteromyarian condition of adductor muscles (fig. 16) 12 



6. Dimyarian condition (or nearly so) of adductor muscles (fig. 



17) 19 



7. Swimming monomyarian bivalves (Scallops) 10 



7. Attached monomyarian bivalves (Oysters and Jingle shells) 8 



8. Lower bivalve with hole through which passes calcified byssus 9 



8. No such hole, lower valve directly cemented to hard substrata 



(Eastern oyster"/ Crassostrea virginica 



9. Upper valve translucent and smooth, up to 5.1 cm Anomia simplex 



9. Upper valve drably opaque and rough with small prickles . . . Anomia acu l eata 




Bivalvia 147 



10. Both valves with strong radial sculpture 11 



10. Rough, dirty-white, pink or yellowish valves without strong 



radial sculpture; up to 20 cm diameter Placopecten magellanicus 



11. Approximately equal 'Wings" (or 'ears") at hinge; 17-20 regu- 

 lar ribs forming strong radial corrugations; up to 7.6 cm 



diameter (fig. 18) Aeguipecten irradians 



11. Markedly unequal "wings", about 50 irregular cord-like ribs; 



up to 10.2 cm diameter Chi amy s islandica 



12. "Shipworms" boring in timber, worm-like bodies (fig. 25) 



bearing reduced valves anteriorly and pallets posteriorly 18 



12. Wedge shaped shells, markedly narrow anteriorly with well 

 developed, usually dark periostracum, byssal attachment, 

 lacking siphons (Mussels) 13 



12. Markedly elongate shells, active burrowers in sand, with well 



developed foot and short or medium length separate siphons 16 



13. Umbo near but not at anterior tip of each valve (fig. 16) 14 



13. Umbo at anterior tip of each valve, no shell sculpture, blue- 

 black with shiny periostracum; common in littoral, often abun- 

 dant Mytilus edulis 



14. With radial shell sculpture and thin periostracum 15 



14. Without radial shell sculpture, with thick hairy periostra- 

 cum; usually dark brown; up to 15 cm, less common species; 



lower littoral and subtidally Modiolus modiolus 



15. Hinge without teeth; strong radial ribs which bifurcate usu- 

 ally covering entire shell; up to 10 cm long; salt marshes 



and upper littoral, often abundant (fig. 16) Modiolus demissus 



15. Hinge finely dentate, ribs on anterior and posterior thirds 

 of shell only; up to 6.4 cm long; rarer species; subtidal in 



this area Musculus (- Modiolaria ) niger 



16. Umbo nearly central, siphons separate and moderately long; 



powerful foot emerging ventrally 17 



16. Umbo at anterior end of dorsal margin; very elongate shell 

 curving dorsally; short siphons; powerful foot emerging 

 terminally; "razor" shape; up to 25 cm long (fig. 24) Ensis directus 



16. Umbo towards anterior end; elongate ovate shell; short siphons; 

 with strong internal rib running ventrally from umbo; up to 



6.4 cm long Siliqua costata 



17. Dull greenish-yellow periostracum often eroded around umbones ; 



thick opaque shell gaping at ends; up to 10 cm long Tagelus plebeius 



17. Shiny thin periostracum with radial markings; often pale pur- 

 ple, fragile shell; up to 3.8 cm long Tagelus divisus 



18. Pallets as simple paddle shaped blades (fig. 27) Teredo navalis 



18. Pallets each plume-like of many cones (fig. 26) 

 probably Bank i a gouldi (but check other Bankia spp.) 



19. Deep burrowing or boring bivalves with massive fused siphons 



(fig. 21) 20 



19. Deposit feeding bivalves with separate extensible siphons 



(fig. 22) 23 



19. Otherwise, usually with short fringed siphons (fig. 23) 29 




148 Bivalvia 



20. Stout rasping spines externally on anterior of valves, re- 

 duced periostracum, borers in peat, clay, or stone 21 



20. Thin valves with irregular growth rings but no sculpture; 

 thick periostracum on ventral margin and siphons; up to 15 



cm shell length; burrowing in muddy sand Mya arenaria 



21. Elongate shell, umbones nearer anterior, entire shell sculp- 

 tured with spines; large siphons 22 



21. Squat shell; up to 5 cm length; umbones nearer midline; 

 sculpture limited to anterior; shell gaping widely at both 



ends; disproportionately large siphons Zirfaea crispata 



22. Shell tapering posteriorly, with only slight gape; up to 



21 cm long Cyrtopleura ( =Barnea) costata 



22. Shell truncate posteriorly, gaping widely at both ends; up 



to 5 cm in length Cyrtopleura ( =Barnea) truncata 



23. Ligament internal, triangular 24 



23. Ligament external 25 



24. Symmetrical ovate shell; pearly white; up to 3.8 cm length 

 Periploma ( z Cochlodesma ) leanum 



24. Asymmetrical, shell tapering posteriorly, chalky white; up 



to 2 cm in length Cumingia tellinoide s 



25. Shells markedly elongate 28 



25. Shells sub-circular or ovate 26 



26. Duller white shells, often with slight posterior twist (fig. 



20) , and pallial sinus more extensive in right valve 27 



26. Glossy white opalescent shell with pallial sinuses similar 



in both valves; up to 13 mm in length Tellina agilis 



27. Variable dull white shell, never elongate; up to 3.8 cm 



length Macoma balthica 



27. White, fragile shell moderately elongate-ovate; with slight 



but obvious posterior twist; up to 2 cm length Macoma tenta 



28. Shell sculptured with rasping spines; reduced periostracum; 

 dull white borer in peat or clay; shell proportions somewhat 



variable Petricola pholadif ormis 



28. Shells not sculptured; well -developed periostracum 17 



29. Subg lobular shells 30 



29. Elongate ovate shell, tapering and becoming compressed post- 

 eriorly; periostracum with fine radial lines, often with ad- 

 herent sand grains; up to 2 cm shell length Lyonsia hyalina 



29. Entire shell compressed; with umbones near anterior corner of 

 nearly rectangular valves; somewhat saddle shaped; up to 3.4 



cm across Pandora gouldiana 



30. Shells with concentric sculpture 31 



30. Shell with strong radial sculpture Cardita borealis 



30. Shells with no sculpture apart from irregular growth rings 34 



31. Ligament external 32 



31. Ligament internal, triangular; up to 10 mm across 



Cras s inella (=Gouldia) mactracea 




Bivalvia 149 



32. With lunules anterior to umbones (fig. 28) 



young Mercenaria (' Venus ) mercenaria 



32. Without such lunules 33 



33. Ovate with strong concentric sculpture; up to 5 cm across 



Astarte borealis 



33. Trigonal with low concentric sculpture; up to 2.5 cm across 



Astarte castanea 



34. Ligament external 39 



34. Ligament internal, triangular 36 



34. Ligament in groove but partly external; characteristic small 

 shells with 2 prominent radial folds (fig. 19) running post- 

 eriorly from umbones which are anterior 35 



35. Oblong valves, translucent-white; up to 13 mm long . . . Thyasira trisinuata 



35. Rounded valves, yellowish periostracum; up to 6.4 mm long . . Thyasira qouldi 



36. Mantle almost completely fused; short siphons surrounded by 

 common circlet of tentacles; posterior of right valve slight- 

 ly overlapping left; up to 6.4 mm long Corbula contracta 



36. Ventral margins of mantle apparently fused, but without tis- 

 sue union; fourth pallial opening ventral to inhalent siphon 



with associated groove for waste disposal (mactrid clams) 37 



37. Mactrid clams less than 18 mm shell length 38 



37. Mactrid clam more than 18 mm shell length; strong, ovate; 

 smooth shell covered by shiny thin yellowish-brown perio- 

 stracum; spoon shaped chondrophore in left valve; up to 



18 cm shell length Spisula solidissima 



38. Rather globose shell with proportionately small chondrophore; 

 no denticles on hinge teeth; each valve with a single low 



radial rib near posterior Mulinia lateralis 



38. Slimmer shells, with disproportionately large chondrophore; 

 tiny saw-tooth denticles on anterior and lateral hinge teeth 

 young of Spisula solidissima 



39. Shells under 5 mm shell length 40 



39. Shells over 5 mm shell length 42 



40. Look out for spat of larger bivalves ' 



a) If heteromyaria n with wedge shaped shell, specimen is likely to 



be a juvenile mussel. Go back to 13 



b) If moderately elongate with fused siphons, specimen is like- 

 ly to be a juvenile of My a arenaria ; see 20 



c) If round or ovate with separate extensible siphons, specimen 



is likely to be a juvenile deposit feeder like a tellinid clam. 



Go back to 2 3 



d) If bearing prominent concentric sculpture and lunules anterior 

 to umbones, specimen is likely to be juvenile of Mercenaria ; 



see 32 and 43 



40. Shells under 5 mm shell length, seemingly adult and not in above 



categories 41 



41. Minute globose shiny shell, with umbones near mid-line and 



fine concentric lines; white, often with blue or purple patches 



(very common and often abundant) Gemma gemma 



41. Minute ovate shell with posterior umbones and shiny nut-brown 

 periostracum (rare and probably commensal) 



Mysella (= Rochef ortia ) planulata 



(See note overpage) 




2^50 Bivalvia 



(But other minute leptonacean clams may also belong here, check 

 Aligena elevata and Montacuta = pp. ) 



42. Globular smooth "cockle" with variable brown patterning on 



white exterior of shell; interior always translucent yellow; 

 actively moving through sandy substrates by large very exten- 

 sible foot; up to 2.5 mm diameter Laevicardium mortoni 



42. Slimmer but still globose clams without above shell coloring; 



may be up to 15 cm in diameter 43 



43. Shell valves with marked, deeply incised lunules anterior to 

 umbones (fig. 28) ; shell may retain traces of juvenile concen- 

 tric sculpture, internal free margin of shells crenulated and 

 usually purple; up to 15 cm diameter, "Quahog" 

 Mercenaria (= Venus ) mercenaria 



43. Shell valves without such lunules and with shiny dark brown or 

 black periostracum showing many fine incised growth lines; no 

 crenulation on valve margin; up to 13 cm diameter 

 Arctica ( - Cyprina ) islandica 



43. Shell valves with large but shallow lunules; dull chalky white; 

 without crenulation on ventral margin of valves; up to 5 cm dia- 

 meter (fig. 29) Pitar morrhuana 



ANNOTATED LIST OF BIVALVES OF THE WOODS HOLE REGION 



Aequipecten irradians (Lamarck). "Bay Scallop". The commonest scallop of the area, 

 in most larger harbors and lagoons on flats exposed at lowest tides, also sub- 

 tidal in shallow water. 



Anadara ovalis (Bruguiere) . "Blood Ark" . Formerly known as Area campechiensis 

 Gmelin, fairly common low water mark to subtidal. 



Anadara transversa (Say). "Transverse Ark". Smallest of our "Ark-shells" , fairly 

 common in mud, low water mark to subtidal. 



Anomia acule^ta Gmelin. "Prickly Jingle". Less common, attached to rocks or emp- 

 ty shells, near low water mark. 



Anomia simplex O rbiqnv. "Common Jingle" or "Mermaid's Toenail". More common, at- 

 tached to logs, docks and boats as well as to rocks; near low water mark. 



Arctica (=Cyprina) islandica (L. ) ."Black Quahog". Dredged in muddy sand, common in 

 certain areas. 



Astarte borealis Schumacher and 



Astarte castanea (Say) . Dredged in shallow water locally, may occur intertidally 

 on exposed sand beaches north of the Cape. 



Bankia qouldi Bartsch. A common and very destructive "Shipworm" on the southern 

 Atlantic coast, transported to this area in drifting wood. 



Barnea . see Cyrtopleura . 



Cardita borealis (Conrad). Dredged in shallow water and on the continental shelf, 

 probably common in some places. This species is listed in most of the text- 

 books as Venericardia borealis , but Venericardia is apparently a Tertiary 

 genus not surviving today. 



Cerastoderma pinnulatum (Conrad) . Not in key. Dredged subtidally. 



C hlamys islandica Muller. "Iceland Scallop". Common in shallow water and on the 

 continental shelf. 



Corbula contracta Say. Dredged in shallo'-' water. 



Crassinella (- Gouldia ) mactracea Lindsley. Dredged from current swept sand and 

 shell bottom in shallow water. 



Crassostrea virginica (Gmelin). "Eastern Oyster". This is the commercially im- 

 portant oyster of the Atlantic seaboard; greatly variable in size and shape; 

 around and below low water mark in estuarine as well as marine conditions, 

 attached to any hard substrata including empty shells, with free swimming 

 larvae, unlike Ostrea spp. 




Bivalvia 151 



Cumingia tellinoides Conrad. In muds, usually associated with eelgrass, a deposit- 

 feeding bivalve, which, however, does not belong to the family Tellinidae but 

 to the Semelidae, illustrating convergence in functional morpholouy. 



Cyrtodaria siliqua (Spengler). Dredged subtidally. Not in key. 



Cvrtopleura (= Barnea ) costata (L.) . "Angel Wing". Around low water mark in sandy 

 mud, may also be found boring in peat or clay. 



Cvrtopleura (- Barnea ) truncata (Say). "Truncated Borer". Borers in peat or clay 

 on the Cape, and in softer rocks (e.g. shales) outside of this area. 



Ensis directu s (Conrad). "Common Razor Clam". Rapid vertical burrower in sand, 

 very common in some areas (including Barnstable) . 



Gemma gemma (Totten) . Very common and particularly abundant on tidal flats. 



Hiatella gallicana (Lamarck) and possibly also 



Hiatella arctica (L.). Non-boring specimens belonging to this genus have been dred- 

 ged subtidally and a living specimen of H. gallicana was found in 1963 in shal- 

 low water at the Sandwich end of the Cape Cod Canal. Not in key. 



Laevicardium mortoni (Conrad). In muddy sand, occasionally with eelgrass, in more 

 sheltered shallow waters. 



Lyons i a hyalina (Conrad) . Rare at low water mark, more commonly dredged. 



Macoma balthica (L.). Common in organic muds, a deposit feeder. 



Macoma tenta (Say). In muddy sand, a deposit feeder. 



Mercenaria (=Venus) mercenaria (L.). "Quahog" or "Little-neck Clam" or "Hard-shelled 

 Clam". The most important commercial clam, very common, loyally abundant. 



Modiolus demissus (Dillwyn) . "Ribbed Mussel". Salt marshes and upper littoral, 

 often abundant. The nomenclature, and even the systematic position, of this 

 mussel have been obscure. Its shell lacks teeth next to the ligament, and it 

 is certainly erroneous to place it in the genus Brachidontes , the shells of 

 which always have tooth-like crenulations just behind the ligament. Care must 

 be taken to distinguish M. demissus from Brachidontes recurvus Rafinesque 

 ("Hooked Mussel"), common on more southern Atlantic shores, but which may ex- 

 tend into this area. Note that Mytilus (or Modiolus ) plicatulus is simply a 

 synonym for M. demissus and that both Volsella and Arcuatula have been sugges- 

 ted as generic names for this species. Volsella has been rejected, but recent- 

 ly Soot-Ryen (1955) has suggested Arcuatula demissa as the best name after 

 setting up several diagnostic characters (including the radial sculpture) to 

 separate Arcuatula from the more characteristic species of the genus Modiolus . 



Modiolus modiolus (L.). "Horse Mussel". Cooler waters, usually below low water 

 mark, reaching greatest size subtidally. 



Mulinia lateralis (Say) . A dwarf mactrid clam, related to Spisula , usually found 

 in shallow water in mud or clay, but occasionally in the same habitat as Spi - 

 sula in surf stirred sand. 



Musculus (= Modiolaria) niqer (Gray) . A rarer mussel, near low water mark and sub- 

 tidally, more actively moving than most mussels. 



My a arenaria L. "Soft-shelled Clam" or "Long-neck Clam". The important commercial 

 clam of mud flats, but occurring commonly in a wide variety of substrata (gra- 

 vel, sand, mud or peat) at all tidal levels and in shallow water. Burrows are 

 probably permanent and adult My a completely sedentary organisms. 



Mvsella (= Rochefortia ) planulata (Stimpson) . A minute leptonacean clam which is 

 probably commensal. This is the only species of this group positively iden- 

 tified recently, but Aligena elevata and Montacuta spp. may occur. Mysella 

 planulata has previously been placed in the genera Kellia and Rochefortia . 



Mytilus edulis L. "Common Mussel". Common, often abundant in extensive, packed 



colonies forming 'blankets" , between tidemarks, and on the masonry and pilings 

 of docks and other structures. 



Nucula proxima (Say) . In mud subtidally (several other Nucula spp. may occur in 

 this area). Deposit feeding using palp proboscides, this is probably the 

 most primitive genus of living bivalves. 



Pandor a qou l diana (Dall) . Rare, lower intertidal and shallow water. 



Periploma (=C ochlodesma ) leanum (Conrad) . Rare, dredged. 



Petricola phola diformis Lamarck. "False Angel Wing". The commonest norer in peat 

 and clay in this area. This species, as is clearly revealed by the separate 

 extensible siphons, is a modified deposit feeder derived from a stock like 




152 Bivalvia 



the Tellinidae, which shows secondary convergence in structure and habit with 

 the Pholadidae, e.g. Cyrtopleura spp. and Zirfaea spp. 



Phacoides ( Lucinoma ) f ilosus Stimpson. Subtidally, dredged in Vineyard Sound. Not 

 in key. 



Pi tar morrhuana (Linsley) . Dredged. 



Placopecten maqellanicus (Gmelin) . "Deep-sea Scallop". Common subtidally and on 

 the Continental Shelf. 



Siligua costata (Say). On shallow water and sand flats , another vertically bur- 

 rowing razor clam, belonging to the Solenidae. 



Solemya velum Say. Not uncommon on intertidal mud flats and mud subtidally, a spe- 

 cialized representative of the Protobranchia. 



Spisula solidissima (Dillwyn) . "Surf Clam" or "Hen Clam". In surf stirred clean 

 sand, common below low water mark on exposed ocean beaches, young specimens 

 occur in the littoral. Called Mactra solidissima in much experimental literature. 



Tagelus divisus (Spengler) and 



Tagelus plebeius (Solander) (?T. gibbus (Spengler)). In muddy sand, on intertidal 

 flats and in shallow water, these are deposit feeding bivalves related to the 

 Tellinidae (note the separate extensible siphons) . Tagelus spp. have second- 

 arily assumed structure and habits like those of the true razor clams. 



Tellina agilis Stimpson (=T. tenera Say) . In fine or muddy sand, on intertidal 

 flats and in shallow water, the only local representative of this important 

 world wide genus of deposit feeding bivalves with separate, very extensible 

 siphons . 



Teredo navalis L. "Shipworm" . A common and destructive wood borer of world wide 

 distribution, transported to this area in drifting wood from more southern 

 parts of the Atlantic coast. 



Thyasira gouldi (Philippi) and 



Thyasira trisinuata (Orbigny) . Dredged. 



Yoldia l imatula (Say) . Dredged in shallow water just below low water mark, occa- 

 sionally found intertidally (two other species, Yoldia sapotilla (Gould) and 

 Yoldia thraciaeformis Storer, may occur in this area. This is one of the 

 three local genera of Protobranchia, deposit feeding by means of palp probos- 

 cides . 



Zirfaea crispata (L.). "Piddock". Borer in peat or clay on the Cape, and in soft- 

 er rocks (e_.g_. shales) outside this area; more common in colder waters. 



Venericardia, see Cardita. 




Chapter XV 153 



PHYLUM MOLLUSCA 



Shell-less Opisthobranchia 



by George M. Moore 



Nudibranchs are the best known of the shell-less opisthobranchiate snails. Thiele 

 (1931) recognized four orders of the subclass Opisthobranchia, placing some of the 

 shell-less forms, along with a few shelled forms, in the order Sacoglossa. Most of 

 the shell-less forms, along with a few shelled forms, were placed in the order Acoela, 

 in two suborders, Notaspidea and Nudibranchia. Odhner (1934, 1936, 1939) recognized 

 seven orders of Opisthobranchia including Notaspidea and Nudibranchia, and the class- 

 ification adopted in Chapter XXV of this manual gives eight orders. The shell-less 

 opisthobranchs of the Woods Hole fauna belong to three of these orders, with the ma- 

 jority of them in the order Nudibranchia. 



Since the time of Alder and Hancock (1845-55) two general types of Nudibranchia 

 have been recognized. One, the Holohepatica (dorids) , have the digestive gland (the 

 so-called liver) compact and undivided. The other, the Cladohepatica (eolids) , have 

 the digestive gland branched, with the branches extending into special dorsal out- 

 growths of the mantle (the cerata) . Odhner proposed the division of the order Nudi- 

 branchia into four suborders, since it appeared to him that the evolution of the 

 branched digestive gland had occurred more than once. Three of the suborders are 

 represented in this key and list. 



The suborder Doridacea is characterized principally by a circle of branchial 

 plumes (adaptive or secondary gills) about the anus, which is mid-dorsal on the post- 

 erior half of the animal. The digestive gland is compact and does not extend into 

 dorsal extensions of the mantle. In some dorids the mantle is broad and distinct 

 from the foot while in others it is reduced to a ridge or narrow fold. A single 

 pair of tentacles is present, on the dorsal surface a short distance back from the 

 anterior end. These are termed dorsal tentacles or rhinophores, in contrast to the 

 oral tentacles found in certain other nudibranchs. In dorids these dorsal tentacles 

 are delicately sculptured with several diagonal laminae. Typical dorids are repre- 

 sented in the Woods Hole fauna by Palio , Onchidoris , and Acanthodoris . The family 

 Corambidae, although included with the Doridacea, is not typical since its members 

 lack the circlet of branchial plumes. They have a pair of small ctenidia-like gills 

 located one on each side of the anus at the posterior end between mantle and foot. 



In the suborder Eolidacea branchial plumes are lacking and the anus is lateral- 

 ly placed on the right side of the body. Typically, in all except the genus Emble- 

 tonia , there are two pair of tentacles. The branched digestive gland extends into 

 special dorsal processes (cerata; sing, ceras). Many eolids feed on hydroids and 

 sea anemones, and undischarged nematocysts are moved by way of the "liver" canals 

 to the cerata and concentrated in cnidosacs at their tips. A pore connects each 

 cnidosac to the exterior. Eolids are represented in the Woods Hole fauna by nine 

 genera. 



The suborder Dendronotacea is represented in the Woods Hole fauna by Dendrono - 

 tus, Scyllaea , and Idulia. In this suborder the dorsal tentacles are eguipped with 

 a basal sheath into which the terminal club can be retracted. Both types of diges- 

 tive gland organization are found among the genera of this suborder; the holohepa- 

 tic condition is considered the more primitive. 



Nudibranchs, unless carefully anesthetized, contract and distort badly on pre- 

 servation. Such specimens can be used for radula studies and for certain details of 

 internal anatomy. This key will be of little use when working with such specimens, 

 since it is intended for tentative identification of living specimens and is based 

 entirely on external characteristics. Figure references in this chapter are to 

 Plates 20 to 22. 




154 KEY TO SHELL-LESS OPISTHOBRANCHS OF THE WOODS HOLE REGION 



1. With branchial plumes arranged in circle about the anus; 

 anus located medially on the posterior dorsal half of the 

 body; with single pair of tentacles „ 2 



1. Without circlet of branchial plumes as above; other dorsal 

 processes (pallial outgrowths) present or absent; with one 



or two pairs of tentacles 5 



2. Branchial plumes singly pinnate; mantle distinct from foot 3 



2. Branchial plumes doubly pinnate (or imperfectly tripinnate) ; 



mantle distinct or reduced to a ridge 4 



3. Body white or occasionally slightly yellowish; branchial 

 plumes about 11 and set in circle close to anus; dorsal sur- 

 face covered with numerous knobbed tubercles of variable 



size Onchidoris aspera 



3. Body dull yellowish -white (sometimes gray) with numerous 

 brown markings; brownish markings form three indistinct inter- 

 rupted longitudinal bands; branchial plumes up to 20-30 in 

 large specimens, set in elliptical groove around anus, and 

 with an included space covered by several bluntly knobbed 

 tubercles; dorsal surface covered with numerous knobbed tu- 

 bercles of variable size Onchidoris fusca 



4. Mantle distinct from foot; dorsal surface thickly covered 

 with numerous soft, slender, conical papillae of almost uni- 

 form size (figs. 3-5) Acanthodoris pilosa 



4. Mantle reduced to knobbed ridges extending from sides of head 

 to alongside the circlet of branchiae; body sparsely covered 



with short, blunt tubercles of variable size Palio lessonii 



5. Cerata (dorsal processes which contain as a central core a 



branch of the digestive gland) absent 6 



5. Cerata present 10 



6. With distinct mantle; 1 or 2 ctenidia between mantle and foot 7 



6. Without distinct mantle; ctenidia absent 8 



7. With a single typical gastropod ctenidium on right side between 

 mantle and foot; mantle covers anterior 2/3 of body but not the 



head (figs. 1, 2) Pleurobranchaea tarda 



7. With pair of small ctenidia between mantle and foot at posterior 

 end of body in the midline; mantle covers entire body, including 



head (figs. 6, 7) Corambella (?) sp. 



8. Body compressed; with 2- pairs of strap-like membranous extensions 

 arising from dorso-lateral edges of body; inner surface of dorso- 

 lateral folds and surface between them thickly covered with deli- 

 cately branched filaments (these filaments may be termed cerata 



by some authors) (fig. 8) Scyllaea pelaqica 



8. Body depressed; body with lateral extensions which can be folded 

 towards midline over dorsal surface of body to enclose a dorsal 



canal 9 



9. Lateral folds about 2/3 of length of body, not extending to post- 

 erior tip of foot, and not quite meeting when folded over back; 



foot square in front, with rounded corners; length to 1 cm . . . Elysia catula 

 9. Lateral folds extending to posterior tip of foot, and overlapping 

 each other when folded over the back; anterior angles of foot 

 strongly extended with acutely angled tips; length to 3 cm 

 Elysia chlorotica 




Shell-less Opisthobranchs 155 



10. Cerata branched and tree-like Dendronotus frondosus 



10. Cerata unbranched 11 



11. Single pair of tentacles (oral tentacles lacking) 12 



11. Two pair of tentacles (both oral and dorsal tentacles present) 13 



12. Tentacles arising from trumpet-like sheaths; cerata club 



shaped and bearing scattered dark colored tubercles .... Idulia corona ta 



12. Tentacles arising directly from head (without basal sheaths); 



cerata simple and without tubercles Embletonia fuscata 



13. Anterior lateral corners of foot extended and sharply acute 



angled 14 



13. Anterior lateral corners of foot not much extended and 



either rounded or bluntly angled 18 



14. Dorsal tentacles ringed with alternately larger and small- 

 er rings, producing serrate margins (figs. 24, 25) . . Facelina bostoniensis 



14. Dorsal tentacles smooth or slightly wrinkled, not annulated 15 



15. Body ovate in outline, broad and somewhat depressed; with 



numerous cerata (up to 400 on each side) Aeolidia papillosa 



15. Body linear, narrow; with fewer cerata (not over 100 on each 



side) 16 



16. Body pale gray with white margins, and with 3 longitudinal 

 reddish to russet interrupted stripes on head and anterior 



part of body (fig. 23) Cratena pi lata 



16. Body transparent white (internal organs may be yellowish or 

 reddish), and without colored stripes on head and anterior 



part of body 17 



17. Anterior lateral extensions of the foot about half as long as 

 width of foot; tips of cerata transparent with an opaque white 



ring just back of tip; anterior cluster of cerata not as dis- 

 tinct and sharply set off as in the following; central core of 

 cerata scarlet to rose red, varying in some specimens to choco- 

 late (figs. 9-11) Coryphella rufibranchialis 



17. Anterior lateral extensions of the foot about as long as the 

 width of foot; tips of cerata with patch of opaque white; the 

 anterior cluster of cerata distinctly set off from second clus- 

 ter forming a "ruff about the shoulders"; central core of cerata 

 carmine red; cerata somewhat longer than in above species (figs. 



12-14) Coryphella pellucida 



18. Anterior lateral corners of foot bluntly angled (figs. 18, 19) 

 Cuthona concinna 



18. Anterior lateral angles of foot rounded 19 



19. Cerata very numerous and crowded, irregularly set; lateral edge 

 of each ceras produced into a wide, strongly undulating mem- 

 brane (figs. 26, 27) Fiona pinnata 



19. Cerata not so crowded; cerata set in regularly defined rows; 



cerata circular in cross section and without lateral membrane 20 



20. Cerata fairly numerous (at least 30 to 50 on a side) 21 



20. Cerata few (4 to 10 or so on a side) 22 




156 



Plate 20 



SHELL-LESS OPISTHOBRANCHS 



Figures 1, 2, 6-8, 18, 24-27 on Plates 20-22 

 were drawn from Kodachrome transparencies taken 

 by the author. Grateful acknowledgement is made 

 to Miss M. Patricia Morse for inking most of the 

 drawings. Figure 23 is redrawn from Verrill, 

 the others from Alder and Hancock's Monograph. 

 Figures of species that are satisfactorily il- 

 lustrated in Miner (1950) have not been includ- 

 ed in these plates. 



Figure 1. Pleurobranchaea tarda . Dorsal view of specimen from Sargas- 

 sum , Vineyard Sound. 



2. P_. tarda . Ventro-lateral view of same. Ctenidium visible on right 

 side. 



3. Acanthodoris pilosa . Dorso-lateral view. 



4. A. pilosa . Branchial plume. 



5. A. pilosa . Portion of mantle edge, highly magnified, showing the 

 conical papillae. 



6. Corarobella (?) sp. Dorsal view of specimen from Sargassum , Vine- 

 yard Sound. 



7. Corambella (?) sp. Ventral view of same, showing ctenidia-like 

 gills at posterior end. 



8. Scyllaea pelagica . Lateral view of right side. Specimen from 

 Sargassum, Vineyard Sound. 



All scale bars are 5 mm. 




Plate 20 




158 



Plate 21 

 SHELL-LESS OPISTHOBRANCHS (continued) 

 Figure 9. Coryphella ruf ibranchialis . Dorso-lateral view. 



10. C. ruf ibranchialis . Ventral view of anterior end. 



11. c. ruf ibranchialis . Two cerata. 



12. Coryphella pellucida . Dorso-lateral view. 



13. C. pellucida . Ventral view of anterior end. 



14. C. pellucida . Two cerata. 



15. Eubranchus pallidus . Dorso-lateral view. 



16. Eubranchus exiguus . Dorsal view. 



17. Tergipes despectus . Dorsal view. Alder and Hancock noted that 

 "The figures in this plate (Fam. 3, Plate 17) have inadvertently 

 been reversed". The figure shown here is not reversed. 



18. Cuthona concinna . Dorsal view of specimen from Sakonnet Point, 

 Rhode Island. 



19. C. concinna. Ventral view of anterior end. 



All scale bars are 5 mm. 




Plate 21 




160 



Plate 22 

 SHELL-LESS OPISTHOBRANCHS (concluded) . 

 Figure 20. Cratena aurantia . Dorso-lateral view. 



21. C. aurantia . Ventral view of anterior end. 



22. C. aurantia . Two cerata. 



23. Cratena pi lata . Dorsal view. 



24. Facelina bostoniensis . Dorsal view of specimen from Tubularia , 

 Woods Hole. 



25. F. bostoniensis . Ventral view of same specimen. 



26. Fiona pinnata . Dorso-lateral view of specimen from floating 

 timber, Vineyard Sound. 



27. F. pinnata . Three cerata showing undulating membranous exten- 

 sions of same. 



All scale bars are 5 mm. 




Plate 22 



25 •■ 




16i Shell-less Opiethobranchs 



21. Oral tentacles almost as long as dorsal tentacles; cerata 



long, cylindrical or slightly conical (figs. 20-22) .... Cratena aurantia 



21. Oral tentacles about half as long as dorsal tentacles; cer- 

 ata ovoid ovate, much inflated, somewhat compressed (fig. 



15) Eubranchus pallidus 



22. Cerata 5 to 10 on a side, clavate, large and inflated, ta- 

 pering abruptly to a point; body spotted with green or brown; 



tentacles banded with olive or brown (fig. 16) Eubranchus exiguus 



22. Cerata 4 (rarely 5) on a side, set in a single longitudinal 

 row on each side; cerata smoothly (i.e. not abruptly) taper- 

 ing; body transparent white, not spotted, sometimes striped 

 anteriorly with two lateral reddish streaks; tentacles not 

 banded (fig. 17) Tergipes despectus 



ANNOTATED LIST OF SHELL-LESS 0PISTHDB3ANCHS INCLUDED IN THE KEY 



The list presented here includes most of the shallow water species of shell- 

 less opisthobranchs known from the Woods Hole region, and is based both upon pub- 

 lished records of Gould (1870), Verrill (1873), and Johnston (1934), and the col- 

 lections of the author. Since we lack a monographic treatment of the group in 

 this area, and since figures are helpful in identification, page references are 

 made to Miner (1950) in the cases of species not figured in this manual. The syn- 

 onymies given are not complete (some deletions in the interests of brevity have 

 gone beyond the author's wishes, and for this the editor accepts responsibility). 

 References to Alder and Hancock (1845-55) are given as A & H; Gould and Binney 

 (1870) as G & B; Verrill and Smith (1873) as V & S. Additional synonymy is given 

 by Johnston (1915), and Iredale and O'Donoghue (1923). 



CLASS GASTROPODA 



Subclass Opisthobranchia 



Order Sacoglossa 



Elysia catula (Gould, 1870) . As Placobranchus catulus in G & B; as Elysiella 



catulus in V & S; Miner, p. 674. 

 Elysia chlorotica Gould, 1870. Miner, p. 674. Found in salt and brackish water 



marshes . 



Order Notaspidea 



Pleurobranchaea tarda Verrill, 1880. See Verrill, 1882, Trans. Conn. Acad., 5_: 546. 

 Dredged, 60-400 meters; also on floating Sargassum in Vineyard Sound. 



Order Nudibranchia 



Suborder Doridacea 



Acanthodoris pilosa (Abildgaard, 1789) . As Doris pilosa in A & H; as Doris bifida 

 in V & S. Color various, white to yellow, brown, or even black. Under rocks, 

 midtidal to laminarian zone; abundant sporadically in spring, also taken in sum- 

 mer and fall; throughout New England. 



Corambella (?) sp„ Animals figured in figures 6 and 7 have been collected at Woods 

 Hole on pilings and from Sargassum in Vineyard Sound. 



On chidoris a spera (Alder and Hancock, 1842) . As Doris aspera in A & H; as Doris 



pallida in G & B; as Onchidoris pallida in V & S; as Onchidorus aspera in Miner, 

 p. 671. The spelling Onchidorus used by Miner and certain other authors is of 

 incorrect gender, and has been emended by Winckworth (1932, J. Conchol. _19: 234, 

 251). Under rocks, low intertidal to 60 meters. Probably feeds on encrusting 

 bryozoans. All seasons; Bay of Fundy to Rhode Island. 




Shell-less Opisthobranchs 163 



Onchidoris fusca (Muller, 1776) . As Doris b i lame 1 lata in A & H and G & B; as Lamel - 

 lidoris bilamellata in Miner, p. 672. Midtidal to 8 meters, on barnacle covered 

 rocks; feeds on barnacles; often gregarious, breeding and laying eggs; all sea- 

 sons, breeding in spring and fall. Bay of Fundy to Rhode Island. 



Palio lessonii (D'Orbigny, 1837) . As Polycera lessonii in A & H and V & S; Miner, p. 

 673. Under stones, low intertidal; New Brunswick to Connecticut. 



Suborder Dendronotacea 



Dendronotus frondosus (Ascanius, 1774) . As D. arborescens in A & H, G & B, and V & 

 S; Miner, p. 671. Often associated with hydroids, especially Tubularia . Large 

 specimens (up to 8 cm) have been collected by the author from pilings at the 

 east end of the Cape Cod Canal; specimens of 2-3 cm from Bay of Fundy to Long 

 Island Sound af'all seasons. 



Idulia coronata (Gmelin, 1791) . As Dctocoronata in A & H, G & B, V & S, and Miner, 

 p. 673. Associated with various hydroids, including Sertularia ; all seasons; 

 Bay of Fundy to Long Island Sound. 



Scyllaea pelagica Linnaeus, 1761. On floating Sarqassum in Vineyard Sound. 



Suborder Eolidacea 



Aeolidia papillosa (Linnaeus, 1761) . As Eolis papillosa in A & H; as Aeolis papil - 

 losa in G & B, and Miner, p. 670. This largest of New England eolids is some- 

 times called the "common nudibranch", but it is sporadic in occurence. Found 

 at all seasons, usually associated with sea anemones. Bay of Fundy to Woods 

 Hole. 



Coryphella pellucida (Alder and Hancock, 1847) . As Eolis pellucida in A & H. Maine 

 and Woods Hole; winter and spring. Not previously reported from New England. 



Coryphella ruf ibranchialis (Johnston, 1832) . As Eolis ruf ibranchialis in A & H; as 

 Aeolis ruf ibranchialis in G & B. Balch's (1909) C. r. chocolata is but a color 

 variety, intergrading with specimens with red cerata in the same area. The 

 most abundant eolid of New England; among hydroids on rocks, intertidal to 200 

 meters; winter, spring, and early summer; Bay of Fundy to Massachusetts. 



Cratena aurantia (Alder and Hancock, 1842) . As Eolis aurantiaca in A & H; as Mon - 



taqua gouldii in V & S. Associated with Tubularia . Abundant, summer and spring; 

 New Hampshire to Woods Hole. 



Cratena pi lata (Gould, 1870) . As Aeolis pi lata in G & B; as Montaqua pilata in V & 

 S. Abundant on Pennaria at Woods Hole in July and August. This is the species 

 used by Kepner (1943, J. Morph. , 73_: 297-311) in his study of the manipulation 

 of nematocysts by nudibranchs . 



Cuthona concinna (Alder and Hancock, 1843) . As Eolis concinna in A & H. A British 

 species not previously reported from America; the author has taken it in Mass. 

 and Rhode Island; Dr. Henry Russell has reported it from Cape Cod. 



Embletonia fuscata Gould, 1870. With red algae; New Hampshire to Woods Hole. 



Eubranchus exiquus (Alder and Hancock, 1848) . As Eolis exigua in A & H; as Aeolis 

 despecta (in part) in G & B. Gould apparently confused Terqipes despectus and 

 Aeolis exigua (see Verrill, 1882, Trans. Conn. Acad., 5_: 553, under Galvinja exi - 

 gua) . On occasion E_. exiquus may lose its oral tentacles in the laboratory, and 

 may then be confused with Embletonia fuscata . Associated with hydroids, Bay of 

 Fundy to Woods Hole. Has been found breeding in MBL live cars in May. 



Eubranchus pallidus (Alder and Hancock, 1842) . As Eolis picta in A & H and Aeolis 

 picta in G & B. Associated with hydroids, winter and spring; Bay of Fundy to 

 Rhode Island. 



Facelina bostoniensis Couthouy, 1838. As Aeolis bostoniensis in G & B. Associated 

 with Tubularia ; New Hampshire and Woods Hole region. 



Fiona pinnata Eschscholz, 1831. As Fiona nobilis in A & H; also F. marina of au- 

 thors, and F. atlantica Bergh. Taken in August from Sarqassum and floating logs 

 in Vineyard Sound. 




164 Shell-less Opisthobranchs 



Tergipes despectus (Johnston, 1835) . As Aeolis despecta (in part) in G & B; as Eo - 

 lis despecta in A & H. Associated with hydroids, spring and summer; Bay of 

 Fundy to Rhode Island. 



REFERENCES ON SHELL-LESS OPISTHOBRANCHS 



Alder, J. and A. Hancock, 1845-55. Monograph of the British Nudibranchiate Mollusca. 

 Ray Society, London. 



Balch, F. N. , 1909. Notes on New England Nudibranchs II: A Spring Collecting Trip. 

 Nautilus, 23.: 33-55. 



Eliot, C, 1910. The British Nudibranchiate Mollusca. Part VIII. (Supplementary 

 to Alder and Hancock) . Ray Society, London. 



Gould, A. A. and W. C. Binney, 1870. Report on the Invertebrata of Massachusetts, 

 2nd ed., vi-524 pp. Boston. 



Iredale, T. and C. H. O'Donoghue, 1923. List of the British Nudibranchiate Mol- 

 lusca. Proc. Malacol. Soc . London, 1_5: 195-223. A useful checklist for synonymy. 



Johnston, C. W. , 1915. Fauna of New England, Part 13. List of the Mollusca. Occ. 

 Papers, Boston Soc. Nat. Hist., pp. 1-231. 



Johnston, C. W. , 1934. List of Marine Mollusca of the Atlantic Coast from Labora- 

 dor to Texas. Proc. Boston Soc. Nat. Hist., 40: 1-204. 



Miner, R. W. , 1950. Field Book of Seashore Life. xv-888 pp. Putnam, N. Y. 



Ohdner, N. H. , 1934. The Nudibranchiata. British Antarctic (Terra Nova) Exped. 

 1910. Zool., 7_: 229-310. 



Ohdner, N. H. , 1936. Nudibranchia Dendronotacea. A Revision of the System. "Mel- 

 anges Paul Pelseneer". Mem. Mus . Roy. d'Hist. Nat. Belg., Ser . 2, 3_: 1057-1128. 



Ohdner, N. H. , 1939. Opisthobranchiate Mollusca from the western and northern 



coasts of Norway. Det Kgl. Norske. Videnskabers Selskabs Skrifter, Nr . 1: 1-92. 



Thiele, J., 1929-31, 34, 35. Handbuch der systematischen Weichtierkunde. 2 vols. 

 Gustav Fischer, Jena. 



Verrill, A. E. and S. I. Smith, 1873. Report upon the Invertebrate Animals of Vine- 

 yard Sound, etc. Rept. U. S. Comm. Fish, for 1871-72, Part 1: 295-778, pi. 

 1-38. Washington. 




Chapter XVI 2.65 



PHYLUM ENTOPROCTA 



By Mary D. Rogick 



Entoprocta and Ectoprocta are zoologically distinct but because they bear super- 

 ficial resemblance to each other they have been treated together by systematists, as 

 "moss animals", Polyzoa, or Bryozoa ( sensu lato) . 



Entoprocts are minute, less than one centimeter tall. They are usually sessile, 

 pseudocoelomate, and generally of soft texture. Their anus is within the ring of 

 tentacles, which number 8 to 36, depending on the species. Tentacle number and stalk 

 flexibility are important, so should be noted in living specimens wherever possible. 

 The "heads" or calyces of some nod constantly. Some species are solitary, others 

 colonial. Entoprocts may be found attached to rocks, algae, shells, or growing on 

 various organisms as hydroids, sponges, Crustacea, ectoprocts and worms. 



KEY TO LOCAL ENTOPROCTA (partly after Osburn) 

 (Figure references are to Plate 23 ) 



1. Individuals solitary, not colonial or stolonate, provided 

 with a contractile stalk and enlarged basal disc (fig. 1) ; 

 characteristically found on bodies of tube dwelling annelid 



or sipunculid worms Loxosoma spp. 



(Consult Prenant and Bobin for species differences) . 



1. Individuals colonial, arising from creeping stolons, forming 



low, whitish, simple traceries or sometimes denser tufts 2 



2. Stalks of individuals with distinct muscular dilations at 

 bases, near junction with stolons, and sometimes elsewhere 



along stalk; stalks spineless Barentsia 3 



2. Stalks without such muscular dilations, tapering, usually 



with small spines on stalk and/or calyx (fig. 2) Pedicellina cernua 



3. Stalk thin walled and muscular, its distal end very flex- 

 ible, actively curling into a loose spiral (fig. 3) Barentsia laxa 



3. Stalk heavier walled, straight and rigid 4 



4. Stalk wall appears as if punctured by irregularly spaced 



minute, cone shaped pores. Colony delicate, small Barentsia discreta 



4. Stalk wall without pores Barentsia major 



LIST OF LOCAL ENTOPROCTA 

 Family Loxosomatidae 



Loxosoma davenporti Nickerson, 1901. Reported (Nickerson) associated with the poly- 

 chaete " Clymene producta " . It is not clear what maldanid is meant, possibly 

 Maldane . 



Loxosoma minuta Osburn, 1912. May possibly be a Loxosome 11a ? Reported on Phasco - 

 lion strombi (Sipunculoidea) . 



Family Pedicellinidae 



Barentsia discreta (Busk, 1886) . Inconspicuous but of world wide distribution. Found 



on algae, stones, hydroids, ectoprocts. See Rogick (1956). 

 Barentsia laxa Kirkpatrick, 1890. Forms furry patches to half an inch high on Mer - 



cenaria shells which had been bored by the sponge Cliona. See Rogick (1948) . 




166 Entoprocts 



Barentsia major Hincks, 1888. Found on pilings, stones, shells, and around leg 



bases of spider crabs and Limulus . 

 Pedicellina cernua (Pallas, 1771). On pilings and elsewhere, among bryozoans and 

 " other creeping growths. 



REFERENCES ON ENTOPROCTA 



Atkins, D. , 1932. The Loxosomatidae of the Plymouth area, including L. obesum , sp. 



nov. Quart. J. Micr. Sci., 75_: 321-391. 

 Nickerson, W. S., 1901. On Loxosoma davenporti sp. nov. an endoproct from the New 



England coast. J. Morph., 17: 351-380, pi. 33. 

 Osburn, R. C, 1912. The Bryozoa of the Woods Hole Region. Bull. U. S. Bur. Fish. 



(for 1910), 30: 203-266, pi. 18-31. 

 Osburn, R. C, 1944. A survey of the Bryozoa of Chesapeake Bay. Chesapeake Biol. 



Lab. Publ. no. 63_: 1-59. 

 Prenant, M. et G. Bobin, 1956. Bryozaires, Premiere Partie. Entoproctes, Phylac- 



tolemes, Ctenostomes. Faune de France, 60_: 1-398. 

 Rogick, M. , 1948. Studies on marine Bryozoa. II. Barentsia laxa Kirkpatrick 1890. 



Biol. Bull., 94: 128-142. 

 Rogick, M., 1956. Bryozoa of the U. S. Navy's 1947-1948 Antarctic Expedition, I-IV. 



Proc. U. S. Nat. Mus., 105: 221-317. 




Chapter XVII 167 



PHYLUM ECTOPROCTA 



By Mary D. Rogick 



Ectoprocta, the "true" Bryozoa or "true" Polyzoa are a large and diverse group, 

 composed of animals always individually minute, but organized into colonies of var- 

 ied form. Since ectoprocts are important as fossils, much of the basic systematic 

 work on the group has been done by paleontologists (see works of Canu and Bassler, 

 particularly) ; consequently, reliance in taxonomy has been largely upon the exter- 

 nal skeletal characters. 



In the field, the beginner may confuse ectoprocts with hydroids, sponges, sea- 

 weeds, or compound ascidians, because of their growth forms. The colony texture var- 

 ies from gelatinous, to membranous, to chitinous, to calcareous, depending upon the 

 species . 



Identification to genus and species is often a matter of considerable difficul- 

 ty. Original descriptions of some of the commonest species are too incomplete, too 

 general and do not always include really distinguishing key characters. An origin- 

 al description was sometimes so broad that several species could be included under 

 one specific name and one species could fit with equal justification in more than 

 one genus. Some genera, like Cellepora , Lepralia , Membranipora , and Smittina ac- 

 tually became catch-alls for many diverse and hard-to-identify species. 



If possible, bryozoans should be studied alive, with their tentacles extended. 

 Tentacle number is important in distinguishing some species. Use a compound micro- 

 scope with lOOx to 280x magnification and direct (reflected) lighting for the study 

 of calcareous or opaque species and transmitted lighting for transparent forms. Cal- 

 careous colonies are sometimes calcined or treated with Eau de Javelle to remove 

 organic matter from the skeleton. Calcining produces beautiful results but is ris- 

 ky and may destroy the specimen, so is recommended only where ample material is 

 available. 



GLOSSARY OF TERMS USED IN DESCRIBING ECTOPROCTA 



"The study of ectoprocts is burdened by a large and fantastic terminology, much 

 of it dating from a period when the structure of the animals was not understood. 

 Hence the terminology lacks relation to terms employed for other groups of animals. 

 Frequently the ectoproctologists seem to get themselves entangled in their own term- 

 inology, using the same word (e.g., aperture) in several different senses". This 

 statement by Dr. Libbie Hyman should be borne in mind when looking up bryozoan lit- 

 erature. The general zoologist will find an illuminating discussion of ectoproct 

 stru :ture and terminology in Vol. 5 of Hyman ' s "The Invertebrates". 



Ancestrula : Primary zoid produced by the metamorphosis of a larva. The rest of the 



colony develops from it by budding. 

 Alveolus : Small cavity, pit, or fenced in area between zooecia, chiefly in Cyclo- 



stomata. 

 Aperture : Variously used for any opening, sometimes for the zooecial orifice. Best 



to avoid its use. 

 Areolae or areolar pores : One or more rows of pores around the periphery or margin 

 of the zooecial front, often larger than other pores. Remainder of frontal 

 wall, the central part, is usually imperforate if areolae are present. 

 Autozoid: Normal, "typical", or sometimes asexual individual in a colony, if colony 

 has male and female zoids (as in Hippothoa) . 




168 Ectoprocts 



Avicularium : Highly modified zoid, with or without a polypide but with muscles 



which operate its operculum, called the mandible. It may be adventitious , i.e. 

 attached to some part of the parental zoid's front, or it may be vicarious , i.e. 

 an independent unit, replacing a regular zoid in the colony, or be placed be- 

 tween other zoids in the colony. Many sizes and shapes: larger than autozoids, 

 smaller than autozoids; shaped like a bird's head, like the sole of a shoe, or 

 round, elliptical, spatulate, triangular. May be imbedded in the calcareous 

 wall of parent zooecium or swing freely on a stalk which is sometimes much long- 

 er than the whole parent zoid. May even occur on ovicells of some species. 

 Function unknown, although sometimes avicularia ward off other organisms or may 

 keep other larvae from settling on the colony. 



Brood chamber : Used especially for cyclostomes. It is an enlarged space, compart- 

 ment or ovicell in which zygotes develop into larvae. 



Brown body : A ball of brownish-orange tissue representing the remains of a degen- 

 erating or degenerated polypide. Found either in empty or in inhabited zooecia. 



Cardelle : Denticle placed at each side within the orifice for hingement of the oper- 

 culum; also called condyle . May be peg-like, unicusped, bicusped or even ledge- 

 like. 



Communication pore : Opening in zooecial wall between adjacent zoids, for soft tis- 

 sue connecting the two zoids . 



Connate : Firmly united or in close order, as in rows of zoids of Amathia. 



Cryptocyst : Shelf-like calcareous lamina extending inward from the front edges of 

 the side walls, beneath the frontal membrane (like inward turned edges of pie 

 crust) . In Anasca, especially in the membraniporid group. 



Dietellae: Blister-like chambers present in the basal-lateral walls of some Cheilo- 

 stomes. They contain communication pores and are also called pore chambers. 



Distal : Direction of growth away from the ancestrula. That part of the zoid or 

 colony that is farthest away from the ancestrula. 



Frontal side : The free or "ventral" side of an attached encrusting ectoproct, or 



the wall bearing the orifice and other decorations (avicularia, ovicells, pores, 

 sculpturings, etc.) of a zoid. 



Gonozoid : Identifiable male or female zoid of a colony. Sometimes differ in size 

 or in orifice from autozoids. Cyclostomes may develop brood chambers for 

 developing young. Cheilostomes develop ovicells of various types. 



Gymnocyst : Peripheral calcified portion of frontal membrane in some Cheilostomes, 

 developed especially in proximal region, not covered by membranous ectocyst. 

 See figure 48 (Plate 26) . 



Heterozoid : Incomplete or highly modified zoid as opposed to autozoid. Includes 

 avicularia, dwarf zoids, vibracula, gonozoids, some types of spines. Prefer- 

 able to use term heterozooecium, since the zoid or soft parts may be vestigial. 



Lophophore : Circular or semicircular fold of tissue which bears the tentacles. 



Lyrula : A tooth, commonly anvil-shaped, low, of varying width, placed in the cen- 

 ter of the proximal edge of the primary orifice. Characteristic of the "smit- 

 tinid" orifice. Sometimes it may become very worn down. 



Mandible : The operculum closing the beak of an avicularium. 



Multiporous : Refers to a sieve-like plate in the lateral or distal walls of cal- 

 careous Cheilostomes which serves as an interzoidal connection. 



Ooecium : Brood chamber containing the developing zygote or larva in Cheilostomes. 

 Same as ovicell. 



Operculum : Membranous, chitinous or very rarely calcareous flap closing the ori- 

 fice of Cheilostomata. Often works like a drawbridge, after tentacles have been 

 withdrawn into the zooecium. 



Opesia : A large uncalcified membrane covered area on the front side of many Anas- 

 can Cheilostomes (Membraniporids) . It surrounds the orifice and extends prox- 

 imally. It is bordered by a cryptocyst. 



Oral avicularium : An avicularium that is either in the wall of the orifice or next 

 to the orifice. Suboral would be just below or proximal to the orifice. Later- 

 al oral would be to the side of the orifice. 




Ectoprocts lt>9 



Orifice : The zooecial opening through which tentacles are extruded from the zooe- 

 cium. In Cheilostomes it is covered by an operculum. In some heavily calci- 

 fied forms the original orifice (called the primary orifice ) may be hidden by 

 a growing calcareous collar ( peristome ) whose free rim now forms a secondary 

 orifice ( peristomice ) which may have an entirely different shape or appearance 

 than that of the primary orifice. 



Orif icial collar : See Peristome and Orifice . 



Ovicell : General term for any structure serving to contain bryozoan larvae dur- 

 ing their development, according to Bassler. May be of varied shapes and sizes 

 and located conspicuously or inconspicuously on or within zooecia. Often placed 

 at distal end of zoid, like a cap or hood. Sometimes placed in lateral posi- 

 tion. 



Peristome : An extension of the calcareous rim of the orifice in some Cheilostomes. 

 See also Orifice . 



Pleurocyst : The calcareous frontal wall of some Cheilostomes. It is generally 

 granulated and usually not porous over its central area but may have areolar 

 pores around the edge. 



Polypide: The protrusible part of the bryozoan individual and that part which is 

 suspended in the body cavity, namely: the tentacles, gut and associated mus- 

 culature. Early workers on bryozoa thought that the bryozoan individual con- 

 sisted of a box (zooecium) containing a soft individual (the polypide) . 



Pore chambers : See Dietellae . 



Primary orifice : See Orifice . 



Proximal : Direction toward origin of growth, or region nearest the ancestrula. 

 That part of the zoid which is nearest its point of origin. 



Rhizoid: Same as radicle, a rootlike structure formed by zooecia for attachment of 



the colony to the substratum or to various objects. May be calcareous or chit- 

 inous . 



Scutum : Large flabellate spine or shield in front of opesia; attached laterally. 



Secondary orifice : See Orifice . 



Septula : Communication pores between neighboring zoids. The pores may be single 



(uniporous) or grouped together in a sieve-like plate (multiporous) and located 

 in the lateral and distal walls of zoids. 



Sinus : A slit or excavation or notch in the proximal part of the orifice. Espec- 

 ially characteristic of the Schizoporellid group but may occur in other Cheilo- 

 stomes . 



Stolon : Tubular strand, usually horizontal or recumbent (upright in Amathia ) from 

 which either new zoids or other structures (peduncles or secondary stolons) may 

 be budded. More common in Ctenostomata than in other orders, but sometimes 

 present in the latter. 



Tremocyst : Perforated calcareous frontal wall of some Ascophoran Cheilostomes. If 

 the wall is more or less perforated all over it is a tremocyst . If wall is per- 

 forated only around the margin and imperforate in center, then it is a pleuro - 

 cyst . 



Vibraculum : Highly modified chitinous or calcareous heterozoid found in Cheilo- 

 stomes, resembling an avicularium whose mandible has been replaced by a very 

 long bristle or chitinous whip, which may be considerably longer that the zo- 

 oecium. The vibracular chamber contains powerful muscles for moving the whip. 



Zoarium : The entire bryozoan colony, composed of individuals called zoids or bryo- 

 zoids or bryozoites . 



Zooecium : The external skeleton and body wall of the zoid. Originally coined for 

 the compartments in which the polypides are housed. Term especially useful to 

 paleontologists to whom only the hard skeletal structures are available for 

 study. 



Zoid : A single individual of the colony. Term includes the zooecium and its con- 

 tained polypide. 




170 Ectoprocts 



PREPARATION OF SPECIMENS 



Preservation of soft or small calcareous specimens . Ryland (1962) suggests pre- 

 servation of Ctenostomes in 4% sea-water formalin and preservation of calcareous 

 forms in 70% alcohol. If calcareous forms are on large stones or shells, two courses 

 are open to the worker: (1), to store the stones and intact colonies or (2), to burn 

 off (calcine) the colonies and mount them on slides. In either case wash the stone 

 or shell in fresh water and allow them to dry. Store dry. 



Calcining . To prepare permanent slide mounts of calcareous Ectoproct skeletons, 

 one often resorts to calcining. To calcine (burn off the organic, membranous tis- 

 sues), use an alcohol lamp or Bunsen burner and a geologist's blowpipe. Select a 

 dry colony on a suitable rock or shell; blow with the blowpipe so as to direct a 

 narrow jet of flame against the specimen. The colony will first blacken, then turn 

 red hot and finally turn white. Protective glasses should be worn to protect the 

 eyes and face from flying fragments of rock, shell or bryozoan. Caution: Do not 

 burn the colony to a crumbly whiteness, but continue calcining only to the point 

 where some white begins to show and the fine diagnostic pattern is retained. Col- 

 ony fragments will lift up right off the rock and can be transferred on to the sur- 

 face of very thick balsam on a slide. No coverslip is needed. If possible, mount 

 a fragment of an uncalcined colony right alongside the calcined fragment for com- 

 parison or in case the calcined fragment disintegrates. For further details, con- 

 sult Rogick, 1945. 



Some people prefer to use a,bleach like Clorox (sodium hypochlorite) or Javelle 

 water for cleaning and whitening specimens. 



KEY TO THE MORE COMMON GENERA OF LOCAL MARINE ECTOPROCTA 

 (Figure references are to Plates 23-26) 



1. Zooecia are white calcareous tubes pitted with pores; orifice 

 terminal, unconstricted in autozoids, i.e. not narrower than 

 the autozoid, but small and constricted in the greatly swollen 

 ovicells or brood chambers; tube tips free but rest of tube 

 is either partly free or else immersed in the common zoarial 

 crust; vibracula, avicularia and opercula absent; colonies may 

 be arborescent, encrusting, or raised into stiff flattened lobes 

 . . Order CYCLOSTOMATA ( =STENOLAEMATA Borg, 1926; =STENOSTOMATA Marcus, 1938) 2 



1. Zooecia (and gonozoids , if present) otherwise 4 



2. Erect, twig-like colonies articulated (having chitinous joints), 

 attached at their origin to a primary calcareous disc; rhizoids 

 present; zooecia slender; inflated vase-like ovicells densely 



pitted with pores (fig. 4) Crisia eburnea 



2. Colonies compact, discoid, wart-like, encrusting; the tubular 

 zooecia open on the free surface out of the common crust; zo- 

 oecial tubes arranged in series or fascicles radiating from 



a free central area; between them are adventitious tubes or 



incomplete partitions (aveoli or cancelli) ; brood chambers 



spread over and among several zoids 3 



3. Brood chamber roof overgrown with secondary alveoli, looking 



reticulated Lichenopora 



3. Brood chamber roof not covered thus, not reticulated (fig. 5) ... Disporella 




Ectoprocts 171 



Zooecia soft, gelatinous, membranous, corneous or leathery but not 

 calcareous; zoids may be distinctly isolated or else closely pack- 

 ed, encrusting, erect, stolonate, or some may burrow into mollusc 

 shells; zooecial orifice terminal, closed by a puckering of the 

 invaginated tentacle sheath usually, or occasionally by special 

 structures (two lips in the Flustrellidae, a setigerous membrane 

 in others (fig. 10), or an operculum in boring Penetrantiidae) ; 



true ovicells lacking but gonozoids may occur Order CTENOSTOMATA 5 



Colonies usually calcareous, but in some families are corneous 

 or membranous; great variety of growth forms: encrusting, free- 

 ly lamellate, arborescent, nodulate, stolonate, or reticulate; 

 zooecia are rounded or angular chambers budding distally and/or 

 laterally to form contiguous rows; zooecial orifice terminal or 

 subterminal, more commonly at the distal end of zoid's frontal 

 surface, and closed by a hinged operculum; avicularia and ovi- 

 cells present in many species Order CHEILOSTOMATA 13 



Stolons or stolon-like extensions of zoids absent. Zoids are 

 squat, opaque, their lateral walls fused together. Colony a 



gelatinous to leathery crust; common on coarse brown algae 6 



Stolons or stolon-like zoidal extensions present; zoids are 

 membranous or chitinous, separate, tubular, more or less trans- 

 parent and never leathery 7 



Colony rubbery, brownish. Closed orifice is a transverse 

 bilabiate slit, purse-like (fig. 6); chitinous spines mount- 

 ed on small pads (kenozooecia) that appear at edges of front- 

 al wall, oftenest about the orifice Flustrellidra 



Colony a gelatinous to rubbery gray or brown crust sometimes 



arising into sac-like lobes; orifice at tip of a mound-like 



papilla closed by a puckering of the body wall (fig. 7) ; 



spines absent Alcyonidium 



Stolon false, non-septate, representing only the drawn out, 

 narrowed, adherent proximal part of the zoid. Only transverse 

 septum present is usually near point of origin of stolon. Re- 

 mainder of zoid erect, tubular, with orifice squared 8 



Stolons genuine, divided into one or more segments by trans- 

 verse septa. Erect zoids bud directly from stolon or from an 

 intermediate peduncle 9 



Stolons long, zooecia tall (up to 3.8 mm); tentacles number 



8 to 22; gut very long (figs. 12, 13) Nolella 



Stolons shorter, zooecia very tall (up to 4.85 mm) and close 



together; new zoids may sprout from the lateral wall of erect 



zoids; 8 tentacles; funiculus long. In brackish water Victorella 



Stolon broad, tubular, often branches dichotomously; gizzard 



present 10 



Stolon slender, generally not dichotomous ; short or small lat- 

 eral segments (peduncles) arise from it and give rise to zo- 

 oecia 11 




172 Ectoprocts 



10. Zooecia very regularly disposed in a parallel series (forming 

 a double row of closely packed, touching, parallel zoids) 

 either in a continuous or an interrupted spiral around the 

 stolon, or in palisade-like groups (fig. 11); colony arbor- 

 escent Amathia 



10. Zooecia occur in irregularly clumped groups, or singly, along 

 stolon. Zoids soft, flexible, rather transparent. When re- 

 tracted their tips are squared, with corners reinforced. Mem- 

 branous or setigerous collar shorter than in Aeverrillia .... Bowerbankia 



(1) Bowerbankia gracilis , the more common species, has 8 

 tentacles (fig. 8) 



(2) Bowerbankia imbricata, less common, has 10 tentacles 

 (fig. 10) 



11. Gizzard present. Zoids yellowish, horny, husk shaped, with 

 membranous frontal area; occur in pairs near end of each 



internode (fig. 9) Aeverrillia 



11. Gizzard absent 12 



12. Zooecia clavate, with long slender stalk which attaches to 



the stolon peduncles; 12 to 21 tentacles Triticella 



12. Zooecia ovoid to cylindrical, originating from lateral 

 branching sprouts of the stolon. Zooecia sometimes bunched 



up at nodes; 8 tentacles Valkeria 



13. Colony erect 14 



13. Colony recumbent or encrusting 21 



14. Avicularia, vibracula and true ovicells completely absent 17 



14. One or more of the above (avicularia, or vibracula or true 



ovicells) may be present 15 



15. Ovicells and avicularia may be present but both vibracula and 



scuta are absent 18 



15. Either vibracula or scuta, or both, may occur 16 



16. Vibraculum lacking but scutum present Tricellaria 



16. Vibraculum and scutum usually both present (fig. 40) Scrupocellaria 



17. Zoids tiny, single, erect, isolated, glassy, firm walled, and 

 connected basally by stolonate extensions. Proximal part re- 

 cumbent, swollen and punctate near where the upright spoon- 

 shaped part diverges from it. Upright stalk reinforced by 

 fine closely wound spiral thread. Colonies diffuse, white, 

 inconspicuous but very common on bases of Bugula , hydroids and 



other colonial growths (fig. 14) Aetea 



17. Zoids biserial, back to back (fig. 44). New zoids and branches 

 bud from the sides of the zooecia near distal end. Colonies 

 yellowish, bushy. Opesia occupies about half the zooecial 



front and slants obliquely Eucratea 



18. Zooecia uniserial, budding from distal end and also from front- 

 al wall just below the opesia; ovicell on dwarfed zoid; avicul- 

 aria absent (figs. 15, 19) Scruparia 



18. Bird's head type avicularia usually present, zooecia biserial 



or multiserial rather than uniserial 19 




Ectoprocts 173 



19. Colony biserial; zooecia trumpet shaped, divided into three 

 parts; opesia rounded, nearly terminal, at enlarged oblique- 

 ly truncated end of zooecium. Upward facing orifice surround- 

 ed by 4 to 8 extremely long spines. Avicularia and ovicells 

 lateral (fig. 16) Bicellariella 



19. Zooecia not trumpet shaped but more tubular. Opesia very 

 large, occupying from half to nearly the whole of the zooecial 



frontal surface 20 



20. Base of zooecium transverse at its place of origin dorsally 



and proximally; zooecia multiserial (fig. 52) Dendrobeania 



20. Base of zooecium strongly forked at its place of origin dor- 

 sally and proximally. Zoarium biserial to narrowly multiser- 

 ial (figs. 17, 18) Bugula 



Two species are common at Woods Hole: 



(1) Bugula simplex (fig. 17), formerly called B. f labellata , 

 tan in color with flattened, somewhat fan-like fronds. 

 Common in such protected places as the Eel Pond. 



(2) Bugula turrita (fig. 18), yellow to orange-brown; colony 

 of conical form with a marked spiral or whorled arrange- 

 ment of branches. Found in more exposed situations. 



21. Colony a fragile calcareous lace; zooecial front has a large 

 uncalcified membranous area (opesia) ; side walls and their 



inturning ledges (cryptocyst) calcified 23 



21. Zooecial frontal wall more extensively calcified 22 



22. Frontal wall covered by two rows of calcareous flattened ribs 

 (costae) , more or less fused, with rows of pores or perfora- 

 tions where ribs did not quite meet Cribrilin a 



(1) Cribrilina annulata (fig. 28): Frontal costae and rows of 

 pores regular and distinct; avicularia absent; ooecia 

 small. 



(2) Cribrilina punctata (fig. 29): Ooecia large; avicularia 

 present at sides of orifice. 



22. Frontal wall not costate but well calcified except for the 



orifice and possible pores 26 



23. Ovicells absent; avicularia wanting in most species 24 



23. Ovicells and avicularia present; avicularia located proxi- 

 mally or laterally on front wall; opesial spines often 



present 25 



24. Avicularia absent; spines usually present around opesial 

 border (figs. 21, 22, 23). Well developed gymnocyst 



usually present Electra 



24. Avicularia absent from most species. No calcareous spines 

 on opesial walls but tubercular processes may occur at zo- 

 oecial corners. Cryptocyst may develop into a proximal 

 shelf under frontal membrane but a regular gymnocyst (cal- 

 careous outer front wall) is wanting or greatly reduced 

 (fig. 20) Membranipora group 



The genus Membranipora is a temporary" dumping genus" for 

 hard-to-identify "open-faced" species. Species are shifted 

 from it and its daughter genera Conopeum , Acanthodesia , etc. 

 and then returned to the mother genus. Membraniporan classi- 

 fication is still very fluid. 




174 Ectoprocts 



25. Several large blister-like pore chambers present in basal- 

 lateral walls of zoid; they are punctured by communication 

 pores (fig. 24) Callopora 



25. Pore chambers absent; instead, zooecial walls contain sev- 

 eral uniporous or multiporous septules (pore plates) Teqella 



26. Primary orifice without a proximal median tooth, the lyrula 27 



26. Primary orifice rounded to subcircular, with median proximal 



lyrula; cardelles (denticles) usually present 35 



27. Orifice semicircular, with straight proximal border, without 

 a cardelle (denticle) in each corner; median suboral asco- 

 pore present; frontal wall with many pores; avicularia and/ 



or ovicells on some zoids (fig. 25) Micropore 11a 



27. Orifice otherwise; special ascopore absent 28 



28. Proximal border of orifice forms a shallow cradle-like si- 

 nus as wide or wider than the rest of the orifice. Front- 

 al wall coarsely perforated all over 29 



28. Proximal border of orifice forms a sinus narrower than the 

 rest of the orifice (a "keyhole" orifice) ; frontal wall ei- 

 ther areolate or with pores all over 30 



29. Orifice somewhat bell shaped because of sinus width (fig. 30); 



avicularia and ovicells absent Cryptosula 



29. Orifice rounded; perforate ovicells and occasional avicular- 

 ia present Hippodiplosia 



30. Orifice with beaded distal vestibular arch separated from 

 the wide proximal sinus by a broad bicusped or bifid car- 

 delle at each side. Ovicell with large uncalcified front- 

 al area 



Hippoporina contracta (fig. 26) but not other Hippoporinae 



30. Orifice arch not beaded; ovicells and cardelles not as 



above 31 



31. Avicularia absent; frontal wall non-porous; ovicells with 

 small number of pores; ovicelled zoids of smaller size 



than autozoids 32 



31. Avicularia present; frontal wall variously porous 33 



32. Male zoid with rounded notched orifice like that of auto- 

 zoid, but smaller; cardelles unicusped or bicusped; female 

 gonozoid orifice differently shaped from that of autozoid. 

 Female gonozoid on same face of colony as autozoids. Col- 

 ony small, vitreous, uniserial to multiserial (fig. 27) Hippo thoa 



32. Female gonozoid on back surface of autozoids. Colony uni- 

 serial or biserial Haplota 



33. Frontal wall a tremocyst, i.e., perforated all over by pores; 



cardelles small or wanting; ovicells generally with pores 34 



33. Frontal wall imperforate except for areolar pores; ovicell 

 evenly perforated by pores; small oral avicularium on asym- 

 metrical suboral umbo; other avicularia elsewhere, of var- 

 ious shapes and sizes (fig. 36) 

 Schismopora and some of the other Celleporae 




Ectoprocts 175 



34. Avicularium present in midline proximal to orifice Schizomavella 



34. Avicularium not in midline below orifice but located 



elsewhere about orifice or frontal (figs. 32-35) Schizoporella 



35. Avicularia present 36 



35. Avicularia absent; frontal wall imperforate except for 



areolar pores; ovicell imperforate Mucronella 



36. A median suboral avicularium present 37 



36. Avicularium not median nor suboral; frontal wall areolate 

 but not perforated centrally; avicularia may be peripheral 



(fig. 31) Parasmittina 



37. Suboral avicularium median and longitudinally directed 38 



37. Suboral avicularium transverse or obliguely placed on a 

 suboral umbo just in front of or partly obscuring the ori- 

 fice Rhamphos tome 11a 



38. Frontal wall and ovicell perforated by pores all over the 

 central area; sometimes the median suboral avicularium be- 

 comes incorporated into the peristomial collar in old zo- 



oecia Smittina 



38. Frontal wall imperforate except for areolar pores 39 



39. Ovicell center area perforate Smittoidea 



39. Ovicell usually imperforate, or at most with an occasional 



pore Porella 



ANNOTATED LIST OF ECTOPROCTA 

 (Figures of genera mentioned in key are not mentioned here) 



CLASS GYMNOLAEMATA Allman, 1856 



Order Cyclostomata (= Stenolaemata or Stenostomata) 



Crisia cribraria Stimpson, 1853. Rare. At Crab Ledge. 



Crisia denticulata (Lamarck, 1836) . Doubtful identification. 



Crisia eburnea (Linnaeus, 1758). Delicate white brittle upright slender branching 



sprigs. Common on algae, especially Chondrus crispus , drif tweed and holdfasts. 



Disporella hispida (Fleming, 1828) . Flat rounded white calcareous patches resemb- 

 ling lichens; about 1/8 inch in diameter; edges crinkly, center part with 

 slightly raised tubes or jagged projections. On algae, hydroids, bryozoa and 

 stones . 



Lichenopora verrucaria (Fabricius, 1780). On stems of Bugula . Eucratea , hydroids, 

 and on shells and stones. About 1/8 inch in diameter. 



Oncousoecia diastoporides (Norman, 1868). Fig. 37; Stomatopora of some authors. 

 Rare, from Crab Ledge. 



Tubulipora atlantica (Johnston, 1847). At Crab Ledge, on stones and shells. 



Tubulipora flabellaris (Fabricius, 1780). Fig. 43. Uncommon, on shells and stones 

 at Crab Ledge and near Nantucket. 



Tubulipora liliacea (Pallas, 1766). Uncommon, on algae, eel grass, shells and stems 

 of hydroids and Bugula , in Vineyard Sound. 



Order Ctenostomata Busk, 1852 



Aeverrillia armata (Verrill, 1873) . On piles and seaweed ( Laminaria and Phyllo - 

 phora ) . 




176 Ectoprocts 



Aeverrillia setigera (Hincks, 1887) . On hydroids and such algae as Chondrus and 

 Ascophyllum . Indistinguishable in field from Aeverrillia armata . 



Alcyonidium gelatinosum (Linnaeus, 1767). Questionable. 



Alcyonidium hirsutum (Fleming, 1828) . Vineyard Sound, on algae. 



Alcyonidium parasiticum (Fleming, 1828). Vineyard Sound, Crab Ledge and No Man's 

 Land. 



Alcyonidium polvoum (Hassall, 1841). A. mytili of Osburn ' s 1912 paper. Encrusts 

 piles, barnacles, stones, algae, shells, Libinia crab, and even skate egg cas- 

 es. Color very variable, from gray to yellow to red to brown. 



Alcyonidium verrilli Osburn, 1912. Rare at Vineyard Sound. 



Amathia vidovici (Heller, 1867). A. dichotoma of Osburn ' s 1912 paper. Common, on 

 piles, rocks, oyster shells and algae. 



Anquinella palmata Van Beneden, 1845. Rare, mud encrusted. Not in key. 



Bowerbankia gracilis var . caudata (Hincks, 1877). On stones, shells, ascidians, 

 and on stems of hydroids, bryozoa and algae. 



Bowerbankia gracilis Leidy, 1855. On piles, stones, and about 18 species of sea- 

 weeds . 



Bowerbankia imbricata (Adams, 1800) . The least common Bowerbankia , indistinguish- 

 able in field from B. gracilis . Colonies pinkish in breeding season (July 

 and August) because of reddish larvae. Found on algae ( Chondrus , Fucus, As - 

 cophyllum , Corallina ) . 



Flustrellidra hispida (Fabricius, 1780) . Once known as Flustra or Flustrella . 



Forms a brown, rubbery crust on such algae as Ascophyllum , Chondrus , Fucus , 

 Ulva. 



Nolella blakei Rogick, 1949. On Perophora from Lagoon Pond, Martha's Vineyard. 



Triticella elongata (Osburn, 1912). Commensal on legs, shells or branchial cham- 

 bers of such crabs as Callinectes sapidus , Libinia , and on pinnotherid crabs 

 in Chaetopterus tubes. 



Triticella pedicellata (Alder, 1857) . Recorded as Vesicularia f amiliaris in Os- 

 burn 's 1912 paper. On algae. 



Valkeria uva (Linnaeus 1758) . From Vineyard Sound, on hydroids and bryozoa. 



Victorella pavida K ent, 1870. Membranous, soft, white tracery or tuft; in brack- 

 ish water. 



Order Cheilostomata Busk, 1852 

 Suborder Anasca Levinsen, 1909 



Aetea anguina (Linnaeus, 1758). Tiny but common on stems of algae, and animals, 



and on stones and shells. 

 Aetea recta Hincks, 1861. The Aetea sica of Rogick and Croasdale's 1949 paper. 



On about 18 algal species. Pinkish larvae found in July and August. 

 Amphiblestrum f lemingii (Busk, 1854). Fig. 49; Membranipora f lemingii in Osburn, 



1912. On shells, stones and algae. Not in key. 

 Bicellariella ciliata (Linnaeus, 1758). On piles, stones, shells and hydroids. 



Embryos in ovicells in July and August. 

 Bugula avicularia (Linnaeus, 1758). Not in key; see fig. 50. 

 Bugula cucullif era Osburn, 1912. Not in key; see Rogick and Croasdale (1949). 



On algae ( Fucus , Laminaria , Rhodymenia and Phyllophora ) along with Aetea and 



Crisia . 

 Bugula simplex Hincks, 1886. This has been extensively used experimentally under 



the name of B. f labellata . Forms thick yellow-orange tufts in protected 



places such as floats in Eel Pond and piles elsewhere. 

 Bugula turrita (Desor, 1848). Occurs in more exposed situations than B. simplex , 



and easily recognized by its spiral growth. Also much used in laboratory 



studies. Larvae released from late June throughout August. Grows on at 



least 16 algal species. 




Ectoprocts 177 



Bugulopsis peachii var ■ berinqia Kluge, 1952. Fig. 47. Cellularia peachii in 

 Osburn 1912. Rare; on shells and on Dendrobeania murrayana . Not in key. 



Caberea ellisii (Fleming, 1818). Fig. 41; on shells and pebbles. Not in key. 



Callopora aurita (Hincks, 1877) . Formerly in Membranipora . Small white colonies 

 on rocks and less commonly on such algae as Phyllophora , Phycodrys an< 3 hold- 

 fasts of Laminaria . 



Callopora craticula (Alder, 1857). {- Membranipora formerly). On shells and 

 stones . 



Callopora lineata (Linnaeus, 1767). (= Membranipora in Osburn 1912). Rare; on 

 shells, stones and algae. 



Cauloramphus cymbaeformis (Hincks, 1877) . Fig 38; formerly in Membranipora . En- 

 crusting stalks of hydroids and Dendrobeania murrayana . 



Cellaria fistulosa (Linnaeus, 1758). Not in key. 



Conopeum reticulum (Linnaeus, 1767). Fig. 39; Membranipora lacroixii of Osburn, 

 1912, and Rogick and Croasdale, 1949. Delicate encrusting lace on rocks, 

 shells and less frequently on such algae as Ascophyllum , Fucus and Phyllo - 

 phora ; sometimes covers an area of several square inches. 



Cribri lina annulata (Fabricius, 1780). Rare; on stones, shells, and algae ( Phyco - 

 drys and Laminaria ) . 



Cribri lina punctata (Hassall, 1841) . Not common, but has been found encrusting 

 shells, pebbles and 7 algal species. 



Dendrobeania murrayana (Johnston, 1847). Height 0.5 to 1.5 inches; common in 

 outer waters from dredged shells and pebbles. 



Electra crustulenta (Pallas, 1766) . As Membranipora monostachys in fig. 29b of 

 Plate XXII, Osburn (1912). 



Electra hastinqsae Marcus, 1938. As Membranipora monostachys in fig. 29a of Plate 

 XXII, Osburn (1912). Mostly on rocks and shells but occasionally on Fucus , 

 Laminaria , and even on gill chambers of the spider crab Libinia . 



Electra pilosa (Linnaeus, 1767). Very common on Laminaria ; occurs also on about 



16 other algal species, as a fine calcareous lace, one layer thick, sometimes 

 a foot in length. 



Eucratea loricata (Linnaeus, 1758) . Bushy phytoid colonies up to 10 inches high 

 in outer waters (Crab Ledge, Nantucket, and No Man's Land). Formerly called 

 Gemellaria . 



Membranipora tenuis Desor, 1848. Cryptocyst forms a jagged shelf that covers the 

 proximal half of the opesia. Encrusts stones and shells. 



Membranipora tuberculata (Bosc, 1802) . (= Membranipora tehuelca ) . Exceedingly 

 abundant on Sargassum , sometimes on Laminaria and drif tweeds. 



Scruparia ambigua (d'Orbigny, 1841) . Fig. 19. Found on Bugula turrita and about 

 11 algal species ( Laminaria , Fucus , etc.). 



Scruparia chelata (Linnaeus, 1758). Fig. 15. Not common, but has been reported 

 on bryozoa, hydroids and algae, and also on piles. 



Scrupocellaria scabra (Van Beneden, 1848). Rare; on shells, stones and in drift. 



Tegella arctica (d'Orbigny, 1851). (= Membranipora) ■ Colonies one inch in dia- 

 meter, on shells and stones. 



Tegella armifera (Hincks, 1880) . Membranipora arctica var. armifera of Osburn 

 (1912) . 



Tegella unicornis (Fleming, 1828). (= Membranipora ) . Encrusts dredged shells. 



■rncellaria gracilis (Smitt, 1867). Menipea ternata in Osburn's 19l2 paper. At- 

 taches to shells, stones, hydroids and bryozoans . 



Suborder Ascophora Levinsen, 1909 



Cellepora avicularis Hincks, 1860. Cellepora americana in Osburn, 1912. On algae 

 and stems of hydroids and bryozoans. 



Cellepora canaliculata Busk, 1881. On hydroids and bryozoans. 



Cellepora dichotoma Hincks, 1862. On such algae as Chondrus , Gracilaria and Phyllo - 

 phora . See fig. 36. 




178 Ectoprocts 



Cryptosula pallasiana (Moll, 1803) . (= Lepralia ) . Living colonies an orange color, 

 especially around the periphery. Colonies flat, calcareous, about 2 cm in dia- 

 meter; common on rocks and shells; also occur on about 11 species of algae such 

 as Laminaria , Fucus , Ascophyllum , Ulva , etc. 



Cylindroporella tubulosa (Norman, 1868). Fig. 51. Porina tubulosa in Osburn, 1912. 

 On stones and shells, in outer waters; not common. Not in key. 



Haplota clavata (Hincks, 1857). Fig. 42. (- Scruparia ) . Rare; on Dendrobeania mur - 

 rayana and Eucratea loricata . 



Hippodiplosia americana (Verrill, 1875). (- Lepralia ) . On shells and stones; col- 

 onies white to reddish. 



Hippodiplosia pertusa (Esper, 1796). (Formerly Lepralia ) . White to reddish cal- 

 careous colonies of considerable extent on rocks and shells. 



Hippoporina contracta (Waters, 1899). Lepralia serrata of Osburn. White to buff- 

 colored calcareous colonies encrusting rocks, shells and some algae (Phyllo - 

 phora ) . Zoids small and crowded. The beaded orifice is distinctive. 



Hippothoa divaricata Lamouroux, 1821. On stones, shells and occasional algae; rare. 



Hippothoa hyalina (Linnaeus, 1767) . Exceedingly common and cosmopolitan species, 



encrusting red and brown algae especially but also found on stones, shells, hy- 

 droids and bryozoans . Forms tiny glistening white to irridescent patches about 

 2 or 3 mm in diameter, usually twining around small algal stems or in protect- 

 ed spots, as on holdfasts. Embryos plentiful in July and August. 



Micropore 11a ciliata (Pallas, 1766) . On rocks, shells and 5 algal species. 



Microporella ciliata var . Stella ta (Verrill, 1875). On shells. 



Mucronella immersa (Fleming, 1828) . Mucronella peachii in Osburn, 1912. On stones 

 and shells; occasionally on algae. 



Mucronella ventricosa (Hassall, 1842). Rare; on stones and shells. 



Parasmittina nitida (Verrill, 1875) . Smittina trispinosa var. nitida of Osburn. 



Colonies very fine grained; form lightweight multilayered porous nodules sever- 

 al inches in diameter; color gray to sulfur yellow. Abundant in dredgings. 



Parasmittina trispinosa (Johnston, 1838). On stones, shells, and occasionally on 

 algae. Colonies whitish to yellow. 



Porella acutirostris Smitt, 1867. On shells and stones; colonies rounded, pattern 

 often of great regularity. At Crab Ledge. 



Porella concinna (Busk, 1852). Common at Crab Ledge on stones and shells. 



Porella proboscidea Hincks, 1888. White or yellow frilly bilaminate colonies ris- 

 ing erect from a base that encrusts shells, stones, and the ascidian Boltenia , 

 sometimes several inches high; from Nantucket Shoals, No Man's Land, and Crab 

 Ledge. 



Porella propinqua (Smitt, 1867). On shells and hydroid stems. 



Rhamphos tome 11a bilaminata (Hincks, 1877). On hydroid stems. 



Rhamphos tome 11a costata Lorenz, 1886. Colony encrusts stems of various kinds, ris- 

 ing frill-like to a height of one-half inch; at Crab Ledge and Nantucket Shoals. 



Rhamphos tome 11a ovata (Smitt, 1868). Rare, encrusting stones and shells. 



Schizomavella auriculata (Hassall, 1842) . (= Schizoporella ) . Colorless to yellow 

 to reddish colonies encrust stones, shells and occasionally hydroid stems; at 

 Crab Ledge and Nantucket Shoals. 



Schizoporella biaperta (Michelin, 1841-42) . (= Stephanosella) . Multilaminate ruf- 

 fly reddish-orange colonies encrust piles, stones, shells, hydroid stems and 

 9 algal species ( Chondrus , Fucus , Laminaria , etc.). 



Schizoporella unicornis (Johnston, 1847) . Multilaminate red calcareous colonies 



encrust shells, stones, piles, worm tubes and 6 algal species ( Chondrus , Fucus , 

 Laminaria , etc) . 



Smittina majuscula Nordgaard, 1905. Smittia porifera of Osburn ' s 1912 paper. Col- 

 ony encrusts stones, shells and stems of various kinds; off Nantucket and Crab 

 Ledge. 



Stomachetosella sinuosa (Busk, 1860). Fig. 45. (= Schizoporella ) . Circular red, 



purple or brown colonies encrust stones and shells at Crab Ledge. Not in key. 




Ectoprocts 179 



Umbonula arctica (Sars, 1851). Fig. 46. Mucronella pavonella of Osburn ' s 1912 

 paper. Colony encrusts stones and shells or forms fan shaped expansions on 

 stems of hydroids, etc. Not common. Not in key. 



REFERENCES ON ECTOPROCTA 



Bassler, R. S., 1953. Bryozoa: 253 pp. Part G of R. C. Moore ' s "Treatise on Inver- 

 tebrate Paleontology." Geological Soc . of America, univ. of Kansas Press. Law- 

 rence, Kans . Exceedingly useful for both recent and fossil genera. 



Borg, F., 1944. The Stenolaematous Bryozoa. Further Zool. Results Swedish Antarc- 

 tic Exped. 1901-1903. Ill (5): 1-276, 16 plates. Includes many comments and 

 revisions on other than Antarctic species. 



Harmer, S. F., 1923. On Cellularine and other Polyzoa. Jour. Linn. Soc. Zool. 



35 : 293-361; 3 plates. Very important morphological paper settling some taxo- 

 nomic questions. 



Harmer, S. F., 1957. The Polyzoa of the Siboga Expedition, Part IV, Cheilostomata 

 Ascophora. . .Resultats Siboga-Expedit. XXVIIId (Livr. 145): 641-1147; 33 plates. 



Hincks,T, 1880. A history of British Marine Polyzoa, 2 vols., London, England. A 

 classic reference. 



Hyman, L. H., 1959. "The Invertebrates", vol V., Smaller Coelomate Groups. McGraw- 

 Hill Book Co., New York, N.Y. Ectoprocta on pp. 275-515. The most comprehen- 

 sive compilation on the subject. 



Kluge, G. A., 1962. Mshanki Severnih Morei SSSR. (Bryozoa of the Northern Seas of 

 the USSR). (In Russian). Fauna USSR #76, Akademia Nauk USSR, Zool. Institute, 

 Leningrad. 584 pp. Very good figures. 



Lagaaij, R. , 1952. The Pliocene Bryozoa of the Low Countries. Mededelingen van de 

 Geologische Stichting, Ser. C, V(5) : 1-233; 26 plates. 



Marcus, E-, 1940. Mosdyr (Bryozoa eller Polyzoa). Danmark ' s Fauna, Dansk Natur- 

 historisk Forening 46, 401 pp.; G. E. C. Gads Forlag, Kizfoenhavn, Danmark. Ex- 

 cellent handbook for identification. 



Osburn, R. C, 1912. The Bryozoa of the Woods Hole Region. Bull. U. S. Bur. Fish. 

 (1910), 30: 205-266; pi. 18-31. 



Osburn, R.C., 1950 .Bryozoa of the Pacific Coast of America. Part 1. Cheilostomata- 



Anasca. Allan Hancock Pacific Exped. 14(1): 1-269, pi. 1-29. Univ. of Southern 

 Calif. Press, Los Angeles, Calif. 



Osburn, R. C, 1952. Part 2. Cheilostomata-Ascophora Ibid . , 14(2): 271-611; pi. 

 30-64. 



Osburn, R. C, 1953. Part 3. Cyclostomata, Ctenostomata, Entoprocta, and Addenda. 

 Ibid . , 14(3): 613-841; pi. 65-82. 



Prenant, M. et G. Bobin, 1956. Bryozoaires, Iere Partie, Entoproctes, Phylactolames, 

 Ctenostomes. Faune de France, 6_0: 1-398. Very usable. 



Rogick, M., 1940. An ecological effect of the New England hurricane. Ohio Jour. 

 Sci., 40 (3) : 163-167. 



Rogick, M., 1945. Calcining specimens. Amer . Biol. Teacher, £5: 66-70. 



Rogick, M. , 1949. Studies on marine Bryozoa, IV. Nolella blakei , n. sp. Biol. Bull., 

 97 : 158-168. 



Rogick, M., 1956. Bryozoa of the U. S. Navy's 1947-48 Antarctic Expedition, I-IV, 

 Proc. U. S. Nat. Mus., Smithsonian Inst., 105 (3358) : 221-317; 35 pi. 



Rogick, M. and H. Croasdale, 1949. Studies on marine Bryozoa, III. Woods Hole re- 

 gion Bryozoa associated with algae. Biol. Bull., 96: 32-69. 



Ryland, J. S., 1960. The British Species of Bugula (Polyzoa). Proc. Zool. Soc. Lon- 

 don, 134 (1) : 65-105. Exceedingly useful for identification of some troublesome 

 Bugulae . 



Ryland, J. S., 1962. Biology and identification of intertidal Polyzoa. Field Stud- 

 ies, I_(4) : 19 pp. 



Silen, L., 1944. On the formation of the interzoidal communications of the Bry- 

 ozoa. Zooloogiska Bidrag fran Uppsala. Band 22^: 433-488. Excellent account of 

 the various types of interzoidal communications, pores, chambers, etc. 




180 Ectoprocts 



Soule J. D., 1957. Two species of Bryozoa Ctenostomata from the Salton Sea. Bull. 



So. Calif. Acad. Sci . , 56(1): 21-30. Adult Nolella blakei and Victorella pavida . 

 Zoological Record: Bryozoa (Polyzoa) Section. An annual publication dating from 



1864 to the present; indispensable for any worker in the group. 



Plate 23 



ENTOPROCTA AND ECTOPROCTA 



Figures 1, 7, and 11 after Osburn 1912; figs. 2, 

 4-6, 8-10 after Rogick and Croasdale 1949; figs. 

 3 and 12-13 after Rogick 1949; all redrawn by 

 Mrs. Emily Reid 



Fig. 1. Loxosoma davenporti . 



2 . Pedicellina cernua . 



3. Barentsia laxa . 



4. Crisia eburnea : note inflated ovicell and joints or nodes. 



5. Disporella hispida , a complete small colony. 



6. Flustrellidra hispida , portion of colony; note spines and 

 slit-like closure of orifices. 



7. Alcyonidium verrilli , portion of colony; note puckered clo- 

 sure of orifices. 



8. Bowerbankia gracilis , zoids with retracted tentacles. 



9. Aeverrillia armata , portion of colony; note paired zooecia on 

 short peduncles, and the 4 terminal spines on each zooecium. 



10. Single polypide of Bowerbankia imbricata with tentacles extend- 

 ed; note setigerous collar directly below the tentacles, here 

 constricting the tentacle sheath. 



11. Amathia vidovici ; note close-set spiral bands of zoids. 



12. Nolella blakei , retracted individual, very young, with squared 

 orifice . 



13. Nolella blakei , very young zoid, with tentacles extended. The 

 four basal extensions are "false" stolons. The bottom right 

 represents the attenuated proximal end of the shown zoid. The 

 other three are cut off by septa from the base of the shown 

 zoid and likewise represent the proximal extensions of their 

 own zoids. 




Plate 23 



8 




182 



Plate 24 



ECTOPROCTA (2) 



Figures 15, 16, 20 and 21 after Osburn (1912); 

 rest after Rogick and Croasdale (1949), redrawn 

 by Mrs. Emily Reid 



Figure 14A, B. Aetea recta , note proximal recumbent parts of zoids, 

 connected by stolonate extensions. 



15. Scruparia chelata; a zoid at left bears ooecium. Opesia oblique 

 and shorter than in §_. ambiqua . 



16. Bicellariella ciliata : A, portion of colony; B, ovicell borne 

 on a zoid; C, avicularium with serrated beak. 



17. Bugula simplex : small part of branch, with 3 bird head avi- 

 cularia and 3 overhanging ovicells. 



18. Bugula turrita : small part of branch, shows 4 ovicells and one 

 bird head avicularium. Note spines on zooecia. 



19. Scruparia ambiqua , portion of colony arising from basal attached 

 row of zooecia. Opesia parallel to back wall and longer than in 

 S^. chelata . 



20. Membranipora tuberculata : note large opesia and pairs of tubercles. 



21. Electra crustulenta , a more or less spineless species. 



22. Electra pilosa , a lightly calcified spiny species. Note porous 

 gymnocyst (frontal proximal wall) , and spines bordering opesia. 



23. Electra hastingsae , a species with delicate spines, sometimes 

 lacking or broken off. 



24. Callopora aurita, part of a colony showing 9 zooecia, 10 ovicells 

 (with triangular front area) and 13 avicularia (some smaller than 

 others) . 



25. Microporella ciliata: note the spine bordered hemispherical ori- 

 fice under which is a small median crescent shaped ascopore. 

 Four globose ovicells at bottom conceal orifices. 



26. Hippoporina contracta: note bifid denticles and beaded arches of 

 the orifices. Ovicells are not pictured but note spatulate avi- 

 cularia on the two extreme right zoids, and areolar pores. 




Plate 24 




184 



Plate 25 



ECTOPROCTA (3) 



Figure 30 after Osburn, rest after Rogick 

 and Croasdale, all redrawn by Mrs. Emily Reid 



Fig. 27. Hippo thoa hyalina , one ooecium at upper right of group. 



28. Cribrilina annulata , no ooecia shown. 



29. Cribrilina punctata , three ooecia shown at right in group. 



30. Cryptosula pallasiana . 



31. Parasmittina trispinosa , portion of colony without ooecia. 

 Note avicularia beside orifices. 



32. Schizoporella unicornis , portion of colony without ooecia. 

 Note avicularia beside orifices. 



33. Schizoporella unicornis , zooecia with ovicells. 



34. Schizoporella biaperta , heavily calcified portion of colony; 

 note avicularia close to orifices. 



35. Schizoporella biaperta , portion of less heavily calcified 

 colony, without ovicells. 



36. Cellepora dichotoma , portion of colony, with ovicells. Note 

 avicularium borne on umbo on front of each zooecium. 




Plate 25 



28 



29 



32 




186 Plate 26 



ECTOPROCTA (4) 



Figures modified from indicated sources; 

 redrawn by Mary Rogick. Some of the gen- 

 era figured are not in the key. 



Fig. 37. Colony fragment of Oncousoecia diastoporides , after fig. 12A of Osburn, 1912. 



38. Five zoids and two pedicellate avicularia of Cauloramphus cymbaeformis . after 

 figs. 36, 36A of Osburn, 1912. 



39. Five zoids of Conopeum reticulum , after fig. 9 of Rogick, 1940. The large ope- 

 sia is here blacked in. 



40. Branch of Scrupocellaria scabra , after Plate 6, fig. 7 of Hincks, 1880, showing 

 frontal and lateral avicularia, and scuta (aperture shields) . 



41. Caberea ellisi from dorsal aspect, showing three long vibracula, after PI. 8, 

 fig. 7 of Hincks, 1880. 



42. Haplota clavata from dorsal aspect, showing ovicell arising from back of zoid 

 on branch at left; from fig. 107 of Marcus, 1940. Detail of aperture (orifice) 

 above at right . 



43. Very young colony of Tubulipora flabellaris . showing the "primitive disc" at 

 point of colony origin; after PI. 64, fig. 2 of Hincks, 1880. 



44. Eucratea loricata , showing back-to-back zooecia, from fig. 16 of Osburn, 1912. 



45. Three zoids and an ovicell (at bottom) of Stomachetosella sinuosa . from fig. 

 51 of Osburn, 1912. 



46. Umbonula arctica. zoid with 2 adventitious avicularia and the characteristically 

 large orifice; from fig. 16 of Osburn, 1912. Note the areolar pores and small 

 denticle or umbo (not a lyrula) . 



47. A single internode of Bugulopsis peachii var . beringa after fig. 20 bis of Os- 

 burn, 1912. Note dark "joints" at bottom and top. 



48. A composite diagram, modified from fig. 116 of Bassler, 1953, showing two mem- 

 braniporid zoids, and a vicarious (independent) avicularium at right. The low- 

 est zoid shows a pointed adventitious frontal avicularium. This zoid's non- 

 porous frontal surface is an olocystal gymnocyst. The upper zoid has a frontal 

 wall with pores, a tremocystal gymnocyst. The cryptocyst is the shelf immediate- 

 ly framinj the opesia. The cap shaped structure overhanging the distal end of 

 the top zoid is an ovicell. 



49. An ovicelled zoid of Amphible strum f leminqii similar to Callopora except for 

 the design on the ovicell; after fig. 38 of Osburn, 1912. 



50. Dorsal surface of a Bugula avicularia branch, showing the forked proximal ends 

 of zoids (where zoids originate distally and dorsally) , after PI. 10, fig. 2 of 

 Hincks, 1880. 



51 A, 51B, 51C. Cylindroporella tubulosa , after figs. 43, 43A, 43C of Osburn, 1912. 

 Fig. 51A is a side view of an ovicelled zoid; fig. 51B is the frontal view of 

 another ovicelled zoid; 53C shows several bottle shaped autozoids . 



52. Dorsal surface showing the transverse proximal ends of Dendrobeania murrayana ; 

 after Pi. 14, fig. 6 of Hincks, 1880. 




Plate 26 




188 Chapter XVIII 



PHYLUM ECHINODERMATA 



Keys axe provided for the common members of four classes of living echinoderms 

 (the Crinoidea are not represented at Woods HoleX These classes may be recognized as 

 such without difficulty, except in the case of the very worm-like synaptid holothur- 

 ians. Keys revised with the help and advice of John M. Anderson. Figure references 

 are to Plate 27. 



I. Class Asteroidea 

 (Sea stars or starfishes) 



1. Arms bear prominent spines; tube feet in 4 rows Asterias 2 



1. Arms bear only numerous minute spines; tube feet in two rows 3 



2. Arms tend to be blunt and cylindrical; skeleton firm; jaws 



of major pedicellariae (on adambulacral spines) bx'oad and blunt 



(fig. 1); colors usually dark, brown to greenish black; common 



Asterias forbesi 



2. Arms pointed and somewhat flattened; skeleton rather soft; 



usually a line of spines on upper surface of each arm; jaws of 



major pedicellariae tapering and pointed (fig. 2); colors lighter, 



yellowish to lavender; rare south of Cape Asterias vulgaris 



3. Five arms; usually crimson above, yellow below; small; more com- 

 mon north of Cape Henricia sanguinolenta 



3. Nine to eleven arms; up to 25 cm across; found north of the Cape 



Solaster endeca 



II. Class Ophiuroidea 

 (Brittle stars, serpent stars) 



1. Lateral spines on arms short 2 



1. Lateral spines on arms prominent 3 



2. Disc granulated, with no distinct scales; 2 pairs of slits leading 



into genital bursae at base of each arm (fig. 3) . . . . Ophio derma brevispina 



2. Disc covered with small scales; only one pair of slits leading 

 into genital bursae at base of each arm (fig. 4) ; found only 



north of the Cape Ophiura robusta 



3. Three lateral arm spines on each joint (fig. 5); small, gray and 



white Amphipholis squamata 



3. Five or six lateral arm spines on each joint (fig. 6); color 



variable, often bright ; arms often banded Ophiopholis aculeata 



III. Class Echinoidea 

 (Sea urchins, sand dollars) 



1. Flat and disc-like; very numerous minute spines Echinarachnius parma 



1. Globular, with prominent spines 2 



2. Color purplish, brownish, or blackish, spines long and stout; 



the common sea urchin about Woods Hole Arbacia punctulata 



2. Color greenish or yellowish; spines short, slender, and more 



numerous; much more common north of the Cape 



Strongylocentrotus drobachiensis 




Echinodermata 189 



IV. Class Holothuroidea 

 (Sea cucumbers) 



1. Body wall muscular and opaque; typical tube feet present; 10 



branching tentacles surround mouth 2 



1. Body wall thin, transparent, showing 5 longitudinal ("radial") 

 muscle strands; 12 pinnately branched tentacles about mouth; 

 tube feet absent; worm-like in appearance, tending to adhere 



to fingers when handled 4 



2. Tube feet scattered over body, not confined to five adambulacral 



rows Thyone briareus 



2. Tube feet mostly in 5 rows Cucumaria 3 



3. Large (up to 30 cm); color some shade of brown; north of Cape 



Cucumaria frondosa 



3. Small (up to 6 cm); color grayish or pale; south of Cape 



Cucumaria pulcherrima 



4. Color whitish; tentacular digits 4-6 pairs plus terminal digit 

 (variable) ; usually in sand (see note in check list) 



Leptosvnapta tenuis 



4. Color pinkish; tentacular digits 2-4 pairs plus terminal digit 

 (variable) ; usually in gravel or under stones (see note in 

 check list) Leptosvnapta roseola 



Note: the two synaptid species can be distinguished by the following internal 



characteristic: In the calcareous ring of L. tenuis each radial plate contains 

 a hole for the passage of the radial nerve (fig. 7) ; in L. r oseola these plates 

 are not pierced but are notched anteriorly (fig. 8). 



ANNOTATED LIST OF ECHINODERMS 

 I. Class Asteroidea 



Asterias austera Verrill, 1895. Found only offshore in deep water. Not in key. 



Asterias forbesi (Desor, 1848) . "Common starfish" south of the Cape. 



Asterias tenera Stimpson, 1862. Not in key. This "slender armed starfish" occurs 

 in deeper water (6-40 meters) both north and south of the Cape, but is not re- 

 corded from Vineyard Sound. 



Asterias vulgaris Verrill, 1866. "Northern starfish"; South of the Cape this spe- 

 cies occurs only in deeper water. 



Henricia sanguinolenta (O. F. Muller, 1776). "Blood starfish", formerly known as 

 Cribrella sanguinolenta . The large yolky eggs are brooded beneath the mother; 

 development is direct, without a free larval stage. 



Solaster endeca (Retzius, 1783). Does not occur at Woods Hole; found north of the 

 Cape. 



II. Class Ophiuroidea 



Amphipholis (formerly Amphiura ) squamata (Delle Chiaje, 1828). One of the commonest 

 ophiuroids of the region, but small and inconspicuous; generally in gravel, 

 stones, or shell. Development direct, in brood pouches of parent. 



Gorgonocephalus agassizi (Stimpson , 1853). Not in key. Remarkable for its dichoto- 

 mously branching arms, the "basket star" or "spider" occurs in northern waters. 

 Known to the tip of the Cape and Nantucket Shoals. It is occasionally brought 

 into Woods Hole by fishermen. 



Ophioderma (formerly Ophiura ) brevispina (Say, 1825) . Very common in protected, 

 grassy bays such as Lagoon Pond. 




190 



Plate 27 



ECHINODERMATA 



From specimens or redrawn from various 

 sources, all by Bruce Shearer. 



Figure 1. Asterias f orbesi . outline of a major pedicellaria, 

 showing blunt form (after Coe) . 



2. Asterias vulgaris . outline of major pedicellaria, showing 

 more elongated form (after Coe) . 



3. Ophioderma brevispina . underside of junction of arm with 

 disc, to show the two pairs of openings of the genital 

 bursae. 



4. Ophiura robusta . underside of junction of arm with disc, 

 showing one pair of openings of genital bursae (after 

 Clark) . 



5. Amphipholis squamata , lateral view of a portion of an arm, 

 to show the three lateral arm spines per joint. 



6. Ophiopholis aculeata , lateral view of a portion of an arm, 

 showing six lateral arm spines per 'joint. 



7. Leptosvnapta tenuis , radial and interradial pieces of cal- 

 careous ring, the radial pierced for the passage of the 

 radial nerve (after Heding) . 



8. Leptosvnapta ( Epitomapta ) roseola , radial and interradial 

 pieces of the calcareous ring, the radial notched anter- 

 iorly (after Heding) . 




Plate 27 




192 



Echinodermata 



Ophiopholis aculeata (Linnaeus, 1767). Uncommon; the "daisy brittle star"; may be found 



in exposed rocky areas, as at Cuttyhunk. 

 Ophiura robusta (Ayres, 1851) . Found only north of the Cape. 



III. Class Echinoidea 



Arbacia punctulata (Lamarck, 1816). "Purple" or "common sea urchin". One of the best 



known sources of embryological material. 

 Echinarachnius parma (Lamarck, 1816). "Sand dollar"; taken by dredging on sandy bottom. 

 Strongylocentrotus drobachiensis (0. F. Miiller, 1776. "Green sea urchin"; taken rather 



rarely in Vineyard Sound, but is the common (and only) urchin north of the Cape. 



IV. Class Holothuroidea 



Caudina arenata (Gould, 1841) . Not in key. This apodous (tube-foot-less) holothurian 

 much resembles a smooth skinned sipunculid with one end drawn out into a sort of 

 tail. It is common in sand north of Boston and has been reported off Cuttyhunk. 



Cucumaria frondosa (Gunnerus, 1770) . This large sea cucumber may be expected only 

 north of the Cape. 



Cucumaria pulcherrima (Ayres, 1854) . A small gray form; may occasionally be taken, 

 or washed up in numbers, on Nobska and Stony Beaches after severe storms. 



Leptosynapta ( Epitomapta ) roseola (Verrill, 1873). Heding (1928, p. 323) considers 

 this form sufficiently distinct to be given subgeneric or even generic rank as 

 Epitomapta roseola . 



Leptosynapta inhaerens , see L eptosynapta tenuis . 



Leptosynapta tenuis (Ayres, 1851) . This species is almost always referred to at Woods 

 Hole as L. inhaerens (0. F. Miiller, 1738). But on the basis of a careful compari- 

 son, Heding (1928) concludes that the "L. inhaerens " of Woods Hole is not of the 

 same species as the "L. inhaerens "of Europe and that the next available name, ten - 

 uis , should be used. The fact of this difference should be borne in mind if ex- 

 perimental results obtained on L. inhaerens in Europe and America are compared. 



Thyone briareus (Lesueur, 1824) . A well known experimental animal, collected in very 

 soft mud in shallow bays. 



Thyone scabra Verrill, 1873. Rare, dredged. Not in key. 



Thyone unisemita (Stimpson, 1851) . Rare, dredged. Not in key. 



REFERENCES 



Clark, H. L, 1904 



for 1902, 22 

 Coe, W. R., 1912. 



Bull, 

 Deichmann 



Bull 

 Heding, S 



XLVI 



The Echinoderms of the Woods Hole region. Bull. U. S. Fish. Com. 



545-576. 



Echinoderms of Connecticut. Conn. State Geol. Nat. Hist. Survey, 

 19: 1-152. 



E., 1930. The holothurians of the western part of the Atlantic Ocean. 

 Mus. Comp. Zool., Harvard, 7_1(3) : 43-266, pi. 1-24. 



G., 1928. Papers from Dr. Th. Mortensen's Pacific Expedition 1914-16, 

 Synaptidae. Vidensk. Medd. Dansk Naturhist. Foren., 8_5: 105-323. 




Chapter XIX 193 



THE " PROTOCHORDATES " 



The term "protochordates" today includes the Phylum Hemichordata, and two subphyla 

 of the Chorda ta, namely: 



A. Subphylum Cephalochordata, with Amphioxus and its kin, not represented locally. 



B. Subphylum Urochordata (- Tunicata) which includes: 



1. Class Ascidiacea, the sessile tunicates, well represented in the Woods Hole 

 fauna and much used in experimental work. 



2. Classes Thaliacea and Larvacea, which are pelagic or planktonic, and are not 

 covered in these keys. 



PHYLUM HEMICHORDATA 



The only common hemichordate of Woods Hole is the well known Saccoglossus kowal - 

 ewskyi (A. Agassiz, 1873) . This occurs intertidally or in shallow water in fine muddy 

 sand where its presence is marked by little piles of fine, stringlike castings. The 

 wormlike body is exceedingly fragile and difficult to collect undamaged. It is easily 

 recognized by the characteristic whitish proboscis, orange collar, and brownish body 

 (plate 28, fig. 1). 



The development of S. kowalewskyi is direct, without drastic metamorphosis, from a 

 ciliated larva. Some confusion has resulted from the claim of Agassiz that S_. kowal - 

 ewskyi arose from the metamorphosis of a planktonic "tornaria" larva. The fact that 

 tornaria larvae do appear in local waters indicates that some other species may exist 

 in not too distant, but probably deeper, waters. 



Agassiz described our common species as Balanoqlossus kowalewskyi ; this was reas- 

 signed to Dolichoglossus by Spengel in 1893, in his well known work on the Enteropneusta 

 of the Gulf of Naples. However, Van der Horst, in his revision of 1939 (Bronn's "Tier- 

 reich", IV:4:2:2) adopted the prior name of Saccoglossus (published by Schimkewitsch in 

 1892), but long overlooked as a consequence of the paper being in Russian). Since there 

 is no question as to the species kowalewskyi (or the variant spelling kowalevskii ) , ex- 

 perimentalists should use the specific name and not merely the generic name in reporting 

 work done on Saccoglossus kowalewskyi at Woods Hole, in order to avoid possible confu- 

 sion to foreign readers. 



PHLYUM CHORDATA 



SUBPHYLUM UROCHORDATA (- TUNICATA) 



Class Ascidiacea 



This section has been compiled from material written and contributed by Drs. Donald 

 J. Zinn and Donald P. Abbott, whose assistance is much appreciated. The key is intended 

 only for identification of ascidians in the Woods Hole region. Information about the 

 anatomy and ecology of these animals may be found in Berrill (1950) and further material 

 on their taxonomy in Van Name (1945). Embryological details are discussed at some length 

 by Berrill (1936). Figure references on ascidians are to plate 28. 



Ascidians show various degrees of colony formation: " simple " ascidians develop sing- 

 ly from eggs and do not bud; individuals in this group are relatively large. Colonial 

 ascidians can reproduce by budding, and form aggregations of several to many small indi- 

 viduals. In " social " ascidians, such as Perophora , the individuals are distinct from 

 each other and are connected only by stolons at their bases (figs. 2, 3). " Compound " 

 ascidians, such as Botryllus , have minute individuals embedded in a common test -or tunic 

 which often has a characteristic growth form (figs. 7, 8). 




194 Ascidiacea 



It is often very difficult to see the anatomical features of fresh, unrelaxed as- 

 cidians, since they contract strongly when dissected. For purposes of laboratory study 

 of anatomy, or if necessary for identification, relaxed and properly preserved speci- 

 mens should be used. Place animals in pans of sea water to which is added Epsom salts 

 (MgS04) , about one heaping teaspoon per liter. After 12-24 hours of anaesthetization, 

 fix for at least an hour before study in 5-10% formalin made up with sea water. This 

 treatment permits easy observation of features nearly impossible to discern in delicate, 

 contractile living forms or in contracted preserved material. Specimens that are kept 

 for more than a couple of weeks should be transferred through 2 changes of 70% alcohol. 

 Large specimens should have slits made in them to facilitate penetration. Fresh speci- 

 mens will usually be easier to study if hardened a little by previous transfer to strong 

 alcohol for a few days. 



In using the following key, note that the branchial or inhalent siphon (morpho- 

 logically the mouth) is considered anterior. Dorsal is defined by the position of the 

 brain and subneural gland, which lie close to the surface between the siphons. The 

 gonads in solitary ascidians are typically conspicuous structures, each consisting of 

 a sac-like ovary on the surface of which may be located the lobes of the testes. 



KEY TO COMMON ASCIDIANS 



1. Colonial ascidians (individuals are small and connected by 



stolons or embedded in common test) ; 



1. Simple ascidians (individuals usually of good size, and al- 

 though they may occur in clusters are not organically con- 

 nected to each other) 



2. Colony thin, flat, encrusting; zooids colorful, and arranged 

 in stellate or subcircular clusters or "systems" (figs. 7, 8); 

 zooids of each system with branchial apertures opening inde- 

 pendently, atrial apertures directed medially and opening into 

 a common cloaca 1 cavity in the tunic Botryllus schlosseri 



2. Colony not as above 3 



3. Colony consisting of numerous tiny (2-4 mm diameter) greenish 

 individuals, connected to one another only by basal stolons 



(social ascidians) (figs. 2,3) Perophora viridis 



3. Colony not as above; individual zooids completely embedded in 



matrix of the common test (compound ascidians) 4 



4. Forming flat encrusting colonies 2-4 mm thick and up to more 

 than 10 cm in diameter; test smooth on surface, opaque because 

 of large numbers of minute stellate calcareous spicules which 

 are white, yellowish, or reddish in color; no postabdomen pre- 

 sent Didemnum candidum 



4. Form of colony otherwise; test not containing stellate calcar- 

 eous spicules, though sometimes with encrusting or embedded 



sand grains; postabdomen present, containing the gonads 5 



5. Colony in the form of massive 'meaty" plates, lumps, or lobes up 

 to several inches long and attached by one edge; tunic very 

 firm; stomachs of zooids bearing about 12 longitudinal ridges 



(fig. 5) Amaroucium stellatum 



5. Colony not as above; stomachs of zooids bearing 20 or more long- 

 itudinal ridges (fig. 4) 6 



6. Colonies low, globular, oval or flat topped, attached by a nar- 

 row base Amaroucium constellatum 



6. Colonies consisting of globular masses built up of radially ar- 

 ranged, transparent, finger-like lobes, which may contain encrusting 

 and embedded sand Amaroucium pellucidum 




Ascidiacea 



195 



7. Branchial siphon with 8 lobes, atrial siphon with 6; body 



elongate, up to several inches long; test grayish, gelatinous, 



transparent enough when expanded to reveal the pharynx with 5-7 



longitudinal muscle bands on each side and the main loop of 



the gut, posterior to the pharynx, basally (fig. 6) Ciona intestinalis 



7. Branchial siphon with 4 or 6 lobes; body and test not as above 8 



8. Branchial aperture (also atrial aperture) square or 4-lobed; 

 dissection shows pharyngeal stigmata straight, elongate, and 



not arranged in spiral or circular fields; no kidney present .... STYELIDAE 9 



8. Branchial aperture usually 6-lobed, atrial aperture usually 

 4-lobed; dissection shows pharyngeal stigmata more or less 

 curved and arranged in circular or spiral fields; kidney pre- 

 sent on the right side MOLGULIDAE 10 



9. Test leathery, tough, irregular, yellowish or brownish in 

 color; when collected often feels like a rough lump of gristly 

 consistency; 2 gonads on each side of the body (figs. 9, 10); 



pharynx with 4 longitudinal folds on each side Styela partita 



9. Test thin, tough, membranous, pinkish to bright red in life, 

 attached by a relatively large area basally; body depressed 

 with long axis usually parallel to the substrate; 1 gonad on 

 the right side (fig. 12), none on the left (fig. 11); pharynx 

 with one longitudinal fold on the right side, none on the left 

 Dendrodoa carnea 



10. Adults live in soft sand or mud substrates, unattached to 



larger objects 11 



10. Adults do not live free in soft sand or mud, but occur attached 

 to larger objects such as gravel, rocks, floats, pilings, marine 



plants, shells 12 



11. Siphons arise close together; body covered with minute fib- 

 rous processes which hold a layer of mud about the body; 

 dissection shows only one gonad, this present on the left 

 side (figs. 13, 14); pharynx lacking longitudinal folds but 

 bearing 7 large internal longitudinal vessels on each side 

 Bostrichobranchus pilularis 



11. Siphons separated at bases by a space greater than 1/5 of 

 body circumference (figs. 15, 16); dissection shows 2 gonads, 

 one on each side of the body; pharynx bearing longitudinal 

 folds on each side, each fold marked by a small group of in- 

 ternal longitudinal vessels Molgula arenata 



12. Very common, attached to eel grass, floats, pilings, etc., 

 in bays; long axes of both gonads straight (figs. 17, 18) 

 Molgula manhattensis 



12. Less common; long axes of one or both gonads conspicuously 



curved 13 



13. Gonads on both sides an inverted U-shape, leaving open ends 

 of oviducts pointed away from the base of the atrial siphon 



(figs. 19, 20) Molgula complanata 



13. Left gonad with an S-shaped or W-shaped curve, right gonad 

 with a straight axis; both gonads with open ends of oviducts 

 curved to point toward the base of the atrial siphon (figs. 

 21, 22) Molgula citrina 




196 



Plate 28 



PROTOCHORDATES 



Figures 1, 3, and 9 from life; rest redrawn 

 from Van Name (1945) ; all by Bruce Shearer. 



Fig. 1. Saccoglossus kowalewskii , whole animal, from life. 



2. Perophora viridis . individual, seen from left side. 



3. Same, colony from life, to show "social" growth habit. 



4. Amaroucium constellatum , zooid with larvae in atrial cavity. Note 

 the numerous stomach ridges. 



5. Amaroucium stellatum , region of stomach, to show the fewer and 

 simpler ridges. 



6. Ciona intestinalis , diagram of body seen from left, to show posi- 

 tion of gut and gonads; branchial sac omitted. 



7. Botryllus schlosseri , single zooid seen from left side. 



8. Same, small colony from life, showing investment in common tunic. 



9. Stye la partita , diagram of body as seen from left and as if wall 

 transparent, branchial sac omitted, showing gut and gonads. 



10. Same, seen from right side, showing gonads. 



11. Dendrodoa carnea, view of left side showing gut. 



12. Same, view of right side, showing gonad. 



13. Bostrichobranchus pilularis , diagram of body seen from left, showing 

 gut and gonad. 



14. Same, from right, showing renal sac. 



15. Molgula arenata , body from left, showing gut and gonad. 



16. Same, body from right, showing renal sac and gonad. 



17. Molgula manhattensis , body from 18. Same, from right, 

 left. 



19. Molgula complanata , body from left. 20. Same, from right. 



21. Molgula citrina , body from left. 22. Same, from right. 




Plate 28 




198 Ascidiacea 



ANNOTATED LIST OF ASCIDIANS 



Order Aplousobranchia 



Family Synoicidae 



Amarouciuni stellatum Verrill, 1871, Massachusetts to Florida. "Sea Pork"; viviparous. 

 Amaroucium constellatum Verrill, 1871. New Hampshire to Florida. Good embryological 



material. Viviparous. 

 Amaroucium pellucidum (Leidy, 1855) . Massachusetts to Florida. In 10-20 meters on 



sand, shells, or gravel in tidal currents. Viviparous. 



Family Didemnidae 



Didemnum candidum lutarium Van Name, 1910. Van Name (1945) considered the form pre- 

 valent at Woods Hole, and extending from southern Maine to the south side of Cape 

 Cod, to be a northern geographical race of D. candidum Savigny, 1816. This may 

 prove erroneous (see Millar, 1962. Studies Fauna Curacao ... 8_: pp. 62-66), but 

 the familiar name D. candidum is retained until further investigation shows the 

 necessity of a change. 



Order Phlebobranchia 



Family Cionidae 



Ciona intestinalis (Linnaeus, 1767). One of larger ascidians of the United States, and 

 one of the best known and most widely distributed of all ascidians. Greenland to 

 Rhode Island. Oviparous. 



Family Perophoridae 



Perophora viridis Verrill, 1871. Although small, its transparent test makes it favor- 

 able for observation of heartbeat, etc. Southern Cape Cod to southern Florida. 

 "Sea grape"; viviparous. 



Order Stolidobranchia 



Family Botryllidae 



Botryllus schlosseri (Pallas, 1766). Very common; colonies most often found encrust- 

 ing in variety of colors on hydroid stems and eel grass leaves. Portland, Maine 

 to West Coast of Florida; viviparous. 



Family Styelidae 



Styela partita (Stimpson, 1852) . Formerly well known as Cynthia partita ; the eggs are 

 classical embryological material. Common on wharf pilings, often with other ascid- 

 ians, from Massachusetts Bay to West Coast of Florida. "Sea peach" (note that the 

 name "sea peach" is also used for the long -stalked ascidian Boltenia, often cast up 

 on beaches north of Cape Cod, and the large solitary Halocynthia aurantium of more 

 northerly waters) . 



Dendrodoa ( Styelopsis ) carnea (Agassiz, 1850). Pinkish to bright red body spreads out 

 on surfaces of stones, dead mussel shells, etc., to which animal is attached. New- 

 foundland to Long Island Sound. Viviparous. 




Ascidiacea 199 



Family Molgulidae 



Bostrichobranchus pilularis (Verrill, 1871) . Size and transparency of test depend on 

 environment. Found on or in mud or sand from one meter to greater depths. Tadpole 

 larvae not formed. St. Lawrence River to Florida. 



Mogula arenata Stimpson, 1852. Commonly unattached; buried; regular, symmetrically 



circular in profile (except between siphons) , disk-like when viewed from above and 

 generally covered with coat of sand grains. South Shore of Cape Cod to Cape May, 

 New Jersey. Tadpole larvae not formed. Oviparous. 



Molgula citrina Alder and Hancock, 1848. Usually attached to hard objects or pilings; 

 vary greatly in appearance and shape; are transluscent dull olive. Gulf of St. 

 Lawrence to Narragansett Bay, Rhode Island. Viviparous. 



Molgula complanata Alder and Hancock, 1870. Unusually long synonymy (see Van Name) ; 



sand and shell encrusted and more or less globular body attached by slender fibrous 

 processes to stones, shells or hard sand from low water to about 300 fathoms. Gulf 

 of St. Lawrence to Martha's Vineyard. Viviparous. 



Molgula manhattensis (DeKay, 1843). Commonest ascidian of this area. Nearly globular 

 body with test irregularly hirsute and usually papillated near siphons; attached 

 to others of same species in large groups or to wharves, pilings, ship bottoms, eel- 

 grass in shallow, polluted, brackish or ordinary sea water. Portland, Me. to N. E. 

 Texas (southern Florida?) Oviparous with larvae developing outside of body of 

 parent. 



Molgula robusta (Van Name, 1912) . Not in key. Differs from M. manhattensis in a) 

 lacking free-swimming larval stage, b) larger average size, c) living at 17-25 

 meters on compacted mud-sand bottoms in areas of tidal currents, unattached and 

 usually on left side, d) long pointed teeth on margin of posterior part of dorsal 

 lamina, and e) reddish purple eggs. Woods Hole Harbor and Vineyard Sound. Ovipar- 

 ous . 



REFERENCES 



Berrill, N. J. 1936. Studies in tunicate development. Part V. The evolution and class- 

 ification of ascidians. Phil. Trans. Roy. Soc, London Ser. B., Vol. _226i 43. 



Berrill, N. J. 1950. The Tunicata. London, Ray Society, 354 pp. 



Grasse, P. P., Ed. 1948. Traite de Zoologie. Tome XI. Echinoderms, Stomocordes, Pro- 

 corde's. pp. 895-919. 



Van Name, W. G. 1945. The North and South American Ascidians. Bull. Amer. Mus . Nat. 

 Hist. 84: pp. 1-476, pi. 1-31. 




200 



GLOSSARY OF THE COMMON AND NON-SCIENTIFIC 

 NAMES USED IN THE WOODS HOLE REGION 



Among non-scientific or "common" names of invertebrates, a relatively small num- 

 ber are truly vernacular, that is, firmly established in the speech of the region 

 and generally known to natives. Some true vernacular names as "horseshoe crab" and 

 "quohog" may actually be more stable than scientific names, and are quite specific. 

 But other vernacular terms such as "rock crab" or "barnacle" lack precision because 

 each applies to more than one species in the region, not distinguishable by the lay- 

 man, or because even if only one species is indicated in a particular region, the 

 same name is used for other species elsewhere. Many so-called common names are not 



vernacular, but may represent anglicized versions of scientific names thus we 



speak of "an ameba", "a hydra", "planar ians" , or "isopods"; such names are general- 

 ly learned in school and are better known to the scientific than to the general pub- 

 lic. They are useful, but not in referring to particular species. Then there are 

 the sometimes barbarous renditions from scientific specific names, such as "Morton's 

 egg cockle" for " Laevicardium mortoni" . Names of this sort are characteristic among 

 groups of animals widely studied by amateurs. In the case of birds and fishes, such 

 names have become fairly well standardized. Among invertebrates, such are most com- 

 monly used for shell bearing molluscs, and since Abbott's "American Seashells" and 

 similar works provide easy reference, we have included few names of this sort. 



The use of synthetic "common" names does nothing to aid the beginning student 

 and is to be discouraged in scientific writing. Likewise, the use of non-specific 

 vernacular names, unless accompanied by the proper scientific name, can lead to 

 great confusion in the literature and should especially be avoided by comparative 

 physiologists and ecologists. Far better to use an "old" but unmistakable scienti- 

 fic name like Nassa obsoleta , Nereis limbata , or Mactra solidissima than a meaning- 

 less vernacular term such as "the clam", "the rock crab", or "the sand worm". 



In the following glossary, we have attempted to include the common vernacular 

 names characteristic of southern New England, as well as names which have been im- 

 ported and have taken root among the Woods Hole scientific community. We make no 

 claims of completeness, and would appreciate criticisms. For the great majority of 

 invertebrates, there are no common names, vernacular or otherwise. 



"Common name " 



Scientific approximation 



" Common name " Scientific approximation 



Acorn barnacles . . . Balanus , Chthamalus 



Acorn worms Hemichordata 



Bamboo worms .... Clymenella , Maldanidae 

 Barnacles . . Cirripedia (shelled types) 



Beach fleas, hoppers Amphipoda 



(various species, esp. 



of family Talitridae) 



Bearded sponges . . Microciona prolifera 



Big fiddler crabs Uca minax 



Black fiddler crabs Uca pugnax 



Black quohogs Arctica islandica 



Blood clams . . Anadara (various species) 

 Blood stars . . . Henricia sanguinolenta 



Blood worms Glycera 



Blue crabs Callinectes sapidus 



Boring sponges . Cliona (several species) 



Bread sponges Halichondria 



Brittle stars Ophiuroidea 



Broken back shrimp Hippo lyte 



Bubble shells Haminoea, etc. 



Calico-back 



fiddler crabs .... Uca pugilator 

 Channeled whelks 



Busycon cana lieu latum 



Cherrystone clams. . young Mercenaria 



Chitons . Polyplacophora (Amphineura) 



Clams . . Various Bivalvia (Mollusca) 



not including the generally 



recognized mussels, scallops, 



oysters, etc. 



Clam worms Nereis 



Columbus's crabs . . . Planes minutus 

 Comb jellies Ctenophora 



Corals Madreporaria and some 



other colonial Anthozoa 

 Dead-man ' s fingers . Alcyonium carneum 



Dog whelks Thais lapillus 



Edible mussels .... Mytilus edulis 



Eel grass Zostera 



Feather -duster worms . . . Sabellidae 




Glossary 



201 



Fiddler crabs Uca (3 species; 



Finger sponges Haliclona oculata 



Fish lice Branchiura ( Arqulus ) 



Flatworms Platyhelminthes 



Goose barnacles . Lepas (several species) 



Grass shrimp Hippo lyte 



Green crabs Carcinus maenas 



Green sea urchins 



. . . . Strongvlocentrotus drobachiensis 



Gribbles Limnoria 



Gulf weed Sarqassum 



Gulf weed crabs Planes minutus 



Hard-shelled clams Mercenaria 



Hermit crabs Pagurus 



Horse conchs Busycon 



Horsehair-snakes Gordiacea 



Horseshoe crabs . . . Limulus polyphemus 



Horse mussels Modiolus modiolus 



Hydra-worms young of Nicolea 



Jack-knife clams .... Siliqua , Tagelus 

 Jellyfishes . Hydromedusae, Scyphomedusae 



Ctenophora 



King crabs (British usage) .... Limulus 



Knobbed whelks Busycon carica 



Lady crabs Ovalipes 



Leathery tunicates Stye la 



Leeches Hirudinea 



Little-necked clams Mercenaria 



Limpets Acmaea testudinalis 



Lion's mane (jellyfish) Cyanea 



Lobsters Homarus 



Long-finned squid Loligo pealei 



Long-necked clams Mya arenaria 



Lug worms Arenicola (3 species) 



Mantis shrimp . Hoplocarida or Stomatopoda 



Mermaid's toenail Anomia 



Mites (marine) Halacaridae 



Moon shells Lunatia , Natica, 



Neverita , Polinices 



Moss animals Bryozoa (Entoprocta and 



Ectoprocta) 



Mud crabs Xanthidae 



Mud shrimp Callianassa , Upogebia 



Mud snails Nassarius obsoletus 



Mussels Mytilus , Modiolus 



Nassa .... Nassarius (several species) 



Northern corals Astrangia danae 



Northern squid Ilex illacebrosus 



Opossum shrimp Mysidacea 



Oysters Crassostrea 



Oyster crabs Pinnotheres 



Oyster drills Urosalpinx 



Pea crabs Pinnotheres 



Periwinkles .... Littorina (3 species) 



Portuguese Man-of-War Physalia 



Prawns Palaemonetes , etc. 



Purple sea urchins . . Arbacia punctulata 



Quahogs, quohogs Mercenaria 



Rag worms . . . Nereis (several species) 



Razor clams Ens is 



Red-jointed fiddler crabs . Uca minax 

 Red sponges . . Microciona prolifera 

 Ribbed mussels . . . Modiolus demissus 



Ribbon worms Nemertea 



Rock crabs .... Cancer (2 species) 



Rock slaters Liqia 



Sand crabs Emerita talpoida 



Sand dollars . . Echinarachnius parma 



Sand moles Emerita talpoida 



Sand shrimp Crangon 



Scale worms . Polynoidae, Sigalionidae 



Scallops Aequipecten , Pecten 



Scud . . various gammarid Amphipoda 



Sea anemones Actinaria 



Sea clams .... Spisula solidissima 

 Sea cucumbers Holothuroidea 



Sea egg . . . sea urchins especially 



. . Strongvlocentrotus drobachiensis 



Sea float Velella mutica 



Sea gooseberry Pleurobrachia 



Sea lettuce ulva 



Sea mice A phroditidae 



Sea peach Boltenia , Stye la 



Sea pens Pennatulacea 



Sea pork Amaroucium 



Sea slugs . . . (mostly) Nudibranchia 

 Sea squirts . . . Ascidiacea, Tunicata 



Sea stars Asteroidea 



Sea urchins . . (regular) Echinoidea 



Sea walnut Pleurobrachia 



Shipworms Teredo , Bankia 



Short-finned squid . Ilex illacebrosus 



Skeleton shrimp Caprellidae 



Soft corals . . . Alcyonium carneum , 



Alcyonaria 

 Soft-shelled clams . . . Mya arenaria 

 Soft-shelled crabs 



. . . post-moult Callinectes sapidus 

 Spider crabs . . Libinia (2 species) , 



Pelia 



Sponges Porifera 



Square -backed 



fiddler crab . Sesarma reticulatum 



Squid, common Loligo pealei 



Starfishes Asteroidea 



Stony or true coral . Astrangia danae, 



Madreporaria 

 Haliplanella luciae 

 Cliona 



Striped anemones 

 Sulfur sponges 

 Summer squid . 

 Surf clams . . 

 Tube -worms . . 



Whale lice . 

 Whelks . . . 

 White shrimp 

 Winkles . . 



. I lex illacebrosus 

 Spisula solidissima 

 . various sedentary 

 Polychaeta 

 Cyami dae ( Capr e 1 li dae) 

 . . . Thais , Busycon 

 Callianassa stimpsoni 

 Littorina (3 species) 




202 



SYSTEMATIC INDEX 



The following index is to genera and higher taxa mentioned in this manual. In 

 general, older synonyms have not been included except for those of experimental ani- 

 mals that have been extensively used at Woods Hole in previous years, and which are 

 widespread in the literature. Specific names of animals, names of plants, localities, 

 authors, and anatomical terms have not been indexed. Underlined page numbers indicate 

 illustrations. For vernacular and non-scientific names, see the glossary starting on 

 page 200. 



Abietinaria , 17 

 Acanthodesia , 173 

 Acanthodoris , 130, 153 



154, 156, 157, 162 

 Acaulis , 10, 17 

 Acerotisa , 37 

 Acmaea , 129, 130, 134, 



139, 142, 143 

 Acoela (Opi sthobranchia) 



130, 153 

 Acoela (Turbellaria) 31 



32 

 Acrothoracica, 91 

 Acteon , 130, 135, 139 

 Actiniaria, 25 

 Aeginella , 110, 111 

 Aetea, 172, 176, 182, 183 

 Aeolidia, 130, 155, 163 

 Aeolis , see Aeolidia and 



other nudibranch syno- 

 nyms 162 ff 

 Aequipecten , 144, 145 , 147 



150 

 Aeverrillia , 172, 175 



176, 180, 181 

 Aqlaophamus , 56, _57, 70 

 Aiptaisiomorpha , see Ha- 



liplanella 

 Alcippe , see Trypetesa . 

 Alcyonacea, 25 

 Alcyonaria, 25 

 Alcyonidium , 171, 176, 180 



181 

 Alcyonium , 25 

 Alentiana , 75 

 Aligena , 150 

 Alloeocoela, 31, 32, 33 

 Allorchestes , 115 

 Almyracuma , 99, 100, 101 



102 

 Alpheus , 121 

 Amage , 63 

 Amaroucium , 194, 196, 197 



198 

 Amathia , 168, 169, 172 



176, 180, 181 

 Amblyosyllis , 54, _55 , 80 

 Ammotrypane , 72 

 Ampelisca , 114 

 Ampeliscidae, 112, 114 



Ampharete . 63 

 Ampharetidae, 52, 53_, 61 



63 

 Amphiblestrum . 176, 186 



187 

 Amphicteis . 63 

 Amphineura, 130, 133 

 Amphinome . 63 

 Amphinomidae, 63 

 Amphipholis . 188, 189, 190 



191 

 Amphipoda, 93, 107 ff 

 Amphiporus . 41, 43, 44, 45 

 Amphi trite . 82, 83 

 Amphiura . see Amphipholis 

 Ampithoe . 115 

 Ampithoidae, 113, 115 

 Anachis . 138, 139 

 Anadara . 130, 144, 145 



146, 150 

 Anaitides see Phyllodoce 



( Anaitides ) 

 Anaperus . 31, 32, 34, 35. 

 Anasca, 176 

 Ancinus , 103, 106, 110 



111 

 Anemonia , 26 

 Anquinella , 176 

 Annelida, 47 ff 

 Anomia , 146, 150 

 Anomura, 117, 121, 127 

 Anopla, 40, 43 

 Anoplodactylus , 84, 85 



86, 82 

 Anostraca, 88 

 Anthomedusae, 19 

 Anthozoa, 8, 25 ff 

 Anthuridea, 103, 105 

 Antinoella , 75 

 Aoridae, 115 

 Aphanostoma . 31, 32, 34 



35. 

 Aphrodita , 64 

 Aphroditidae, 60, 64 

 Aplacophora, 130, 133 

 Aplousobranchia, 198 

 Aplysia , 130, 135, 139 

 Arabella , 58, 59. , 64 

 Arabellidae, 58, 59, 62 

 Arbacia , 188, 192 



Area, see Anadara 

 Archiannelida, 47 

 Arcteobia , 75 

 Arctica , 150 



Arcuatula , see Modiolus, 151 

 Arenicola , 64 

 Arenicolidae, 63 

 Argulus , 88 

 Aricia , see Orbinia 

 Aricidea , 56, 5_7, 73, 74 

 Armadi llidium , 105 

 Asabellides , 63 

 Aschelminthes , 46 

 Ascidiacea, 193 ff 

 Ascophora, 177 

 Asellota, 105, 106 

 Asellus , 105, 106, 108, 109 

 Astacura, 117, 126 

 Astarte , 149, 150 

 Asterias , 188, 189, 190, 



191 

 Asteroidea, 188, 189 

 Astranqia , 22, 23., 25 

 Asychis , 69 

 Aurelia , 21, 22, 22. 

 Autolytinae, 79 

 Autolytus , 54, 55., 79, 81 

 Axiothella , 69 

 Balanomorpha, 89 ff 

 Balanoqlossus , see Sacco- 



qlossus 

 Balanus , 86, 8_7, 89, 90, 91 

 Bankia , 144, 145, 147, 150 

 Barentsia , 165, 166, 180 



181 

 Barnea, see Cyrtopleura 



148, 151 

 Batea , 114 

 Bateidae, 113, 114 

 Bdellonemertea, 40, 43 

 Bdelloura , 34, 35., 36 

 Beroe , Beroida, 29 

 Bicellariella . 173, 176 



182, 183 

 Bicidium , 26 

 Bittium , 137, 139 

 Bivalvia, 130, 146 ff 

 Boltenia , 198 



Bopyroidea , see Epicaridea 

 Bostrichobranchus , 195 



196, 197, 199 




Systematic Index 



203 



Botryllus , 193, 194, 196 



197 

 Bougainvillia , 9, 10, 11 



13, 14, 17, 19 

 Bowerbankia , 172, 176, 180 



181 

 Brachiodontes , see Modio - 

 lus , 151 

 Brachyura, 117, 118ff 



126 

 Brada , 67 

 Branchellion , 47 

 Branchiopoda, 88 

 Branchiura, 88 

 Brania, 54, 5_5, 80, 81 

 Bryozoa, see Entoprocta, 



Ectoprocta 

 Buccinum , 138, 139, 142 



143 

 Bugula , 173, 176, 182, 183 



186, 187 

 Bugulopsis, 177, 186, 187 

 Busycon , 130, 139, 140 

 Byblis , 114 



Caberea, 177, 186, 187 

 Caecum , 134, 140 

 Calathura , 105 

 Callianassa , 118, 124 



125 , 126 

 Callinectes , 120, 122 



123 , 126 

 Calliopius , 114 

 Calliopiidae, 113, 114 

 Callipallene , 84, 85, 86 



87 

 Callopora , 174, 177, 182 



183 

 Calycella , 13, 15, 17 

 Calyptoblastea, 8, 10 

 Campanularia , 13 , 15, 16 



17 

 Campanulariidae, 15 

 Campylaspis , 99, 100, 101 

 Cancer , 119, 122, 123., 126 

 Cancridae, 119 

 Capitella , 64 

 Capitellidae, 63, 64 

 Caprella , 110, 111 

 Caprellidea, 112 

 Carcinides , see Carcinus , 



126 

 Carcinonemertes , 40, 43 

 Carcinus , 119, 122, 123 



126 

 Cardita . 148, 150 

 Caridea, 117, 121 

 Carinogammarus , 114 



Car i noma , 42, 43 

 Carmia, see Mycale 

 Caudina , 192 

 Caulorhamphus , 177, 186 



187 

 Cavolina , 130 

 Cellaria , 177 

 Cellepora , 167, 174, 177 



184, 185 

 Cellularia , see Bugulop - 

 sis 

 Cephalocarida, 88 

 Cephalochordata, 193 

 Cephalopoda, 131, 133 

 Cerapus , 115 

 Cerastoderma , 150 

 Cerebratulus , 42, 43,44 



45 

 Ceriantharia, 2 5 

 Cerianthus , 25 

 Cerithiopsis , 137, 140 

 Chaetoderma , 130, 133 

 Chaetogordius , 47 

 Chaetopleura , 130, 133 

 Chaetopteridae, 61, 65 

 Chaetopterus , 65 

 Chaetozona . 54, 55^ 66 

 Chalina , see Haliclona 

 Cheilostomata, 171 ff 

 Chelicerata, 84 ff 

 Chelifera, see Tanaida- 



cea 

 Chelura, 115 

 Cheluridae, 115 

 Childia, 31, 32, 34, 35 

 Chiridotea , 104, 106 



110, 111 

 Chlamys , 130, 147, 150 

 Chondrophora, 20 

 Chone , 56, 57., 76, 77 

 Chordata, 193 ff 

 Chrysaora , 22, 2Z_, 24 

 Chrysoela , see Haliplan- 



ella 

 Chrysopetalidae, 54, 55 



60 

 Chthamalus , 86, 8_7, 89 



90, 91 

 Cingula , 136, 140 

 Ciona, 195, 196, 197 



198 

 Cirolana, 103, 106, 108 



109 

 Cirratulidae, 54, 55_, 61 



66 

 Cirratulus , 54, 5_5, 66 

 Cirripedia, 88, 89 ff 



Cladocera, 88 

 Cladohepatica, 153 

 Clavidae, 10 

 Cleistocarpidae, 21 

 Cliona , 2, 3, 5_, 7 

 Clione, 130 

 Clymenella , 56, 5_7, 69 

 Clytia , 13 , 15, 16, 17 



19 

 Cnidaria, 8 ff, 21 ff 



24 ff 

 Cochlodesma , 148, 151 

 Colus, 138, 139, 140 

 Conchostraca, 88 

 Conopeum , 173, 177, 186 



187 

 Copepoda, 88 

 Corambella , 154, 156, 157 



162 

 Corbula, 149, 150 

 Cordylophora , 10, YS_, 17 

 Coronadena , 37 

 Corophiidae, 113, 115 

 Corophium , 115 

 Corymorpha , 14, 17 

 Corynitis , see Zanclea 

 Coryphella , 155, 158 



159 , 163 

 Craqo , see Cranqon , 121 

 Crangon , 117, 121, 124, 



125 

 Cranqonyx , 114 

 Craniella , 6, 7 

 Craspedacusta , 19 

 Crassinella , 148, 150 

 Crassostrea , 130, 146 



150 

 Cratena, 155, 160, 161 



162, 163 

 Craterolophus , 21, 22 



23 

 Crepidula , 130, 134,140 

 Cribrilina , 173, 177 



184, 185 

 Crisia , 170, 175 

 Crucibulum , 134, 140 

 Cryptosula , 174, 178,184 



185 

 Ctenophora, 8, 29 

 Ctenostomata, 171 ff 

 Cucumaria , 189, 192 

 Cumacea, 93, 98 ff, 101 

 Cuminqia , 148, 151 

 Cumulata, 33 

 Cuspidaria , 131 

 Cuthona, 155, 158, 159 



163 




2 04 



Systematic Index 



Cyanea , 21 



Cyathura , 103, 105, 108 



109 

 Cvclaspis , 99, 100, 101 

 Cyclostomata, 170 ff 

 Cydippida, 29 

 Cylichna , 135, 140 

 Cylindroporella , 178, 186 



187 

 Cylista , see Haliplanella 

 Cymadusa , 115 

 Cynthia , see Stye la 

 Cyprina , see Arctica 

 Cyrtodaria , 151 

 Cyrtopleura , 148, 151 

 Cystenides , see Pectinaria 



( Cvstenides ) 

 Dalyellioida, 32, 33, 34 



35 

 Decapoda (Crustacea) , 117f f 

 Dendrobeania , 173, 177, 186 



187 

 Dendrodoa , 195, 196, 197 



198 

 Dendronotacea, 153, 163 

 Dendronotus , 153, 155, 163 

 Dentalium , 129, 130 

 Derocheilocaris , 88 

 Dexamine , 115 

 Dexaminidae, 113, 115 

 Dexiospira , 56, 57 

 Diadumine , 26 

 Diadumine , see Haliplan - 

 ella 

 Diastylis , 98, 99, 100 



101 

 Didemnum , 194, 198 

 Dinophilus , 47, 54, 55 

 Diopatra , 64, 71, 72 

 Diplocirrus , 67 

 Dispio , 58, 59, 78, 79 

 Disporella , 170, 175, 180 



181 

 Dodecaceria , 54, 55_, 66 

 Dolichoqlossus , see Sacco - 



glossus 

 Doridacea, 153, 162 

 Doris , see Acanthodoris , 



Onchidoris 

 Doryilleidae, 52, _53, 62 



66 

 Doto , see Idulia 

 Driloneris , 58, 5_9, 64 

 Dysponetus , 54, 5_5, 60 

 Echinarachnius , 188, 192 

 Echinodermata, 188 ff 

 Echinoidea, 188, 192 

 Ectopleura , 14, 18 



Ectoprocta, 167 ff 

 Edotea , 104, 106, 108 



109 

 Edwardsia , 22, 2Z_, 26 



27, 29 

 Edwardsia , also see 



Nematostella 

 Elasmopus , 114 

 Electra, 173, 177, 182 



183 

 Eloactis , 2 7 

 Elysia , 130, 154, 162 

 Embletonia , 153, 155 



163 

 Emerita , 121, 127 

 Endeis, 85 

 Enipo , 75 

 Enopla, 40, 43 

 Enoplobranchus , 54, 55 



83 

 Ensis , 130, 144, 145 



147, 151 

 Entoprocta, 165 

 Eolidacea, 153, 163 

 Eolidia , Eolis , see Aeo - 



lidia and other syn- 

 onyms in nudibranch 



checklist. 

 Epicaridea, 103 

 Epitomapta , 190, 191 



192 

 Epitonium , 136, 140 

 Epizoanthus , 25 

 Eleutherocarpidae, 21 

 Erichsonella , 104, 106 



108, 109 

 Erichthonius , 115 

 Erythrops , 94, 96, 97 

 Esperella , see Mycale 

 Eteone, 56, 57., 74, 75 

 Eubranchus , 158, 159 



162, 163 

 Euchone , 76, 77 

 Eucratea , 172, 177, 186 



187 

 Eudendrium , 9, 11, 13, 



14, 18 

 Eudorella , 99, 100, 101 

 Eudorellopsis , 99, 100 



101 , 102 

 Eulalia, 56, 57, 74, 75 

 Eumida , 56, 5J7, 74, 75 

 Eunice , 52, 53_, 66, 67 

 Eunicidae, 52, _53, 62 



66 

 Eunoe , see Harmothoe 



( Eunoe ) 75 

 Euphrosine , 52, 5_3_, 60 



67 



Euphrosinidae, 52, 53 , 



60, 67 

 Euplana , 37, 44, 45 

 Eupleura, 138, 140, 142 



143 

 Eupomatus , see Hydroid - 



es ( Eupomatus ) 

 Eurylepta . 37 

 Eurypanopeus , 119, 122 



123 , 126 

 Eusyllinae, 79, 80 

 E usylli s, 54, 55, 80, 81 

 Evadne, 88 



Exoqone , 54, 55_, 80, 81 

 Exogoninae, 79, 80 

 Exosphaeroma , 103, 106 



110, 111 

 Fabricia, 56, 5J7, 60, 76 



77 

 Facelina , 155, 160, 161 



163 

 Filograna , 56, 5_7, 77 

 Fiona , 155, 160, _16_1, 163 

 Flabellifera, 103, 106 

 Flabelliqera , 67 

 Flabelligeridae, 52, 53. 



60, 67 

 Flustra , see Flustrell - 



idra 

 Flustrella , see Flustrel - 



lidra 

 Flustrellidra , 171, 176 



180, 181 

 Galyinia , see Eubranchus 

 Gammaridae, 113, 114 

 Gammaridea, 112 ff 

 Gammarus , 114 

 Gastropoda, 130, 134ff 



153 ff 

 Gattyana , 75 

 Gemellaria , see Eucrat - 

 ea 

 Gemma , 149, 151 

 Gemmaria , see Zanclea 

 Glycera , 58, 5_9, 67, 68 

 Glyceridae, 58, 59^, 62 



67 

 Gnathiidea, 103 

 Gnesioceros , 37, 44, 45 

 Golfinqia , 44, 45., 46 

 Goniada , 58, 59., 68 

 Goniadella , 68 

 Goniadidae, 58, 59, 62 



68 

 Gon ion emus , 19 

 Gonothyraea , 15, 16, 18 

 Gordiacea , 45, 46 

 Gorgonocephalus , 189 




Systematic Index 



205 



Gouldia , see Crassinella 



" Grantia " , see Scypha 



Grapsidae, 120 



Gunda , see Procerodes 



Gymnoblastea, 9, 10 



Gymnolaemata, 175 



Gyptis , 68 



Gyratrix , 32, 33, 34, 3_5 



Halacaridae, 84 



Halcampa , 27 



Halecium , 10, 13, 15, 18 



Halichondria , 3, 5_, 7 



Haliclona , 3, 5., 6 



Haliclystus , 21, 22, 23 



Haliplanella , 26, 27 



Haloclava , 22, 23, 26, 27 



Halocynthia , 198 



Haminoea, 130, 135, 140 



Haploscoloplos , see Scolo - 



plos 

 Haplota , 174, 178, 186, 187 

 Harmothoe , 52, 5_3, 75, 76 

 Harmothoe ( Eunoe ) , 75 

 Harmothoe ( Hermadion ) , 75 

 Harmothoe ( Lagisca ) , 76 

 Haustoriidae, 113, 114 

 Hedylopsis , 130 

 Hemichordata, 193 

 Henricia , 188, 189 

 Hermadion , see Harmothoe 



( Hermadion ) , 75 

 Hesionidae, 56, 57, 62, 68 

 Heterocrypta , 118, 122, 123 



126 

 Heteromastus , 64 

 Heteromysis , 94, 95, 96, 97 

 Heteronemertea, 40, 41, 43 

 "heteronereids " , 70, 71 

 "heterosyllids", 79 

 Hiatella , 151 

 Hippa , see Emerita 

 Hippodiplosia , 174, 178 

 Hippolyte , 117, 121, 124 



125 

 Hipponoe , 63 

 Hippoporina , 174, 178, 182 



183 

 Hippothoa , 167, 174, 178 



184, 185 

 Hirudinea, 47 

 Holohepatica, 153 

 Holothuroidea, 189, 192 

 Homarus , 117, 126 

 Hoplocarida, 127 

 Hoplonemertea, 40, 43 

 Hoploplana , 3 7 

 Hutchinsoniella , 88 

 Hyale , 115 

 Hyalella , 115 



Hyalinoecia , 71, 72 

 Hydractinia , 9, 10, 11 



13, 18 

 Hydractiniidae , 11 

 Hydrobia , 136, 140 

 Hydroida, 8, 19 

 Hydroides ( Eupomatus ) 



56, 57_, 77 

 Hydromedusae, 19 ff 

 Hydrozoa, 8 ff 

 Hypaniola , 52, 5_3, 63 

 Hyperia , 110, 111 

 Hyperiidea, 112 

 Ichthyobdella, 47 

 Idotea, 104, 106, 108, 109 

 Idulia , 153, 155, 163 

 Ilex , 133, 144, 145 

 I lyanassa , see Nassarius 

 Imogine, 38 

 Inachidae, 118 

 Inqolfiellidea, 112 

 lone , 105, 107, 108, 109 

 I schnochiton , 133 

 Ischyroceridae, 113, 115 

 I schyrocerus , 115 

 Isodictya , 5_, 6 

 Isopoda, 93, 102 ff, 109 



111 

 Jaera, 105, 106, 108 



109 

 Jassa , 115 



Kalyptorhynchia, 32 , 33 

 Lacuna , 130, 137, 140 

 Laeospira , 56, 57 

 Laetmatonice , 64 

 Laevicardium , 150, 151 

 Lagisca , see Harmothoe 



( Lagisca ) , 76 

 Lamellibranchia, see Bi- 



valvia 

 Lamprops , 98, 102 

 Laomedea , see Gonothy - 



raea 

 Laonice , 79 

 Larvacea, 193 

 Leanira , 78 

 Lecithophora, 33 

 Leichone, 69 

 Lembos , 115 

 Lepadomorpha, 89 ff 

 Lepas , 86, 87, 89, 90 



91 

 Lepidametria , 75, 76 

 Lepidonotus , 52, 5_3, 75 



76 

 Lepralia , 167 

 Lepralia has several syn- 

 onyms; see ectoproct 



checklist. 



Leptocheirus , 115 

 Leptochelia , 102, 105 



108, 109 

 Leptocuma , 99, 100, 



101 , 102 

 Leptomedusae, 19 

 " Leptoplana " , 38 

 Leptosynapta , 189, 190 



191 , 192 

 Leucon , 99, 100, 101 



102 

 Leucosolenia , 2 , 5 , 6 

 Libinia, 118, 122, 123 



126 

 Lichenopora , 170, 175 

 Ligia , 105, 106, 110 



111 

 Lilieborgiidae , 113 



114 

 Limnomedusae, 19 

 Limnoria, 103, 106 



108, 109 

 Limulus , 84 



Lineus, 42, 43, 44, 45 

 Lironeca, 104, 106, 108 



109 

 Lissodendoryx , 5_, 6 

 Listriella , 114 

 Littorina , 130, 137, 140 



142, 143 

 Livoneca, see Lironeca 

 Lobata, 28 

 Loima , 82 , 83 

 Loligo , 131, 133, 144 



145 

 Loxosoma , 165, 180, 181 

 Lucinoma , see Phacoides 



( Lucinoma ) 

 Lumbrineridae 58, 5_9^ 62 



68 

 Lumbrineris , 58, 5_9, 68 



69 

 Lunatia , 136, 140, 142 



143 

 Lycastopsis , 70, 71 

 Lyonsia , 130, 148, 151 

 Lysianassidae, 112, 114 

 Lysianopsis , 114 

 Lysilla , 83 

 Lysiosguilla , see Nanno - 



squilla , 127 

 Macoma , 144, 145, 148 



151 

 Macros tomum , 32, 33, 34 



3_5 

 Mactra, see Spisula 



and Mulinia 

 Madreporaria, 25 

 Magelona , 69 




206 



Systematic Index 



Magelonidae, 61, 69 

 Maiidae, 118 

 Malacobdella , 40, 43, 44 



45 

 Maldane , 56, 5_7, 69 

 Maldanidae, 56, 5J7_, 62, 69 

 Maldanopsis , 56, 5_7, 69 

 Margelopsis , 11 

 Marphysa , 52, 53_, 66, 67 

 Melampus , 130, 134, 141 

 Melinna , 63 

 Melita , 114 

 Meiribranipora , 167, 173 



177, 182, 183 

 Membranipora has numerous 



synonyms; consult ecto- 



proct checklist. 

 Menipea , see Tricellaria 

 Mercenaria , 130, 144, 145 



149, 150, 151 

 Mertensia , 29 

 Meterythrops , 94, 95, 96 



97 

 Metridium, 26, 27 

 Michtheimysis , see Mysis 

 Microciona , 3, 5_, 6 

 Microdeutopus , 115 

 Microphthalmus , 68 

 Microstomum , 31, 33, 34 



11 

 Microhydra , 19 

 Microporella , 174, 178 



182, 183 

 Micrura , 42, 43 

 Mitrella , 137, 141 

 Mnemiopsis , 2 9 

 Modiolaria , 147, 151 

 Modiolus , 144, 145, 147 



151 

 Molgula , 195, 196, 197 



199 

 Mollusca, 129 ff, 153 ff 

 Monocelis , 31, 33, 34, 35 

 Monoculoides , 114 

 Monoophorum , 32, 33, 34 35 

 Montacuta , 150 

 Montaqua , see Cratena 

 Mucronella , 175, 178, 179 

 Mulinia , 149, 151 

 Musculus , 147, 151 

 Mya , 130, 144, 145, 148 



149, 151 

 Mycale , 5_, 6, 7 

 Myriochele , 7 3 

 Myrmeciplana , 33 

 Mysella , 149, 151 

 Mysidacea, 93 ff, 97 

 Mysidopsis , 94, 95, 96, 97 

 Mysis , 94, 95, 96, 97 



Mystacocarida, 88 

 Mytilus , 130, 142, 143 



147, 151 

 Myxicola , 76, 77 

 Nannosquilla , 127 

 Narcomedusae, 19 

 Nassa, see Nassarius 

 Nassarius , 11, 130, 138 



141, 142, 143 

 Natica , 136, 141 

 Naushonia , 118, 124, 125 



126 

 Neanthes , see Nereis 



( Neanthes ) 

 Nectonema , 44, 45, 46 

 Nematomorpha, 4_5, 46 

 Nematostella , 22, £3_ 



26, 27 

 Nemertea, 40 ff, 44, 45 

 Neomysis , 94, 95, 96, 97 

 Neopanope , 119, 122, 12 3 



127 

 Neosperiopsis , see Iso - 



dictya 

 Nephropsida, 117, 126 

 Nephtyidae, 56, 57., 62 



70 

 Nephtys , 56, 5_7, 70 

 Neptunea , 139, 141 

 Nereidae, 52, 53, 61 



70 

 Nereimyra , 68 

 Nereis , 48, 49, 52, 53 



70, 71 

 Nereis ( Neanthes) , 52 



53, 70, 71 

 Nereis ( Nereis ) , 52, 5_3 



70, 71 

 Nerinides , see Scolo - 



lepis 

 Nerocila , 104, 106, 108 



109 

 Nicolea, 54, 55., 82, 83 

 Nicomache , 69 

 Ninoe , 58, 59, 68, 69 

 Nolella , 171, 176, 180 



181 

 Notaspidea, 130, 153 



162 

 Nothria , see Onuphis 



( Nothria ) 

 Notocirrus , 64 

 Notomastus , 64 

 Notophyllum , 56, 52 



74, 75 

 Notoplana , 37, 38, 44 



45. 

 Notostraca, 88 

 Nucella, see Thais 



Nucula , 142, 143 , 151 



Nuda, 29 



Nudibranchia, 130, 153ff 



162 

 Obelia , 9, 13, 15, 16 



18, 19 

 Octocorallia , see Alcy - 



onaria 

 Octopus , 129, 131 

 Ocypodidae, 120 

 Odontosyllis , 54, 55., 80 



81 

 Odostomia , 138, 141 

 Oedicerotidae, 113, 114 

 Oerstedia , 41, 43 

 Oligochaeta, 47 

 Ommastrephes , see Ilex 



133 

 Onchidoris , 153, 154, 162 



163 

 Oncousoecia , 175, 186 



187 

 Oniscoidea, 105, 106 

 Onuphidae, 52, 5_3, 62, 71 

 Onuphis , 52, 5_3_, 71, 72 

 Onuphis ( Nothria ) , 71 



72 

 Onuphis ( Onuphis ) , 72 

 Ophelia , 72 

 Opheliidae, 63, 72 

 Ophioderma , 188, 189 



190, 191 

 Ophioglycera , 58, 59 



68 

 Ophiopholis , 188, 190 



191 , 192 



Ophiura , 188, 190, 191 



192 

 Ophiuroidea, 188, 189 

 Opisthandropora, 33 

 Op isthobranchia, 130 



153 ff 

 Orbinia , 58, 59, 72, 73 

 Orbiniidae, 58, 59_, 63 



72 

 Orchestia , 115 

 Orchomenella , 114 

 Ostracoda , 88 

 Ostrea , see Crassostrea 

 Ototyphlonemertes , 43 

 Ovalipes , 120, 122, 123 



127 

 Ovatella , 134, 141 

 Owenia , 58, 5_9, 73 

 Oweniidae, 58, 5_9, 62 



73 

 Oxyurostylis , 98, 100 



101 , 102 

 Paqurus , 38, 121, 127 




Systematic Index 



207 



Porifera, Iff 



Porina, see Cylindropor - 



ella 

 Porpita , 20 

 Potamilla , 56, 57, 76 



77 

 Praunus , 94, 95, 96, 97 

 Pr axil lei la , 69 

 Praxillura , 69 

 Prionospio , 78, 79 

 Probopyrus , 105, 107 



108, 109 

 Procephalothrix , 42, 43 

 Procerodes , 34, 3_5, 36 

 Proporidae, 31 

 Prosobranchia, 130 

 Prostheceraeus , 37, 38 



44, 45 

 Prostoma , 40, 43 

 Prosuberites , 3, 7 

 Protobranchia, 130, 146 

 Protochordata, 193 ff 

 Protula , 77 

 Ptilanthura , 105 

 Pulmonata, 130 

 Pycnogonida, 84, 85 

 Pycnoqonum , 85 

 Pyqospio , 78, 79 

 Pyramidellidacea, 137 

 Renilla , 25 

 Retusa , 135, 141 

 Rhabdocoela, 31, 32, 33 

 Rhamphos tome 11a , 175, 178 

 Rhithropanopeus , 119, 127 

 Rhizocephala, 92 

 Rhodine, 69 

 Rhynchocoela, 40 ff, 44 



15. 

 Rochefortia , 149, 151 

 Sabella , 56, 57., 76, 77 

 Sabellaria , Sabellariidae 



58, 59, 60, 76 

 Sabellidae, 50, 56, 57 



60, 76 

 Saccoglossus , 193, 196, 197 

 " Sacconereis 1 , 1 79 

 Sacculina , 92 

 Sacoglossa, 130, 153, 162 

 Sagartia , 22, 23_, 26, 2 7 

 Sagartia , also see Hali - 



planella 

 Samytha , 63 

 Samythella , 63 

 Sarsia , 14, 18 

 Scalibregma , 52, 53^, 77, 

 Scalibregmidae, 52, 53_ 



63, 77 

 Scaphopoda, 130 




208 



Systematic Index 



Schizmopora , 174 

 Schizomavella , 175, 178 

 Schizoporella , 175, 178 



184, 185 

 Schizotricha , 9, 10, 13_ 



16, 18 

 Scolecolepides , 58, 5_9, 78 



79 

 Scolelepis , 58, 59., 78, 79 

 Scoloplos , 58, 59, 72, 73 

 Scruparia , 172, 177, 178 



182, 183 

 Scrupocellaria , 172, 177 



186, 187 

 Scyllaea , 153, 154, 156 



157 , 163 

 Scypha , 2, 5_, 6 

 Scyphacella , 105, 106, 110 



111 

 Scyphistoma larva, 21, 23 

 Scyphomedusae, 21 ff 

 Scyphozoa, 8, 21 ff 

 Seila , 137, 141, 142, 143 

 Septibranchia, 131 

 Seriata, 33 

 Serpulidae, 50, 56, 5_7_, 60 



77 

 Sertularia , 8, 9, 10, 13. 



17, 18 



Sesarma , 120, 122, 123, 127 

 Sigalion , 78 

 Sigalionidae, 60, 78 

 Siligua , 147, 152 

 Siphonophora, 19, 20 

 Sipunculoidea, 45, 46 

 Smittina , 167, 175, 178 

 Smittoidea , 175 

 Solaster , 188, 189 

 Solemya , 146, 152 

 Sphaeroma , 103, 106, 110 



111 

 Sphaerosyllis , 54, 55, 80 

 Spinther , Spintheridae, 52 



53_, 60 

 Spio , 58, 59_, 78, 79 

 Spiochaetopterus , 65 

 Spionidae, 52, 53_, 58, 59_ 



61, 78 

 Spiophanes , 58, 59_, 78, 79 

 Spirorbis ( Dexiospira ) , 56 



57_, 77 

 Spirorbis ( Laeospira ) , 56 



57_, 77 

 Spirorbis ( Paradexiospira ) 



56, 57_, 77 

 Spisula , 149, 152 

 Squilla , 124, 125 , 127 

 Stauromedusae, 8, 21 

 Stauronereis , 52, 53 , 66 



Stegophryxus , 105, 107 



108, 109 

 Stenolaemata, see Cvclo- 



stomata 

 Stenostomata, see Cyclo- 



stomata 

 Stenothoe , 114 

 Stenothoidae, 113, 114 

 Stephanosella , see Schi - 

 zoporella 

 Sternaspidae, Sternaspis 



79 

 Sthenelais , 60, 78 

 Stolidobranchia, 198 

 Stomachetosella , 178,186 



187 

 Stomatopoda, 127 

 Streblosoma , 83 

 Streblospio , 78, 79 

 Streptosyllis , 54, 55,80 

 Strongylocentrotus , 188 



192 

 Stye la, 195, 196,197,198 

 Styelopsis , 198 

 Stylactis , 11, 18 

 Stylochus , 37," 38,44, 45 

 Suberites , 5_, 6, 7 

 Syllidae, 54, 55_, 62, 79 

 Syllides , 80, 81 

 Syllinae, 79, 80 

 Syllis , 54, 5_5, 80, 81 

 Sympleustes , 115 

 Syncoelidium , 34, 35_, 36 

 Synoicidae, 198 

 Sycon , see Scypha 

 Syncoryne , see Sarsia 

 Tagelus , 147, 152 

 Talitridae, 113, 115 

 Talorchestia , 115 

 Tanaidacea, 93, 102, 105 



109 

 Tanais , 102, 105, 108, 



109 

 Tanystylum , 84, 85,86,87 

 Tegella , 174, 177 

 Tellina , 130, 144, 145 



148, 152 

 Tentaculata, 29 

 Terebella , 82, 83 

 Terebellidae, 54, 55., 61 



81 

 Terebellides , 54, 5_5, 82 



83 

 Tergipes , 158, 159 . 162 



164 

 Teredo , 144, 145,147,152 

 Tetrastemma , 41, 43 

 Thais , 38, 139, 146 

 Thalassinidea, 117, 118 



126 



Thaliacea, 193 

 Tharyx , 54, .55, 66 

 Thelepus , 82, 83 

 Thoracica, 89 ff 

 Thuiaria , 17, 18 

 Thyasira , 144, 145 , 149 



152 

 Thyone , 189, 192 

 Tmetonyx , 114 

 Tornaria larva, 193 

 Trachelobdella , 47 

 Trachylina, 19 

 Trachymedusae, 19 

 Travisia , 72 

 Tricellaria , 172 

 Trichobranchus , 82, 83 

 Tricladida, 30, 36 

 Triphora , 136, 146 

 Triticella , 172, 176 

 Trophonia , see Pherusa 

 Trypetesa , 89, 91 

 Tubulanus , 42, 43 

 Tubular ia , 9, 14, 17, 18 



19 

 Tubulipora , 175, 186, 187 

 Tunicata, 193 ff 

 Turbellaria, 30 ff 

 Turritopsis , 10, 19 

 Typhloplanoida, 32, 33 

 Uca , 120, 121, 122, 123 



127 

 Umbonula, 179, 186, 187 

 Unciola , 115 

 Upoqebia , 118, 124, 125 



126 

 Urochordata, 193 ff 

 Urosalpinx , 38, 130, 139 



146 

 Valkeria, 172, 176 

 Valvifera, 103, 106 

 Velella, 20 



Venericardia , see Cardita 

 Venus , see Mercenaria 

 Vermicular ia , 134, 146 

 Vesicularia , see Triti - 

 cella 

 Victorella , 171, 176, 180 

 Volsella , see Modiolus , 151 

 Woodsholia , 32, 33, 34, 35_ 

 Xanthidae, 119 

 Xiphosura , see Limulus , 84 

 Xiphosurida, 84 

 Yoldia, 146, 152 

 Zanclea , 8, 13_, 14, 19 

 Zirfaea , 148, 152 

 Zoantharia, 25 

 Zoanthidea, 25 

 Zygeupolia , 42 , 43 

 Zygonemertes , 41, 43, 44, 



45 

W33641 
ilarbarb tHnibersijtp 
FARLOW 
REFERENCE LIBRARY 
OF 
CRYPTOGAMIC BOTANY 

? 
f 
it 


HULTON GROUP KEYS 
Edited by Antony R. Kenney, M.A., B.Sc. 
Identification of thi 
Larger Fnngi 
ROY WATLING, B.Sc.,Ph.D,M.I.Biol. 


IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 

DEDICATION 
To my parents who encouraged my interests in mushrooms and 
toadstools and my wife who, later, was sympathetic to my studies 
and assisted in the production of the manuscript. 

Hulton Group Keys 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER 
FUNGI 
by 
ROY WATLING, B.Sc., Ph.D., M.I.Biol. 
Principal Scientific Officer, 
Royal Botanic Garden, Edinburgh 
Editor of series: Antony R. Kenney, M.A., B.Sc. 

© 
1973 
R. Watling 
A. R. Kenney 
ISBN o 7175 0595 2 
First published 1973 by Hulton Educational Publications Ltd., 
Raans Road, Amersham, Bucks. 
Reproduced and printed by photolithography and bound in 
Great Britain at The Pitman Press, Bath 

PREFACE 
This is one of a series of books intended to introduce field-biology to 
students, particularly the sixth form and early university student. The 
present work is ecologically biased in order to emphasise a rather 
neglected aspect of the higher fungi. 
Few books on fungi have ever been designed for students. This 
book is aimed primarily at this level, but if the interested amateur is 
assisted and encouraged by this same text my hopes will have been 
doubly achieved. Many amateurs interested in higher fungi wish only 
to name their collections, or know approximately what they are before 
sampling them as an addition to their diet. An understanding of our 
commoner species at an early age will allow the ‘budding’ mycologist 
to tackle the much needed study of the more critical forms. Mycology 
is still at a descriptive stage, but it is hoped this will soon be changed 
and fungi of all kinds will be studied as part and parcel of courses in 
ecology. 
It is of course quite impossible to cover all the species in such a 
small volume as this present one, but it is hoped that the examples 
which have been carefully chosen are sufficiently common throughout 
the country for any student to collect them in a single season. The 
examples, except for very few, in fact appear in the list of higher fungi 
found about the Kindrogan Field Centre, Perthshire, Scotland, com- 
piled from the collections made by students attending my field course 
there. 
The present work is arranged in three parts; the agarics are dealt 
with first, the non-agarics next, both with particular reference to their 
major habitat preferences, and lastly a catalogue of those more 
specialised habitats which are frequently encountered. All parts are 
supported at the end by lists in tabular form of those species expected 
to be found in any one habitat. Keys to the major groups, families and 
genera, are included to widen the scope of the book and place the 
examples chosen and illustrated in the text in their position in 
classification. 
In the description the synonymy has been very severely pruned and 
only covers the commonly seen names; they are included as part of 
the general information under each species. In order for the student 

6 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
to expand unfamiliar names a list of references is added at the end of : 
the work. The common names of the fungi, whenever possible, have / 
been adopted from a list produced by Dr Large, the author of The , 
Advance of the Fungi, an exciting tale of fungal parasites. The 
authorities for the names of the fungi described have been reduced to 
accord with the minimum requirements set out by the Code of Botani- 
cal Nomenclature. After each description a list of references to coloured 
plates is given and while some of these illustrations are not of the 
highest quality they are adequate, and, more important, they are j 
widely available. Any technical terms appearing in the description are | 
explained in the glossary, although they have been kept to a minimuin, j 
the difficulty of expressing colours has been overcome by consistently . 
referring to one colour chart only, (a chart designed originally for the 
use of mycologists and available from Her Majesty s Stationery | 
Office). • 1 L i 
I have not indicated the edibility of a particular species unless there 
is no doubt as to the edibility of it, related species and those species 
with which it might be easily confused. Many fungi are notoriously I 
difficult to identify and when one has approximately 3,000 species of 
larger fungi in the country the task is even more difficult. It would 
be folly therefore to indicate edibility for all the fungi described m a 
book such as this; the golden rule whieh should be adopted is not to 
eat any of the fungi one collects in the woods and fields. A fault of 
most popular treatments is that they are biased towards the human diet 
and selection of species is done on this basis; in the present wor 
selection of examples within the 270 pages has been difficult and two 
factors have been particularly considered to ensure that (i) representa- 1 
tives of all the major groups of fungi and genera have been covered . 
and (ii) a coverage has been attempted of all the common ecological 
niches. ,. . . , . 
I am fully aware that the taste of a fungus may be distinctive to that 
species or to a group of closely related species, but it is only a spot 
character and the tasting of one’s finds is neither necessary nor advis- 
able; indeed it is not used in this book. The odour, however, has been 
indicated whenever distinctive. 

7 
CONTENTS 
Page 
Preface . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5 
Introduction . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 9 
Where to look . . . . . . . . . . . . g 
Collecting . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 10 
Examination . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1 1 
Microscopic examination . . . . . . . . . . 12 
Key to major groups of Larger Fungi . . . . . . . . 21 
A. Agarics and their relatives . . . . . . . . . . 22 
Key to major genera . . . . . . . . . . . . 22 
(i) Agarics of woodlands and copses . . . . . . 27 
(a) Mycorrhizal formers . . . . . . . . . . 27 
(b) Parasites . . . . . . . . . . . . 59 
(c) Saprophytes — Wood-inhabiting or lignicolous agarics 64 
(d) Saprophytes — Terrestrial agarics . . . . . . 78 
(ii) Agarics of pastures and meadows . . . . . . 95 
(a) Agarics of rough & hill-pastures . . . . . . 95 
(b) Agarics of chalk-grassland & rich uplands . . . . 108 
(c) Agarics of meadows and valley-bottom grasslands .. 114 
(d) Fairy-ring formers . . . . . . . . . . 118 
(e) Agarics of urban areas — lawn and parkland agarics . . 122 
(f) Agarics of wasteland and hedgerows . . . . 126 
B. Bracket fungi and their relatives . . . . . . . . 135 
Key to major genera . . . . . . . . . . . . 135 
(i) Pored and toothed fungi . . . . . . . . . . 140 
(a) Colonisers of tree trunks, stumps and branches . . 140 
(b) Destroyers of timber in buildings . . . . . . 154 
(c) Colonisers of cones . . . , . . . . . . 158 
(d) Terrestrial forms . . . . . . . . . . 160 
(ii) Cantharelles and related fungi . . . . . . . . 162 
(iii) Fairy-club fungi . . . . . . . . . . . . 166 
(iv) Resupinate fungi . . . . . . . . . . 176 
C. The Jelly fungi — Key to major groups with examples . . 179 
D. The Stomach fungi; puff-balls and their relatives — Key to 
major groups with examples . . . . . . . . . . 186 

8 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
E. Cup fungi and allies 
F. Specialised Habitats 
(i) Fungi of dung and straw heaps . . 
(ii) Fungi of bonfire sites 
(iii) Fungi of bogs and marshes 
(a) Sphagnum bogs 
(b) Alder-carrs 
(iv) Fungi of beds of herbaceous plants 
(v) Fungi of moss-cushions . . 
(vi) Heath and mountain fungi 
(a) Moorland fungi 
(b) Mountain fungi & Basidiolichens 
(vii) Sand-dune fungi . . 
(viii) Subterranean fungi 
(ix) Fungal parasites 
G. Appendix . . • • • ■ • • 
(i) Species lists of specialised habitats 
(ii) Glossary 
(iii) Simple experiments with Fairy-rings 
(iv) Development of the Agaric fruit-body 
(v) References 
H. Index 
198 
207 
207 
216 
222 
222 
226 
227 
230 
231 
231 
276 
238 
243 
246 
249 
249 
260 
264 
266 
269 
271 
Cover transparency supplied by John Markham, F.R.P.S., F.Z.S. 

9 
INTRODUCTION 
The term larger fungus refers to any fungus whose study does not 
necessarily require more than a low-powered lens to see most of the 
important morphological features. Using such a term cuts across the 
existing scientific classification, for it includes the more obvious fungi 
bearing their spores on specialised reproductive cells called basidia, 
fig. 5, and a few of those whose spores are produced inside specialised 
reproductive cells called asci. The term is useful, however, even though 
it embraces a whole host of unrelated groups of fungi ; it includes the 
polypores, fairy-clubs, hedgehog-fungi, puflF-balls and elf-cups, as well 
as the more familiar mushrooms and toadstools — or puddockstools as 
they are often called in Scotland. Specimens of all these groups will 
find their way some time into the collecting baskets of the naturalist 
when he is out fungus-picking, along with probably a few jelly-fungi 
and less frequently one or two species of the rather more distantly 
related group, the morels. The biggest proportion of the finds, however, 
on any one collecting day in the autumn, when the larger fungi are in 
their greatest numbers, will be of the mushrooms and toadstools; these 
are, collectively, more correctly called the agarics. 
The early botanists and pioneer mycologists of the nineteenth century 
recognised the fact that the fungi both large and small are ecologically 
connected to the herbaceous plants and trees among which they grow, 
but many mycologists since have tended to neglect these early observa- 
tions. Although the importance of the fungi in the economy of the 
woodland, copse, field and marsh is well-known, mycologists and ecolo- 
gists alike have been rather slow to appreciate that the fungi can be 
just as good indicators of soil conditions, if not better, than many other 
plants. Perhaps it is rash to attt mpt such a treatment as you find here 
because we know so little of the reasons why a particular fungus prefers 
one habitat to another. However, it is envisaged and hoped that, if a 
framework is provided, accurate field-notes can gradually be accumu- 
lated and many of the secrets yet to be uncovered explained. 
Where to look 
Fungi can be found in most situations which are damp at some time of 
the year. Searching for fungi can begin as soon as the spring days 
become warm, although even in the colder periods of winter several 

10 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
finds can be made. In summer it gets very dry and this necessitates | 
collecting in damper areas, such as marshes, alder-carrs, swamps and ' 
moorland bogs. After a heavy storm in summer, on the edges of paths I 
and roadsides, woodland banks, in clearings in woods and in gardens, 
fungi can be collected within a few days of the rain, but collecting 
normally reaches a climax in August-September, the precise date 
depending on the locality and the individual character of the particular i 
year. 
All woodlands are worth visiting, particularly well-established woods 
with a mixture of trees. Pure pine-woods do not seem to be as good as 
pine-woods with scattered birch; plantations are often disappointing 
except after heavy rain or late in the season, even well into November 
in mild years. Pure birch and beech, the latter particularly when on 
chalky soils, are excellent areas to visit. Oak is possibly not as good j 
but areas with willow and alder have many unique species. The 
edge of woods, sides of paths or clearings are usually more productive | 
areas to search in than is the depth of the wood, and a small plot of 
trees can be much more rewarding than a large expanse of woodland. 1 
After some time one is able to judge the sort of place which will yield | 
fungi. Rotten and burnt wood are very suitable substrates for they 
retain the moisture necessary for growth of fungi even in dry conditions, | 
so allowing fructification to take place. I 
Grasslands including hill-pastures, established sand-dunes, etc., are 
often excellent, but of course they are much more dependent on the | 
weather to produce favourable conditions for fungal development than 
woodland areas where the changes in the humidity and temperature | 
are less extreme; prolonged mist or mild showery weather favour the | 
fruiting of the grassland fungi. Dung in both woods and fields is an I 
excellent although ephemeral substrate; many species of fungi charac- | 
terise dung whilst others will grow in manured fields, on straw-heaps , 
or where man has distributed the habitat. I 
Collecting u j I 
The collecting of larger fungi should not be considered a haphazard : 
pursuit; careless collecting often results in many frustrating hours being i 
spent on the identification of inadequate material, which is also not i 
suitable after for preservation as reference material. A few good speci- 
mens are infinitely better than several poor ones; one is always tempted i 
to collect too much and then collections are inevitably discarded. 
Always try to select specimens showing all the possible stages of deve- i 

INTRODUCTION 
I 
lopment from the smallest buttons to the expanded caps. Sometimes 
such a range is not possible and one must be satisfied with either a 
couple or only one fruit-body. 
Carefully dig up or cut from the substrate the entire fungus and 
handle it as little as possible. A strong pen-knife or fern-trowel is 
admirable for the job. The associated plants should be noted, especially 
trees, and if one is unable to identify the plants or woody debris retain 
a leaf or a piece of wood for later identification. One should note in a 
field-notebook any features which strike one as of interest, such as 
smell, colour, changes on bruising, presence of a hairy or viscid surface. 
For transporting home the specimens should be placed in tubes, tins 
or waxed paper which are themselves kept in a basket. The smallest 
specimen can go in the first, the intermediate-sized forms in the tins 
i or waxed paper and the larger ones laid in the basket or placed in large 
I paper bags; plastic bags are not suitable except for very woody fungi. 
Thus an assortment of tins, tubes and various sizes of pieces of waxed 
paper are essential before setting out on a collecting trip. The specimens 
should be placed in the waxed paper such that they can be wrapped 
; once or twice and the ends twisted as if wrapping a sweet, 
i Examination 
Once home always aim at examining the specimens methodically. 
The first necessity is to determine whether the fungus, which has been 
collected, has its spores borne inside a specialised reproductive cell 
(ascus) i.e. Ascomycete, or on a reproductive cell (basidium) i.e. 
Basidiomycete. By taking a small piece of the spore-bearing tissue, 
mounting in water, gently tapping it and examining under a low power 
of the microscope this can be easily ascertained. The tapping out is 
best done with the clean eraser of a rubber-topped pencil. There are 
several different shaped asci and basidia; the latter structures are more 
important in our study because the Ascomycetes are in the main 
composed of microscopic members. 
The following procedure is necessary for the examination of your 
find: — 
Select a mature cap of an agaric from each collection, cut off the 
stem and set the cap gills down on white paper, or if the specimen is 
small or is a woody or toothed fungus, or consists of a club or flattened 
irregular plate, place the spore-bearing surface (hymenium) face down 
on a microscope glass slide. The smaller specimens must be placed in 
tins with a drop of water on the cap to prevent drying out. Even with 

2 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
the larger specimens it is desirable to place a glass slide somewhere 
under the cap between the gills and the paper, and if possible to 
enclose the species carefully in waxed paper or in a tin. Whilst you are 
waiting for the spore-print to form, notes must be made on the more 
easily observable features; one is not required at this stage to examine 
the microscopic characters. 
All the characters which may change on drying must be noted 
immediately, and these include colour, stickiness, shape, smell and 
texture. A sketch, preferably in colour, however rough, can give much 
more information than many score words. 
Cut one fruit-body, longitudinally down with a razor or scalpel or a 
sharp knife if the fruit-body is woody, and sketch the cut surfaces, 
fig. lA-B. These sketches and the rest of the collection notes should 
be made such that identification and future comparisons can be 
achieved. Thus always note the characters in the same order for each 
description. A table of the important characters is provided here, but 
this is meant as a guide not as a questionnaire. The attachment of the 
gills, pores or teeth to the fruit-bodies when once the fungus is in 
section should be always noted (see p. 20). 
The spore-print when complete should be allowed to dry under 
normal conditions and then the spore-mass scraped together into a 
small pile. A microscope cover-slip should be placed on the top of the 
pile and lightly pressed down. The colour of the spore-print (or 
deposit) can then be compared with a standard colour chart and the 
spores making up the print examined in water under a microscope. 
Microscopic examination 
When one is more experienced with fungi it will be found necessary 
to carry out many microscopic observations, but when commencing the 
study it is necessary only to have an ordinary microscope; a calibrated 
eyepiece-micrometer is an advantage as is an oil-immersion lens. An 
examination of the spores is always necessary; the examination of 
features such as the sterile cells on the gill and stem, etc., varies with 
the fungus under observation. Spores should if at all possible be taken 
from a spore-print and mounted on a microscope slide, either in water 
or in a dilute aqueous solution of household ammonia. Although for 
mycologists it is often necessary to measure spores to within a ^ micron 
(pm) this book has been so arranged that one only really has to distin- 
guish between a spore which is small (up to 5 pm), medium (5~io 
long (10-15 large if globose and very long (if over 15 pm) ; this is 

Fig. 1. Dissection of a toadstool as recommended by the 
author. For explanation see text. 

H 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
not Strictly accurate, but serves the purpose for an introductory text. 
It is important to describe the character of the spore, i.e. ornamentations, j 
whether a hole (germ-pore) is present at one end and/or a beak (apiculus) j 
at the other (fig. 5). With white or pale coloured spores it is useful to 
stain either the spore or the surrounding liquid with a dye— 10% 
cotton blue solution is admirable, or a solution of 1-5 g iodine in 100 
ml of an aqueous mixture containing 5 g of potassium iodine and 100 g 
of chloral hydrate. Both these dyes must be accurately made up if the 
study of the fungi is to be taken at all seriously; because some of the 
chemicals used above are not normally required by students, a chemist 
must make up the reagents for you. Often the spores turn entirely or 
partially blue-black or pale blue or purplish red in the iodine solution 
a useful character. 
Material in good condition is always required and one of the first 
things the student needs to do is train himself to collect sufficient 
material in good condition. The steps by which all the structures of the 
fungus used in the text can be observed are outlined below:— | 
Fig. I shows the cuts required to furnish suitable sections in order 1 
to observe the various structures and patterns of tissue which are 
important. , 
1. Carefully place the longitudinal section (AB) of the fruit-body which 
has been sketched gill-face down under a low power or dissecting 
microscope. Hairs or gluten on the cap, if present, will be made visible 
by focusing up and down (figs. 2 and 3A) and/or those on the stem 
(fig. 3B). When any part of the cut fruit-body is not being examined 
retain it in a chamber containing damp paper or moist moss; this will 
assist the cells to retain their turgidity, for they frequently collapse on 
drying and are difficult to observe except after performing often 
lengthy and special techniques. 
If only one fruit-body is available, then cut along CD and mount m 
a tin box on a slide in order to obtain a spore-print (otherwise see 
paragraph 6). 1 tt j 
2. Cut off a complete gill (E) and quickly mount on a dry slide. Under 
the low power of a microscope, the cystidia on the gill-margin will be 
visible (fig. 4); it will be seen whether the spores are arranged in a 
particular pattern (fig. 5) and whether the basidia are 2-spored or 4- 
spored. In white-spored toadstools it is difficult sometimes to determine 
whether the basidia are 2- or 4-spored so one must confirm the obser- 
vations by other techniques. 

A Filamentous cap-surface 
B ‘Cellular’ cap-surface 

1 6 IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
A section of the gill accompanied by a small piece of cap-tissue, as in 
E, will confirm the presence or absence of noticeable cystidia (or hairs) 
on the cap. Now mount the section bounded by EG and HI in a drop 
of water containing either a drop of washing-up liquid and/or glycerine, 
the soapy liquid helps to expel any water which may tend to cling to the 
gill-margin amongst the cystidia and the glycerine stops the mount 
from drying out whilst further sections for comparison are cut and 
examined. It is at this time that the structure of the outermost layer 
of the cap can be examined, e.g. whether it is made up of a turf-like 
structure; the presence or absence of cystidia on the cap can be also 
confirmed (fig. yA— C). It is frequently necessary to tap the mount in 
order to spread the tissue slightly and expose the elements; this can be 
done very efficiently by light pressure from the end of a pencil to which 
an eraser is attached. Cut off along line JK to eliminate marginal 
cystidia from confusing the picture and mount both pieces separately. 
3. Cut out a wedge of tissue from the fruit-body (L) so as to have 
several gills attached to some cap-tissue; until one is familiar with the 
variability of facial and marginal cystidia, carefully cut along the line 
PQ (note; the cut is made one-third of the distance from the cap 
margin, thus eliminating the possibility of large numbers of marginal 
cystidia being examined in error for facial cystidia). Now make a second 
cut along the line of RS so that finally a small block of tissue remains 
(M). 
Mount on a dry slide with the plane through PQ face down on the 
slide and observe under a low magnification, to assess whether cystidia 
on the gill-face are present or absent, and if present their general 
shape and whether numerous or infrequent (fig. 8). 
Mount in water %ashing-up mixture as outlined above and tap 
gently with the rubber attached to the end of a pencil; evenly distri- 
buted pressure should be given. If the gills appear to be too close 
then rotate the rubber a little whilst pressing in order to spread the 
tissue. 
4. Using a low power of a microscope and looking down into the plane 
RS of the unmodified block M or a similar block, one obtains by this 
simple technique a very accurate idea as to the structure of the trama 
of the gill (fig. 9). 'The organisation of this tissue is very important in 
classification, some groups of toadstools having what has been described 
as regular trama (fig. 9C), others irregular (fig. 9D), inverse (fig. 9B) 
or divergent (fig. 9A). This same tissue may be thick or sparse to 

Fig. 7. 
A Homoiomerous flesh 

1 8 identification of the larger fungi 
wanting, coloured or not. Such sections are often better than attempts 
at very thin sections unless very specialised techniques are used. There 
are few satisfactory thicknesses between the two extremes; the thick 
sections you can do and the very thin requiring expert techniques. 
5. Take out a small block of tissue T as indicated in the figure (fig. i). 
Mount immediately and repeat as in 3. This will allow the outer layer 
of the cap to be more clearly seen (fig. 7A-C) and also the structure of 
the flesh (fig. 10). The latter may be composed of a mixture of filaments 
and ‘packets’ or ‘nests’ of rounded cells (i.e. heteromerous), or of 
filaments, only some of which may be inflated (i.e. homoiomerous) , 
but when individual cells are swollen they never form distinct groups. 
By very similar techniques it is possible to show that the more woody 
fungi can have flesh composed of one of four types of cells (Corner, 
1932) : these types depend on whether distinctly thickened cells (plate 47) 
are present with the actively growing hyphae or not (pp. 140-1 50), whether 
hyphae are present which bind groups of hyphae together, etc. (plate 46). 
6. Remove stem along line CD and cut out small blocks of tissue as 
indicated (U, V and W). Mount immediately and examine as in para- 
graph 3, for cystidia, etc. (see fig. 3). 
Whilst all these sections are being cut and processed a second fruit- 
body, if available, should be set to drop spores; this is done by cutting 
off the cap from the stem and placing it either entirely or in part, and 
with gill-edges down, on a slide in a tin. 
7. Z is a ‘scalp’ of a cap; a thin slivei from the cap is placed on a slide 
in a drop of water (modified with washing-up liquid, etc. as above). 
After placing a cover-slip over the tissue it is tapped gently; this will 
show if the cap is composed of globose to elliptic elements or if it is 
composed of strictly filamentous units (figs. 6A & B). Care must be 
taken not to reverse the section when transferring it to the mountant, 
either by turning the scalpel or by allowing the surface tension of the 
liquid to pull the section upside down. The construction of any veil 
fragments will also be seen in this mount, and if a loose covering of 
veil is present this should be removed before observation so that it 
does not obscure the fundamental structures. 
8. Examine the stipe of the fruit-body used above under a low power 
or with a dissecting microscope in order to ascertain whether there 
are any remains of veil and/or vegetative mycelium. If found, mount 
immediately in the solution containing iodine mentioned above and 
examine. 

INTRODUCTION 
19 
I Of course it is difficult to carry out the above system the first time 
I and be successful in seeing everything, indeed in being able to cut all 
the sections 1-8. Practice makes perfect, so why not practise with a 
I lb of mushrooms from the grocer before the autumn season starts. 
In this way you will have overcome the difficulties without having to 
I experiment with your collections. 

20 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
CHARACTERISTICS FOR THE IDENTIFICATION OF HIGHER FUNGI WITH CAPS 
Locality G. Ref. Date 
Habitat notes soil type pH 
vegetational community 
solitary ; in troops or rings 
Draw or preferably paint exterior and vertical section of fruit-body 
MACROSCOPIC CHARACTERS 
CAP 
General characters : 
diameter shape consistency 
colour: when immature when mature 
when wet when dry 
Surface 
dry, moist, greasy, viscid, glutinous, peeling easily or not, 
smooth, matt, polished, irregularly roughened, downy, velvety, scaly, shaggy 
Margin 
regular, wavy incurved or not 
smooth, rough, furrowed striate or not 
Veil, if present 
colour abundance or scarcity- 
distribution at margin, whether appendiculate or dentate 
consistency, whether filamentous, membranous 
GILLS, or pores or teeth etc. 
remote, free, adnate, adnexed, emarginate, subdecurrent, decurrent 
crowded or distant distinctly formed or not 
shape interveined or not 
easily separable from the cap-tissue or not 
consistency (whether brittle, pliable, fleshy or waxy) 
thickness width 
colour: when immature at maturity- 
number of different lengths or number of layers 
obvious features of gill-edge, tube-edge, e.g. colour, consistency 
STEM 
FLESH 
central, eccentric or lacking shape 
dimensions : length thickness 
hollow- or not 
colour: w-hen immature when mature 
consistency- (whether fleshy, stringy, cartilaginous, leathery or woody) 
surface characters (whether fibrillose, dry, viscid, scaly or smooth) 
characters of stem-base 
Veil, if present characters 
Volva, if present characters 
Ring, if present 
whether single or double 
whether persistent, fugacious or mobile 
whether apical, median or basal 
whether membranous or filamentous 
whether thick or thin 
colour in cap : when wet when dry- 
colour in stem : w-hen w et when dry 
colour changes if any when exposed to air 
presence or absence of milk-like or coloured fluid 
(note - colour when exuded on fruit-body immediately and after some time 
and when dabbed on to a clean cloth or paper handkerchief and exposed to the air). 
SMELL before and after cutting —relate to a common every day odour 
MICROSCOPIC CHARACTERS 
BASIDIOSPORES 
colour in mass colour under microscope 
size type of ornamentation, it any 
size and shape of germ-pore, if present , . • , . , - .s . i 
iodine reaction of spore-mass: — blue-black to dark violet (amyloid); red-purple 
(dextrinoid) ; yellow-brown or brown (non-amyloid) 
BASIDIA number of sterigmata 
CAP-FLESH type of constituent cells 
QI type and arrangement of cells between adjacent hymenial faces 
CAP-SL’RFACE tvpe of cells composing the outermost lay-er whether filaments or 
rounded cells 
STERILE CELLS— CYSTIDIA 
presence or absence of sterile cells: — 
on gill-edge on gill-margm 
on cap on stem 
shape, estimation of size, thick or thin-walled, hyaline or not 
types of ornamentation, etc. 

I 
21 
Key to the major classes of Larger Fungi 
Spores borne externally on stalks on a clavate to cylindrical cell 
Basidiomycotina 
Spores produced within a clavate, cylindrical or subglobose cell 
Ascomycotina 
Key to major groups based on character of basidium and fruit- 
body shape 
1. Basidia either produced in a hymenium or in a mass, and until 
maturity contained within a closed fruit-body . . Gasteromycetes 
Basidia produced in a layer of cells (hymenium) and exposed 
to the air before the maturity of the spores (Hymenomycetes) 2 
2. Basidia simple, a single cell (fig. 5) (Homobasidiae) . . . . 3 
Basidia usually septate, or if simple then fruit-body gelatinous 
and often collapsing to form a skin when dried (Heterobasidiae) 4 
3. Fruit-body usually fleshy, soft and easily decaying (putrescent), 
hymenium spread over the surface of gills, ridges or within 
• • • • • • • • . . Agaricales (p. 22) 
Fruit-body with hymenium smooth or spread-out on teeth, 
ridges or plates or if within tubes then fruit-body tough and 
leathery Aphyllophorales (p. 135) 
4. Basidia divided . . . . . . . . . . ^ 
Basidia simple and apex drawn out into two long necks Plate 
61 (p. 185) . . . . . . Dacrymycetales (p. 180) 
5. Basidia divided transversely by one to three horizontal septae 
Plate 60 (p. 183) . . . . . . Auriculariales (p. 182) 
Basidia divided into two or four cells by vertical septae Plate 61 
(p. 185) . . . . . . . . Tremellales (p. 184) 
1 

I 
22 IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
A. AGARICS AND THEIR RELATIVES 
I. 
3 - 
4 - 
5 - 
6 . 
7 - 
8 . 
9 - 
II. 
Key to major genera 
Spores distinctly coloured in mass and coloured individually 
under the microscope 
Spores not, or faintly, coloured in mass and hyaline under the 
microscope 
Spores blackish or some shade of brown 
Spores pinkish 
Stem laterally attached to the cap or absent 
Claudopus (and some species of Clitopilus) i 
Stem centrally attached to the cap . . . . . . . . 4 
Stem with a cup-like structure enveloping the base Volvariella ‘ 
Stem lacking any special structure at its base . . . . . . 5 
Gills not attached to the stem (free), or with part attached to ' 
and descending down the stem (decurrent) . . . . . . 6 
Gills attached to the stem but not descending down the stem 7 ! 
Gills remote to free from the stem . . . . . . Pluteus K 
Gills distinctly attached and descending down the stem 
Clitopilus (see also Eccilia p. 102) ^ 
Gills broadly attached to the stem (adnate) . . . . Entoloma Rf 
Gills narrowly attached to the stem (adnexed) Leptonia & Nolanea ^ 
Stem laterally attached to the cap . . . . . . Crepidotus 
Stem centrally attached to the cap . . . . . . • • 9 j 
Spore-print some shade of brown . . . . • • • • 10 f 
Spore-print blackish to purplish black . . . . • • 18 i 
Spore-print bright rust-brown .. .. .. •• •• 
Spore-print dull clay-brown or ochraceous . . . . . . 16 |( 
Stem with the veil girdling the stem (ring), or cobweb-like 
(cortina) 
Stem without the veil girdling the stem or when present then 
easily lost 
13 

AGARICS AND THEIR RELATIVES 
23 
12. Stem with distinct ring or ring-zone Pholiota & related genera 
Stem with cobweb-like veil or faint filamentous ring-zone 
Cortinarius & Gym?iopilus 
13. Gills attached to the stem but not descending down the stem 
(adnexed to adnate) . . . . . . . . . . . . 14 
Gills free of the stem, or distinctly attached to and* running 
down the stem (decurrent), and then often joined together 
at the apex of the stem or at their base . . . . . . 
14. Cap-surface composed of rounded cells . . . . Conocybe 
Cap-surface composed of filamentous cells . . . . Galerwa 
15. Gills free of the stem and the whole fruit-body very fragile 
Bolbitius 
Gills attached to and running down the stem (decurrent), 
easily separable from the cap-tissue and frequently veined at 
apex of stem Paxillus 
16. Cap scaly, fibrillose and roughened . . , . , , Inocybe 
Cap smooth, greasy or viscid . . . . , . . . . . ly 
17. Cap-surface composed of rounded cells . . . . Aqrocybe 
Cap-surface composed of filamentous cells Naucoria & Hebeloma 
18. Gills or complete fruit-body becoming liquefied . . Copriniis 
Neither the gills nor fruit-body collapsing into a slurry of cells 19 
19. Gills free to remote from the stem or attached and descending 
down the stem (decurrent) . . . . . . . . . . 20 
Gills attached in some way to the stem but not descending 
down the stem (adnate to adnexed) . . . . . . . . 21 
20. Gills decurrent; stem possessing a cobweb-like veil 
Gomphidius and Chroogomphus 
Gills remote or free; stem possessing a usually persistent ring 
Agaricus 
21. Gills distinctly spotted or distinctly mottled; stem stiff but 
breaking with a snap when bent; growing on dung or in 
richly manured areas Panaeolus 
Gills not spotted or distinctly mottled; stem cartilaginous or 
not, and fruit-body growing on dung or not . . . , . . 22 
22. Gills broadly attached to the stem (adnate) and with a veil 
girdling the stem Stropharia 
Gills narrowly attached to the stem (adnexed) or with concave 
dentation near the stem (sinuate), or if adnate then lacking a 
ring 23 

24 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
23. Gills with concave indentation near the stem (sinuate) and 
cap and stem with a cobweb-like veil . . . . . . Hypholoma 
Gills attached to the stem but lacking a distinct concave in- 
dentation near the stem . . . . . . • • . . 24 
24. Stem stiff but breaking with a snap when bent; edge of cap 
incurved at first and cap-surface composed of filamentous 
cells Psilocyhe 
Stem fragile; edge of cap straight even when young and cap- 
surface composed of rounded cells . . . . . . Psathyrella 
25. Fruit-body fleshy and readily decaying, often firm but never 
tough . . . . . . . . • • • • • • . . 26 
Fruit-body tough and not easily decaying . . . . • ■ 47 
26. Parasitic on other agarics . . . . • • • • Nyctahs 
Not parasitic on other agarics . . . . . . • • • • 27 
27. Spore-bearing layer on fold-like often forked gills or simply 
on irregularities . . . . . . • • • • • • . . 28 
Spore-bearing layer (hymenium), on distinct well-formed gills 29 
28. Spore-bearing layer on fold-like gills . . . . CanthareUus 
Spore-bearing layer on surface of irregularities CratereUus 
29. Cap easily separable from the stem . . . . • • • • 3 ° 
Cap not easily separable from the stem . . • • • • 31 
30. Stem with girdling veil (ring) and or with a persistent cup- 
like structure at the base (volva); cap usually with warts or 
scales distributed on its surface . . . . • • Amanita 
Stem with a ring but lacking a volva; cap surface powdery, 
hairy or scaly Lepiota & related genera 
31. Cap, stem and gills brittle; stem never stiff and either exuding 
a milk-like juice or not; spores with spines or warts which 
stain blue-black in solutions containing iodine . . • • 32 
Cap, stem and gills soft or if stem stiff then snapping when 
bent; gills never brittle . . . . . . • • • • • • 33 
32. Fruit-body exuding a milk-like fluid . . . . . . Lactarius 
Fruit-body not exuding milk-like fluid . . . • Russula 
33. Gills thick, watery and lustrous (waxy) or with a bloom as if 
powdered with talc; often brightly coloured . . . . • • 34 
Gills not waxy and rarely over 1-5 mm thick . . . . 36 
34. Gills rather watery and lustrous (waxy); spores smooth . . 35 
Gills rigid not waterv, with powdery bloom ; spores with 
distinct spines . . . . . . • • • • • • Laccana 

AGARICS AND THEIR RELATIVES 
25 
35. Fruit-body with a distinct veil and growing in woods; cap 
often viscid or pale coloured ' . . . . . . Hygrophorus 
^ Fruit-body lacking a veil and usually growing in fields; cap 
i usually brightly coloured and sometimes viscid Hygrocybe 
36. Stem with girdling veil (ring) and/or stem not attached to the 
centre of the cap (eccentric) . . . . . . . . • • 37 
.. Stem central and lacking a ring . . . . . . . . 38 
37. Stem central and possessing a ring . . . . . . Armillaria 
Stem not centrally attached to the cap 
members of the ' Pleurotaceae' (p. 74) 
38. Stem fibrous . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 39 
Stem stiff only in the outer layers . . . . . . . . 42 
39. Gills with a concave indentation near the stem (sinuate) . . 40 
Gills attached to and descending down the stem (decurrent) 41 
40. Spores with warts which darken in solutions containing iodine 
Melanoleuca 
Spores not so colouring in solutions containing iodine 
Tricholoma & related genera 
41. Spores with warts which darken in solutions containing iodine 
Leucopaxillus 
Spores not so colouring in solutions containing iodine 
Tricholoma & related genera 
42. Gills thick and with rather blunt edges 
Cantharellula & Hygrophoropsis 
Gills thin and with distinct and sharp edges . . . . • • 43 
; 43. Gills attached to and descending down the stem (decurrent); 
cap often depressed at the centre and sterile cells absent from 
the gills and the surface of the cap . . Clitocybe & Ornphalina 
I Gills attached to the stem but not descending down the stem 
(adnate to adnexed) or if descending then distinct sterile cells 
on the gills, cap and stem . . . . . . . . • • 44 
I 44. Cap-edge straight and usually striate when young; cap thin and 
■ somewhat conical and gills descending down the stem or not 
I Mycena & related genera 
I Cap-edge incurved, non-striate and cap rather fleshy; gills 
j not descending down the stem . . . . . . • • 45 
[ 45. Stem dark and woolly at least in the lower half and the cap 
J viscid; fruit-bodies growing in clusters on tree-trunks 
Flammulina 

26 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
46 
Stem not dark and woolly 
46. Cap viscid and stem usually- rooting; fruit-body growing di- 
rectly on wood or attached to wood by long strands or cords 
of mycelium (rhizomorphs) . . . • - • Oudemansiella 
If cap viscid then fruit-body neither attached to wood by 
cords of mycelium nor stem with a rooting base 
Collybia & related genera 
Stem central and gills often interconnected by veins; cap can 
be dried and later revived, purely by moistening 
Marasmius & related genera 
Stem not attached to the centre of the cap and fruit-body 
although persistent not easily revived to natural shape after 
once being dried . . . . • - • • • • . . 48 
Spore-print blue-black with solutions containing iodine . . 49 
Spore-print yellowish in solutions containing iodine . . . . 50 
47 
48. 
49. 
50- 
52. 
53 - 
54 - 
55 - 
57- 
Lentinellus 
Panellus 
Schizophyllum 
.. 51 
Lentinus 
Panus 
• • 53 
56. 
Gills toothed or notched along the edges 
Gills even along their edges and not toothed 
Gills appearing as if split down their middles 
Gills not splitting 
Gills notched or toothed along their edges 
Gills even along their edges and not toothed 
Spore-print yellowish, purplish, black or pink 
Spore-print some shade of brown, but without purplish flush 56 
Spore-print yellowish or pinkish . . . . . . . . 54 
Spore-print purplish brown or blackish 
Spore-print yellowish 
Spore-print pinkish 
Spore-print purplish brown 
Spore-print blackish and spores ornamented 
Cap glutinous and stem with or without girdling veil (ring) ; 
within the tubes the sterile cells (cystidia) cluster together Suillus 
Cap at most viscid and then only in wet weather and sterile 
cells within the tubes individually placed . . . . • ■ 57 
Stem-surface covered with distinct black or dark brown or 
white then darkening scales; spore-print clay-brown with or 
without a flush of cinnamon-pinkish brown . . . . Lecctnum 
Stem-surface covered completely or in part with a network 
or pattern of faint lines or pale yellow or red-rust but never 
black dots; spore-print olivaceous buff Boletus & related genera 
• • 55 
. Gyroporus 
Tylopilus 
Porphyrellus 
Strobilomyces 

AGARICS AND THEIR RELATIVES 
27 
(i) Agarics of woodlands and copses 
(a) Mycorrhizal formers 
Leccinum scabrum (Fries) S. F. Gray 
Birch rough stalks or Brown birch-bolete. 
Cap: width 45-150 mm. Stem: width 70-200 mm; length 20-30 mm. 
Description: Plate i. 
Cap: convex and becoming only slightly expanded at maturity, pale 
brown, tan or buff, soft, surface dry, but in wet weather becoming 
quite tacky, smooth or streaky-wrinkled and cap-margin not over- 
hanging the tubes. 
" Stem: white, buff or greyish, roughened by scurfy scales which are 
minute, pale and arranged in irregular lines at the stem-apex, and 
enlarged and dark brown to blackish towards the base. 
Tubes: depressed about the stem, white becoming yellowish brown 
at maturity, with small, white pores which become buff at maturity 
and bruise distinctly yellow-brown or pale pinkish brown when 
touched. 
Flesh: watery, very soft in the cap lacking distinctive smell and either 
not changing on exposure to the air or only faintly becoming pinkish 
or pale peach-colour. 
Spore-print: brown with flush of pinkish brown when freshly prepared. 
Spores: very long, spindle-shaped, smooth, pale honey-coloured under 
the microscope and more than 14 p.m in length (14-20 [jim long X 
5-6 [Jim broad). 
Marginal cystidia: numerous and flask-shaped. Facial cystidia: sparse, 
similar to marginal cystidia. 
Habitat & Distribution: Found in copses and woods containing birch 
trees, or even accompanying solitary birches. 
’ General Information : This fungus is recognised by the pale brown cap, 
the white, unchanging or hardly changing flesh and the cap-margin 
not overhanging the tubes. There are several closely related fungi 
) which also grow with birch trees but they need some experience in 
order to distinguish them. This fungus was formerly placed in the 

28 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
genus Boletus, indeed it will be found in many books under this 
name. Species of Leccinum are edible and considered delicacies in i 
continental Europe. The majority can be separated from the other • 
fleshy fungi with pores beneath the cap, i.e. boletes, by the black; 
to brown scaly stem and rather long, elongate spores. The scales i, 
on the stem give rise to the common name ‘Rough stalks’ which is 
applied to this whole group of fungi. % 
Illustrations: F 39C; Hvass 253; LH 122; NB 155®; WD 89b 
Suillus greviUei (Klotzsch) Singer Larch-bolete 
Cap: width 30-100 mm. Stem: width 15-20 mm; length 50-70 mm. 
Description : Plate 2. 
Cap; convex or umbonate at first, later expanding and then becoming 
plano-convex, golden-yellow or rich orange-brown, very slimy i 
because of the presence of a pale yellow sticky fluid. 
Stem : apex reddish and dotted or ornamented with a fine network, 
cream-coloured about the centre because of the presence of a ring 
which soon collapses, ultimately appearing only as a pale yellow 
zone; below the ring the stem is yellowish or rusty brown, particu- 
larly when roughly handled. 
Tubes: adnate to decurrent, deep yellow but becoming flushed wine-^ 
coloured on exposure to the air, with angular and small sulphur- 
yellow pores which become pale pinkish brown to filaceous or 
pale wine-coloured when handled. 
Flesh: with no distinctive smell, pale yellow immediately flushing 
filaceous when exposed to the air, but finally becoming dingy red- 
brown, sometimes blue or green in the stem-base. 
Spore-print: brown with distinct yellowish tint when freshly prepared. 
Spores: long, ellipsoid, smooth and pale honey when under the micro- 
scope, less than 12 pm in length (8-1 1 pm long X 3-4 pm broad). 
Marginal cystidia: in bundles and encrusted with amorphous brown, 
oily material. Facial cystidia: similar in shape and morphology to 
marginal cystidia. 
Habitat & Distribution: Found on the ground accompanying larch 
trees either singly or more often in rings or troops. 
General Information: This fungus is easily recognised by the poorly 
developed ring, overall golden-yellow colour and pale yellow vis- 
cidness on the cap which comes off on to the fingers when the fruit- 

r 
Plate 1. Fleshy fungi: Spores borne within tubes 
ilk 

Plate 2. Fleshy fungi: Spores borne within tubes 
50 mm 
50 mm 
I 

AGARICS AND THEIR RELATIVES 
3 
body is handled. There are several closely related fungi which also 
grow with coniferous trees, e.g. Suillus luteus Fries, ‘Slippery jack’, 
but many need experience in order to identify them. All these fungi 
were formerly placed in the genus Boletus, because of the fleshy 
fruit-body with pores beneath the cap. The larch-bolete receives its 
common name from the close relationship of the fungus with the 
larch. On drying S. luteus and S. grevillei may strongly resemble 
one another but the former can be distinguished when fresh by the 
chocolate brown, sepia, or purplish brown cap and the large whitish, 
lilac-tinted ring. 
Species of Suillus are edible and rank highly in continental cook- 
books, although they have disagreeably gelatinous-slimy caps, a 
character, in fact, which helps to separate them from other fleshy 
pore-fungi. 
Illustrations: F 41a; Hvass 257; ML 187; NB 104^; WD 84^. 
Boletus badius Fries Bay-coloured bolete 
Cap: width 70-130 mm. Stem: width 34-37 mm; length 1 10-125 
(36-40 mm at base). 
Description : Plate 3. 
Cap; hemispherical, minutely velvety, but soon becoming smooth and 
distinctly viscid in wet weather, red-brown flushed with date-brown 
and darkening even more with age and in moist weather to become 
bay-brown. 
Stem : similarly coloured to the cap but paler particularly at the apex, 
smooth or with faint, longitudinal furrows which are often powdered 
with minute, dark brown dots. 
Tubes: adnate or depressed about the stem, lemon-yellow but imme- 
diately blue-green when exposed to the air and with angular, rather 
large similarly coloured, pores which equally rapidly turn blue-green 
when touched. 
Flesh: strongly smelling earthy, pale yellow but becoming pinkish in 
centre of the cap, and blue in the stem and above the tubes when 
exposed to the air, but Anally becoming dirty yellow throughout. 
Spore-print: brown with a distinct olivaceous flush. 
Spores: long, spindle-shaped, smooth, honey-coloured under the 
microscope and greater than 12 p.m in length (13-15 pm long X 
5 pm broad). 

32 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Marginal cystidia: numerous, flask-shaped and slightly yellowish. 
Facial cystidia: scattered and infrequent and similar to marginal 
cystidia in shape. 
Habitat & Distribution: Found in woods, especially accompanying pine i , 
trees, but often found fruiting on the site of former coniferous trees, , 
even years after the trunks or the stumps have been removed. 
General Information: This fungus is recognised by the rounded, red- 
brown cap, coupled with the pale yellow flesh and greenish yellow 
tubes, both of which become greenish blue when exposed to the air. 
There are several species in the genus Boletus which stain blue at < 
the slightest touch or when the flesh is exposed to the air, e.g. 
B. erythropus (Fries) Secretan, a common bolete with a dark oliva- * 
ceous cap, orange pores and red-dotted stem. 
The flesh of some species of Boletus, e.g. B. edulis Fries, however, 
remains unchanged or at most becomes flushed slightly pinkish. 
Although many people say thev recognise B. edulis, the ‘Penny-bun’ 
bolete — a name derived from the colour of the cap, there is some 
doubt as to whether the true B. edulis is common in Britain as we ^ 
are led to believe. B. edulis and its relatives are highly recommended 
as edible (see p. 35). B. badius is also edible, but it is ill-advised to 
eat any bolete which turns blue when cut open. 
Illustrations: B. badius — F 38c; Hvass 248 (not very good); LH 191; 
NB 109^; \VD 85b B. edulis: F 42a; Hvass 246; LH 191; NB 143^. 
) 
General notes on Boletes j 
I 
There are nearly seventy boletes recorded for the British Isles and | 
evidence of others which have as yet not been fully documented. As a i 
group they are characterised by being fleshy, possessing a central stem 
and producing their spores within the tubes, and not on gills as in the 
common mushroom. It is the first character by which the boletes 
differ so markedly from the other pored fungi, such as the ‘Scaly < 
Polypore’ (see p. 140). ^ 
The boletes have long been classified in the genus Boletus, but ’ 
instead of referring all the pored, fleshy fungi to a single large genus 
several genera are now recognised. The separation of these genera is 
based on differences in colour of the spore-print and differences in the \ 
anatomy of the tubes, cap and stem, etc., e.g. members of the genus 
J 

Young fruit-body with section 
showing incurved margin 

34 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Suillus have colourless or pale coloured dots on the stem exuding a 
resin-like liquid in wet weather, which is clear and glistening in some 
species but turbid and whitish in others, gradually darkening and 
hardening so that the stem is ultimately covered in dark brown or 
reddish smears or spots; members of the genus Leccinum on the other 
hand never exude liquid and have coarse or fine roughenings on the 
stem which are usually dark, but may commence white and ultimately 
darken depending on the species; many species of Boletus possess a 
very distinct raised network all over the stem, whilst others have it 
present only in part, or have minute, often brightly coloured, dots 
replacing it. 
Within this single, yet not particularly large, group of fungi, several • 
biological phenomena are demonstrable. There is good evidence that 
the majority of British boletes are mycorrhizal; several species are 
known to be associated only with one species of tree or group of closely 
related tree-species. Thus Suillus grevillei and S. aeruginascens (Secre- 
tan) Singer grow in association with larch trees: S. luteus and Boletus 
badius in contrast grow in association with pine trees; Leccinum 
scabrum with birch trees; L. aurantiacum (Fries) S. F. Gray, with 
poplar trees and L. quercimim (Pilat) Green & Watling, with oak trees. 
Boletus edulis can be separated into several distinct subspecies which 
are associated with different trees; the two commonest subspecies are 
those associated with birch and with beech trees. It is well known that 
although present in this country during the warmer periods of the ; 
Ice-Age, larch neither survived the intense cold of the last advance of 
the ice nor migrated back into Britain after the ice had melted. Thus l 
all larches which we see in Britain have been planted by man. There t 
is little doubt that mycelia of many fungi were introduced along with 
these plants very probably including the mycelium of the larch-bolete. ' 
A similar pattern can be seen with other introduced trees, although not ' 
to such a marked degree, e.g. spruce trees. The beech tree, however, ! 
is native to the south of England, unlike the larch returning to this i 
country after the ice had melted; it has been planted extensively i 
outside its former range in northern areas of the British Isles taking : 
with it its associated fungi. There is some evidence that some stocks 
of beech and fungi have been introduced from continental Europe in i 
comparatively recent times. 
A parallel, yet inexplicable association is found between the bolete 
Suillus bovinus (Fries) O. Kuntze and its close relative Gomphidius i 

AGARICS AND THEIR RELATIVES 
35 
1 roseus (Fries) Karsten where the mycelium of two fungi are found inter- 
twined forming a close association! Parasitism although rare is also 
found amongst the boletes, and an uncommon parasitism at that — a 
fungus on a fungus; for example in Britain although infrequent Boletus 
parasiticus Fries grows attached and ultimately replaces the spore- 
tissue of the common earth-ball {Scleroderma, see p. 192). 
I Those fungi which grow on dead and decaying substrates are called 
i saprophytes and although the greater number of higher fungi would 
' be included in this class of organisms the character is infrequent 
amongst the boletes. One British example of this type of fungus is 
the rare Boletus sphaerocephalus Barla which grows on woody debris. 
Chemists have long been interested in boletes, for as noted above the 
flesh of some species when exposed to the atmosphere turns vivid 
! colours, a feature often incorporated into the Latin name, e.g. Boletus 
purpureus Persoon, from the purple colours produced whenever the 
“ fruit-body is handled. The reaction appears to be an oxidation where 
in the presence of an enzyme and oxygen a pigmented substance or 
substances are produced. What the significance of these colour-changes 
is in nature is as yet unknown; however, what is interesting is that 
many of the chemicals involved are unique and have only recently 
been analysed completely; they are related to the quinones. 
There is little doubt that it is this rapid and intense blueing of the 
flesh of many boletes that has lead to a belief that they are poisonous. 
It is uncertain whether there are any truly toxic species of Boletus 
but several have unpleasant smells and tastes which make them very 
unattractive. Boletus edulis is the important ingredient, however, which 
gives the distinctive taste to ‘so-called’ dried mushroom soup. Thou- 
sands of fruit-bodies are collected annually in the forests of Europe to 
be later dried and processed for incorporation into soup. Boletes 
appear to form an important part of the diet of several rodents and 
deer and in Scandinavia in the diet of reindeer. 
Probably one of the most obscure of our British boletes is Strohilo- 
myces floccopus (Fries) Karsten, the ‘Old IVIan of the Woods’. It has a 
black, white and grey woolly, scaly cap and stem, and the flesh dis- 
tinctly reddens when exposed to the air. The spores are almost spherical, 
purple-black in colour and covered in a coarse network when seen 
under the microscope. All these characters readily separate Strobilo- 
myces from all other European boletes; however, in Australasia, members 
of this and related genera form a very important part of the flora. 

If 
36 IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Chroogomphus rutilus (Fries) O. K. Miller Pine spike-cap 
Cap: width 30-150 mm. Stem: width 10-18 mm; length 60-120 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: convex with a pronounced often sharp umbo, wine-coloured, 
flushed with bronze-colour at centre and yellow or ochre at 
margin, viscid but soon drying and then becoming paler and quite 
shiny. 
Stem: yellowish orange, apricot-coloured or peach-coloured, streaked 
with dull wine-colour, spindle-shaped or narrowed gradually to the * 
apex from a more or less pointed base. 
Gills: arcuate-decurrent, distant, at first greyish sepia then dingy 
purplish with paler margin, but finally entirely dark purplish brown. 
Flesh: lacking distinctive smell and reddish yellow or pale tan in the 
cap, rich apricot- or peach-colour towards the stem-base. 
Spore-print: purplish black. 
Spores: very long, spindle-shaped, smooth, olivaceous purple and 
greater than 20 pm in length (20-23 X 6-7 pm). 
Marginal cystidia: cylindrical to lance-shaped and up to 100 X 15 pm. 
Facial cystidia: similar to marginal cystidia. 
Habitat & Distribution: Found in pine woods, usually solitary or in 
small groups. Fairly common throughout the British Isles and 
characteristic of Scots Pine woods. 
General Information : This fungus can be distinguished by the purplish 
or wine-coloured cap and the gills being pigmented from youth. ^ 
There is only one other British species of this genus, i.e. C. corallinus 
Miller & Watling. 
Chroogomphus is separated from Gomphidius by the flesh having ' 
an intense blue-black reaction when placed in solutions containing 1 
iodine, and the gills being coloured from their youth. In many ^ 
books Chroogomphus is placed in synonymy with the genus Gomphi- |! 
dius. However, Gomphidius glutinosus (Fries) Fries, G. roseus (Fries) I 
Karsten and G. maculatus Fries all have whitish gills when immature j 
which gradually darken, and their flesh simply turns orange-brown ^ 
in solutions of iodine. G. glutinosus is uniformly grey in colour and 1 
is most frequently found under spruce and other introduced conifers: * 
G. roseus has a pale-pinkish coloured cap and white stem, and grows 
with pine; G. maculatus grows under larch and is flushed filaceous * 
at first but becomes strongly spotted with brown when handled. 
Illustrations: Hvass 192; LH 213; WD 83^. j 
i 

! 
i' 
I- 
20 nm 

38 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Paxillus involutus (Fries) Karsten Brown roll-rim 
Cap: width 50-120 mm. Stem: width 8-15 mm; height 30-75 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: at first covex with a strongly inrolled, downy margin, but then 
expanded and later frequently depressed towards the centre, clay- 
coloured, ochre or yellow-rust, slightly velvety but becoming smooth 
or sticky particularly in wet weather and readily bruising red-brown 
when fresh. 
Stem : central or slightly eccentric, thickened upwards, fibrillose-silky, 
similarly coloured to the cap but typically streaked with red-brown 
particularly with age. 
Gills: ochre or yellow-brown then rust and finally darker brown, 
decurrent, crowded, often branched and united about the apex of 
the stem; easily peeled from the flesh with the fingers and rapidly 
becoming red-brown on handling. 
Flesh: thick, soft and with slightly astringent smell and yellowish to 
brownish but becoming red-brown after exposure to the air. 
Spore-print: rust-brown. 
Spores: medium-sized, ellipsoid, smooth, deep yellow-brown and 
rarely greater than 10 pm in length (8-10 X 5-6 pm). 
Marginal cystidia: numerous lance-shaped or spindle-shaped. 
Facial cystidia: scattered and similar in shape to marginal cystidia. 
Habitat & Distribution: Found on heaths and in mixed woods, parti- 
cularly where birch has or is now growing, or even accompanying 
solitary birch trees. 
General Information : This fungus is easily recognisable by the strongly 
inrolled, woolly margin of the cap and yellow-brown gills which 
are easily separable from the cap-flesh. P. rubicundulus P. D. Orton 
is similar but grows under alder and has yellow gills unchanging when 
handled and dark scales on the cap. P. atrotomentosus (Fries) Fries 
and P. panuoides (Fries) Fries both grow on coniferous wood and 
have smaller spores; the former is recognised by the dark brown to 
almost black shaggy stem and the latter by the shell-shaped cap 
devoid almost completely of a stem. 
Illustrations: F 41c; Hvass 189; LH 185; NB 115®; WD 70^. 

! 
Plate 5. Fleshy fungi: Sppres brown and borne on gills 
i 

40 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Cortinarius pseudosalor J. Lange 
Cap: width 60-125 Stem: width 15-25 mm; length up to 180 mm. ^ 
Description : 
Cap: bell-shaped or bluntly conical only slightly expanding with 
maturity, smooth or wrinkled at centre but often furrowed at the I 
margin, slimy, brown with a distinct olive flush when in fresh 
condition and becoming ochraceous brown and shiny when dry. 
Stem: usually swollen to some degree about the middle, slimy parti- 
cularly towards the base, whitish throughout when young except -t 
for a faint amethyst or violaceous flush in the lower part; as the 
slime dries the stem becomes shiny and the outer surface breaks 1 
up into flbrillose scales or scaly, irregular ring-zones. 
Flesh: lacking distinct smell, white with ochraceous flush in the cap, j 
white in the stem, thick and soft in the cap but fibrous in the stem, i 
Gills: adnate, broad, rather thick, frequently veined and distant, 5 
ochraceous brown and finally deep rust-brown. 1 
Spore-print: rust-colour. * 
Spores: long, slightly almond-shaped in side view, finely warted | 
throughout and not less than 12 [xm in length (13-14 X 7-8 pm). 
Marginal cystidia: ellipsoid or club-shaped, hardly different from the \ 
surrounding undeveloped basidia. 
Facial cystidia: absent. 
HabiMt & Distribution: Found on the ground in copses and woods 
especially those containing beech. 
General Information: Recognised by the conical, grooved cap and the > 
slimy spindle-shaped stem with a distinct violaceous flush; this 
fungus is often misnamed C. elatior Fries but this is a much less 
common fungus. There are several closely related fungi, but these 
grow with other tree-species and need much more experience to 
distinguish one from the other. C. pmicola P. D. Orton is one such 
species growing in the litter under Pinus syhestris, Scots Pine; this 
species is fairly common in the remnant pine woods of Northern 
Scotland. The large size, sticky or glutinous cap and stem indicate 
that this fungus belongs to Cortinarius^ subgenus Myxacium. 
Illustrations: Hvass 145; LH 162; NB 119; WD 6oh ' 

Plate 6. Fleshy fungi: Spores brown and borne on gills 

42 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
General notes on Cortinarii 
The genus Cortinarius is the largest genus of agarics in the British Isles, 
indeed in Europe and North America— perhaps in the world. It in- 
cludes some of our most beautiful agarics, yet it is one of the least 
satisfying to the mycologist because of the difficulties experienced in 
identifying collections— partly because many species are so seldom 
seen. 
Cortinarius contains just under two hundred and fifty recognisable 
British species, although recent research has shown that many more 
are yet to be described from this country as new to science. Except for 
some very characteristic species the individual members within the 
genus Cortinarius are often very difficult to separate one from the other; 
however, Cortinarius is one of our least difficult genera to recognise in 
the field owing to the presence when mature of rust-coloured gills 
and a cobwebby veil which extends from the margin of the cap to the 
stem. This structure is termed a cortina (Fig. 14) and in young specimens 
covers the gills with delicate filaments. As the cap expands the cottony 
or cobwebby filaments are stretched and either disappear entirely or 
may collapse to form a ring-like zone of filaments on the stem. In 
some species a second completely enveloping veil is also found, and this 
veil is viscid in one distinct group of which C. pseudosalor already 
described is a member. The gills in the genus are variable in colour 
when young although constant for a single species; they may be 
filaceous purple, orange, brown, red, yellow-ochraceous or tan, but 
ultimately in all members at maturity thev become rust-colour. The 
spores under the microscope are richly coloured, yellow to red-brown 
and are frequently strongly warted ; in mass they are rust-brown 
and this character coupled with the presence of the cobweb-like veil 
characterises the genus. 
Within the genus Cortinarius there is a wide range of characters 
varying from species with distinctly sticky caps and stems, some with 
sticky caps and dry stems to those with both dry caps and stems. A 
few species are very large and fleshy whilst others are quite slender and 
many of the latter rapidly change colour on drying out and are then 
said to be hygrophanous. However, although there is such a large 
spectrum of characters in a single genus the species all have in common 
the cortina and rust-coloured gills, the latter often appearing as if 
powdered with rusty dust. 

AGARICS AND THEIR RELATIVES 
43 
Utilising the characters mentioned above this very large genus can 
be split into the following six sections, called by the mycologist sub- 
genera 
a. Large to medium sized fleshy agarics with viscid caps and stems — 
Myxacium 
b. Large, fleshy agarics with viscid or tacky caps when fresh but dry 
stems — Phlegmacium 
c. Large to medium sized agarics with dry, scaly or humid caps and 
dry stems which if orange tawny are robust— Cortinarius 
d. Medium, rarely large, agarics with dry, silky to innately flbrillose 
caps, slender stems and frequently with at least part of the fruit- 
body yellow, orange or reddish — Dermocyhe 
e. Medium to small agarics with silky flbrillose, non-hygrophanous 
caps which may become tacky in wet weather and then usually 
with robust, clavate-bulbous stems — Sericeocyhe 
f. Small, less frequently medium or large agarics, all with distinctly 
hygrophanous caps — Hydrocybe. 
In several continental books some or all of these divisions are recog- 
nised as distinct genera in their own right. The subgenus Telamoma 
which occurs in many texts was formerly thought to differ from 
Hydrocybe in the presence of a universal veil; the universal veil is a 
second veil which completely envelopes the fruit-body when it is 
young and is in addition to the cortina. However, the modern treatment 
would seem to suggest that the presence of the universal veil is not of 
the utmost importance and so the two subgenera are incorporated into 
one. The name Hydrocybe reflects the character of changing colour 
as it dries out because of the loss of water. Within each subgenus 
the species are distinguished by the colour of the young gills and of 
the cap, the veil colour and texture, and microscopic characters of the 
spores, particularly their size. 
The majority of species of Cortinarius are mycorrhizal and like the 
boletes possess very specific relationships with tree species. Thus some 
are typical of coniferous woodland and others typical of deciduous 
woodland in general, whilst others typify woods of a particular tree, 
e.g. beech, oak, birch, pine, larch. Some species are characteristic of 
woods on limestone or chalky soils (calcareous) whilst others are 
characteristic of woods on sandy, heathy acidic soils. For example, 
Cortmarius armillatus (Fries) Fries which is found in damp woods and 
possesses one or more cinnabar-red or scarlet zones on the stem and 

44 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
red fibrils at the stem-base appears to be connected with birch. Several 
species are associated with native trees whilst others have undoubtedly 
been introduced from abroad. They are very important in the economy 
of the woodland ecosystem. 
One of the most beautiful and easily distinguished of our British 
species is Cortinarius violaceus (Fries) Fries which has uniformly deep 
violet-coloured stem and cap and coloured cystidia on the gill-margin, 
a character unusual in Cortinarius. 
No species are known to be truly poisonous and many species are 
known to be edible, but many are too small to be of any value. Some of 
the larger species are regarded as good to eat, but frequently are too 
scarce. Thus the necessity for experience to recognise the different 
species, coupled with their often unpleasant tastes make them an 
unimportant group of agarics for eating. 

AGARICS AND THEIR RELATIVES 
45 
Russula ochroleuca (Secretan) Fries Common yellow russula 
Cap: width 50-100 mm. Stem: width 20-35 mm; length 50-100 mm. 
Description: Plate 7. 
Cap: yellow-ochre or dull yellow becoming paler with age, or flushed 
faintly greyish green, convex but soon expanding and becoming 
flat or depressed in the centre, smooth, or granular when young and 
slightly tacky in wet weather, faintly striate at the margin. 
Stem: white at first then flushed slightly greyish, smooth or wrinkled, 
firm at first but quickly becoming soft and fragile. 
Flesh: brittle, firm at first then soft, white, yellow under cap-centre. 
Gills: white at first then flushed pale cream-colour, brittle, adnexed 
to free, rather distant. 
Spore-print: faintly cream when freshly prepared. 
Spores: medium-sized, hyaline, broadly ellipsoid or subglobose to 
almost globose, coarsely ornamented with prominent warts which 
stain blue-black when mounted in solutions containing iodine and 
which are faintly interconnected by low ridges, about 8x7 pm in 
size (9-10 X 7-8 pm). 
Marginal cystidia: prominent, lance- to spindle-shaped and often filled 
with oily material. 
Facial cystidia: similar in shape to marginal cystidia and projecting 
some distance from the gill-face. 
Habitat & Distribution: Commonly found in mixed woods from summer 
until late autumn. 
General Information: Easily recognised by the ochre-yellow cap, very 
pale cream-coloured spore-print and greying stem. Two other 
yellow-capped species of Russula are commonly found. R. claroflava 
Grove with yellow spore-print and blackening fruit-body which grows 
with birches in boggy places, and R. lutea (Fries) S. F. Gray which is 
much smaller, having a cap up to 50 mm and very deep egg-yellow 
gills and spore-print; it grows in deciduous woods. 
Illustrations: F 22a; Hvass 226; LH 119; NB 137^; WD 49b 
General notes on the genus Russula 
A large genus with nearly one hundred distinct species in the British 
Isles and several others yet unrecognised or undocumented. This genus 
is composed generally of large toadstools often beautifully coloured, 
indeed the majority have brightly coloured caps in reds, purples. 

46 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
yellows or greens depending on the species although a few are pre- 
dominantly white bruising reddish brown or grey to some degree. 
Such large and distinctive fungi one would think would be the 
easiest members of our flora to identify, unfortunately they are not. 
They form a group quite isolated in their relations, the only close 
relatives being members of the genus Lactarius, to be dealt with later 
(see p. 50). The flesh of members of both Lactarius and Russula 
contains groups of rounded cells, a feature unique amongst agarics 
and explains why in Russula the fruit-bodies, cap and gills and some- 
times the stem are brittle and easily break if crushed between the 
fingers. The fruit-body does not exude a milky liquid when the flesh 
is broken. 
The spore-print varies, depending on the species involved, from white 
to deep ochre and individual spores are covered in a coarse ornamenta- 
tion which is composed of isolated warts or warts interconnected by 
raised lines, or mixtures of both. The ornamentation stains deep blue- 
black when the spores are mounted in solutions containing iodine and 
the pattern which is produced appears in many cases to be of a specific 
character. 
The majority of the species, if not all north-temperate species are 
mycorrhizal and the familiar host-tree fungus relationship can be 
recognised : — 
R. claroflava Grove, with birch in boggy places, R. emetica (Fries) 
S. F. Gray with pine in wet places, R. hetularum Hora with birch in 
grassy copses and R. sardonia Fries with pines. Brief notes are here 
included giving the basic characters of eight common species, but it 
must be appreciated the identification of many species within this 
genus is difficult. 
-I 
I 
•V 
h 
1^' 
1 
1 
1 , 
R. atropurpurea (Krombholz) Britz. Blackish purple russula 
Cap: width 50-100 mm. Stem: width 14-25 mm; length 60-80 mm. 
Cap: deep reddish purple but becoming spotted with either cream- 
colour or white blotches. 
Stem : white but becoming flushed greyish or stained brownish with age. 
Gills: white then very pale yellow. 
Flesh: white in cap and stem. 
Spore-print: white. 
On the ground in mixed woods and copses, particularly those containing 
oak. 

Plate 7. Fleshy but brittle fungi: Spores whitish and borne on gills 

48 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Russula cyanoxantha (Secretan) Fries 
Cap: width 50-150 mm. Stej?i: width 10-30 mm; length 50-100 mm. 
Cap: lilac, bluish to purple often with green tints. 
Stem: pure white. 
Gills: pure white. 
Flesh: white. 
Spore-print: white. 
Common in deciduous woods, especially beech-woods. 
R. emetica (Fries) S. F. Gray Emetic russula 
Cap: width 50-100 mm. Steyn: width 8-15 mm; length 25-70 mm. 
Cap: bright scarlet fading with age to become spotted pinkish, slightly 
viscid when moist. 
Stem: spongy, fragile. 
Flesh: white. 
Gills: pure white. 
Spore-print: pure white. 
In pine woods usually in boggy areas. 
R.fellea (Fries) Fries Geranium-scented russula 
Cap: width 40-75 mm. Stem: width 10-20 mm; length 30-75 mm. 
Cap: tacky when fresh, straw-coloured or pale tawny brown. 
Stem: similarly coloured to the cap. 
Gills and flesh: pale straw-colour and smelling of House Geraniums 
(i.e. Pelargoniums). 
Spore-print: cream-coloured. 
Common under beech. 
R. foetens (Fries) Fries Foetid russula 
Cap: width 70-170 mm. Stem: width 15-30 mm; length 50-90 mm. 
Cap: slimy, dingy yellow to tawny, margin strongly furrowed and 
ornamented with raised bumps. 
Stem: whitish then flushed or spotted with rust-brown. 
Gills: straw-coloured, often spotted brown with age and beaded with 
watery droplets when growing under moist conditions. 
Flesh: white to cream, brittle and with foetid-oily smell. 
Spore-print: pale cream-colour. 
Common in deciduous woods. 

AGARICS AND THEIR RELATIVES 
49 
R, mairei Singer 
Cap: width 30-75 mm. Stem: width 7-15 mm; length 35-70 mm. 
Cap : scarlet red but developing creamy areas with age, dry. 
Stem and gills : white but with a distinct although faint greenish grey 
flush, the former fairly firm. 
Flesh: white. 
Spore-print: pure white. 
Commonly accompanying beech, even individual trees in gardens. 
/?. nigricans (Merat) Fries Blackening russula 
Cap: width 75-200 mm. Stem: width 15-35 length 25-75 ^^n* 
Cap: cream-coloured then flushed sooty brown, finally black as if 
scorched by proximity to bonfire. 
Stem: white then dark brown. 
Gills: pale ochre reddening when bruised, thick and very distant. 
Flesh: white slowly dull red on cutting then brown and finally changing 
soot-colour after some time. 
Spore-print: white. 
Common in deciduous woods. 
R, xerampelina (Secretan) Fries 
Cap: width 50-140 mm. Stem: width 15-30 mm; length 40-60 mm. 
Cap: deep blood-red or brownish red. 
Stem: white with a flush of red towards the base. 
Gills : cream then ochraceous. 
Flesh: white staining brownish and smelling strongly of fish- or crab- 
paste, and staining dark green when a crystal of green iron sulphate 
is rubbed into it. 
Spore-print: deep cream-colour. 
Common in mixed woods; a very variable fungus with many colour- 
forms, but easily recognised by the green reaction with ferrous 
sulphate. 

50 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Lactarius turpis (Weinm.) Fries Ugly milk-cap 
Cap: width 60-200 mm. Stem: width 10-25 mm; length 40-75 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: firm, convex usually with a central depression at maturity, dark 
olive-brown or dark greyish olive with a yellow-tawny, woolly margin 
when young which soon disappears, and the whole cap becomes 
sticky with age and turns deep purple when a drop of household ^ 
ammonia is placed on it. 
Stem : short, stout, similarly coloured to the cap except for the distinctly ‘ 
ochraceous apex, slimy and pitted. 
Gills: crowded, cream-coloured to pale straw-coloured, but soon 
spotted with dirty brown, particularly when bruised. 
Flesh: white or greyish ochre exuding a milk-like liquid which lacks ; 
a distinct smell and is white and unchanging when»exposed to the air. 
Spore-print: pale pinkish buff. 
Spores: subglobose or ellipsoid and covered in a network of strongly | 
developed, raised lines interconnected by finer ones, both of which 
stain blue-black in solutions containing iodine, generally 8 X 6 pm ' 
in size (7-8 X 6-7 pm). 
Marginal cystidia: lance- or spindle-shaped and filled with oily con- 
tents. 
Facial cystidia: similar to marginal cystidia. < 
Habitat & Distribution: Common in woods and copses, or on heaths I 
especially in boggy places but always where birch is growing. 
General Information: Easily recognised by the dull colours and purple < 
reaction with alkali; there is no British species with which L. turpis | 
can be mistaken. The purple reaction is similar to that found in the | 
familiar school laboratory reagent litmus, for the compound found | 
in L. turpis turns purple in alkali and reddens in acidic solutions. First ' 
discovered by Harley in 1893 this reaction marked the beginning 
of a whole series of chemical studies on the agarics which has led 
to the discovery of many unique compounds. 
Illustrations: Hvass 214 (but too green); LH 213; NB 113^; WD 38b 
General notes on the genus Lactarius 
There is little doubt that the genus Russula and the genus Lactarius 
are closely related ; in fact they stand aside from the other agarics in 

Plate 8. Fleshy and milking fungi: Spores whitish and borne on gills 
25 mm 
L.S. of gills showing 
mixed trama, milky 
droplets and cystidia 
Young fruit-body 
showing woolly margin 
Ellipsoid spores with 
net work on surface 
8 iim 
40 urn 
I 

52 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
the very important character mentioned on page 46. In Europe the 
easiest distinction between the two genera is that members of the 
genus Lactarius exude a milk-like juice which may be white or variously 
coloured depending on the species involved (e.g. purple in L. uvidus 
(Fries) Fries, yellow in L. chrysorheus Fries). The cap, stem and 
frequently the gills are brittle and when broken liberate the milk-like 
liquid; when the fruit-body is dry, however, the presence of this liquid 
may be difficult to demonstrate. The spores have a blue-black ornamen- 
tation under the microscope when mounted in iodine, and although 
when in mass the colours are not as varied as those found in the genus 
Russula there is every likelihood that they will play an important role 
in the classification of the group in the future. The colour of the 
spore-print has been rather neglected, although the genus includes 
some rather unusual fungi. 
The odours of many species are very distinct and vary from the smell 
of coconut and spice to those of various flowers; an odour commonly 
met with is termed ‘oily rancid resembling butter which has become 
mouldy’ ; in early books it was described as being the smell of bed-bugs ! 
The majority of the species are undoubtedly mycorrhizal: thus L. 
torminosus is found with birch, L. deliciosus and L. rufus with conifers 
and L. quietus with oak. Brief notes are given on additional species: — 
L. camphor atus (Fries) Fries Curry-centred milk-cap 
Cap: width 20-50 mm. Stem: length 20-50; width 4-6 mm. 
Cap and stem: red-brown. 
Gills: reddish brown. 
Flesh: reddish buff with an aromatic odour resembling spices which 
becomes very strong when dried and exudes a pale thin milk-like 
liquid. 
Common in conifer woods and plantations. 
L. deliciosus (Fries) S. F. Gray Saffron milk-cap 
Cap: width 50-120 mm. Stem: length 20-60 mm; width 15-25 mm. 
Cap: viscid, dirty greyish ochre with flush of tawny but soon becoming 
greenish with age. 
Stem: dirty buff or greyish ochre, spotted with green particularly with 
age or on handling. 
Gills: orange-yellow bruising deep orange but becoming green with 
time. 

AGARICS AND THEIR RELATIVES 
53 
Flesh: pinkish to apricot-coloured but becoming green with age and 
exuding a rich orange-red fluid which gradually becomes greyish 
green. 
Frequent in conifer woods and plantations. 
L. glyciosmus (Fries) Fries Coconut-scented milk-cap 
Cap: width 20-50 mm. Stem: length 30-50 mm; width 5-8 mm. 
Cap: usually with a central ‘bump’, greyish lilac, dull and minutely 
scaly or velvety. 
Stem: white to pale yellowish. 
Gills: pale yellowish to flesh-coloured then flushed lilaceous. 
Flesh: pale yellowish or flushed lilaceous, smelling strongly of desic- 
cated coconut and exuding a white unchanging milk-like liquid. 
In woods and on heaths, particularly where birch is growing. 
L. quietus (Fries) Fries Oak milk-cap 
Cap: width 30-80 mm. Stem: length 40-80 mm; width 10-15 n^m. 
Cap and stem: milky cocoa-coloured, zoned with reddish brown. 
Gills: pale ochraceous then flushed red-brown. 
Flesh: similar to gills, smelling strongly of rancid oil, and exuding a 
white, thin milk-like liquid which becomes very, very faintly yellow 
on exposure to the air. 
Common wherever oak is growing. 
L. rufus (Fries) Fries Rufous milk-cap 
Cap: width 50-90 mm. Stem: length 50-90 mm; width 10-15 mm. 
Cap: dark red-brown with a distinct, usually sharp ‘bump’ in centre. 
Stem: pale red-brown throughout or whitish at base. 
Gills: pale reddish brown and exuding a white, unchanging milk-like 
fluid. 
In pine woods and less frequently with birches on acid heaths. 
L. torminosus (Fries) S. F. Gray Woolly milk-cap 
Cap: width 40-150 mm. Stem: length 60-100 mm; width 15-30 mm. 
Cap: pale strawberry-pink or pale salmon colour, distinctly zoned, 
slimy when wet at centre and strongly shaggy fibrillose at margin. 
Stem and gills : pale strawberry colour. 
Flesh: tinged salmon-pink and exuding a white unchangeable milk- 
like liquid. 
Frequent where birches grow. 

54 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Amanita muscana (Fries) Hooker Fly agaric 
Cap: width 100-175 mm. Stem: width 30-40 mm; length 150-275 mm. 
Description : 
Cap; bright scarlet to orange-red with scattered whitish or yellowish 
fragments of veil particularly towards the centre and hanging down 
from the margin, viscid when moist, striate at margin with age. 
Stem: white, striate above the soft easily torn, although prominent, 
ring which is white above and yellow below; stem-base swollen and 
ornamented with patches of yellowish or white veil-fragments which 
form concentric rings or ridges of tissue. 
Gills: white, free, crowded, fairly thick, minutely toothed at their edge. 
Flesh: soft, lacking distinctive smell, or at times slightly earthy and 
white, yellowish below cap-centre. 
Spore-print: white. 
Spores: long, hyaline under the microscope, ellipsoid, smooth about 
10 X 7 pm in size (10-13 X 7-8 pm). 
Marginal cystidia: composed of chains of swollen, hyaline cells. 
Facial cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distribution : Found in birch-woods, less frequently collected 
in the vicinity of conifers; wide-spread and fairly common, but it is 
erratic in its appearance giving the impression of being absent from 
a locality until one season it suddenly fruits in profusion. 
General hiformation : An easily recognised fungus because of its striking 
colour. It is also very familiar and well-known because it appears so 
often on Christmas cards, and features commonly in illustrations in 
children’s story-books. The fungus contains a poison which formerly 
was used to kill flies — hence the common name of ‘Fly agaric’ and 
the scientiflc name from the latin name for the house-fly. The red 
skin of the cap, where the major amount of the poison resides, was 
cut up with a little milk and sugar or honey; flies attracted to this 
sweet concoction inadvertently ate the poison and later perished. 
This fungus has a very well documented and long history and appears 
in the legends of many countries. It is featured in Greek mythology, 
Slavic and Scandinavian folk-lore and indeed appears in the pre- 
history of Indian tribes of N.E. Asia. It has even been connected 
with the formation of certain sects within the early Christian church. 
Illustrations : F. frontispiece; Hvass i; LH 117; NB 113^; WD 2^. 

Plate 9. Fleshy fungi: Spores white and borne on gills 
Young fruit-bodies showing the elongation 
of stem and disruption of volva 

56 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Notes on the genus Amanita 
The genus Amanita contains many important mycorrhizal fungi 
including the ‘Blusher’, A. rubescens (Fries) S. F. Gray, the ‘Tawny 
grisette’, A. fuha Secretan, and the ‘False death-cap’, A. citrina 
S. F. Gray. The first grows on heaths and in woods with a variety of 
trees; A. fuha frequently grows with birch and A. citrina with several 
leafy trees although its var. alba (Gillet) E. J. Gilbert appears to be 
confined to beech woods. However, there is some evidence that many 
members of the genus in drier more southern countries than Britain, 
are non-mycorrhizal. In fact the genus as a whole may be southern- 
temperate in its distribution. In the British Isles the number of species 
of Amanita recorded decreases as one goes north, or the frequency of 
single species except for a few widespread forms falls off northwards. 
In a few cases a more familiar southern species is replaced in similar 
habitats by another species, e.g. A. phaUoides (Fries) Secretan is replaced 
by A. virosa Secretan the ‘Destroying angel’ in Scotland, and A. 
citrina frequently in the north by A. porphyria (Fries) Secretan. 
Species of Amanita are usually large conspicuous fungi and the genus 
contains some of our best known agarics. One, A. muscaria (Fries) 
Hooker has already been mentioned, but the genus also includes the 
‘Death-cap’ A. phaUoides and ‘Caesar’s mushroom’ A. caesarea (Fries) 
Schweinitz, a fungus not found in this country but considered to be 
superior in edibility to all other fungi; thus edible and deadly poisonous 
species are found closely related and this simply emphasises how 
important it is not to eat the agarics one finds in the woods and 
fields except when accompanied by a ‘real’ expert. Deaths or near 
fatalities in Europe and North America are recorded annually due to 
the eating of fungi belonging to this genus. 
The poisonous qualities of the fungi in this genus — only a very 
small amount of poison is often sufficient to produce fatal results — 
has led to a close connection between these fungi and black magic and 
the supernatural. This connection is even more emphasised when it is 
learnt that some have an intoxicating effect. Hence the long history 
mentioned earlier. 
Members of the genus Amanita are characterised by their anatomy 
and certain macroscopic features; the former is illustrated under 
A. muscaria, i.e. the divergent gill-trama. The main macroscopic 
character of note is the presence of a volva at the base of the stem 

AGARICS AND THEIR RELATIVES 
57 
f 
gi 
la 
of 
)e 
s. 
ir 
J, 
i 
le 
>) 
le 
IS 
iV 
d 
and it is the details of this volva which helps to distinguish different 
species. A. phalloides has a distinct, loose, membranous sheath, in A. 
citrina the volva is reduced to a narrow rim around the bulbous stem 
and in A. rubescens and A. muscaria the volva is simply a series of con- 
centric zones of woolly scales. All the four species noted above possess 
a ring, but A. fulva the ‘Tawny grisette’ and A. vaginata (Fries) 
Vittadini the ‘Grisette’ only possess a volva; this has lead to the use 
of the generic name Amanitopsis in many books, now no longer con- 
sidered necessary. 
The veil in Amanita is probably the most highly developed amongst 
our common agarics and from Appendix iv it can be seen how the 
scaly cap and stem originate and how the volva differs from the ring. 
The volva and cap-scales constitute what has been called the universal 
veil and the ring which stretches from the cap margin to the stem has 
been termed the partial veil. 
The spores of species of Amanita are large and their shape and 
chemical reactions help to distinguish the different species within the 
genus. One of the most interesting features, however, is that the spore- 
mass, although usually described as white, in many species is not white 
but flushed greenish grey, etc. The slight subtleties in colour of the 
spore-print assist in classification. 
The following notes may be instructive in conjunction with the 
information above (for common names see above). 
(i) Possessing a ring on the stem: — 
ir A, citrina S. F. Gray 
Q Cap: width 55-80 mm. Stem: width 18-22 mm; length 70-80 mm. 
A lemon-yellow or whitish capped agaric with bulbous stem-base, 
y I white patches of volva on cap and white stem with flesh strongly 
. I smelling of new potatoes. 
(j Spores: almost globose and measuring 9-10 X 7-8 pm. 
iS 
y A. excelsa (Fries) Kummer 
Cap: width 75-140 mm. Stem: width 20-28 mm; length 85-120 mm. 
y A greyish or brownish capped agaric with clavate stem-base, grey 
r patches of volva on the cap and white concentrically scaly stem 
c with flesh unchanged on exposure to the air. 
(1 I Spores: broadly ellipsoid and measuring 9-10 X 8-9 pm. 

IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
58 
A. rubescens (Fries) S. F. Gray 
Cap: width 70-120 mm. Stem: width 12-25 length 65-100 mm. 
A reddish fawn or pinkish buff capped agaric with swollen stem-base, 
pinkish or flesh-coloured patches of volva on cap and reddish con- 
centrically scaly stem with flesh becoming reddish when exposed to 
the air. 
Spores: ellipsoid and measuring 9-10 X 5-6 pm. 
A, pantherina (Fries) Secretan ‘Panther’ 
Cap: width 48-95 mm. Stem: width 12-20 mm; length 65-100 mm. 
An olive-brown or smoky brown capped agaric with only slightly 
swollen stem-base, white patches of volva on the cap and white 
concentrically scaly stem with unchanging flesh. 
Spores: ellipsoid and measuring 8-12 X 7 pm. 
A, phalloides (Fries) Secretan 
Cap: width 70-85 mm. Stem: width 12-20 mm; length 85-120 mm. 
A greenish or yellow-olive capped agaric with stem sheathed in mem- 
branous volva, white patches of volva on cap and smooth, white 
stem with white flesh. 
Spores: broadly ellipsoid and measuring 10-12 X 7 pm. 
(ii) Lacking ring on stem: — 
A.fulva Secretan 
Cap: width 40-60 mm. Stem: width 10-15 mm; length 100-150 mm. 
A thin, tawny-brown agaric with stem sheathed in membranous volva 
and pale tawny, slightly scaly stem. 
Spores: globose and 10-12 pm in diameter. 
A. vaginata (Fries) Vittadini 
Differs from A.fulva in the cap being metallic grey or silvery in colour. 

AGARICS AND THEIR RELATIVES 
59 
(b) Parasites 
Armillaria mellea (Fries) Kummer Honey-fungus 
Cap: width 50-150 mm. Stem: width 10-12 mm; length 75-150 mm. 
Description: Plate 10. 
Cap: at first convex then more or less flattened or slightly depressed, 
very variable in colour, yellowish, olive, buff, sand-coloured or some 
shade of brown, at first covered in small, brownish or ochraceous 
scales which give the young cap a velvety aspect, but gradually the 
scales disappear with age except at the cap-centre; margin striate 
and usually paler than centre of the cap. 
Stem: equal or swollen at base, often several grouped together, white 
at apex above a whitish, rather thick, ring which is flushed with 
olive-yellow or red-brown at its margin; stem-base fibrillose, 
whitish but finally red-brown at maturity. 
Gills: adnate or slightly decurrent, whitish then flushed flesh colour 
and developing brownish spots with age or in cold, wet weather. 
Flesh: with rather strong and unpleasant smell, white or flushed 
pinkish in the cap, brown and stringy in the stem. 
Spore-print: very pale cream colour. 
Spores: medium-sized, hyaline, ellipsoid, less than 10 pm in length 
(8-9 X 5-6 pm). 
Marginal cystidia: variable, hyaline, cylindric and not well-differen- 
tiated. 
Facial cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distribution : This fungus grows in troops or is found joined 
at the base to form clusters. It is always attached to old trees, trunks, 
stumps and buried wood, either directly or by its vegetative stage 
which darkens and aggregates to form strands resembling boot-laces 
which are called rhizomorphs. 
General Information : This rather variable, and therefore often perplex- 
ing, fungus causes a destructive rot of trees and can travel long dis- 
tances through the soil with the use of its rhizomorphs. It commonly 
grows on several species of broad-leaved trees, but can also colonise 
conifer trees. It also attacks garden shrubs, such as privet-hedges, 
and is particularly destructive to Rhododendrons causing a wilt of the 
whole shrub and subsequent death; it has also been recorded as 
attacking potatoes. The actively growing mycelium which can often 
be found growing under the bark of infected trees, exhibits a lumin- 

6o 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
osity if freshly exposed and placed in a darkened room. The rhizo- 
morphs of A. me! lea are highly specialised structures composed of 
mycelial threads some of which have become rather more differen- 
tiated than is normally found in the vegetative stage of other agarics. 
Illustrations: F 27a; Hvass 26; LH 93; NB 141^; WD 4^. 
Pholiota sqiiarrosa (Fries) Kummer Shaggy Pholiota 
Cap: width 50-120 mm. Stem: width 17-25 mm; length 95-125 mm. 
Description : Plate ii. 
Cap: convex, but expanding and becoming flattened with a slight 
central umbo, ochre-yellow to yellowish rust-colour and covered 
with dark brown recurved scales which are particularly dense at 
the centre. 
Stem: variable in length and thickness depending on how it is attached 
to the substrate, whether in a deep crack or wound, or in a depression, 
and how many specimens are in the cluster; its colour is similar to 
that of the cap, exhibits a small, dark brown fibrillose, torn ring or 
ring-zone and is ornamented with recurved red-brown scales below 
that ring. 
Gills: broadly adnate with a decurrent tooth and crowded, yellowish 
at first then rust-coloured. 
Flesh: with strong, pleasant but pungent smell, yellowish brown, soft 
in the cap, fibrous in the stem. 
Spore-print: rich rust-brown. 
Spores: medium-sized, pale brown under the microscope, smooth, 
ellipsoid, and 6-8 X 4 pm in size. 
Marginal cystidia: spindle-shaped, hyaline, numerous. 
Facial cystidia: flask-shaped with a small apical appendage and be- 
coming rich yellow when immersed in solutions containing ammonia. 
Habitat & Distribution: Common in clusters in woods, gardens or 
parks, on wood or at the base of the trunks of broad-leaved trees in 
summer and autumn. 

Plate 10. Fleshy fungi: Spores white and borne on gills 
Armillaria mellea 

62 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
General Information : Although rather a common easily recognisable 
and aesthetically pleasing fungus growing in its characteristic clusters 
at the base of trees, it is a weak parasite entering the living tissue 
after invading decayed areas of the tree. This is the reason wTy 
when branches are broken off trees by wind, snow or storms, they 
should be carefully trimmed to remove ragged edges and the 
wound treated with a protective tar to stop the entry of rain, cold 
and fungus spores. Other more destructive fungi may enter a tree 
through such wounds ; P. squarrosa frequently attacks mountain ash 
or rowan. 
It is recognised by the dry scaly cap and stem which helps to 
distinguish it from the sticky capped P. aurivella (Fries) Kummer 
with similar habitat preferences but wider spores (6-9 X 4-5 pm). 
P, adiposa (Fries) Kummer is found on beech trees and it, too, has a 
viscid cap, but the spores are 5-6 X 3-4 pm in dimensions. 
Illustrations: Hvass 134; LH 149; \VD 54^. 

Plate 11. Fleshy fungi: Spores rust-brown and borne on gills 
Pholiota squarrosa 
Scaly cap and stem 
9f) 

64 IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
(c) Saprophytes — wood inhabiting or lignicolous agarics 
Hypholoma fasciculare (Fries) Kummer Sulphur-tuft 
Cap: width 20-50 mm. Stem: width 6-13 mm; length 40-100 mm. 
Description: 
Cap: sulphur-yellow, flushed with sand-colour or red-brown at centre 
then ochraceous yellow throughout, convex at first with margin 
incurved and clothed with fibrillose remnants of a yellow-olive veil, 
but then becoming flattened and losing evidence of that veil. 
Stem: equal or flcxuous, usually with several joined at base, similarly 
coloured to the cap, fibrillose streaky or with some fibrils from the 
veil stretching from the cap to the stem in young specimens. 
Gills: sinuate and crowded, at first sulphur-yellow then olive-green, 
but finally with a flush of purple-brown. 
Flesh: with rather strong and unpleasant smell, yellow throughout. 
Spore-print: purple-brown. 
Spores: medium-sized, ellipsoid or ovoid, smooth, purple-brown and 
less than 10 pm in length (6-8 X 4 pm). 
Marginal cystidia: flasked-shaped, short, cylindnc and hyaline. 
Facial cystidia: more swollen than marginal cystidia and with silvery 
contents which yellow in solutions containing ammonia. 
Habitat & Distribution: The sulphur-tuft grows in dense clusters on 
and around old stumps of broad-leaved trees, and can be found 
throughout the year; it also grows on conifers, but less frequently. 
General Information : It may be recognised by the greenish tint of the 
immature gills and of the young cap. H. capnoides (Fries) Kummer 
grows on the wood of coniferous trees and has a much more ochrace- 
ous brown cap and stem than the sulphur-tuft and slightly larger 
spores — 7-8 X 4-5 pm. H. sublateritium (Fries) Quelet grows on 
hardwoods but is bigger than //. fasciculare and has a brick-coloured 
cap and very sturdy stem (spores 6-7 X 3-4 pm). 
Illustrations : F 37b; Hvass 176; LH 147; NB 141®; WD 76^. 

i Plate 12. Fleshy fungi: Spores purplish brown and borne on gills 
ft 

66 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
FlammuUna velutipes (Fries) Karsten Velvet-shank 
Cap: width 20-80 mm. Stem: width 5-10 mm; length 35-60 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: bright sand-colour or slightly red-brown at centre, convex at 
first then flattened with age, smooth, slimy because of the presence 
of a sticky elastic skin, rather rubbery to the touch. 
Stem ; cylindrical or slightly swollen towards the base, dark brown and 
densely hairy or velvety, tough and rubbery to handle. 
Gills: adnexed, very unequal and somewhat distant, pale yellow, gra- 
dually becoming buff as the spores mature. 
Flesh: with rather pleasant smell, yellowish, watery and soft. 
Spore-print: white. 
Spores: medium-sized, hyaline, ellipsoid and about 8 X 3-4 pm in 
size (7-9 X 3-4 pm). 
Marginal cystidia: hyaline, elongate, broadly flask-shaped. 
Facial cystidia: similar to marginal cystidia. 
Habitat & Distribution : Found in clusters on old stumps, fallen trunks 
and on the wounded parts of standing trees. 
General Information : This fungus can be recognised by the clustered 
habit, the viscid, bright tawny cap and the dark velvety stem. This 
is one of the few agarics which occurs regularly late in the season, 
even appearing in the winter, although it can be seen growing in 
its familiar groups at almost any time of the year. This fungus holds 
a rather isolated position in classification and was once placed in the 
genus CoUybia. It may be found in several books under this last 
genus. 
Illustratiojis : F i8b; Hvass 80; LH 109; NB 141^; WD 21^. 


68 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Mycena galericulata (Fries) S. F. Gray Bonnet mycena 
Cap: width 25-50 mm. Stem: width 3-6 mm; length 50-125 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: conical or bell-shaped then expanding but retaining a central 
umbo, never completely flattened, smooth, greyish, pale sepia or 
dirty white and striate with darker lines from the margin to the ' 
centre. 
Stem; similarly coloured to the cap, smooth, shiny, tough and usually 
noticeably downy at base. ' 
Gills: at first white flushed distinctly pale pink with age, uncinate, ; 
rather distant and sometimes with interconnecting veins. 
Flesh: white with little or no distinctive smell. 
Spore-print: white. 
Spores: medium-sized, hyaline, broadly ellipsoid, smooth, about 10 X 
7 pm in size (9-12 ^ 6-8 pm) and staining bluish grey when mounted 
in solutions containing iodine. 
Marginal cystidia: club-shaped but the apex ornamented with blunt ; 
hairs of varying lengths. 
Facial cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distribution: Commonly found, in all but the coldest months, j 
in woods, parks or gardens, often in dense clusters on stumps and !i 
fallen trunks of broad-leaved trees. 
General Informatioji : This is one of our commonest members, and one 
of the largest in the genus Mycena; many species in this genus are 
quite small yet are nevertheless very important components of the 
woodland flora decomposing leaves, twigs, etc., and contributing in 1 
this way to the recirculating of organic matter. 
The name Mycena is derived from the same Greek word as that ^ 
which refers to the country around the ancient city of Mycenae in 
the plain of Argos, and from whence Agamemnon came and gathered ’ 
his forces to invade Troy to reclaim Helen his wife. It has been i 
suggested that this similarity in name came about through the 1 
necessity for an army stationed in Argos, early in the history of 
Ancient Greece, to rely on the mushrooms found on the plains | 
about to save the soldiers from starvation. 
Illustrations : F 17a; Hvass 119; LH 109; NB 133®; WD 26^. 

Plate 14. Fleshy fungi: Spores while and borne on gills 
I 
\ 
Adult fruit-body and section 
2-spored basidia 

70 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Pluteus cervinus (Fries) Kummer Fawn pluteus 
Cap: width 40-100 mm. Stem: width 10-15 mm; length 75-125 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: conical, rapidly expanding and then becoming plano-convex or 
flattened with only a slight but persistent umbo, dark brown, umber’^ 
or Vandyke brown, viscid when wet and often with radiating fibrils. 
Stem: white, streaked to varying degrees with dark brown fibrils, 
cylindrical or slightly swollen towards the base, where it is attached 
to the substrate. 
Gills: remote, very crowded, thin, at first white then distinctly salmon- 
pink. ^ 
Flesh: with pleasant smell, white and soft. 
Spore-print: dull salmon-pink. 
Spores: medium-sized, very faintly buff under the microscope, 
broadly ellipsoid and 7-8 X 5-6 pm in size. 
Marginal cystidia: flask-shaped, the majority with three or four hooks 
at the distinctively thick-walled apex. 
Facial cystidia: similar to marginal cystidia but sometimes intermixed* 
with those lacking hooks. 
Habitat & Distribution: This fungus grows singly or in groups on old 
stumps and fallen trunks throughout the year except for the most 
wintry months; it is commonest in autumn. 
General Information : This fungus may also grow on old sawdust heaps, 
a habitat which is often very worth while examining in detail by the 
interested amateur during wet seasons. In summer sawdust heaps 
dry out but after a good soaking, which, of course, can be applied * 
artificially by frequent watering with a hose or watering-can, many 
interesting fungi develop. On sawdust heaps containing conifer 
debris a larger species with black or dark brown edge to the gills is 
found — P. atromarginatus Kiihner. 
The peculiar pointed cystidia found on the gill-edge and on the ^ 
gill-face of P, cervmus were thought by some early mycologists to | 
stop mites and insect larvae from crawling up between the gills and * 
damaging the developing spores. There is no evidence that this 
actually takes place in nature; the real purpose of these obscure 1 
structures is unknown and has been little studied. 
Illustrations : Hvass 127; LH 121; NB 135^; WD 50^. 
i 

Plate 15. Fleshy fungi: Spores pinkish and borne on gills 

r 
I 
I 
I 
72 IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI , | 
Gymnopiliis penetrans (Fries) Murrill 1 
Cap: width 20-50 mm. Stem: width 4-7 mm; length 20-50 mm. ,j 
Description: ij 
Cap: convex then becoming flattened at maturity, dry, slightly scaly, jj 
golden tawny, or rusty yellow and when young with the remnants B 
of a rapidly disappearing yellow cortina hanging from the margin. .1 
Stem: yellow above and red-brown or orange-tawny below and j 
darkening on bruising; veil forming a delicate flbrillose zone in thej 
upper part of the stem which is soon lost on excessive handling. 
Gills: adnate to slightly decurrent, thin and crowded, at first golden 
yellow, but soon spotted rust colour. I 
Flesh: yellow and lacking distinctive smell. j 
Spore-print: rich orange-tawny. 
Spores: medium-sized, ellipsoid, flnely roughened and deep yellow 
brown under the microscope, less then 10 pm in length (7-8 X 5-4 
pm). 
Marginal cystidia: hyaline, flask-shaped with long often slightly 
irregular neck. 
Facial cystidia: similar to the marginal cystidia, but often broader. * 
Habitat & Distribution: This fungus is found on sticks or twigs or 
chips of coniferous wood, particularly in plantations. 
General Information : Although it has only comparatively recently been 
recognised in Britain it is very wide-spread. It has been confused 
with, indeed described under, the name of the less-common fungus 
Gymnopiliis sapineus (Fries) Maire which also grows in conifer 
woods; it is easily distinguished, however, by its spotted gills. Both 
the fungi above can be found in books under the old name Flammula, 
from the bright colour of the caps of many of its constituent members, 
but Fla7nmula has been used for a genus of flowering plants also 
and this has precedence. 
Illustrations : F 29a; Hvass 152 not very good; LH 175 not very good; 
NB 109®. 

Plate 16. Fleshy fungi; Spores rust-brown and borne on gills 
Filamentous cells of cap-surface 

74 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Notes on the artificial family group 'Pleiirotaceae ' — the Oyster ) 
mushrooms 
One of the common features of lignicolous fungi is the fact that they 
lack a distinct stem or if one is present it is attached to one side of the 
cap, i.e. lateral. However, in the past the correlation of the habitat 
with lack of stem has induced mycologists to define a single family to 
include all these forms. After studying the anatomy and microscopic ! 
characters this grouping has been found to be entirely artificial and 
simply reflects how the morphology is tied up intimately with the 
ecology of a species. 
In this one family members of the genera Panus, Panellus, Lentinus, ■. 
Lentinellus, Crepidotus, Pleurotellus, and Pleurotus have all been grouped 
together, but some of the genera are more related to the polypores 
referred to later (p. 135); many of those with brown spores are better 
placed with Cortinarius and some of those with white or cream-coloured 
spores are better placed close to Mycena and Tricholoma. This leaves 
as a residue the genus Pleurotus, a genus which although rather hetero- 
geneous contains one familiar member, i.e. the common Oyster mush- 
room, Pleurotus ostreatus. 
Pleurotus ostreatus (Fries) Kummer Oyster mushroom 
Grows up to i^a mm across. 
Cap: flattened, shell-shaped, smooth or slightly cracked, deep bluish 
grey, gradually becoming brownish with age and finally dark buff. 
Stem : absent or very short, passing gradually into one side of the cap. 1 
Gills: white flushing dirty yellow with age, rather distant and deeply 
decurrent. 
Flesh: white, soft and with very pleasant smell. 
Spore-print: pale lilac. 
Spores: long, hyaline, oblong under the microscope and lo-ii X 4 pm 
in size. 
Marginal and facial cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distribution : Common, clustered in tiers on stumps, trunks, 
posts, etc. 
General Information : This fungus is not infrequent on old telephone- 
poles and forms white sheets of mycelium immediately under the 
bark of fallen trees. Although frequent in autumn it may be found 
throughout the year and is easily recognised by its size and bracket- ; 
1 

25 
Marginal cystidia 
of Crepidotus mollis 

76 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
like, shell-shaped caps. It surprisingly has a pale lilac spore-print 
and not as might be expected a white spore-print. In the var. 
columbinus Quelet the young caps are a beautiful peacock-blue; this 
variety frequently grows on poplars. 
Illustrations : F 125^; Hvass 109; LH 107; NB 125^; WD 31b 
Panus toriilosus (Fries) Fries is a tough, funnel-shaped, yellowish 
cinnamon fungus with oblong-ellipsoid, small, hyaline spores 
measuring 5-6 X 3 pm and changing yellowish not bluish grey in 
iodine solutions. 
Panellus stipticus (Fries) Karsten forms tiers of pale cinnamon- 
brown, more or less kidney-shaped, scurfy caps on old wood and has 
egg-shaped, hyaline, small spores measuring 4 X 2-3 pm which 
become bluish grey in iodine solutions. 
Lentinellus cochleatiis (Fries) Karsten forms irregular lobed and 
twisted, flattened or funnel-shaped dirty brownish caps with a 
fragrant smell, toothed gill-edges and almost spherical, small, hyaline 
spores measuring 5X4 pm which become bluish grey in iodine 
solutions. 
Lentinellus apparently has very close affinites to Auriscalpium , ‘the 
Ear pick fungus’, (p. 158) both in the structure of the spores and the 
anatomy of the fruit-body. 
Lentinus lepideus (Fries) Fries forms very tough fruit-bodies with 
convex or flattened, pale yellowish caps and stems ornamented with 
dark tawny or brown scales. The stem is often eccentric and buried 
in cracks or soft rotten wood on which it grows; the spores are non- 
amyloid. It grows on pine stumps but also on decaying or unprotected 
railway sleepers and wooden paving blocks, joists, etc., made of 
conifer wood. When the fungus fruits in a darkened environment, 
such as a cellar, the mushroom-like fruit-bodies are not produced 
but are replaced by slender branched structures similar to the ‘Stag’s 
horn’ or ‘Candle-snuff fungus’ (p. 206), or to certain of the Fairy 
Club fungi (p. 172). Similar growths have been recorded for 
Polyporus squamosus which grows on hard wood timber and is 
described in detail later (p. 140). 

AGARICS AND THEIR RELATIVES 
77 
Crepidotus mollis (Fries) Kummer Soft slipper toadstool 
Cap: up to 45 mm across and in tiers, sessile, shell-shaped or kidney- 
shaped, smooth, rubbery and bro-wnish ochre in colour. 
Gills: pale buff then cinnamon-brown and finally flushed snuff-brown, 
thin and crowded. 
Flesh: watery, gelatinous beneath the skin of the cap and whitish buff. 
Spore-print: warm brown. 
Spores: ellipsoid, smooth, medium-sized, pale buff under the micro- 
scope and 8-9 X 5-5-5 pm in size. 
Easily recognised by the soft elastic cap which can be stretched without 
breaking, the brown gills and pale buff spores. (See Plate 49, p. 153.) 
Illustrations: LH 177; NB 145^; WD 69^. 
The artificiality of classifying all those agarics with both a spoon- 
shaped or bracket-shaped fruit-body, and a reduced (or lacking) stem 
is further exemplified by the presence of similar genera in other 
groups of fungi. For instance Claudopus is typified by pink, angular 
spores (Plate 28) and Clitopilus is characterised by longitudinally 
ridged spores, i.e. they are not angular in all optical sections but only 
when seen end on (see p. loi). An example of the former is C. 
parasiticus (Quelet) Ricken which grows on dead remains of woody 
fungi, and of the latter C. passackerianus (Pilat) Singer which may 
invade mushroom beds. Both species are quite small though the last 
fungus is similarly coloured to the more familiar Clitopilus prunulus 
(Fries) Kummer, ‘The Miller’, so common in woods and fields. 
Thus in the British Isles agarics with eccentric stems may be found, 
in the white, brown and pink-spored groups — and in the tropics and 
subtropics the picture is completed by the existence of the genus 
Melanotus in the black-spored agarics. M. bambusinus Pat. grows on 
bamboos and M. musae (Berk. & Curt.) Singer grows on dead leaves 
and debris of bananas; the latter is also a probable agent in the decay 
of fibres in the tropics. 

IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
(d) Saprophytes— terrestrial agarics 
Melanoleuca melaleuca (Fries) Murrill 
Cap: width 40-110 mm. Stem: width 50-80 mm; length 50-90 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: dark brown, umber or Vandyke when moist, hygrophanous and 
becoming very much paler on drying almost tan, convex then 
flattened sometimes umbonate, smooth or wrinkled. 
Stem; white or whitish covered in brownish fibrils which increase in 
number with age or after handling; solid, rather elastic and slightly 
swollen towards the base. 
Gills: white, broad, crowded and as if cut out from behind before 
joining the stem. 
Flesh: with pleasant smell, soft, white, becoming brownish with age, 
particularly in the stem. 
Spore-print: very pale ivory-colour. 
Spores: medium-sized, ellipsoid, hyaline under the microscope and 
roughened by distinct dots which become blue-black when mounted / 
in solutions containing iodine, 8 X 4-5 pm. 
Marginal cystidia: spear- or sword-shaped, roughened with crystals 
at the top and appearing as if barbed like fish-spines. 
Facial cystidia; numerous and similar to marginal cystidia. 
Habitat & Distribution : Common in autumn in woods; also found in » 
pastures. 
General Information : A very common fungus which is rather confusing 
to the beginner because of its variation in colour, brought about by v 
the change in colour with change in content of water. However, this 
fungus can be easily recognised by the unusually ornamented cystidia 
found on the gill-faces and gill-margins. This character and the i 
fact that the spores possess amyloid ornamentation define in part 
the genus Melanoleuca. In many books this common fungus is found i 
under the genus Tricholoma\ however, members of this latter genus ,| 
have neither amyloid ornamented spores nor barbed cystidia. , 
Illustrations : LH 103; WD 13b 
I 
1 


8o 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
CUtocyhe infimdihuliformis (Wcinm.) Quelet Common funnel-cap 
Cap: width 20-60 mm. Stem: width 8-13 mm; length 35-75 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: yellowish ochre flushed slightly pinkish buff or cinnamon 
but later pale tan on ageing or drying, funnel shaped. 
Stem: colour like cap or slightly darker, flexible but firm and solid. 
Gills: white or faintly flushed buflf, decurrent and crowded. 
Flesh: with pleasant slightly floral smell, white, soft and fairly thin. 
Spore-print: white. 
Spores: medium-sized, hyaline, tear-drop shaped, smooth, 6-7 X 3-4 
pm and not blueing when mounted in solutions containing iodine. 
Marginal cystidia: little different from young basidia in dimension and 
shape, although some may have a short apical prolongation. 
Facial cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distribution : Woods, copses, heaths and hill-pastures from 
summer to autumn. 
General Information : An easily recognisable fungus because of its 
graceful stature, thin, funnel-shaped pinkish buff cap and tear-drop- 
shaped spores. Several Clitocybe species grow in woodlands, many of 
them appearing later in the season when colourful agarics are rarer. 
The genus Clitocybe is characterised by the fleshy cap with in- 
curved margin when young, fibrous, fleshy stem and decurrent gills. 
C. clavipes (Fries) Kummer has a smoky brown, top-shaped cap, 
fragile stem which also has a distinct swelling at its base, and strong 
rather unpleasant smell. C. nelmlaris (Fries) Kummer is similar, but 
is pale cloudy grey, has a less fragile stem and a fairly pleasant smell. 
This species if often covered in a bloom which develops further as 
the fruit-body deteriorates. The agaric Vohariella surrecta (Knapp) 
Singer is a rare parasite of C. nebularis (see p. 247) and it has been 
suggested that this bloom may in fact belong to this species. How- 
ever, I have on several occasions tried to encourage the bloom to 
reproduce by keeping hoary looking fruit-bodies of C. nebularis in 
a damp-chamber, but as yet I have never been successful. 
Nevertheless, it is an exercise which would be of great interest 
to continue and a source of great excitement if the small pink-spored 
agaric were produced. C. fragrans (Fries) Kummer is a small, 
sweetly aromatic-smelling species found in frondose woods, and 
C. langei flora, is a mealy-smelling species of conifer plantations. 
Illustrations : F i6a; Hvass 55; LH 95; WD i6‘^. 

Plate 19. Fleshy fungi: Spores white and borne on gills 

82 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Heheloma crustuliniforme (St Amans) Quelet Fairy-cake mushroom 
Cap: width 40-80 mm. Stem: width 8-12 mm; length 38-85 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: pale yellow buff or pale tan with a distinct reddish buff or 
cinnamon-brown tint, darkening only slightly with age; smooth, 
at first tacky to the fingers, but then dry and shiny at centre, 
convex and hardly expanding. 
Stem : cylindrical or slightly swollen towards the base, whitish and with a 
flush of pinkish buff at apex, and covered all over in small, white scales. 
Gills: sinuate, crowded, pale clay-colour or buff, but finally dull dark 
yellow ochre except for the distinct white margins which are beaded 
in wet weather with droplets of liquid. 
Flesh: whitish with a very strong smell of radishes. 
Spore-print: dark clay-colour. 
Spores: long, slightly almond-shaped, pale brown under the micro- 
scope, distinctly warted and about ii X 6 pm in size (10-12 X 6-7 
pm). 
Marginal cystidia: cylindrical to skittle-shaped with slightly to dis- 
tinctly swollen apex. 
Facial cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distribution : Commmn in autumn on the ground by path- 
sides and in woodland clearings. 
Getieral Information: Recognisable by the uniform cinnamon or pinkish 
buff cap, white woolly scales on the stem and distinctive, strong 
smell of radish. There is some evidence that this species may on 
occasions be mycorrhizal; further field studies are required. 
There are several closely related fungi which are difficult for the 
amateur to differentiate from H. crustuliniforme \ there is no doubt 
that there are several species present in the British Isles which do 
not appear in the Check List of British Agarics & Boleti; in fact, 
it would appear that there are several yet to be described as new to 
science. Although individual species are fairly difficult to delimit, 
the genus Hebeloma itself is easily recognised, most members being 
medium sized with brown sinuate gills, whitish, yellowish, or pinkish, 
i.e. pale, caps and white-powdered stems. The word ‘crustulin’ 
which appears in the Latin name of //. crustuliniforme is itself from 
the Latin and means small cake, referring to the cap-shape, which 
remains fairly constant throughout the fungus’ growth. The common 
name is derived from this also. 

Plate 20. Fleshy fungi: Spores dull brown and borne on gills 
L.S. of gills showing 

84 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Inocyhe geophylla (Fries) Kummer Common white inocybe 
Cap: width 10-25 Stem: width 3-6 mm; length 30-50 mm. 
Description : 
Cap; conical with incurved margin then hell-shaped and retaining a 
distinct umbo even when mature, silvery white then ivory and 
finally pale tan particularly centrally and silky fibrillose throughout. 
Stem: slender, cylindrical but for a small swelling at the base, silky 
and shining with a few fibrils from a former cortina which may be 
brownish due to spores adhering to it at maturity. 
Gills: adnexed to free, crowded, pale ochraceous becoming clay- 
coloured. 
Flesh : white with smell of newly dug potatoes, strong when fresh. 
Spore-print: clay-colour. 
Spores: medium sized, ellipsoid or slightly French-bean-shaped, 
smooth, yellow-brown under the microscope and 9-1 1 x 4—5 pm 
in size. 
Marginal and facial cystidia: flask- to spindle-shaped with distinctly 
thickened walls and frequently ornamented with crystals apically. 
Habitat & Distribution : Common in troops m woodland clearings, by 
pathsides or on the edges of ditches bordering woods. 
General Information: This fungus is easily recognised by the very pale 
uniform colour, the colour of the spore-print, silky umbonate cap 
and small size. 1 he cortina connects the cap-margin and the stem 
and consists of a cobwebby structure which collapses at maturity. 
A violet coloured variety, var. hlacina Gillet is frequently found, 
in fact, even accompanying var. geophylla \ it differs only in the lilac- 
colour of the cap and stem. I. geophylla is a member of the very large 
genus Inocybe, further members of which will be dealt with later 
(see p. 238). 
The genus is well defined with dull-yellow spore-print, well 
differentiated sterile cells on the gill-edge (and often on the gill- 
face) and the cobweb— like veil, or cortina, stretching from the cap- 
margin to the stem and easily observed m young specimens. The 
genus is split into three distinct groups: those with smooth spores, 
those with nodulose spores and those with subglobose spores orna- 
mented with long projections. /. geophylla is included in the first 
group. The group which includes the nodulose-spored members 
has been elevated to the rank of genus by some authors, i.e. Astro- 
sporina—2. name referring to the spore-shape eg., I. asterospora. 
Illustrations: F 13a (too blue); LH 155; NB 139^; WD 65b 

Plate 21. Fleshy fungi: Spores dull brown and borne on gills 
30 mm 
20 mm 
L.S. of gills showing regular crama, 
Inocybe asterospora 

86 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Laccaria laccata (Fries) Cooke Deceiver 
Cap: width 12-28 mm. Stem: width 4-8 mm; length 15-60 mm. 
Descriptiofi : 
Cap: hygrophanous, reddish brown or brick-colour becoming ochra- 
ceous on drying, but can be rapidly returned to the original colour 
by placing on the top a drop of water which is rapidly absorbed; 
fragile, convex at first then flattened or depressed about centre, 
smooth or surface scaley, striate at margin when moist. 
Stem: similarly coloured to the cap, fibrous, cylindrical, tough and 
usually with white woolly base. 
Gills: adnate with or without a decurrent tooth, thick, distant and 
pinkish or pale reddish-brown, powdered with white when mature. 
Flesh: red-brown, soft in the cap and fibrous in the stem. 
Spore-print: pure white. 
Spores: medium sized, hyaline under the microscope and spherical, 
7-8 pm in diameter and beautifully spiny. 
Marginal and facial cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distribution : Common in troops in woodland, copses, on 
heaths; in fact it may be found in nearly all possible habitats. 
General Inforriiation : This is a very common agaric which in the future 
will probably be split into several distinct species; unfortunately it 
is as variable as it is common, hence the common name ‘deceiver’; 
it is often mistaken at first glance for manv other species quite un- 
related. 1 have seen even the most experienced mycologist pick up 
rather unfamiliar specimens of Laccaria laccata in mistake for a species 
of Lactarius or a species of Collybia, etc. I would hate to say more 
because I have been ‘deceived’ myself on more than one occasion. 
L. laccata appears to be a composite species, but because of the 
difficulty in defining some of the characters the splitting of the 
species has not as yet been satisfactorily solved. The smell, however, 
may well give a clue for some specimens smell very strongly of 
radish whilst others are odourless. 
L. proxima (Boudier) Patouillard, differs in having ellipsoid spores; it 
is larger in stature and is common in wet places. 
L. amethystea (Merat) Murrill, differs in the deep violet or amethyst- 
colour of the fruit-bodv and commonly grows in shaded woods. 
L. hicolor (Maire) P. D. Orton, which is less frequent, has filaceous 
gills and violaceous mycelium at the base of the stem. 
Illustrations: Flvass 66; NB 133^; WD 20^. 

Plate 22. Fleshy fungi: Spores white and borne on gills 

88 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Mycena sanguinolenta (Fries) Kummer Small bleeding mycena 
Cap: width 10-17 Stem: width 2-4 mm; length 50-80 mm. 
Description : 
Cap; bell-shaped or conical expanding only slightly with age and so 
remaining umbonate, reddish-brown, striate to the margin from the 
darker apex and blotched age with red-brown spots. 
Stem: pale reddish brown, very slender, fragile, woolly at the base and 
exuding a red-brown juice when broken. 
Gills: adnate, fairly distant, whitish to flesh-colour with a dark red- 
brown edge and not noticeably becoming blotched with red-brown. 
Flesh: with no distinctive smell, reddish-brown and very thin. 
Spore-print: white. 
Spores: medium sized, hyaline, ellipsoid to pip-shaped, smooth about 
10 [xm long (9-10 X 4-5 [xm) and becoming bluish grey when 
mounted in solutions containing iodine. 
Marginal cystidia; awl-shaped, pointed at the apex, swollen below 
and filled with dark red-brown contents. 
Facial cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distribution: Solitary or in small groups on poorly kept 
lawns, in woods and copses; it is particularly frequent in the beds of 
needles found in pine woods. 
General hiformation : This fungus is easily recognised by the slender 
habit, reddish juice exuded when broken and habitat preferences. 
Mycena haematopus (Fries) Kummer is larger and grows in tufts 
on wood, but also has a red-brown juice which, however, spots the 
gills. Another very common species of Mycena is M. galopus (Fries) 
Kummer which has a greyish or brownish cap and exudes a milk- 
like juice. The related M. leucogala (Cooke) Saccardo is almost black 
(seep. 216). These agarics exuding juice when broken have a flesh 
composed of filaments, a very different flesh-structure to species of 
Lactarius (see p. 50) and although their spores are amyloid they 
do not turn blue-black in iodine because of the presence of amyloid 
crests and warts. 1'here are few additional species of agaric which 
exude a milk-like liquid, but the majority of these are tropical or 
subtropical. The second names or epithets for the four species 
mentioned above all refer to the ‘latex’ — sanguinolenta — bleeding, 
haematopus blood-foot; galopus, milk-foot and leucogala, white milk. 
For notes on Mycena one is referred to p. 68 describing M. galeri- 
culata (Fries) S. F. Gray. 
Illustrations : \^’D 28“*. 

Plate 23. Fleshy, milking fungi: Spores white and borne on gills 
20 mm 
Adult fruit-bodies and 
section of Mycena 
sanguinolenta 
Marginal cystidia 
filled with dull 
red juice 

90 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Collyhia maculata (Fries) Kummer Spotted tough-shank I 
Cap: width 80-130 mm. Stem: width 5-20 mm; length 50-158 mm*. , 
Description : 1 
Cap: white but soon becoming spotted with reddish-brown, finally i| 
cream-colour with red-brown blotches, convex then becoming | 
flattened, fleshy, firm and tough. 
Stem: white becoming streaked red-brown, thickest in the middle, - 
longitudinally furrowed or striate and often narrowed downwards , 
into a long irregular root embedded in the deep litter. 
Gills: very crowded, cream-coloured, becoming spotted red-brown 
with age. 
Flesh: with pleasant smell, white and fibrous in the stem. 
Spore-print: pinkish cream-colour. 
Spores: small, almost spherical, hyaline under the microscope, about 
5 pm in diameter (4-5 x 5 pm) and not blueing when placed in solu- 
tions containing iodine. 
Marginal and facial cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distribution: Common in troops in woods, particularly 
beech but also found in pine woods and on heaths. 
General Information : Easily recognised by the crowded, narrow, cream 
coloured gills and the cap being entirely white when young, but which 
rapidly becomes spotted red-brown as it develops. ‘Maculatus’ 
means spotted and refers to the red-brown blotches which develop 
irregularly on the cap, stem and gills as the fruit-body matures. 
The genus CoUybia is characterised by the fruit-body being tough, 
the cap-margin incurved at first and the spore-print white or whitish. 
The common fungus C. maculata has always been assumed to have 
a white spore-print but if a cap is placed on a piece of white paper 
gills-down and left for twelve hours there is a suprise in store for 
the careful observer. 
Illustrations: F 15a; Hvass 77; LH loi; NB 103^; WD 21^. 

Plate 24. Fleshy fungi with tough stem: Spores white to cream and borne on gills 
! 

92 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
The specialised substrates of certain species of Marasmius and 
related genera 
A whole series of very small fungi are found in woodland communities 
which appear to be closely related one to another because their caps ^ 
are usually tough, although membranous, dry rapidly yet do not decay, 
and, moreover, revive on remoistening. Their gills are also rather tough "! 
and their spores always white in mass. They are placed in the genus - 
Marasmius. Collybia or Marasmius peronatus (Fries) Fries the ‘wood i 
woolly foot’ is one of our larger more familiar agarics related to this i 
group, but whereas it grows on all kinds of leafy detritus, even wood, 1 
these small fungi appear to be very specific to the substrate on which j 
they grow. ^ 
M. androsaceus (Fries) Fries grows both on heather and on pine- I 
needles (see p. 231). , j 
Cap : whitish or pinkish buff. * 
Stem: black and hair-like. 1 
Spores: pip-shaped and 7-9 X 3-4 p.m. ^ 
M. buxi Fries grows on box leaves. i 
M. epiphylloides (Rea) Saccardo & Trotter grows on ivy leaves. ; 
M. graminum (Libert) Berkeley grows on grass stems. j 
Cap: red-brown. I 
Stem: dark brown. j 
Spores: pip-shaped, 8-12 X 4-6 pm. i 
M. hudsonii (Fries) Fries grows on holly leaves. 
M. perforans (Fries) Fries grows on pine needles (now placed in the 
genus Micromphale). 
M. undatus (Berkeley) Fries grows on bracken stems. 
Cap: reddish brown or greyish and wrinkled. 
Spores: egg-shaped, 8-9 X 6-7 pm. 
Except for their rather special requirements as to substrate preference, 
these species have in common small size, rather tough horny stems and 
cap composed of erect ornamented cells. 
Several agarics which grow on cones have also been placed in ' 
Marasmius. They are frequent in spring and early summer the fruit- 
bodies being attached by a very long rooting stem and cord of fluffy 
hyphae to buried cones in conifers. The biology of these fungi is 
still unknown, but the cones to which they are attached are always 
closed yet buried often several inehes beneath the surface of the soil. 

Plate 25. Fleshy fungi with wiry to tough stem: Spores white and borne on gilts, 
fruit-body frequently reviving when moistened 
15 (im 
and growing on Hawthorn berries 

94 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
It is yet to be found whether the spores of the agaric infect the cones 
after they drop or whether the cones fall because they have become 
infected. How do the cones become so deeply buried? Are squirrels 
or rodents involved? All the species which grow on cones have brown 
or tawny caps and yellowish brown stems. 
Strobiluvus stephanocystis (Hora) Singer has cystidia with rounded 
heads and grows on pine-cones. '• 
S. tenacellus (Fries) Singer has pointed cystidia and grows on pine 
cones. 
S. esculentus (Fries) Singer has lance-shaped cystidia and grows on 
spruce cones. 
Baeospora myosura (Fries) Singer is tough and pale-coloured and is 
similar in general characters to species of Strobilurus, but has amy-^ 
loid spores and fruits on pine-cones in the autumn. 
When discussing the specialised plant-substrates, such as cones, one 
must mention the small brown-spored, pale buff coloured agaric 
Tubaria dispersa (Persoon) Singer, or Tubana autocJithona (Berkeley & 
Broome) Saccardo, which grows on the ground under hawthorns, often 
in troops in summer and autumn, attached to old hardened hawthorn 
berries. 

AGARICS AND THEIR RELATIVES 
95 
(ii) Agarics of Pastures and Meadows 
(a) Agarics of rough and hill pastures 
Hygmcybe pratensis (Fries) Donk Butter mushroom 
Cap: width 20-80 mm. Stem: width 5-12 mm; length 30-70 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: convex then expanding to become plano-convex with a broad 
low umbo, tan, pale russet or even yellowish buff throughout or 
slightly darker at the centre. 
Stem: gradually thickened upwards, similarly coloured to the cap or 
paler if the cap is dark russet. 
Gills: pale buff, deeply decurrent and often connected up at their 
bases by veins. 
Flesh: buff or pale tan, thick and soft in the cap, slightly fibrous in the 
stem. 
Spore-print: white. 
Spores: medium-sized, ellipsoid to egg-shaped, hyaline under the 
microscope, 7-8 X 5 [j.m in size and not becoming bluish grey in 
solutions containing iodine. 
Marginal and facial cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distribution: Common in pastures or on heaths from early 
summer to late autumn. 
General Information: A fungus easily recognised by the uniform buff- 
colour of the stem, cap and gills. As one might expect from the 
common name it is edible; it is held in high regard by many mush- 
room-pickers. 
Although ‘pratensis’ specifically means fields, reflecting the habitat 
of the fungus, this and related species can also be found on heaths and 
pastures often intermixed and forming a most interesting flora. The 
following are perhaps the most commonly seen : 
H. lacma (Fries) Orton & Watling and H. cinerea (Fries) Orton & 
Watling are similar in stature, but metallic grey in colour except for 
the persistently yellow stem-base in H. lacma. 
H. subradiat (Secretan) Orton & Watling is flesh-coloured or brownish 
and H. virginea (Fries) Orton & Watling is white. 
H. nivea (Fries) Orton & Watling and H. russocoriacea (Berkeley & 
Miller) Orton & Watling are much smaller, the former white and 
odourless and the latter off-white with a very strong smell of incense. 
Illustrations: F 12*’; Hvass 95; LH 77; NB 33^; WD 33^. 

Plate 26. Fleshy fungi: Spores white and borne on thick, waxy gills 
L.S. of gills showing irregular, thick trama, 
prominent basidia but lack of cystidia 
I 
30 (tm l| 

AGARICS AND THEIR RELATIVES 
97 
Hygrocybe psittacina (Fries) Wunsche Parrot hygrophorus 
Cap: width 12-25 Stem: width 3-8 mm; length 30-60 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: very slimy with colourless sticky fluid, deep bluish green when 
fresh, but becoming more and more ochraceous-orange with age or 
completely fading out to a yellow ochre, bell-shaped at first then 
expanded except for central umbo. 
Stem: like the cap very slimy, apple-green or bluish green throughout 
but becoming ochraceous like the cap except at the apex which is 
persistently green. 
Gills: adnate yellow or apricot-coloured, greenish towards their base, 
broad, distant and rather tough. 
Flesh: whitish, tinged green in the cap and yellow or apricot-colour 
in the stem. 
Spore-print: white. 
Spores: medium-sized, hyaline, ellipsoid, not blue-grey in solutions 
containing iodine and 8-9 X 4-5 pm in size. 
Marginal and facial cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distribution : Common in grassland and hill-pastures, but it 
also occurs in copses and woodlands. 
General Information : This fungus is easily recognised by the distinctive 
colours, but it is rather deceptive for the cap and the stem soon 
become faded; however, the green colouration persists at the apex 
of the stem and it is by this that in the faded state the fungus can 
still be identified. H. laeta (Fries) Kummer fades to similar colours 
but the cap is flesh-colour at first or sordid brown and the gills are 
flesh-coloured or greyish; it prefers upland pastures and heathland: 
its spores are smaller, being 5-7 X 4 pm. 
Illustrations : F 12a; Hvass 92; LH 79; NB 33®; WD 34^. 
General notes on Hygrophori 
Hygrophori are some of our most colourful groups of agarics, 
many are brightly coloured with caps in reds, greens, yellows, 
oranges, etc., the colour often accentuated by the usually slimy aspect. 
Traditionally the genus Hygrophorus has been split into three groups 
as follows: — 

9^ IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Limacium with slimy cap, adnate to decurrent gills and slimy or tacky 
stem which may also often be ornamented with dots, especially 
towards the top. 
Camarophyllus with dry cap, smooth and fibrous stem and decurrent 
gills. 
Hygrocybe with thin, fragile, sticky or moist cap, smooth fibrillose stem 
and gills varying from free to decurrent. 
The last two sections have been joined together into the single 
genus Hygrocybe and all the members seem to be saprophytic or inti- 
mately associated with grassland communities. The first section 
Limacium now makes up the genus Hygrophorus and its members 
are thought to be mycorrhizal with trees, e.g. H. hypothejus (Fries) 
Fries with pine, the ‘Herald of the winter’ because it occurs at the end 
of the fungus season and H. chrysaspis Metrod, a whitish, sickly-smelling 
fungus under beech. Results from examining the anatomy of the gills 
appears to confirm these divisions. All the Hygrophori have a homo- 
geneous flesh, white spores, central, fleshy stem and thick, waxy gills; 
microscopically this group of fungi can be recognised by the very 
long basidia. 
The following are common examples of the genus Hygrocybe : — 
H, calytraefovmis (Berkeley & Broome) Fayod has a rose-pink, conical 
cap which expands to become upturned at the edge with age. 
H, coccinea (Fries) Rummer has a bright scarlet cap which becomes 
yellow-ochre on drying and a yellow base to a scarlet stem. 
H. conica (Fries) Rummer has an orange to red stem and sharply 
conical cap which turns blackish with age and whose gills when cut 
exude a clear watery liquid. 
H , flavescens (Rauffman) Singer has a slimy, golden yellow cap and 
similarly coloured stem. 
H, chlorophana is similar, but has a lemon-yellow cap and stem. 
H, punicea (Fries) Rummer is a large and robust species, similar in 
colour to H. coccinea but with a white base to the stem. 
H. unguinosa (Fries) Rarsten has a smoky grey, very slimy cap and 
stem. 
H. nitrata (Persoon) Wunsche is as dull coloured as//, unguinosa, but 
is not slimy, and in addition strongly smells of cleaning fluid or 
bleaching-powder. It is one of three dull coloured, strong bleaching- 
powder-smelling species found in Britain. H. ovina is another, but 
is darker than H. nitrata and becomes red when bruised or cut. 

Plate 27. Fleshy brightly coloured fungi: Spores white and borne on thick, waxy gills 

100 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
H. metapodia (Fries) Moser has a sooty brown fibrillose-streaky cap and 
stem. The gills are distant and grey, and the fruit-body may reach 
up to 100 mm across. It is probably the biggest of our native species 
of Hygrocybe. 
For completion examples of Hygrophorus include: 
H. bvesadolae Quelet has a slimy orange-yellow cap, yellow gills and 
yellow, slimy, smooth stem. It is found under larch trees. 
H, chrysaspis Metrod has ivory white cap, stem and gills which soon 
become flushed with rust-brown and finally the whole fruit-body 
becomes red-brown. The stem is slimy and white dotted at the apex. 
It grows in beech woods. 
H. hedrychii Velenovsky has a slimy cream-coloured cap flushed with 
pale peach colour, d'he gills and stem are cream and the latter slimy 
and dotted at the top. It is found in pine woods. 
H. hypothejus (Fries) Fries has an olive-brown slimy cap, yellow stem 
and gills; the stem is slimy and smooth. It is found in pine woods 
and under pines on heaths. 
H. pustulatus (Persoon) Fries has an ash-grey cap brownish towards 
its centre, viscid white stem with dark grey dots at the apex and 
white gills. PI. agathosmus (Secretan) Fries is similar, but smells 
strongly of bitter almonds. Both species are found in plantations. 
Species of the genus Hygrophorus are infrequently encountered in 
Britain, although twenty species are recorded for the British Isles. 
They are ecologically distinct from members of the genus Hygrocybe 
in preferring woodland communities to grassland areas; they are 
probably mycorrhizal. The anatomy of the fruit-body is also rather 
different to that found in Hygrocybe", the gill-trama is bilateral as in 
Leccinum (p. 27), Snillus (p. 28), Boletus (p. 31), Chroogomphus 
(p. 36), Paxillus (p. 38) and Amanita (p. 54). Members of the 
genus Hygrocybe have regular to irregular gill-tramas. In fact, 
although both genera are united into a single family, the Hygro- 
phoraceae is based on one character common to both, i.e. the long 
basidium; there is every indication that the genus Hygrocybe has 
greater affinity to Omphalina in the Tricholcmataceae (p. 232). 
Surprisingly enough in North America many of our familiar 
grassland species including H. pratensis are to be found in deep 
shaded woodland! 

AGARICS AND THEIR RELATIVES 
lOI 
Angular, pink-spored agarics^ — Rhodophyllaceae 
The name of the family refers to the pink gills and it unites all those 
fungi with a salmon-pinkish buff spore-print and whose spores are 
angular in all optical sections. There are a few agarics, e.g. Clitopilus 
prunulus (Fries) Kummer with ridged spores which appear angular in 
end-on view, but which are ellipsoid in both side and face views and 
so are considered less related. 
The family Rhodophyllaceae by some authorities contains one genus 
Rhodophyllus , more correctly called Entoloma; in the British Isles five 
constituent genera are recognised, but they will have to be more 
critically defined to make a more meaningful classification. At the 
moment, many of the species are poorly documented and it would 
appear that anatomical studies will assist in the future in the recognition 
of species-groups. 
If one selects the eight most distinctive shaped spore-types exhibited 
in members of this family, then when their spores are examined side-on 
a feature is available for correlation with the traditional field characters, 
such as cap scaliness and gill-attachment. The most distinctive spore- 
shape is Type G, found in Nolanea staurospora Bresadola, which is 
probably the most common and widespread species of the family. It 
grows in woodlands, grassland and on lawns and will be dealt with 
later (p. 122). The other spore types are illustrated and range from 
irregularly rhomboid to elongate angular. 
The majority of the members of this group grow in grassland, hill- 
pastures and meadows and distinct communities containing members 
of this family and of the Hygrophoraceae can be recognised. It is not 
proposed to deal in detail with any individual members because they 
can be so easily confused with each other by the specialist let alone by 
the amateur. 
However, the genera as at present accepted are as follows : — 
I. Entoloma in its original sense contains agarics with fleshy caps, 
fibrous stems and sinuate or adnexed gills, e.g. Ent. clypeatum (Fries) 
Kummer with grey to yellow-brown cap, found growing with 
members of the apple and rose-family in the summer and early 
autumn. This genus corresponds to Calocybe in the white-spored 
agarics (p. no). 

102 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
2. Leptonia contains those agarics with rather thin caps whose margin 
is incurved, cartilaginous stems and adnate to adnexed, rarely 
decurrent, gills and whose cap flesh is indistinct from that of the 
stem, e.g. Lept. serrulata (Fries) Kummer with dark blue to violet- 
blue cap and dark blue edge to the gills. This genus approaches the 
tough-shanks {Collybia) in the white-spored genera (p. 90). 
3. Nolanea is characterised by agarics with delicate caps, whose flesh 
is distinct from that of the stem and whose edge is straight and 
pressed against the fragile stem when young, and the adnexed or 
adnate, rarely decurrent, gills, e.g. N. staurospora (see p. 122). 
N. cetrata (Fries) Kummer with yellow-brown to tan-coloured cap 
is found from spring to autumn in conifer woodland, especially 
plantations. The genus corresponds to Mycena in the white-spored 
agaric genera (p. 68). 
4. Eccilia is a small genus containing agarics with thin, membranous 
caps and distinctly decurrent gills, e.g. E. sericeomtida P. D. Orton 
with convex, then umbilicate, silky greyish brown cap. This genus 
corresponds to Omphalina in the white-spored agarics (p. 232). 
5. Claudopus has three British representatives, all of which have a very 
small stem which may even be absent, e.g. C. depluens (Fries) 
Gillet grows on soil and C. parasiticus (Quelet) Ricken grows on 
old decaying fruit-bodies of woody fungi. This genus corresponds to 
Pleurotellus in the white-spored genera and to Crepidotus in the 
brown-spored genera (p. 77). 

Plate 28. Fleshy fungi: Spores pinkish and angular and borne on gills - Rhodophyllaceae 

104 IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Cystodevma amianthinum (Fries) Fayod 
Cap: width 15-35 Stem: width 4-8 mm; length 15-30 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: pale ochraceous yellow to sand-colour, convex then expanded, 
with central umbo and often radially wrinkled-reticulate, covered 
completely in powdery granules when fresh but these gradually 
disappear with age or on excessive handling. 
Stem: slender, white above a narrow, easily lost ring which is composed 
of floccose, ochraceous yellow granules which also clothe the lower 
part of the stem. 
Gills: adnate, cream-coloured and crowded. 
Flesh: yellowish with a strong smell of new-mown hay. 
Spore-print: white. 
Spores: small to medium sized, hyaline under the microscope, smooth, 
ellipsoid, 5-7 X 3-4 [am and becoming blue-grey when mounted 
in solutions containing iodine. 
Marginal and facial cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distribution: Frequently found amongst grass on heaths, 
in hill-pastures and in woodlands from summer to autumn. 
General Information : This fungus is recognised by the gill-attachment 
and the powdery-scurfy cap formed by the breaking up of an 
enveloping veil composed of thick-walled, rounded cells, similar to 
those on the surface of the stem. 
This fungus was formerly placed in the genus Lepiota because of 
the ring but the veil in Cystbderma amianthinum is formed in quite 
a different way to the ring in the true parasol mushrooms. The gills 
are also adnate and not free as in the true species of Lepiota (see 
p. 1 12). C. carcharias (Secretan) Fayod is found under similar con- 
ditions, but is white or flesh-coloured. C. cinnabarinum (Secretan) 
Fayod is also found in short grass and moss, but has a cinnabar-red, 
floccose cap and C. granulosum (Fries) Fayod is yellowish brown 
with non-amyloid spores and adnexed gills. 
Many authorities prefer to connect this small group of closely 
related species more to members of the Tricholornataceae (i.e. the 
family which contains the Wood Blewits (p. 13 1), Mycena (p. 68, 
etc.) than to the parasol mushrooms — Lepiota (p. 112). 
Illustrations: Hvass 23; LH 129; NB 103'^; WD 8^. 

Plate 29. Fleshy fungi: Spores white and borne on gills 
Wrinkled cap with powdery veil 
almost completely lost 

io6 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Hygrophovopsis aiivantiaca (Fries) Maire False chanterelle ' 
Cap: width 25-70 mm. Stem: width 4-7 mm; length 25-50 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: bright orange-yellow or apricot, fleshy, soft, depressed at centre 
and with wavy, incurved, slightly downy margin. 
Stem: yellow at apex, rich red-brown or orange about the middle and 
sometimes dark brown at the very base. 
Gills: decurrent, deep orange, thin, crowded, repeatedly forked and 
easily separable from the cap-tissue. 
Flesh: yellowish, pale in the cap, darker in the stem. 
Spore-print: white. 
Spores: medium sized, hyaline under the microscope, ellipsoid or 
pip-shaped, smooth, 7-8 X 4 um and red-brown when mounted in 
solutions of iodine. 
Marginal and facial cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distribution : Common in woodlands, particularly with 
pines, and on heaths or in rough hill-pastures. 
General Information : This fungus is recognisable by the orange or 
yellow cap and stem and the decurrent gills. It was formerly placed 
in Cantharellus because of the colours, white spores and the decurrent 
gills, but it really differs in many other respects. It is true, however, 
that it is frequently confused with the true Chanterelle {Cantharellus 
cibarius Fries, p. 162) by those who do not inspect their specimens 
carefully. The gills are thin, plate-like as in other agarics and not 
fold-like as in Cantharellus (see p. 162). The Chanterelle is edible 
and sought after as a delicacy, but there are varying reports as to the 
edibility of Hygrophoropsis. Certainly it is not of the best quality 
and there is evidence for it causing upsets: therefore it is best to take 
the name ‘False Chanterelle’ at face value and treat this fungus as 
truely false; ‘aurantiaca’ means orange-coloured and refers to the 
colour of the fungus. 
A pale form is frequently collected, particularly in hill-pastures, 
and is probably worthy of specific recognition. The cap is ochraceous 
yellow to cream and the stem distinctly dark in the lower half. j 
There is some confusion as to the true position in classification of II 
this fungus. The anatomical details of the fruit-body parallel those i 
of PaxiUus involutus (Fries) Fries (see p. 38) although the spore- 
print is white. There is little doubt that future research will answer I 
this problem. I 
Illustrations: Hvass 183; LH 185; NB 103^; WD 16^. , 

Plate 30. Fleshy fungi: Spores white and borne on gills 

io8 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
(b) Agarics of chalk-grassland and rich uplands 
Agaricus campestris Fries Field mushroom 
Cap: width 40-100 mm. Stem: width 12-20 mm; length 40-80 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: rounded then expanding to become plano-convex, fleshy with the 
margin incurved at first, initially pure white, but soon becoming cream- 
colour and at maturity streaked brownish particularly at the centre. 
Stem: white with a simple, very thin, white ring which becomes 
brownish on rubbing and is easily lost with age or by handling. 
Gills: free, pink but finally umber-brown at maturity. 
Flesh : white, flushed reddish when cut especially in the stem. 
Spore-print: cigar-brown, with hint of purple. 
Spores: medium sized, ellipsoid or egg-shaped, smooth, small, 7-8 X 
4-5 pm and dark brown under the microscope. 
Marginal and facial cystidia: absent. Basidia 4-spored. 
Habitat Distribution : The field-mushroom grows amongst grass in 
pastures, etc., and also on old lawns where it may form fairy-rings. 
General Information : This is the common wild, edible mushroom for 
which many people have in the past unwisely substituted many quite 
unrelated species. Deaths have often been caused by lack of careful 
observation when selecting wild fungi for the table; this only 
emphasises why ‘white mushrooms’ found in fields should not be 
casually eaten. 
A, arvensis Sccretan the ‘Horse-mushroom’ is also edible, but is 
much bigger (up to 180 mm), creamy white and bruises slightly 
yellowish on handling; it also has larger spores (7-10 X 5 pm), 
club-shaped cells on the gill-edge, gills commencing white and not 
pink, and the presence of a complex ring. 
A. xanthodermus Genevier the ‘Yellow-staining mushroom’ has even 
smaller spores than the field mushroom, i.e. 5-6 X 4 pm and a 
rather strong, unpleasant smell; if eaten many people subsequently 
suffer from stomach-pains and this shows that even amongst those 
fungi which the scientist would call true mushrooms, i.e. those 
fungi in the genus Agaricus, there are some poisonous members. 
Thus it is always necessary to have wide experience before one 
collects fungi for eating and until this is achieved all specimens 
should be discarded. 
Illustrations : Field mushroom — Ilvass 163; LH 133; NB 3D; WD 71^. 
Horse mushroom— Hvass 160; LH 135; WD 72'. Yellow-staining 
mushroom — Hvass 159; WD 71^. 

Plate 31. Fleshy fungi: Spores purple-brown and borne on gills 

1 10 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Calocyhe gamhosum (Fries) Singer St George’s mushroom 
Cap: width 70-100 mm. Stem: width 15-25 mm; length 50-70 mm. __ 
Descript iofi : 
Cap: creamy white, ivory or light buff, slightly darker at the centre 
with age, fleshy, rounded and with wavy margin, finally expanding 
to become plano-convex; the margin is incurved and slightly downy 
at first. 
Stem: firm, rather thick, white at the top, creamy or buff below and 
slightly downv when fresh. 
Gills: sinuate to adnexed with a slight decurrent tooth, white to 
pale buff. 
Flesh: with a very strong smell of meal, white and thick. 
Spore-print: white. 
Spores: small, ellipsoid, smooth, hyaline under the microscope, 5-6 X 
3-4 pm and not becoming blue-grey with solutions containing 
iodine. 
Marginal and facial cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distribution : Found amongst grass in base rich pastures, 
often in fairly large rings from April to June and on golf-courses 
particularly those near the sea. 
General Information : The common name refers to the early appearance 
of this agaric; St George’s Day is April 23rd, and this mushroom 
is found about this time in favourable years, its fruiting often ex- 
tending into early June, particularly if the fruiting is retarded by a 
cold and wet spring. It is easily recognised by the pale colour of the 
cap, strong mealy smell, but particularly by its appearance in spring. 
In each new year it is probably the first of the larger agarics to 
appear. This species will be found in most books under the genus 
Tricholoma, but differs from typical members of this group in the 
anatomy and chemistry of the gill-tissues. 
The Latin name ‘gambosum’ is derived from ‘gamba’ meaning a 
hoof and this reflects the shape of the fleshy cap as it pushes up 
through the grass. Another much older name is Tricholoma georgii 
(Fries) Quelet which was used by Clusius and is derived from the 
legend of St George. 
Illustrations : Hvass 28; LH 83; WD (f. 


1 12 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Lepiota procera (Fries) S. F. Gray Parasol mushroom 
Cap: width 70-200 mm. Stem: width 12-20 mm; length 100-250 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: dull brown or greyish brown, oval or rounded at first, but later 
becoming bell-shaped, finally expanding but for the central umbo 
and the surface breaking up into shaggy scales. 
Stem: straight, tapering upwards from a slightly bulbous base, felty 
at first but then the surface breaking up into small patches which 
finally resemble the pattern of a snake-skin; there is also a large, 
thick, white ring which is brown below and becomes loose on the 
stem. 
Gills: remote, white, crowded and fairly broad. 
Flesh: white, thin, soft. 
Spore-print: white. 
Spores: very long, ellipsoid with a germ-pore, hyaline under the 
microscope about 16 X 10 pm (14-17 X 9-12 pm), and becoming 
reddish brown in solutions containing iodine. 
Marginal cystidia: variable, elongate balloon-shaped and hyaline. 
Facial cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distribution: Found from summer until mid-autumn, on 
the outskirts of copses, in fields, at edges of woodland or in wood- 
land clearings; it is sometimes found in very large rings. 
General Information: When this fungus first appears through the soil 
it resembles a drum-stick with the margin of the unexpanded cap 1 
tightly hugging the stem. It is an easily recognised fungus because 
of its straight and graceful stature with large cap and tall stem. It is . 
one of our best edible fungi and cannot be confused with any other t. 
agaric. L. rhacodes (Vittadini) Quelet is not as elegant and has much | 
smaller spores. 
Illustrations: F 26a; Hvass 15; LH 125; NB 31^; WD 5^. 


IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
II4 
(c) Agarics of meadows and valley-bottom grasslands 
Psilocybe semilanceata (Secretan) Kummer Liberty caps 
Cap: width 8-14 mm; height up to 18 mm. Stem: width 4-6 mm; 
length 50-70 mm. 
Description : 
Cap; sharply conical, in fact often with a very distinct apical point, 
never or very rarely becoming expanded, often fluted and puckered 
at the incurved margin, smooth, viscid, pale buff or clay colour, but 
soon flushed with greyish green at maturity and becoming free of 
the fibrils of veil which ornament the margin when young. 
Stem: slender, tough and smooth, similarly coloured to the cap and 
sometimes blueing at the base when picked. 
Gills : adnate to adnexed, crowded, purplish black except for white edge. 
Flesh: white or pallid. 
Spore-print: purple-brown. 
Spores: long, ellipsoid, slightly lemon-shaped, smooth and with a 
distinct germ-pore at one end and 12-14 X 7 size. 
Marginal cystidia; bottle-shaped with an elongate tapering neck, 
with thin walls which at most become pale honey in solutions con- 
taining ammonia, unlike the cystidia of Hypholoma (p. 64). 
Habitat & Distribution: Commonly growing amongst grass in fields 
near farm-yards, on heaths and by roadsides; often it occurs in 
small troops. 
General Information: Psilocybe semilanceata is recognised by the uni- 
quely shaped cap; ‘semilanceata’ means half spear-shaped, from the 
papilla at the top of the cap, giving it a pointed aspect. However, 
the common name is more descriptive and comes from the fact that 
these caps resemble the helmets worn by French soldiers in the 
early part of the century. 
This fungus was once very isolated amongst British agarics, but 
now it has been united with a group of small purplish brown- 
spored fungi formerly placed in the genus Decomca. What is of more 
interest is the fact that unlike many British agarics the cap often 
does not expand fully in order to release the spores. In this way it 
allows mycologists to hypothesise on how certain of the enclosed, 
stalked Gastromycetes evolved in some of the desert regions of the 
world. 
Illustrations: LH 149; NB 33II; WD 78’. 

Plate 34. Fleshy fungi: Spores purple-brown and borne on gills 
) 

IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
I l6 
I 
Conocyhe tenera (Fries) Fayod Brown cone-cap ; 
Cap: width 10-20 mm. Stem: width 3-6 mm; length 70-100 mm. 
Description : " | 
Cap: very hygrophanous, sand colour, orange-yellow or ochraceous 
brown tinted cinnamon when fresh but drying uniformly yellow- 
ochre, thin, fragile, striate when moist, but soon non-striate as water , 
is lost from the cap. 
Stem: tall, slender and similarly coloured to the cap, straight, fragile, 
minutely striate from the top to bottom with what appears to be . 
minute powdery granules. , 
Gills: adnate then becoming free, crowded, ochraceous and finally 
cinnamon-rust in colour. * 
Flesh: russet when moist but rapidly becoming yellowish as the fruit- ! 
body dries. 
Spore-print: rust-brown. 
Spores: long, ellipsoid, with thick, bright yellow-brown walls and 
distinct germ-pores at their ends when seen under the microscope, > 
and over 10 pm in length (11-12 X 6 pm.) 
Marginal cystidia: pinheaded or skittle-shaped. , 
Facial cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distribution: This fungus grows in ones and twos, more rarely j 
in troops amongst grass. 
General Information : This is one member of a whole complex group 
of ochraceous, brown, tawny or cinnamon-brown capped agarics j 
which superficially appear to be the same, but on closer examina- 
tion the expert can split them into several distinct species. | 
The use of microscopic characters is essential and outside the scope 
of this book or the ordinary mushroom-picker’s manual. However, I 
the closely related C. lactea (J. Lange) Metrod can be more easily .1 
distinguished for it has a white or cream-coloured cap and stem. ^ 
It also has larger broadly ellipsoid spores, measuring 12-14 X 6-9 | 
pm, but the same shaped cells on the gill-edge. | 
Illustrations : LH 153; NB 35'^; WD 68^. , 

I: 

ii8 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
(d) Fairy-ring formers 
Many agarics grow in circles, but not all of them produce zones in the 
vegetation. It is the distinct zonation caused by the ‘fairy-ring cham- 
pignon’ Marasmius oreades (Fries) Fries and related fungi which have 
given rise to the name of Fairy-ring and which resulted in the founda- 
tion of many folk tales. 
A fairy-ring can be divided into four distinct zones, a central zone of 
fairly normally developed vegetation on the outside of which is a 
green, actively growing zone of grass; outside this is a zone composed 
of brown or dead vegetation. The outermost zone again appears to 
be far more lush than the normal grass in the vicinity and it is in this 
last zone that the fruit-bodies of the fungus causing the pattern 
appear. 
A generalised explanation of the zoning appears to be as follows: — 
In the outermost zone the actively growing mycelium decomposes 
soil constituents and liberates nitrogenous material which is in turn 
taken up by the plant roots nearby and utilised for their growth. In the 
penultimate zone the grass is dead, probably not caused by a direct 
parasitic attack but by the mycelial threads filling the air-spaces in the 
soil and so inhibiting water flow. This destruction of the delicate balance 
of water and air found in any soil induces drying out and gradual death 
of the plants whose roots permeate the soil. Behind the dead-zone is 
vegetation which shows increased vigour apparently due to plant- 
nutrients being released by the decaying mycelium and plant-material, 
whose death has been caused by the presence of the fungus. The 
innermost zone is not so stimulated. 
With nothing more than graph and tracing paper, a tape-measure, 
note-book and pencil, pieces of cane about four inches long, and 
coloured dye or Indian ink, it is exciting to assess the annual radial 
growth of fairy-rings and to correlate these with environmental con- 
ditions. This can be carried out on a school lawn or on a home lawn; 
the method and further experiments are given in Appendix iii. 

Plate 36. Fairy-ring fungus — Marasmius oreades 

20 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Marasmius oreades (Fries) Fries Fairy-ring champignon 
Cap: width 25-60 mm. Stem: width 5-9 mm; length 30-80 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: pinkish tan with slight flush of brown at centre, hygrophanous 
and drying out buff-coloured or clay-coloured, convex at first then 
expanding to become plane, but for an obtuse umbo which is 
retained at the centre. 
Stem: pale buff, tough, flexible and smooth. 
Gills: adnexed, pale cream colour or pinkish buff and fairly distant. 
Flesh: whitish or pinkish tan, smelling of cherry laurel (cyanic). 
Spore-print: white. 
Spores: medium sized, hyaline, pip-shaped, smooth, not staining 
bluish grey when mounted in solutions containing iodine and about 
10 X 6 pm in size (9-1 1 X 5-6 pm). 
Marginal and facial cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distribution: This agaric is very common from May to 
October on lawns and grass-verges. 
General hiformation : M. oreades forms well developed fairy-rings, and 
is easily recognised by its tough nature, pale colours and ability to 
revive after having been dried. This ability to revive in moist weather 
even after the fruit-body has been dried by the sun or wind is a 
character which was used to distinguish members of the genus 
Marasmius. However, this is a very subjective character and since 
microscopic techniques were introduced and used widely in the 
study of agarics the genus has been delimited rather more critically. 
Marasmius is close to Collybia (p. 90), in fact many species 
appear in one book in one genus and in another book in the second 
genus; M. oreades itself is not a typical member of the genus. 
Marasmius seems to be a much more important genus in the tropical 
and subtropical regions of the world; we have already mentioned 
how some of the small species of Marasmius in Europe grow only 
on leaves of a particular plant (see p. 92). M. androsaceus (Fries) 
Fries (see p. 231) is the horse-hair fungus. 
Illustrations'. F 19a; Hvass 81; LH 115; NB 35^; WD 24^® (not very 
good). 

Plate 37. Fleshy fungi reviving when moistened even after drying; Spores white and borne on gills 
cells of cap-surface 

122 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
(e) Agarics of urban areas — lawn and parkland agarics 
Nolanea staurospora Bresadola 
Cap: width 20-40 mm. Stem: width 3-5 mm; length 45-70 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: bell-shaped at first then expanded, hygrophanous, date-brown, 
striate when moist but pale fawn or tan and non-striate when dry, 
and usually becoming quite silky-shiny. 
Stem: slender, fragile, greyish brown, silky fibrillose-striate and shiny. 
Gills: almost free, crowded and pale greyish brown when young, but 
finally flesh coloured. 
Flesh: brownish and smelling very strongly of meal when cut or broken 
between the fingers. 
Spore-print: salmon-pink with flush of cinnamon. 
Spores: medium sized, fawn under the microscope, star-shaped with 
4-6 prominent angles, 9-10 X 7-9 p.m, smooth and with no germ- 
pore. 
Marginal and facial cystidia: absent. 
Nolanea sericea (Merat) P. D. Orton Silky nolanea 
Cap: width 25-40 mm. Stem: width 5-9 mm; length 25-50 mm. 
Description : 
Cap : convex then flattened or with slight umbo, umber-brown with 
a greyish cast which becomes accentuated as the cap dries out and 
finally becoming silky-shiny; the margin is incurved and striate at 
first but on expanding it becomes non-striate with time. 
Stem: sho'rt, fibrillose, greyish brown, shining and white at the base, 
very fragile and often snaps just above the soil-level when collected. 
Gills: crowded, adnate and pale greyish brown then pinkish brown. 
Flesh: with a strong smell of new meal, brownish becoming paler as 
it dries out. 
Spore-print: salmon-pink. 
Spores: medium sized, smooth, pale fawn under the microscope, 
angular almost cubic and 10-13 X 8-9 pm in size. l 
Marginal and facial cystidia: absent. | 
General Informatioji: Nolanea staurospora is very common amongst 
grass, in many habitats such as on heaths, and in woodlands and 
copses, but it is particularly common in pastures and on lawns. 
It is difficult to separate from close relatives on field-characters, i 

Plate 38. Fleshy fungi: Spores pinkish and angular, and borne on gills 
Nolianea sericea 
20 urn 
Filamentous cells of cap-surface of 
Nolanea staurospora 

124 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
except for the strong mealy smell; however, it is recognised imme- i 
diately by the spore-shape, in fact stauro — means a cross and spora — ’ 
spore! 
Because of the flattened cap and gill-shape N. sericea (Merat) ! 
P. D. Orton was first placed in Entoloma, but for a long time it was f 
one of the smallest members of that genus. The European species 
of Nolanea have recently been critically analysed, and now that , 
closely related species to the silky Nolanea have been found, it > 
appears better placed in Nolanea although it is still found under 
Entolorna in many books. The Latin word ‘sericeum’ means silky 
and refers to the silky cap and stem of this fungus which is a very ^ 
noticeable feature when the fungus is collected in the dry state. 
The common name which has been given to this fungus also refers 
to the silky nature of the fruit-body. 
Illustrations: N. staurospora — LH i8i; ND 31'^; WD 52“^. N. sericea — ' 
LH 181; WD 52h 
i 
t 
Panaeolus foenisecii (Fries) Schroeter Brown hay-cap ■ 
Cap: width 12-28 mm. Stem: width 3-6 mm; length 40-60 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: semiglobate to convex and hardly expanding even with age, j 
smooth, expallent, dull cinnamon-brown or dark tan-colour, be- 
coming clay-colour or pale cinnamon-colour from centre outwards 
on drying and so sometimes appearing as if it is zoned. 
Stem: slender, fragile, smooth and pale cinnamon-brown, except at 
apex where it is dotted with white; it is usually more brownish below. 
Gills: adnate, crowded, pale brown and mottled, but becoming more 
uniformly umber-brown except for whitish margin. 
Flesh: whitish or pale cinnamon colour. 
Spore-print: purple-brown. 
Spores: long, lemon-shaped under the microscope, dull brown, 
warted all over but for the distinct germ-pore; 12-15 X 7-8 pm in ; 
size. ’ 
Marginal cystidia: variable spindle-shaped with flexuous neck and sub- 
capitate apex, about 5-6 pm wide. 
Facial cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distribution: Common amongst short grass on lawns, in ' 
pastures, on grass-verges, etc., from May until October. , 

Plate 39. Fleshy fungi: Spores purple-brown and borne on gills 
20 
Rounded cells of cap-surface 

r 
126 IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Ge?ieral Information : P. foenisecii is recognised under the microscope 
by the ornamented spores; this character was used to separate this 
fungus in the new genus Panaeohna. However, although the spore- 
print is not exactly black the stature, mottled gills and anatomy 
conform closely with Panaeolus sphinctrinus (Fries) Quelet and 
P. rickenii Hora (see p. 210 and below respectively). The same 
fungus has been placed in Psilocyhe (see p. 114), but it has little in 
common with members of that genus. The word ‘foenisecii means 
hay-harvest, reflecting the habitat of growing in fields. This fungus 
is variable in colour depending on its state of turgidity; it can be 
easily confused with other species of Panaeolus when moist and with 
certain species of Conocybe wTen dry. P. rickemi is an equally 
common agaric growing on similar or slightly less base-rich soil- 
types. It has a distinctly bell-shaped reddish brown cap with a pale 
incurved margin which in wet weather is, like the entire stem, 
beaded with droplets of liquid. This gives the fungus a glistening 
appearance when seen fresh and as it dries these droplets are lost 
and the cap becomes slightly zoned. The stem is pale reddish-brown 
with a strong frosted appearance because of the minute hairs which 
cover it. I have no doubt that the classification of these fungi will 
be assisted by careful analysis of the shapes of the hairs found in 
the different species. 
Illustrations: Panaeolina foenisecii — LH 145; WD 78“^. Panaeolus 
rickenii — LH 145. 
(f ) Agarics of wasteland and hedgerows 
Coprinus comatiis (Fries) S. F. Gray Lawyer s wig 
Cap: width 30-60 mm; height 80-200 mm. Stem: width 10-20 mm; 
length 80-250 mm. 
Description : Plate 40. 
Cap: at first cylindrical or oval then bell-shaped, fleshy, fragile, white 
and covered with woolly, whitish, shaggy scales which have brown 
tips; the centre of the cap is smooth and yellow to ochraceous 
whilst the margin becomes striate and filaceous and finally black 
as the tissue liquefies (autodigests) and the margin rolls up to expose 
new areas of spore-bearing tissue. 
Stem: tall, white, smooth and tapered towards the apex, with a white 


128 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
ring which can easily move up and down the stem with handling, 
and which soon disappears with age. 
Gills: free at first, white then pink and finally black, becoming gradually 
dissolved into a black fluid from the base of the cap upwards. 
Flesh: white, thin, except immediately in the central area of the cap. 
Spore-print: blackish-purple. 
Spores: long, elongate-ellipsoid, large and about 13 X 5-8 [xm in size, 
(12-15 X 7“9 
Marginal cystidia: elongate club-shaped to balloon-shaped, hyaline 
and thin-walled. 
Facial cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distribution: Grows in clusters on rich ground, in gardens, 
on sides of newly prepared roads and central reservations of motor- 
ways, on path-sides, in cultivated fields and on rubbish dumps; 
it grows from spring to autumn and sometimes occurs in huge 
troops. 
General Information: Easily recognised by its size, the shape of the 
cap with its scaly surface and from its resemblance to a judge’s 
wig’; it is frequently called the ‘lawyer’s wig’ and whereas some 
common names are not very descriptive and one has to use a lot of 
imagination to conjure up what the common name implies, in this 
case it is not so. It is also known as the ‘shaggy cap’ or ‘shaggy 
ink-cap’. Ink or inky cap is, however, a common name for many 
species of the genus Coprinus (see p. 21 1-4). 
The unrelated Lyophyllum decastes (Fries) Singer and L. connatum 
(Fries) Singer are also common fungi growing on roadsides, on soil 
and compost-heaps. They too break through embankments, soil, 
paths, etc., producing large craters and mounds of debris. 
Illustrations: Coprinus comatus — F 34^; Hvass 172; LH 137; NB 35°; 
\VD 82'^. Lyophyllum decastes — LH 81; W D 14^. 
Lacrymaric velutina (Fries) Konrad & Maublanc Weeping widow 
Cap: width 45-90 mm. Stem: width 8-14 mm; length 50-125 mm. 
Description : Plate 41. 
Cap: convex then expanded with obtuse central umbo, dull clay-brown 
or date-brown and at first covered with flattened, woolly fibrils 
which are gradually lost with age; the margin is incurved and 
fringed with remnants of the veil. 
Stem: fragile, pale dingy-coloured or clay-coloured at apex, dull 

Plate 41. Fleshy fungi: Spores blackish and borne on gills 
L.S. of gills showing regular trama 
Fibrillose scaly cap and marginal cystidia covered in 

130 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
brown below the ring-zone which consists of white fibrils; later in 
development these fibrils catch the spores and the stem becomes 
black and fibrillose-scaly, particularly below the ring-zone. 
Gills: sinuate, crowded and very dark brown or almost black with 
distinct white margin which is covered in tiny beads of liquid in 
moist weather. 
Flesh : pale buff. 
Spore-print: almost black. 
Spores: long, dark brown, lemon-sha})ed and warted with distinct and 
prominent germ-pore and 10-12 X 6-7 pm in size. 
Marginal cystidia: club-shaped or wdth a distinctly rounded head. 
Facial cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distrihutioji : Common on the ground near newly built 
houses, on roadsides, tips and paths in woods, either solitary or 
in groups; it is also found in pastures. 
General Information: The fibrillose scaly cap and stem and the almost 
black gills which frequently have liquid droplets at their edge 
separate this species from all other agarics and microscopically it 
can be easily recognised by the warted spores. ‘Velutina’ means 
velvety and refers to the texture of the cap-surface, of the young ; 
fruit-body. The genus name Lacrymaria refers to this peculiar, but 
certainly not unique, phenomenon, of exuding liquid from cells on 
the gill-edge. This has been compared with weeping and ‘lacrymans’ 
means weeping; the common name reflects this also — weeping widow 
(cf. p. 154). 
This fungus has had a chequered history, for it is also known in 
some books as Hypholoma lacrymabunda (again meaning weeping) 
or H. velutma \ the anatomy of the fungus, however, is quite different 
to Hypholoma (e.g. H . fasciculare p. 64). More recently it has found 
a place in Psathyrella, but it seems unsatisfactorily placed there be- 
cause of the warty spores, black spore-print and fibrillose cap-surface; 
it warrants a separate genus, i.e., Lacryjnaria. L. pyrotncha (Fries) 
Konrad & Maublanc is the only other British species of this genus 
but it has a bright orange cap colour; it is rare. 
Illustrations: Hvass 180; LH 141; WD 86^. 1 

AGARICS AND THEIR RELATIVES 
131 
Lepista nuda (Fries) Cooke Wood blewits 
Cap: width 70-100 mm. Stem: width 10-15 mm; length 70-100 mm. 
Description : Plate 42. 
Cap: rounded then flattened or slightly depressed in the centre, 
smooth, bluish lilac, or violaceous when young but gradually with 
age becoming reddish-brown, with or without a flush of wine colour. 
Stem: similarly coloured to the cap, equal, fleshy, elastic, fibrillose 
and streaky. 
Gills: adnate with or without a decurrent tooth, crowded, lilac and 
easily separable from the cap-tissue by the fingers. 
Flesh: bluish violaceous, but drying out dirty buff in the base of the 
stem. 
Spore-print: flesh-coloured. 
Spores: medium-sized, ellipsoid appearing smooth but very minutely 
roughened under the microscope, although it is very difficult to see 
except with a good instrument (6-8 X 4-5 pm in size). 
Marginal and facial cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distribution: Widespread in troops or small groups in copses 
and under hedgerows and not uncommon in flower-beds in gardens 
in late autumn and early winter especially on compost heaps and in 
rhubarb patches which have been mulched with piles of moribund 
leaves. 
General Information : This fungus was originally placed in Tricholoma, 
but due to differences in anatomy and the distinctly coloured and 
ornamented spores it has been placed along with ‘common blewits’ 
T. personatum (Fries) Kummer (or better L. saeva (Fries) P. D. 
Orton), in the genus Lepista. This genus which is also called Rhodo- 
paxillus, again referring to the pinkish spore-print, is not found in 
many of the easily obtainable books. One should look for the fungus 
under Tricholoma, from which it can be separated easily by the 
beautiful colour. 
Both the ‘wood blewits’ and ‘common blewits’ have been regularly 
sold in markets in England within the last fifty years. They are 
edible and considered of high quality. In their fresh state they are 
easily recognised, but as they age they become browned and so 
resemble many other less desirable fungi. 
Illustrations: F 17^^; Hvass 49; LH 91; NB 125^; WD 12^ (a bit too 
pastel). 

Filaments of cap-surface 

AGARICS AND THEIR RELATIVES 
133 
Agaricus bispoms (J. Lange) Pilat Common mushroom 
Cap: width 40-100 mm. Stem: width 15-25 mm; length 50-75 mm. 
Description: Plate 43. 
Cap: rounded gradually expanding to become plane, whitish with 
numerous brown radiating fibrils and with the margin irregular 
because of fragments from the ring which are left there after expan- 
sion of the cap. 
Stem: short, cylindrical, smooth, bruising reddish-brown when handled 
and with a narrow ring which soon collapses and disappears. 
Gills: free, pink at first then purple-brown, narrow and crowded. 
Flesh: solid, thick, firm and slowly flushing brownish on cutting. 
Spore-print: purple-brown. 
Spores: medium-sized, broadly ellipsoid, purple-brown under the 
microscope, less than 10 pm long, (6-8 X 5-6 pm). 
Marginal cystidia: club-shaped, 10-12 pm at apex. 
Facial cystidia: absent. 
Basidia: 2-spored. 
Habitat & Distribution: Frequent on manure heaps, straw heaps, on 
road scrapings and around garden plants. 
General Information: This fungus is recognised by the dark fibrils on 
the cap, the 2-spored basidia easily seen with the low power of a 
microscope, and the pink gills when young. Much confusion has 
existed over this fungus and its nearest relatives. It is similar to 
the ‘Cultivated mushroom’, A. hortensis (Cooke) Pilat, which is offered 
for sale in shops. However, it differs in several minor details and it 
may be that A. bisporus is the fungus from which the cultivated 
mushroom developed, very probably unconsciously by man, but the 
history of the cultivated mushroom is very obscure. The cultivated 
mushroom when bought in British shops is white but in the United 
States two varieties are sold, one with the brownish fibrils pre- 
dominating and a snow-white one where the fibrils do not darken; 
the former is frequently found in Europe. The white form is some- 
times found in gardens where spent-mushroom spawn is used as 
mulching around fruit-trees but it has a rounder cap than A. bisporus. 
The cultivated mushroom accounts for an annual income of £14 
million in the British Isles. 
Illustrations: A. hortensis — LH 133 (as the forma albida); NB 31^; 
WD 71 1 . A. bisporus — Hvass 161; LH 133. 

Plate 43. Fleshy fungi: Spores purple-brown and borne on gills 
L.S. of gills showing 
regular trama 
lO mm 

135 
B. BRACKET-FUNGI AND THEIR RELATIVES 
Key to major genera 
A group of fungi which includes the bracket fungi, hedgehog fungi, 
fairy-clubs and their relatives; in the majority of species the margin 
continues to grow through the favourable part of the season and so 
often envelopes leaves, grass, etc. 
1. Spore-bearing layer (hymenium) quite smooth, spread over 
veins or shallow pores; fruit-body top-shaped, fan-shaped 
or club-shaped, or spread over the substrate (resupinate) . . 2 
Spore-bearing layer lining the inner surface of tubes or borne 
on warts or spines . . . . . . . . , . • • 17 
2. Fruit-body club-shaped, coral-shaped or distinctly funnel- 
shaped, fan-like or resembling an agaric . . . . . . 3 
Fruit-body resupinate or with poorly developed cap . . . . ii 
3. Fruit-body coral-like or club-shaped with clubs grouped or 
branched . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4 
Fruit-body resembling an agaric or funnel-shaped to fan- 
shaped . . . . . , . . , . . . . . . . 9 
4. Fruit-body large, branched with flattened and curled lobes 
and so resembling a cauliflower . . . . . . Sparassis 
Fruit-body of single or grouped clubs or if branched then not 
resembling a cauliflower, the lobes being cylindrical or only 
slightly flattened and hardly bent . . . . . . . . 5 
5. Fruit-body small arising from a seed-like structure or growing 
attached to dead herbaceous plant remains . . . . . . 6 
Fruit-body medium to large, simple or branched and usually 
growing on the ground ; one large species grows on wood . . 7 
6. Fruit-body arising from a seed-like body embedded in the 
plant-tissue or found loose in the soil . . . . . . Typhula 
Fruit-body on dead plant-remains but seed-like structure 
absent Pistillaria 

3 ^ 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
7. Fruit-body much branched; spores ornamented (see also 
Thelephora below) . . . . . . . . . . Ramaria 
Fruit-body simple or if with well-developed branches then 
spores smooth . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 8 
8. Fruit-body branched irregularly with many to few branches, 
grey, white or drab-coloured; spores large, subglobose and 
smooth . . . . . . . . . . . . . . Clavulina 
Fruit-body club-shaped or if branched then brightly coloured 
and spores not large and subglobose 
Clavaria, Clavulinopsis & Clavariadelphus 
9. Fruit-body resembling an agaric with spores borne on fold- 
like, often forked and shallow ridges and veins, and often 
brightly coloured 
Cmitharellus (compare carefully with Craterellus below) 
Fruit-body funnel-shaped or fan-shaped . . . . . . 10 
10. Fruit-body often drab colour or greyed with smooth or 
slightly veined outer surface . . . . . . . . Craterellus 
Fruit-body wrinkled, irregular or smooth and powdery, 
lilaceous to chocolate-brown in colour . . Thelephora 
11. Fruit-body sessile or resupinate and fleshy; spores borne on 
veins united to form shallow pores . . . . . . . • 12 
Fruit-body resupinate or bracket-like, and spore-surface 
veined or rugulose but lacking distinct pores . . . . 13 
12. Spores colourless . . . . . . . . • • Merulius 
Spores brown . . . . . . . . . . • • Serpula 
13. Spore-bearing layer containing long, brown spines Hymenochaete 
Fruit-body lacking spines although often having encrusted 
sterile cells . . . . . . . . . . • • • • 14 
14. Surface of fruit-body more or less radiately veined . . Phlebia 
Surface of fruit-body not radiately veined . . . . . . 15 
15. Spores brown . . . . . . . . . . . . Coniophora 
Spores colourless . . . . . . . . . • • • 16 
16. Flesh distinctly formed and fruit-body with or without a well 
formed cap . . . . . . Stereum & related genera 
Flesh poorly differentiated and fruit-body lacking a cap 
members of the Corticiaceae (including Peniophora & Hyphodontia 
p. 176) 
17. Spores borne on teeth or spines . . . . • • . . 18 
Spore-bearing layer lining tubes or elongate pores . . . . 22 

BRACKET-FUNGI AND THEIR RELATIVES 
137 
18. Fruit-body with central stem; agaric-like but not attached to 
cones . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 19 
Fruit-body encrusting or bracket-like, or with lateral stem if 
resembling an agaric . . . . . . . . . . . . 20 
19. Fruit-body fleshy . . . . Hydnum and related genera 
Fruit-body rubbery or tough . . Hydnellum and related genera 
20. Fruit-body growing attached to cones and cap with lateral 
stem . . . . . . . . . . . . Auriscalpium 
Fruit-body not on cones and distinct stem lacking . . . . 21 
21. Spores borne on a series of radially arranged knotches resem- 
bling gills . . . . . . . . . . . . Lentinellus 
Spores borne on a resupinate layer of spines 
Mycoacia and related genera 
22. Tubes free one from another 
Fistulina 
Tubes united to form a distinct tissue . . 
. . 23 
23. Fruit-body perennial and exhibiting more than 
one layer of 
tubes 
. . . . 24 
Fruit-body annual although the fruit-body can 
persist in a 
dried depauperate form for several months 
. . 27 
24. Spores brown 
• • 25 
Spores colourless 
26 
25. Large, brown, sterile cells present in the tubes; spores simple 
Phellinus & Cryptoderma 
Brown, sterile cells absent from tubes; spores complex Ganoderma 
26. Large woody fruit-body with crust-like top . . . . Fomes 
Medium sized to small, fleshy-tough fruit-body with downy or 
crust-like top . . Oxyporus, Fomitopsis & Heterobasidion 
27. Spores borne in labyrinth-like or elongate pores, or cap either 
poorly developed or absent, and only resupinate pore-surface 
present . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 28 
Spores borne in distinct pores on well-developed woody 
fruit-bodies . . . . . . . . . . . . -Si 
28. Spores borne in labyrinth-like pores Daedalea & Daedaleopsis 
Spores borne in elongate pores like very thick gills, or fruit- 
body completely resupinate . . . . . . . . . . 29 
29. Spore-layer lining elongate pores 
Lenzites (white) & Gloeophylliim (brown) 
Spore-layer consisting of a resupinate pore-layer . . . . 30 

138 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Pore-layer totally resupinate ; flesh very poorly developed 
Fibuloporia and related genera 
Fruit-body resupinate or developing ill-formed caps at the 
margin; flesh well-developed and quite tough 
Datronia, Gloeoporus & Bjerkandera 
Fruit-body with a distinct stem . . • • • • • • 3^ 
Fruit-body sessile or with a poorly developed stem, or if 
merely with a basal swelling then pores bruising . . . . 33 
Pores dark-coloured but spores pale-coloured in mass 
Coltricia (also see Phaeolus below) 
Pores white or creamy, foot often darkened or black, and 
spores hyaline . . . . • • • • • • • • Polyporus 
Pores brightly coloured, red, lilaceous or orange to apricot- 
colour . . . . . • • • • • • • • • • • 34 
Pores never as brightly coloured, cream, white, grey or in 
some shade of brown . . . . • • • • • • • • 35 
Pores red to orange-red . . • • • • Pycnoporus 
Pores lilac to violaceous, or lilaceous orange to apricot colour 
Hapalopilus (orange-apricot) & Hirschioporus (lilaceous) 
Pore-surface brown or dark grey and spores often colourless 36 
Pore-surface white or creamy, or yellow; spores hyaline . . 38 
Pore-surface firm and grey . . • • • • Bjerkandera 
Pore-surface greenish yellow, bruising brown or yellow- 
brown and darkening with age . . • • • • • • 37 
Fruit-body lacking a stem, rust-brown, breaking easily, 
cheesy and with silky sheen . . . . • • • • Inonotus 
Fruit-body with a broad basal hump, fibrillose spongy with 
yellow margin to cap . . . . • • • • • • Phaeolus 
Tubes forming a layer quite distinct from the flesh; fruit-body 
fleshy and tough . . . • • • • • • • • • 39 
Tubes not forming a layer distinct from the flesh; fruit-body 
woody or corky . . . . • . • • • • • • -43 
39 . Pore-surface bright yellow; upper surface yellow or orange 
Laetiporus 
Pore-surface white . . . • • • • • • • • • 4° 
Fruit-body medium to large, shell-shaped, whitish brown or 
silvery grey on top; on birch . . . • • • • • Piptoporus 
Fruit-body often frond-like, infrequently shell-shaped and 
if on birch then small . . . . • • • • • • • • 4^ 
30 
31 
32 
33- 
34 
35 
36 
37 
38. 
40 

BRACKET-FUNGI AND THEIR RELATIVES 
139 
41. Fruit-body fan- or frond-shaped, composed of innumerable 
more or less complete caps joined together at their base or to 
half-way . . . . . . . • • • Grifola & Meripilus 
Fruit-body neither fan-shaped nor frond-shaped and com- 
pound . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 42 
42. Fruit-body wholly pale-coloured white, cream, ivory, etc. 
Tyromyces 
Fruit-body except pores usually some shade of brown Polyporus 
43. Cap thick, corky or woody and pores medium or large 
Trametes & Pseudotrametes 
Cap thin but leathery and pores small . . . . Coriolus 

140 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
(i) Pored and toothed fungi ^ 
» 
(a) Colonisers of tree trunks, stumps and branches 
! I 
Polyporus squamosus Fries Scaly polypore ' 
Cap: ioa-300 mm. Stem: width 25-50 mm; length 25-75 mm. ' 
Description : 
Cap: fan-shaped or semicircular, spreading horizontally with age, 
ochre-yellow or straw-coloured with dark brown, flattened scales 
in concentric zones which are much more dense at the centre. 
Stem: short, stout, white at apex and netted with pale creamy buff I 
about middle, but dark brown or black towards the base and attached [ 
to the side of the cap. 
Tubes: whitish to yellowish and decurrent with large, angular, irre- , 
gularly fringed, whitish or cream-coloured pores. V 
Flesh: with strong, not very pleasant smell, cream-coloured or white. ■ 
Spore-print: white. 
Spores: long, oblong or elongate ellipsoid, hyaline under the micro- 
scope (10-15 X 4-5 pm) and not blueing in solutions containing 
iodine. 
Habitat & Distribution : An easily recognisable fungus growing on 
stumps and old living trees, especially of sycamore and elm where ^ 
it often forms tiers of caps from late spring until autumn; however, / 
they decompose rapidly and almost completely disappear by the j 
next year when new fruit-bodies may appear in the same place, | 
a phenomenon which may take place for several consecutive seasons. I 
General hiformation. The genus Polyporus is in most text-books, a big 
and unwieldy genus joining together all fleshy, annual fungi pos- 
sessing tubes; even the boleti (see p. 32) have been included! < 
Many of these species are now considered less closely related one 
to another than previously thought. Boleti differ from polypores, I 
however, in their less tough and distinctly putrescent fruit-body, i 
and in the fact that the margin of the cap extends but does not • 
continue to grow during the life-cycle; the margin of the polypore ^1 
fruit-body is active and may burst into growth again when favour- | 
able weather conditions occur. The ‘Scaly polypore’ has a flesh 
which consists of two types of hyphae: (i) hyphae of unlimited 
growth vdth abundant protoplasmic contents which stain easily and 
which collapse on drying; and (ii) thick-walled, strengthening hyphae ' 
which bind the thin walled hyphae together. Laetiporus sulphureus 
(Fries) Murrill ‘Sulphur polypore’ has a single type of hyphae in 

Plate 44 . Woody fungi: Spores white and borne within tubes — fruit-body annual 

142 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
the tubes, i.e. thin walled generative, and only a few binding hyphae 
in the flesh. It has an orange cap with a rather thick, sulphur or * 
chrome-yellow margin, sulphur-yellow tubes and pores and yellow, ^ 
then pale buff, flesh. The spore-print is white and the spores hyaline, i 
pip-shaped and medium sized, (5-7 x 4-5 pm). 
Illustrations: P. squamosus - — F 43*’; Hvass 267; LH 75; NB 129^^; I 
WD 94b L. sulphureus — Hvass 268; LH 73; NB 129^; WD 94^. ^ 
■P 
Some common annual polypores ^ 
Piptoporus betuUnus (Fries) Karsten Birch polypore | 
Cap: 75-200 mm, kidney-shaped or hoof-shaped, smooth, covered by j 
a thin, separable and greyish silvery or pale brownish skin; cap- 
margin thick, incurved and projects beyond the tubes. I 
Stem: rudimentary, simply a small hump below which the fungus 
develops. 
Tubes, pores and spore-print: white. 1 
Spores: sausage-shaped, and thin-walled hyaline under the microscope * 
and very narro}\% (5-6 X 1-2 pm). It grows on birch throughout the , 
country where it causes a sap wood-rot which finally converts the 
inner timber to a red-brown friable mass. The flesh, which contains 
thickened binding hyphae, is used for mounting insects and for f 
sharpening knives, hence the common name ‘Razor-strop fungus’. 
Illustrations : Hvass 269; LH 67; NB 117“*; WD 93^. j 
I 
Inonotus hispidus (Fries) Karsten Shaggy polypore 1 
Cap: 100-250 mm, kidney-shaped, yellow-brown to rust-brown, but ^ 
finally almost black, at first covered with shaggy hairs, but these 
tend to mat together with age. * 
Stem: absent. I 
Tubes and flesh: rust-colour; pores at first yellow, but finally red- | 
brown. 
Spore-print: yellow-brown. 
Spores: medium sized (8-9 X 7-8 pm) and globose under the I 
microscope. It grows on various broad leaved trees, especially ash ^ 
where it causes a spongy, white heart-wood rot. The flesh contains 
hyphae with thick, brown walls. , 
Illustrations: LH 63; WD 96^. I 

Plate 45. Woody fungi — annual polypores 

144 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Phaeoliis schneinitzu (Fries) Patouillard 
Cap: 100-300 mm, bracket-shaped or tub-shaped, dark brown with 
a knobbly, velvety, roughened and grooved surface; margin at first 
golden yellow. 
Stem : absent or short, thick and brown. 
Tubes and pores: greenish yellow. 
Flesh: deep rust-brown. 
Spore-print: greenish yellow. 
Spores: medium sized, greenish under the microscope, ellipsoid and 
about 8X4 pm in size, (7-8 X 3-4 pm). This fungus is found on 
conifers or near conifer stumps where it is attached to the roots; it 
causes a brown cubical heart-wood rot; the flesh of the fruit-body 
is composed of only one type of hyphae. 
Illustrations: LH 67; NB iii^; WD 95^. 
Meripilus giganteus (Fries) Karsten Giant polypore 
Cap: 75-100 mm, or even up to 200 mm wide, grouped and forming a 
tuft of caps up to 750 mm across. The individual caps are fan- 
shaped, pliable, rather thin and yellow-brown to snuff-brown with 
their margins w^avy and cream colour or yellowish. 
Stem: replaced by a united mass of caps. 
Tubes, pores and flesh: white and very soft, but becoming black on 
bruising. 
Spores: small, pip-shaped, hyaline under the microscope and 5-6 X 
4-5 pm. This fungus is a common sight forming masses at the base 
of broad-leaved trees; it is common on beech. It is a soft, fibrous 
polypore as a result of the lack in the flesh of thick-walled specialised 
hyphae. 
Illustrations: Hvass 277; LH 73; NB 129^; WD 93^. 
The spores of all the annual polypores described above do not 
blue when placed in solutions containing iodine. 

BRACKET-FUNGI AND THEIR RELATIVES 
145 
Coriolus versicolor’ (Fries) Quelet 
Many zoned polypore 
Cap: 25-60 mm. Stem: absent. 
Description: Plate 46. 
Cap: semi-circular, flattened, thin, tough and flexible when fresh with 
the surface velvety and marked with smoother, paler concentric 
zones giving a pattern of yellow-brown, grey or darker greenish 
grey zones; the margin is thin and is the palest of the zones and 
may be wavy or lobed. 
Tubes: white with small, round and rough-edged to angular white or 
cream-coloured pores which become yellowish with age. 
Flesh: white, tough and continuous with the tube tissue and so not 
allowing one to detect any difference between the tissues. 
Spore-print: white. 
Spores: medium sized, oblong and hyaline under the microscope, and 
6-8 X 2-3 pm; not blueing in solutions containing iodine. 
Habitat & Distribution: Very common on stumps, trunks and fallen 
branches of various trees, especially beech; it is to be found through- 
out the year. 
General Information: It is often associated with nodulose masses of 
fungal tissue which are covered in small poroid areas and are very 
confusing when found by the beginner; they are simply growth- 
forms of Coriolus versicolor-, such forms are frequently found on 
old house-timbers exposed to the weather, particularly window 
frames where it forms a distinct rot. Its flesh consists of thin-walled 
hyphae and binding hyphae as in Polyporus squamosus as well as an 
additional thick-walled type called skeletal hyphae. It would appear 
that several polypores are capable of producing the amorphous 
growths mentioned above, some of which contain hyphal fragments 
called conidia. 
The bands of colour on the cap of the ‘many zoned polypore’ are 
retained after drying and from a group of fruit-bodies the most 
attractively zoned can be selected, mounted on small pieces of wood 
or cardboard and fitted at the back with a pin. Such preparations 
make very attractive brooches and have been used even by modern 
designers to contrast with their fashion creations. 
There are many pale tubed polypores growing on wood. Daedalea 
quercina Fries ‘Mazegill’, grows on oak and has irregular maze-like 
pores; Lenzites betulina (Fries) Fries, grows on birch, has tough 
plates which resemble the gills of an agaric. Datronia mollis (Fries) 

146 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Donk forms thick spreading resupinate patches on beech, sometimes 
with irregular dark brown caps formed by the upturned margin. 
Several species of Tyromyces occur in Britain and are characterised 
by their white pores and tubes and the white or pale-coloured caps. 
Bjerkandera adusta (Fries) Karsten has a grey pore-surface and is 
also frequently found on beech. 
Illustrations: F 44a; LH 69; NB 117^; WD 51^. 
Ganoderma europaeum Steyaert Common ganoderma 
Cap: 100-350 mm. Stem: absent. 
Description : Plate 47. 
Cap: bracket-shaped, rather flat at margin but humpy and irregular i 
about the middle, frequently concentrically zoned, smooth and only : 
slightly shiny; its margin is whitish or pale greyish. 
Tubes: red-brown or cinnamon-brown, obscurely layered and with 
small, white pores flushed with pale cinnamon-brown, but deep 1 
red-brown when rubbed or with age. 
Flesh : with a fragrant smell, deep red brown and felty-fibrous. i. 
Spore-print: dark cinnamon-brown. ji 
Spores: long, oval with truncate apex, smooth, but reticulate on the | 
inner surface of the inner wall giving the spores a patterned appear- j 
ance when seen under the microscope; lo-ii X 6-7 pm in size. 
Habitat & Distribution: This fungus is common on various trees, | 
especially beech and can be found throughout the year. | 
General Information: This common Ganoderma is perennial and dis- ) 
tinguished from other polypore groups by the complex spores. ! 
G. applanatum (Fries) Karsten is closely related, but differs in the 
thinner fruit-body with a thin margin, and the pale cinnamon- 
brown flesh; the flesh of both species contains thick-walled binding , 
and strengthening hyphae as well as the generative hyphae. || 
So sensitive are the pores to bruising that if a drawing or writing | 
is executed on the lower surface with a pin, needle or similar sharp j 
instrument and the fungus dried, the red-brown lines produced are j 

Plate 46. Woody fungi: Spores white and borne within tubes or on thickened plates 
Coriolus versicolor 
10 urn 
Lenzites betulina 
A. Binding hyphae of Laetiporus sulphurous 
B. Strengthening hyphae of Piptoporus betulinus 

148 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
retained and the pattern preserved. Several fungus paintings pre- 
pared in this way were made in the early part of the century, many 
beautiful ones having originated in the eastern part of North America. 
Fomes fomentarius whose important characters are described below 
has frequently been confused with Ganoderma europaeum. It is 
common growing on birch in Scotland, but is less frequent south of 
Perth, and then grows probably more frequently on beech which is 
similar to the pattern found on the continent of Europe. However, 
it has grown in former periods in England on birch, for it was found 
commonly amongst birch timbers in an excavation of an early 
Mesolithic lake side village near Scarborough, Yorkshire. 
Illustrations : NB 125^; WD i6o^. 
Some perennial polypores. Plate 48. 
Fomes fomentarius (Fries) Kickx Tinder fungus 
Cap: 90-300 mm, hoof-shaped, thick, broadly attached to the substrate, 
zoned with yellow-brown and shades of grey; its margin is blunt 
and fawn or pale brownish. 
Tubes: layered, cinnamon-brown with pale cinnamon pores with a 
whitish bloom. 
Flesh: cinnamon-brown or buff and woolly. 
Spore-print: white. 
Spores: elongate, ellipsoid, very long, hyaline under the microscope, 
15-18 X 5-6 pm, and not ornamented. The flesh contains both 
thick- and thin-walled hyphae. It grows on birch and less frequently 
on beech. The flesh has been used in dentistry, in manufacturing 
fancy articles, such as mats, and was the basis of the tinder used in 
flint-boxes. 
Illustrations: LH 65; NB 117^; WD 100^. 
PhelUnus igniarius (Fries) Quelet ‘Willow Fomes’, grows on willows 
and causes their heart-rot. It is a rust-brown, woody fungus with 
a hard crust and brown tubes and flesh. The spore-print is white 
and composed of small, spherical, hyaline spores, 5-6 pm in diameter. 
The flesh contains thin- and thick-walled hyphae. 
Illustrations: LH 63; WD 99^. 

Plate 47. Woody fungi: Spores brown and borne within tubes — fruit-body perennial 
e- 
'y 
a, 
w 
Ganoderma europaeum 

150 IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Oxypovus popuUmis (Fries) Donk, grows on various sorts of broad- 
leaved trees, particularly poplars and often becomes covered in 
mosses and algae. It has a pale buff or cream-coloured cap, white 
flesh, pores, tubes and spores. 
Illustrations : LH 67. 
Cryptoderma pitti (Fries) Imaz, grows on conifers often several feet 
above the ground. It has a woody, deeply cracked upper surface, 
dark red-brown flesh, tubes and pores. Its spores are small, broadly 
ellipsoid and brown. 
Heterobasidion annosum (Fries) Brefeld Root fomes 
Variable, sometimes possessing a cap, sometimes resupinate except 
for the upturned margin, flattened or shell-shaped, red-brown to 
blackish at the centre but pale at the margin, which when seen 
from below is always white. The tubes are in layers and like the pores, 
flesh and spore-print are white. The spores are broadly ellipsoid, 
small, smooth, hyaline and 4-5 X 4 pm. The flesh is fairly tough as it 
contains both generative hyphae and skeletal hyphae. It is frequent on 
the roots and lower parts of stems of many trees and shrubs causing a 
rapid heart-rot of conifers and extensive damage to young trees. 
Illustrations: LH 67; NB iii^; WD 98b 
The spores of all the perennial polypores described above do not 
blue when placed in solutions containing iodine. 

Plate 48. Woody fungi: Spores borne within tubes — perennial polypores 
nm 
[ 
o 
o 
o 
Spores of Heterobasidion 
annosum 

152 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Schizophylliim commune Fries Split-gill fungus 
Cap: 10-25 nim. Stem: width 2-4 mm; length 2-4 mm. 
Description: 
Cap: greyish fawn becoming whitish when dry, fan or kidney-shaped, 
often lobed and covered in close-set hairs and with incurved margin. 
Stem: absent or the cap simply narrows into a stem-like bump. 
Gills: replaced by a series of grey-brown plates which when dry 
appear as if to split longitudinally and their edges roll back. 
Flesh: brownish but drying whitish. 
Spore-print: white. 
Spores: medium sized, oblong, hyaline under the microscope, not 
blueing in solutions containing iodine and 6-7 X 2-5 pm in size. 
Facial and marginal cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distribution: Grows on fallen branches, trunks, dead wood, 
etc. 
General Information : Easily recognised by the ‘gills’ radiating from a 
point and becoming ‘split’ when dry. Specimens of Schizophyllum 
sealed by A. H. R. Buller in a tube in 1911 have been shown on 
remoistening to unroll their gills and shed variable spores, after 52^ 
years — probably a world record! The split-gill is a rather unique 
British fungus which appears to be much more closely related to 
the polypores than to the agarics — although it has for a long time 
been associated with the Oyster mushroom (p. 74). In fact, the 
splitting gills are two adjacent shallow dishes with spores produced 
on their inner surfaces. The cups separate on drying and therefore 
only superficially resemble gills splitting down the centre. 
Another fungus which can also be associated with the idea of 
cups is Fistulina hepatica Fries ‘the Beef-steak fungus’. This fungus 
is a polypore in the widest sense. It may grow up to 250 mm wide 
and is reddish-brown or liver-coloured with reddish tubes and pale 
flesh-coloured pores; the tubes although free are aggregated together 
and can be easily separated individually with the fingers. This fungus 
is edible although very strong in taste, it produces a serious decay 
of oaks. 
Illustrations: S. commune — LH 105; NB 125^; WD 69^. F. hepatica — 
F 43" (lower figure); Hvass 278; LH 75; NB 129^; WD loH. 

Plate 49. Woody fungi; Spores white and borne on split-'gills' 
Adult fruit-bodies on wood 
Elongate-ellipsoid 
spores 
]3 
Radial section of adult fruit-body 
Tangential section of adult fruit-body 
20 (im 
Under-surface of 
adult fruit-body of 
Schizophyllum 
commune 
5 mnr 
5 mm 
Under-surface of adult 
fruit-body of a 
pleurotoid agaric — 
Crepidotus mollis 
Radial section of adult pleurotoid agaric 
Magnification 
see above 
Tangential section of adult 
fruit-body of pleurotoid agaric 

154 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
(b) Destroyers of timber in buildings 
Serpula lacrymam (Fries) Karsten Dry-rot fungus 
Description : 
Fruit-body: usually widely spreading, but sometimes forming a dis- 
tinct bracket with the upper surface silvery or smokey grey, flushed 
with lilac or rose or yellowish. 
Stem : absent and replaced by a series of dirty white or greyish mycelial 
threads or strands which can be traced up to lOO mm over the 
substrate. 
Flesh: thin, dirty yellowish and composed of only one type of hypha. 
Spores: borne in shallow pores which are part of a complicated net- 
work of rust-brown folds and ridges. 
Spore-print: rust-brown. 
Spores: medium sized, golden yellow, thick-walled and broadly 
ellipsoid, and 8-io X 5-6 pm in size. 
Cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distribution : On worked wood in buildings and less commonly 
in timber-yards. It can be found throughout the year. 
General Information: This fungus forms fan-like structures and strands 
of mycelium which pass along beams and joists and through plaster. 
Where there is a bad case of dry-rot, the room or building will have 
an unpleasant musty smell and when actually growing the fungus 
exudes droplets of water on the mycelium and fruit-body, i.e. 
weeping, hence the name ‘lacrymans’ — weepy. It is a very important 
and destructive agent causing damage to floors and skirting boards, 
to joists and beams. It is a frequent pest of old houses and therefore 
of many of our cities. This fungus does not appear to have been found 
in the wild in Europe, but there is a record from the Himalayas. 
There are, however, very closely related species found on soil or 
wood-detritus. The Dry-rot fungus darkens the wood and produces 
a rot which makes the wood crack into small cubes or rectangular 
blocks. 
This fungus was formerly placed in Merulius, but this genus 
should be retained for hyaline-spored fungi, e.g. M. tremellosus 
Fries, a species which grows even in winter on stumps of various 
trees in our woods. 
Illustrations'. LH 53; WD 103^. 

Plate 50. Dry-rot fungi — leathery and tough spores borne in shallow irregular pores 
Adult fruit-body 
Portion of skirting board 
showing characteristic warping 
caused by Serpula lacrymans 
Minute, hyaline spores of 
Merulius tremellosus 
10 jtm 

156 IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Coniophora puteana (Fries) Karsten Cellar or Wet-rot fungus 
Descriptio?! : 
Fruit-body: variable in size, resupinate, composed of one type of 
hypha only and with a sterile whitish cream or yellow margin. 
Spore-bearing tissue: an irregularly wrinkled or humpy, yellowish 
surface which then becomes olive-green or bronze-colour. 
Spore-print: olivaceous brown. 
Spores: olive-brown under the microscope, smooth, ellipsoid, thick- 
walled and 12-14 X ^“9 in size. 
Cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distribution: This fungus causes wet-rot in houses, but may 
also be found on stumps and fallen trunks in woodland. 
General Information: The fungus causes a discolouration of worked 
timber and induces longitudinal cracking with only a few lateral hair- 
like cracks unlike timber attacked by the dry-rot fungus (see p. 154). 
Illustrations : WD 103^. 
Fibuloporia vaillantii (Fries) Bondarsev & Singer 
Description : 
Fruit-body: a resupinate layer of pores with cream-coloured or white 
sterile radiating margin. 
Spore-bearing tissue : distributed within a series of small often shallow, 
white or ivory tubes. 
Spore-print: white. 
Spores: smooth, hyaline under the microscope, oblong 5-7 X 3-4 pm. 
Cystidia : absent. 
Habitat & Distribution : The dry-rot of houses, particularly in roof- 
systems. 
General Information: Fibuloporia vaillantii is recognised by the white, 
resupinate pore-surface and fairly tough nature due to the presence 
of strengthening hyphae. Just as the genus Polyporus was found to 
be composed of several quite different elements (see pp. 140-44) and 
has since been split up into a number of diflFerent genera, the genus 
Poria has also been fragmented; one of the constituent genera is 
Fibuloporia. Amyloporia xantha (Fries) Bondarsev & Singer dih'ers 
in having amyloid tissue and cystidia encrusted with crystals. The 
flesh contains both simple hyphae and thickened structural hyphae. 
It is yet another member of the large old unwieldy genus Poria 
and causes decay of worked wood, particularly the timbers of bench- 
ing and staging in greenhouses. A. xantha has a sulphur-yellow pore- 
surface and is rather cheesy when handled. 

Plate 51. Wet and Dry-rot fungi — leathery and tough and spores borne 
within shallow pores or on an uneven surface 
spore-bearing surface 
20 fi.m 
Hyphae of Coniophora puteana 
20 urn 
0 " 
0 0 
0 
Broadly ellipsoid, yellowish 
brown spores of 
Coniophora puteana 
•> 
Hyphae of Fibuloporia yaillantii 

158 IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
(c) Colonisers of cones 
Aui'iscalpium vulgare S. F. Gray Ear-pick fungus 
Cap: 8-12 mm. Stem: width 4-6 mm; length 40-75 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: kidney-shaped or semieircular, thin, date- or umber-brown, 
hairy, but paler towards the margin. 
Stem: erect, slender, hairy, particularly at the base, and attached at the 
side of the cap (excentric). 
Gills: replaced by flesh-coloured, then greyish brown spines. 
Flesh: brown. 
Spore-print: white. 
Spores: small, hyaline, minutely spiny, spherical, 4-5 pm in diameter, 
and becoming blue-grey in solutions containing iodine. 
Cystidia: flask-shaped with oily contents. 
Habitat & Distribution : This fungus is always found on fallen pine- 
cones and occurs from early summer to autumn. 
General Information: The ear-pick fungus is easily recognised by the 
slender, elegant habit, excentrically placed cap, substrate preference 
and dark colours. It cannot be confused with any other fungus. 
Recently it has been shown that the ‘agaric’ Lentinellus cochleatus 
(Fries) Karsten (p. 76) is more closely related to Auriscalpium than 
this fungus is to other spine-bearing forms and Lentinellus is to the 
other agarics. Both fungi possess thick-walled cells in the flesh and 
oil-containing hyphae; they are placed in the family Auriscalpiaceae. 
Another laterally stemmed Hedgehog fungus dilTers in possessing 
distinctly gelatinised teeth and preference for conifer wood and not 
cones. Examination of the basidia of this fungus shows that it is 
more closely related to the jelly-fungi, Exidia and Tremella (p. 184) 
than to Hedgehog fungi such as Auriscalpium or Hynduni repandum 
Fries (p. 160). This false nature is reflected in the name of the 
genus to which it belongs, Pseudohydnum, and the very gelatinous | 
texture in the specific name 'gelatinosuni : the fungus is Pseiidohydniim j 
gelatinosum, or as it used to be called Tremellodon gelatinosum. I 
Illustrations: Auriscalpium vulgare — WD 103^. Pseudohydnum gela- \ 
tinosum — WD 105®. I 

Plate 52. Tough or leathery fungi; Spores white and borne on spines — Ear pick fungus 
Small, minutely spiny, 
10 p,m 

6o 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
(d) Terrestrial forms 
Hydnum repandum Fries Wood-hedgehog 
Cap: width. Stem: width 10-17 mm; length 45-65 mm. 
Description: 
Cap: rather thick, fleshy, pinkish buff or tan, paler at its incurved 
and often lobed margin. 
Stem: short, stout and powdered with white roughenings and often 
attached to the cap to one side of the centre. 
Gills: replaced by awl-shaped, pinkish buff spines which are unequal 
in length and run down the top of the stem. 
Flesh: white, firm and with a pleasant smell. 
Spore-print: whitish. 
Spores: medium sized, hyaline under the microscope, smooth, broadly 
ellipsoid, 7 X 6-7 p.m, and not becoming bluish grey in solutions 
containing iodine. 
Cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distribution: The ‘wood-hedgehog’ grows on the ground 
in mixed woods and is easily recognised by its colour and fleshy 
texture. 
General Information : The closely related, smaller, red-brown species 
H. rufescens Persoon grows with conifers. Hydnum was formerly a 
genus which contained several entities, now not considered closely 
related. Thus the following genera have been delimited in addition 
to those related to Hydnum repandum and H. rufescens, and Auri- 
scalpium described on p. 158. 
Sarcodon: Fruit-body fleshy: spores brown and ornamented 
with irregular bumps, e.g. S. imbricatum (Fries) Karsten. 
Phellodoii: Fruit-body tough and fibrous: spores white and 
ornamented with small spines, e.g. P. fiiger (Fries) Karsten. 
Hydnellum: Fruit-body tough and fibrous: spores brown and 
ornamented with irregular bumps and bosses, e.g. H. scrobiculatum 
(Secretan) Karsten. 
Banker a: Fruit-body fleshy: spores white and ornamented with 
small spines, e.g. B. fuliginoalbum (Fries) Pouzar. 
Illustrations: Hvass 280; I>H 61; NB 153^; WD 53'^; Z 61. 

Plate 53. Tough or leathery fungi: Spores whitish and borne on spines 

62 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
(ii) Chanterelles and relatives 
Cantharellus cibanus Fries Chanterelle 
Cap: 30-100 mm. Stem: width 15-25 mm; length 30-70 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: convex then flattened, irregularly wavy, more or less top-shaped, 
depressed and smooth or slightly roughened at centre, egg-yellow 
or lemon-chrome with flush of orange and with the margin incurved 
at first. 
Stem: short, stout, tapered downwards, fleshy and similarly coloured 
to the cap. 
Gills: replaced by irregularly branched yellow folds which may form 
a network near the margin and at the apex of the stem over which 
the folds run down irregularly (decurrent). 
Flesh: with pleasant, fruity smell, yellow but paler on drying. 
Spore-print: pale cream-colour. 
Spores: medium sized, ellipsoid, thin-walled, smooth, 8-10 X 5-6 pm 
in size and not becoming bluish grey in solutions containing iodine. 
Marginal and facial cystidia: absent. 
Basidia: 2-8 spored. 
Habitat & Distribution: Very common in troops in deciduous woods 
especially those with beech and oak. 
General Information : Easily recognised by its folds and absence of true 
gills beneath the cap and the overall yellow colour. This fungus is 
the edible chanterelle of the continental market, where it is con- 
sidered of very high quality; it can be purchased in this country in 
tins. C. friesii Quelet is of a bright apricot colour with filaceous or 
rose-coloured flesh. The ‘false chanterelle’ Hygrophoropsis aurantiaca 
(Fries) Maire already discussed (see p. 106) has true gills and is 
reddish orange in colour. 
Illustrations : Hvass 182; LH 59; NB 123^; WD 83^. 

Plate 54. Fleshy but firm fungi: Spores pale-coloured and borne on irregular folds (False gills) 
20 pm 

164 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Ct-aterellus cornucopioides (Fries) Persoon Horn of plenty 
Cap: 22-80 mm. Stem: width i5~25 mm; length 25-80 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: funnel-shaped, membranous to leathery, but limp, dark brown 
or almost black in wet weather, but on drying becoming dull brown 
or sepia, slightly scaly and with irregularly wavy margin. 
Stem: short, blackish and hollow. 
Gills: absent, replaced by a smooth to irregularly wrinkled, ash-grey 
surface. 
Flesh: sepia but drying out greyish ochre. 
Spore-print: cream-colour. 
Spores: medium sized, hyaline under the microscope, ellipsoid, smooth, 
lo-ii X 6-7 pm in size and not blueing in solutions containing 
iodine. 
Marginal and facial cystidia: absent. 
Basidia: usually 2-spored. 
Habitat & Distribution: Often in very large troops in woods, especially 
under beech. 
General Information: This fungus is recognised by the peculiar shape 
and dull colours which conceal it so well amongst the dead leaves 
and woodland debris; in the shade of the tree-canopy it is easily 
overlooked. Craterellus sinuosus (Fries) Fries is a much smaller species 
with dirty ochraceous fertile surface and brownish grey cap and stem. 
‘Cornucopioides’ means like (oides) a horn of plenty, a familiar 
object in mediaeval paintings as part of heathen festivities full and 
overflowing either with fruit or wine, or both ! 
Illustrations: Hvass 186; Lfl 59; NB 123^; WD 83"^. 

1 
Plate 55. Fleshy but leathery fungi: Spores pale-coloured and borne on irregular wrinkles 
Basidia showing 
variable number 
of sterigmata 
L.S. of spore-bearing 
surface 
Adult fruit-body 
and section of 
Craterellus sinuosus 

IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
1 66 
(iii) Fairy-club fungi 
Clavulina rugosa (Fries) Schroeter Wrinkled club . 
Cap: absent. Fruit-body : length 50-100 mm; width 7-13 mm. 
Description : 
Fruit-body: club-shaped, simple with blunt apex or irregular blunt 
branches, white or dirty cream colour, often thickened upwards and 
marked with longitudinal wrinkles or grooves and the whole surface 
of the club bearing spores. 
Stem: absent or extremely short. ' 
Flesh: white. 
Spore-print: white. 
Spore: medium sized, broadly ellipsoid to subglobose, hyaline under 
the microscope and not turning bluish grey in iodine solutions, 
9-10 X 7-8 [Jim in size. 
Cystidia: absent. 
Basidia: 2-spored. ' 
Habitat & Distribution: Frequent on the ground in woods, especially 
in the shade of beech trees or in conifer plantations. 
General Information: Two very closely related species are to be found 
in similar localities and are equally as common ; they are C. cristata 
(Fries) Schroeter with strongly branched white fruit-body, each 
branch ending in pinkish or lavender-white, divided, sharply pointed 
branchlets and C. cinerea (Fries) Schroeter with irregular greyish or 
dark grey branches with a flush of violaceous. 
These three species are very closely related; in fact so many inter- 
mediates between the extreme morphological forms are known that 
some authorities have considered them simply forms of a single 
species. All these species lack cystidia. 
rugosa — wrinkled, referring to the spore-bearing surface, 
cristata — crested, referring to the branchlets. 
cinerea — ash-grey, referring to the colour. 
All these species are often found blackened by the growth of the 
microscopic fungus, Helminthosphaeria clavariae (Tulasne) Fuckel. 
Illustrations: C. rugosa— CH 55; WD 104^. C. cristata — LH 55; NB 
1535. \Y£) 1042, C. cinerea — WD 104^. 

Plate 56. Fleshy but firm fungi: Spores pale-coloured and borne on club-shaped fruit-bodies 
All fruit-bodies same size 
Clavulina cristata 
Clavulina rugosa 
Oily globule 
Large, subglobose spores 
of Clavulina rugosa 
Adult fruit-body 
Clavaria vermicularis 
Clavulinopsis helvola 

i68 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Clavaria vennicularis Fries White spindles 
Cap: absent. Fruit-body : width 6-io mm; length 50-85 mm. 
Description: Plate 56. 
Simple or very rarely branched, but not forked below the soil-level, 
densely tufted, spindle-shaped, pure white with sharp, often slightly 
biownish, tips, when old it is wavy, often twisted, compressed and 
fragile. 
Stem: absent. 
Flesh: whitish. 
Spore-print: white. 
Spores: small, pip-shaped, smooth, hyaline under the microscope, 
4“5 3 becoming bluish grey in iodine solu- 
tions. 
Cystidia: absent. 
Habitat &: Distribution: Common in autumn amongst grass in fields, 
less frequent in woods. 
General Information: Claz'ulinopsis fusifor?nis (Fries) Corner, ‘Golden 
spindles’ is similar to C. rerniicularis, but forms dense tufts of canary- 
yellow, very fragile clubs joined in 2’s or 3’s below the soil level; the 
spores are also slightlv different, being almost globose, hvaline under 
the microscope and 5-7 pm in diameter. 
Clavaria fumosa Fries is similar to C. verrnicularis and forms tufts 
of very fragile mouse-grey clubs with brownish tips; it produces 
elongate ellipsoid spores measuring 6-8 X 3-4 pm which are 
hyaline under the microscope. C. verrnicularis and C. fumosa differ 
from Clavulinopsis in hvphal construction, but the differences are 
rather difficult to demonstrate to the beginner. Clavulinopsis helvola 
ta\ours similar habits to C. fusiformis and although yellow in colour 
differs in the more orange-yellow colouration, but more par- 
ticularly in the spores being rounded, 5-6 pm in diameter with large 
angular spines. 
The earth-tongues, i.e. members of the family Geoglossaceae 
which are also found in pastures belong to an unrelated group of 
fungi, the Ascomycetes. If the clubs are crushed and examined 
under the microscope rows of sacs (asci) containing long thread-like 
ascospores are found — no basidia are to be seen. 
Illustrations : Clav. fusiformis — \\ 7 ) lop'f C. verrnicularis — WD 104^®. 
C. fumosa — Hvass 303; WD 104'h Clav. helvola — Hvass 300; WD 
105I. 

Plate 57, Club-shaped and coral fungi 

170 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Clavulittopsis corniculala (Fries), Corner (p. 171). 
Cap: absent. Fruit-body : complex; width 20-30 mm; length 20-40 
mm. 
Description: Plate 57. 
Fruit-body: shape depending on the length of grass in which it grows 
but always branching strongly from its base, composed of a dense 
compact tuft of egg-yellow or orange-tawny branches which are 
either irregular or of equal length and so they form a flattened top 
to the fruit-body complex, the branchlets are slender, forked 2- or 
3-times, with their apices narrowed or curved. 
Stem : very downy at the base. 
Flesh : pale yellow. 
Spore-print: white. 
Spores: medium sized, hyaline under the microscope, smooth, spheri- 
cal and 5-7 p.m in diameter, not becoming bluish grey in iodine 
solutions. 
Cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distribution: Common amongst grass in fields or on grassy 
path sides in woodland. 
General Information: Clavulinopsis corniculata is recognised by the 
branched habit and the smooth spores; Ramaria ochraceo-virens is of 
similar form, but has an overall duller colour and turns green on 
bruising, grows in pinewoods and has finely roughened brownish 
spores. Calocera viscosa also has an erect, bright golden or orange- 
yellow fruit-body which becomes more oiange on drying. It is 
repeatedly branched and usually has a long, tough-rooting base. 
However, the spore-print is dirty yellowish and the fruit-body, 
which grows on coniferous wood, is viscid and elastic, a character 
reflected in the name ‘viscosa’. Microscopically the basidium of 
Calocera is shaped like a tuning-fork and is not clavate as in Clavu- 
linopsis corniculata. It appears to be more related to the jelly-fungi 
(see p. 180). 
Illustrations: Clavulinopsis corniculata — LH 55; NB 6; WD 104^. 
Calocera viscosa — Hvass 304; LH 225; NB 149^; WD 107®. 

BRACKET-FUNGI AND THEIR RELATIVES 
17I 
Typhula erythropus Fries. 
Cap: absent. Fruit-body up to 20 mm high. 
Description : 
Fruit-body: upper fertile portion club-shaped and not more than 
half the length, white, surmounting a reddish brown, thread-like, 
often wavy or twisted stem which is attached at its base to an ellipsoid 
bead-like structure, called a sclerotium. 
Spore-print : white. 
Spores: oblong, smooth, hyaline under the microscope, 6-7 X 2 p.m in 
size and not becoming bluish grey in iodine solutions. 
Cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distribution: Not uncommon on dead leaves and twigs or 
dead herbaceous stems. 
Pistillaria micans Fries. 
Cap: absent. Fruit-body: up to 10 mm high. 
Description : 
Club-shaped or oblong, rose-pink hardly differentiated from the 
similarly coloured stem, and arising at most from a small pad of 
filaments. 
Spore-print: white. 
Spores: broadly ellipsoid to pip-shaped, smooth, hyaline under the 
microscope, about 10x6 pm (8-1 1 X 5~7 becom- 
ing bluish grey in iodine solutions. 
Cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distribution: Not uncommon on dead herbaceous stems and 
leaves, especially those in damp places. 
Illustratiofis : T. erythropus WD 105 P. micans WD 105^. 

172 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
General notes on the club-fungi 
Early mycologists believed that the club-shaped nature of the fruit- 
body was important in the classification of these fungi. Thus the 
Earth Tongues {Geoglossufn, see Plate 57), the Stag’s horn fungi and 
relatives [Xylosphaera see p. 204) both Ascomycete groups, the Dacry- 
mycetales (a group of jelly-fungi, see p. 180) and the true fairy-clubs 
were all classified together. It was ‘the Father of Mycology’, the Swede, 
Elias Fries, who in 1821, as in many other groups of fungi, made an 
attempt to make some sense of the chaos. By very careful observations, 
and what is so amazing without using a microscope, he was able to 
separate the tough stemmed and gelatinous stemmed groups from the 
more slender or coral-like ones. Fries was a very keen observer and 
noticed features which many modern authorities miss in the field 
because they rely too heavily on the microscope. Fries’ system was 
used almost unchanged until the second half of this century; its beauty 
was its simplicity in that it joined together in one group all those 
fungi with simple basidia and the spore-bearing tissue distributed all 
around a simple club or around the branches of a complex fruit-body 
resembling a coral. However, by a careful examination of the micro- 
scopic structures, such as the spores and hyphae and the development 
of the fruit-body, it has been found necessary to separate these fungi 
still further. The ecology of the club-fungi has assisted in an under- 
standing of these proposed divisions. 
The larger many branched clavarias, more correctly placed in the 
genus Ramaria, are to be found on bare soil in woodlands and planta- 
tions; R. ochraceo-virens is common in conifer plantations and can be 
recognised by the long ornamented spores, which characterise this 
group of fungi, and the fact that the sandy-coloured fruit-body be- 
comes dark olive-green on bruising (see p. 170). 
Clavanadelphus pistillaris is the largest of our simple club-fungi; 
it may grow up to 200 mm high and 50 mm wide. This fungus has a 
wrinkled outer surface and sometimes the apex of the club becomes 
flattened and lacks basidia; this suggests a possible relationship, 
perhaps evolutionary, to the primitive chanterelles (see p. 162) — also 
woodland fungi. Clavulwa, a complex group of dull or whitish, branched 
fruit-bodies, has been described earlier and the genus is characterised 
by the large spores and 2-spored basidia; they are woodland fungi also. 
The grassland species are often simple in structure belonging in the 

BRACKET-FUNGI AND THEIR RELATIVES 
73 
main to the genus Clavulhwpsis (see p. 170) and the now much reduced 
genus CJavaria (see p. 168). Although really complex, some of these 
species of Clavulhwpsis are branched only below the soil level and 
thus appear as single clubs amongst the grass. Perhaps the single 
club has evolved especially to grow amongst blades of grass. C. cor?ii- 
culata, however, is well branched and the head is tight and compact 
and often flattened close to the ground. The same fungus in woodland 
is more open and because of this it was thought to be a different 
species to the grassland form. It is the simple club which dominates 
the form of those species which grow on herbaceous debris and grass- 
stems; indeed several species of Typhula cause diseases of grass parti- 
cularly those of lawns where they have suffered damage because of 
cold or long periods under the snow. Some of these small fungi produce 
a small hard mass of fungal tissue about the size of a lupin seed (called 
a sclerotium). This is a resting body from which the club-shaped 
almost fllament-like fruit-body later develops. 

174 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Thelephora tevrestris Fries Earth-fan 
Cap: absent. Fruit-body: width 20-40 mm; height 30-50 mm. 
Description : 
Fruit-bodv: erect, fan-shaped or effused with upturned margin, tough 
but thin and fibrous, chocolate-brown or cocoa-coloured, scaly from 
radiating fibrils and with fringed, pale buff or wine-coloured margin. 
Gills; absent and replaced by a wrinkled or irregularly granular, dark 
filaceous grey or cocoa-coloured surface. 
Flesh; brown and thin. 
Spore-print; purplish brown. 
Spores; medium sized, dark brown under the microscope, warted- 
angular and 8-9 X 6-7 am in size. 
Cystidia; absent but basidia often filled with brown contents. 
Basidia; 2-4 spored. 
Habitat 6c Distribution: Found on the ground in woods, especially 
pine woods; also on heathland growing up vegetation and incor- 
porating it into the fruit-body’s shape. 
General Information: There is some evidence to suggest that this 
fungus can form mycorrhiza with pine trees under certain con- 
ditions. 
Although it may be easily passed over because it is perfectly 
camouflaged it is quite easy to recognise when collected. T. palmata 
(Bulliard) Patouillard, is a bigger, less frequently seen species more 
coral-like in shape; it also grows in pine woods. When the fruit- 
body of T. terrestris spreads over the soil or plant debris it resembles 
other members of the family to which it belongs, i.e. Thelephoraceae; 
species of Tomentella. They also have warty angular spores, purplish 
brown colours, and wrinkled or puckered spore-bearing surfaces. 
Tomentella spp., however, are resupinate or encrusting and so do 
not form caps, even at the margin of the fruit-body. Tomentella is 
one of the many genera which were classed collectively as resupinate 
fungi because they lack a cap and form crusts. This group ‘the 
resupinates’ consists of a whole series of quite unrelated fungi. 
Illustrations : LH 53; NB 47®. 

Plate 58. Club and Fan-shaped fungi 
I 

176 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
(iv) Resupinate fungi 
When mycologists talk generally about ‘resupinates’ they are referring 
to a whole group of Basidiomycetes whose spore-bearing layer is 
exposed, the cap highly reduced or completely lacking, and the fungus 
adhering to the surface of the substrate which may be soil, wood, grasses, 
etc., at the point which would have been the cap of an agaric. Probably 
members of the group are the most commonly seen yet it is one of the 
most commonly ignored groups of fungi — by naturalists and myco- 
logists alike; they form ‘white wash’ on old sticks, dark coloured dis- 
colourations on trunks, etc. It is an entirely artificial group of many 
quite unrelated elements united on the common factor of having either 
a reduced or primitive fruit-body consisting only of a sheet of tissue. 
However, these same fungi have a uniting factor in that they frequent 
the same ecological sites, e.g. on muddy soil in bogs, under overhangs 
of banks and stream sides, undersides of logs, trunks, branches and 
twigs, hidden in cracks of old stumps or spreading over carpets of 
conifer needles or dead leaves and sedges. 
By studying the anatomy of the fruit-body and the characters of 
the spores certain relationships can be found which relate many of 
these fungi to several other groups of fungi we have dealt with in earlier 
chapters. 
It is only possible to mention here the group as a whole for all the 
species really require very careful examination, often necessitating 
several hours of microscope work. They should be left by the beginner 
until more experience is obtained and advice of an expert easily 
available. 
Although the group mainly contains saprophytes, a few are parasitic. 
‘Silver-leaf disease’ of almonds and fruit trees is caused by Stereum 
{chondrostereum) purpureum (Persoon) Fries; it has a purple fruiting 
surface, and greyish upper surface when ever this is formed at the 
margin. 
There are several species of Sleveum in Britain, three species of which 
when handled in the fresh state stain red; S. sanguinoleutum (A. & S.) 
Fries, a pale coloured species on conifer wood, S. rugosum (Pers.) 
Fries a similar coloured species on beech, birch and especially hazel, 
and S. gausapatum Fries an ochraceous yellow species on oak, often 
forming a pocket rot of the timber. However, the commonest member 
of the genus is an orange-tawny coloured species with a greyish buff, 

w 
Plate 59. Resupinate fungi 
Microscopic structures at various magnifications 
Stereoid fruit-body 
Stereum hirsutum 
Spores 
A. Cristella farinacea 
B Aleurodiscus amorphus 
C Vuilleminia comedens 
D. Radulomyces confluens 
E Tylosperma asterophorum 
F. Botryohypochnus isabellinus 
G. Peniophora quercina 

78 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
hairy cap, 5. hirsutum (Willd) Fries. It grows on many trees of broad- 
leaved wood and can be found wherever twigs, branches, trunks or 
stumps have been lying out in the rain; it does not bleed. 
Those species of resupinate fungi which resemble members of this 
genus, i.e. those with a distinct tough, although poorly developed, cap, 
are called stereoid. 
‘Red thread disease’ of grass which often causes unsightly red patches 
on lawns and school and corporation playing-fields is caused by 
Corticium fuciforme (Berkeley) Wakefield. Fungi belonging to this 
genus produce fruit-bodies which ‘scramble over the substrate, for 
example, if one searches old elder trees throughout the year one will 
certainly find a ‘white wash’ fungus of this type, Hyphodontia sambuci 
(Pers.) J. Eriksson. Fungi with this type of fruit-body are called corti- 
coid. ^ r V U- 
The two major types are illustrated along with some of the bizarre 
microscopic structures one finds in the resupinates; such structures 
are useful in classification and identification, and their beauty and 
intricacy make up for the surprisingly simple fruit-body shape and 
texture. 

79 
C. THE JELLY FUNGI 
Key to the major groups 
The jelly fungi or Hymenomycetous heterobasidiae is a complex 
group of fungi and not only includes our common jelly fungi but many 
microscopic forms some of which are parasitic. The group is divided 
into three main divisions depending on the position of the cross-walls 
within the basidium, or whether the basidium is in the shape of a tuning- 
fork. They are probably not closely related one to another. 
Auriculariales (Basidia divided into cells by transverse walls) 
1. Fruit-body lacking a cap and more or less forming a gelatinous 
coating on plant-debris . . . . . . . . Helicobasidium 
Fruit-body with more or less distinct cap, gelatinous but 
tough . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2 
2. Fruit-body ear-like or cup-shaped; upper surface with grey 
hairs and lower surface lilaceous brown or wine-coloured Hirneola 
Fruit-body at first cup-shaped but then spreading; upper 
surface grey and hairy, and lower surface purplish. Auricularia 
Tremellales (Basidia divided into cells by longitudinal walls) 
1. Fruit-body with distinct stem and spines on lower surface 
Pseudohyd?ium 
Fruit-body lacking a well-developed stem, either reduced to a 
small lobe or entirely absent . . . . . . . . . . 2 
2. Fruit-body flattened or disc-shaped, often with warts or veins 
on the surface; spores more or less sausage-shaped. . . Exidia 
Fruit-body brain-like or with irregular bumps, sometimes 
lobed or irregular and encrusting . . . . . . . . 3 
3. Fruit-body brain-like or with bumps or bosses; spores rounded 
or ovoid . . . . . . . . . . . . TremeUa 
Fruit-body encrusting woody or herbaceous material; spores 
ellipsoid . . . . . . . . . . . . . . Sehacina 

i8o 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Dacrymycetales (Basidia resembling the shape of a tuning-fork) 
1. Fruit-bodv club-shaped or coral-like . . . . . . Calocera 
Fruit-body top-shaped or with irregular bumps . . . . 2 
2. Fruit-body top-shaped Femsjonia 
Fruit-body cushion- or brain-like, or with irregular bumps 
Dacrymyces 
Dacvymyces stillatus Xees ex Fries 
Fruit-body: 3-6 mm. 
Description : 
Fruit-bodv: cushion or brain-like, often irregular, lacking any evidence 
of stem, yellow or orange, gelatinous, covered entirely by spore- 
bearing tissue. 
Spore-print: yellowish. 
Spores: long, cylindrical or oblong, and slightly curved and 12-15 X 
5—6 urn in size; thev characteristically have 2 to 4 cross-walls dividing 
the interior of the spore (see below). 
Cystidia: absent. 
Habitat X Distribution: Common on all sorts of old wood, particularly 
on fence-posts, wooden railway-sleepers and other worked timber 
outside, e.g. sides of summer-houses and garden sheds. It is also 
found on twigs and branches in woods and copses. 
General Information : This fungus is found throughout the year, but 
it is much more obvious under damp conditions when it is strongly 
gelatinised and very soft; when dry it almost disappears. 1 he tissue 
bearing the basidia (perfect state) is yellow, when orange there is a 
predominance of asexually produced spores called arthrospores 
(conidia). 
1 ). deliquescens is only another name for the same fungus. There 
arc several species of Dacrymyces with which D. stillatus can be 
confused, but can only be separated with certainty by using a micro- 
scope. The Coral-spot fungus, frequently found in gardens, produces 
gelatinous, pink protuberances on wood especially that of sycamore, 
and may easily be mistaken for species of Dacrymyces. It consists 
entirely of asexually produced spores (conidia) of the Ascomycete 
Nectria cinnabarina. The perfect state appears late in the year as 
grouped, small, blood-red flask-shaped fruit-bodies containing 
envelopes of spores. It is quite unrelated to Dacrymyces. 

THE JELLY FUNGI 
8 
Calocera viscosa (Fries) Fries described earlier (p. 170) is closely 
related to Dacrymyces. The much smaller, and probably equally as 
common, Calocera cornea (Fries) Fries is simple, club-shaped and 
yellow, but darkens to become orange on drying. It grows up to 
10 mm high and occurs on all sorts of wood; it is especially common 
on wet beech trunks. It approaches Dacrymyces more than the 
much larger C. viscosa. 
Illustrations: D. deliquescens — LH 225; NB 149^; WD 107^®. 
C. cornea — WD 107®. 

i 82 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Hirneola auricula-judae (St Amans) Berkeley Jew’s ear 
Fruit-body: width 20-75 mm. 
Description : 
Fruit-body; cup or ear-shaped, red-brown or deep wine-colour, 
gelatinous with its upper surface, velvety and clothed in greyish 
or olivaceous hairs. 
Spore-bearing layer: reddish or purplish brown, smooth or veined 
and translucent. 
Spore-print: white. 
Spores: very long, hyaline under the microscope, oblong, curved and 
narrowed towards their base, 16-18 X 6-8 pm in size. 
Cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distribution: On dead branches of all kinds and particularly 
common throughout the year on elder. 
General Information: Easily recognised by the wine-coloured, cup- 
shaped or ear-shaped fruit-body; it is often called Auricularia judae in 
many books. Its Latin name is reflected in the common name: — 
auricula ear and judae, of a jew. This fungus is supposed to be a 
reappearance, as a warning to us all, of Judas, who on betrayal of 
Christ hung himself from an elder tree. 
Auricularia mesenterica (S. F. Gray) Persoon, ‘Tripe-fungus’, is 
bracket-shaped with a hairy upper surface and reddish purple or 
deep purple lower surface which when fresh has a greyish bloom 
due to the formation of the spores. 
There are several fungi in the group Auriculariales in Britain, but 
many of them are inconspicuous and are identified with difficulty 
except by the expert. Sebacina incrustans (Fries) Tulasne is a common 
more obvious example of the resupinate forms. It grows as a cream 
or ivory-coloured, soft fruit-body encrusting twigs, leaves, grass 
and soil. 
Illustrations: LH 225; NB 149^; WD 107b 

r 
Plate 60. Jelly fungi 
8 
r 
1 
t 
>' 
1 
8 
mm 
give secondary ‘spores’ 

184 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
I 
Exidia glandiilosa (St Amans) Fries Witch’s butter 
Fruit-body : width 15-50 mm. 
Description : 
Fruit-body: sessile or shortly stalked, blackish, variable in shape, 
rounded, flattened, disc-shaped or convolute, gelatinous with its 
under surface tomentose and free from the substrate. 
Fruiting surface: upper most, wavy and folded, and with numerous 
wart-like projections. 
Spore-print: white. 
Spores: long, hyaline, cylindrical, sausage-shaped and 12-15 X 5 pm 
in size. 
Cystidia: absent. 
Habitat & Distribution: Frequent in crowded groups on stumps, logs 
and fallen branches of broad-leaved trees, especially those of ash; 
common throughout the year. 
General Information : Tremella fohacea (S. F. Gray )Persoon and 
Tremella mesenterica Hooker are similar but more convoluted 
with leaf-like lobes. The former is cinnamon brown and occurs on 
conifer wood and its spores are 7-9 X 5^7 whilst the latter is 
bright golden yellow or orange-yellow and occurs on broad-leaved 
trees. T. mesenterica has spores 7-8 X 5 “^ often accompanied 
or replaced by small, asexually produced spores. 
Glandulosa— means full of glands and refers to the glands of the 
upper surface of the Witch’s butter. 
The convoluted fruit-body of the Tremella spp. is reflected in the 
word foliacea — leafy, and mesenterica — middle intestine. The last 
species is also often called the ‘\ellow brain-fungus . 
Illustrations: Exidia glandulosa — LFI 225; NB i 49^1 WD 107^. 
Tremella mesenterica — LH 225; NB 149^; WD 107®. 

Plate 61. Jelly fungi 
Chain of asexual 'spores’ 
of 
Two adult fruit-bodies of Exidia glandulosa 

i86 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
SU 
mi 
D. 
THE STOMACH FUNGI 
m' 
The Gasteromycetes are a complex mixture of higher fungi united in 
virtue of their spores being enclosed in a fruit-body and not forcibly 
ejected from the basidium; the group includes the puff-balls and their 
relatives. 
5 tl 
m 
ar 
V 
te 
ai 
Key to some groups 
1. Fruit-body growing beneath the surface of the soil (hypogeous) 
False truffles (including Hymenogaster, Rhizopogon) 
Fruit-body not growing beneath the soil-surface . . . . 2 G 
2. Spores in a slimy mass on a specialised fruit-body arising from f 
an egg-like structure . . Stinkhorns {Phallus & Mutifius) 
Spores powdery at maturity or in small capsules . . . . 3 fi 
3. Spores powdery at maturity and contained within the fruit- A 
body . . . . . . . . . . . . . . • • 4 ? 
Spores enclosed in a small capsule or group of capsules in a t: 
cup-like structure, resembling the eggs within the nest of a 1 
bird . . . . Bird’s nest fungi (including Crucibulum & Cyathus) a 
4. Spores intermixed with threads within the fruit-body from 
which they are dispersed through a specialised pore at its apex 
Puff-balls and Earth-stars {Lycoperdon & Geastrum) 
Spores not mixed with threads within the fruit-body and not 
dispersed through special structure but through cracks as the 
fruit-body weathers . . . . Earth-Balls {Scleroderma) 
The Gasteromycetes is an unnatural group of predominantly sapro- 
phytic higher fungi many of which are extremely grotesque and strange 
in their morphology. Instead of the spores being formed asymmetrically 
on the basidium as is found in the agarics, the spores of members of this 
group are usually more or less symmetrically attached to their sterig- 
mata or may even be seated directly (sessile) on the basidium. The 
whole group, even if unnatural, can, however, be regarded under one 
heading as a biological unit. Until something better is suggested and 

THE STOMACH FUNGI 
87 
supported by evidence the existence of this group is very convenient. 
Usually the basidia project into cavities within the fruit-body in 
which the spores themselves are released as the fruit-body gradually 
matures — hence the name Gastero-mycetes: ‘stomach-fungi’. In a few 
more advanced forms, the puff-balls of temperate countries, for in- 
stance, the spores escape from these cavities through a pore or pores 
in the outer wall of the fruit-body, and in the stinkhorns the spores 
are exposed as a sticky mass because the smell of the material in 
which they are held is attractive to flies. In forms which have sub- 
terranean (or hypogeous p. 243) fruit-bodies there is no special opening 
and here the spores are dispersed by insects and small mammals. 
In the bird’s nest fungi the spores are enclosed in separate packets 
within a saucer or cup-like open structure. 
Recently it has been shown by examination of the microscopic 
structure of the fruit-bodies and spores that certain genera of the 
Gasteromycetes are more closely related to the agarics than many of 
them are between themselves. 
It is believed that some of the Gasteromycetes may have evolved 
from more familiar fungi by adaptation to arid or semi-arid conditions. 
Although this is not true for all the Gasteromycetes within this one 
group of fungi, a whole series of methods of overcoming the disadvan- 
tages connected with non-violent disposal of spores has evolved. 
These methods include both changes in structure and ecology; only 
a few have evolved a mycorrhizal relationship with higher plants. 

i88 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Lycoperdon pyriforme Pcrsoon Stump puff-ball 
Fruit-body : width 20-50 mm; height 40-75 mm. 
Description : 
Fruit-body: more or less pear-shaped, pale brownish often with a 
slight hump on the top, scurfy on the outside with tiny pointed 
gramdes which soon fall off or become rubbed oft' by abrasion, 
particularly after careless handling. 
Stem: consisting of rather small ceHs and connected at the base by 
long, white, branched cords of mycelium which permeate the 
substrate. 
Spore-mass: white at first then greenish yellow and finally olive-brown 
and formed around a sterile column. 
Spores: small, olive, minutely warted but appearing smooth under the 
student microscope; 4 um in diameter and intermixed with long, 
olive coloured, branched hyphal threads 4-5 p.m broad and of 
irregular wall thickness. 
Habitat 5 c Distribution : This puff-ball grows in huge clusters on stumps 
and logs, or can be traced to buried pieces of wood; it occurs from 
summer to late autumn. 
General Information: There are several species of Lycoperdon in this 
country, some quite small and several rather infrequent. L. pyriforme 
is the only one which grows on wood; ‘pyriforme’ means pear- 
shaped and is derived from the shape of the fruit-body. 
L. pevlatum Pcrsoon is also a common puff-ball; it is pestle-shaped 
or top-shaped, whitish or tan with minutely roughened, globose 
spores measuring 4 am in diameter. The fruit-body is covered in a 
mixture of large and small, fragile spines which leave a network 
when rubbed off. It grows in woods and on heaths. 
L. foetidum Bonorden is similar to L. perlaturn, but the spines are 
umber or vandyke-brown ; it also grows both in woods and upland 
pastures, particularly the latter. 
Illustrations : L. pyriforme — Hvass 316; LH 219; NB 155^; WD 109^. 
L. perlatum — Hvass 315; LH 217; NB 155'^; WD iio“. 

Plate 62. Puff-balls 
1-3 Dispersal of spores 
Falling raindrop depresses outer surface 
and pushes out a cloud of spores 

90 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Langermannia gigantea (Persoon) Rostkovius Giant puff-ball 
Fruit-body: diameter 300-450 mm (-1,050 mm). 
Description : 
Fruit-bodv: round or slightly flattened on the top, smooth or cracked 
into small scales, white but becoming flushed yellowish with age 
and finally olive-brown when old, frequently the outer layer dries 
and breaks away to expose the powdery spore-mass within. 
Stem: absent or only present as a small cone of tissue. 
Spore-mass: whitish, cream-coloured and finally olive-brown. 
Spores: small, brownish, minutely warted and spherical, 4-5 pm in 
diameter and intermixed with thick-walled, branched, brown 
hyphae, 3-5 pm broad. 
Habitat & Distribution : On the ground in copses, at the edges of woods, 
under hedges or on refuse tips, and sometimes in gardens. It may 
appear in the same place year after year, and has been recorded 
growing beneath the rafters in houses. 
General Information : When young it is white inside or cream-coloured 
before the spores have developed and can then be cut into slices 
and cooked. I have seen it on sale in markets in X. America and it 
is collected for food by many in Europe. Its pumpkin-shape with a 
circumference of anything up to 1,050 mm makes this fungus easily 
recognisable. The number of spores produced by a fruit-body 
measuring 400 X 280 mm has been calculated by A. H. R. Buller as 
7,000,000,000,000 spores! 
Calvatia utriformis (Fries) Jaap (= C. caelata (Persoon) Morgan) 
has a goblet-like shape and a distinct, sterile base composed of large 
cells with a prominent membrane separating them from the spore- 
mass; the spores are 4-5 pm diameter, smooth and spherical. 
C. excipuliformis (Fries) Perdeck (= C. saccata (Vahl.) Morgan) is 
pestle-shaped with a well developed stem. The spore-mass is com- 
posed of warted, globose spores, 4-5 pm in diameter. 
Bovista nigrcscens Persoon is very similar in shape to the Giant 
puff-ball, but is very much smaller; it lacks a stalk, being attached 
to the substrate only bv mycelial eords. It eommences white, but 
then darkens to become purplish brown at maturity when it also 
breaks from its moorings and rolls about in the wind. 
The last three species are found on heaths, in pastures or on the 
ground in woods. 
Illustrations: ('. gigantea — Ilvass 312; LH 217; XB 371; WD 109'^. 
B. nigrescens—}r\y?^s^ 31 1 ; LH 219; XB 37-^ 
I 

^ Oq 
Plate 63 Puff-Balls 
100 mm 
r 
40 mm 
Calvatia excipuliformis 

192 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Earth-stars and Earth-balls 
The earth-stars, i.e. species of Geastruni, are closely related to the 
puff-balls, but differ in having two very distinct and separate enclosing 
walls, the outer one splitting at maturity to expose a ‘puff'-ball’ within; 
an example of the genus is G. triplex Jungh, found in parks or under 
beech trees or G. rufescens Pers. (illustrated) in mixed woodland. The 
outer skin splits in different ways in different species; in some it splits 
like a star — hence the common name of Earth-star, in some the spore- 
mass is raised as if on stilts. There are several species of Geastrimi 
recorded for Britain, but they are decidedly uncommon. 
The Earth-balls are, however, far from uncommon and may be 
met with from earlv summer until late autumn in any wood parti- 
cularlv those on sandv soils. They are unrelated to the earth-stars. 
Earth-balls 
Sclevoderma citnnum Persoon Common earth-ball 
Fruit-bodx : diameter 25-75 mm. 
Description : 
Pruit-body: rounded or ffattened on top, sometimes lobed, very ffrm, 
yellow or clav colour, scaly, thick, white within or pinkish, if cut 
when immature, and then purplish black as the spores mature. 
Stem: absent or reduced to a small group of mycelial cords. 
Spore-mass: purplish black. 
Spores: medium to large, dark brown, 8-13 am in diameter and covered 
with a delicate network. 
Habitat & Distribution: On the ground in woods or on heaths. 
General Injormation : This fungus is found in many books under the 
name of S. aurantiiim. S. verrucosum Persoon is closely related, but 
has a stem-like rooting base and an umber brown spore-mass. The 
spores are also slightly different; they are 10-14 pm in diameter 
and ornamented with spines and ridges. 
The earth-balls appear to have characters in common with the 
false truffles, indeed sometimes they grow partially buried in the 
sandy soil of woods. Like the false truffles they have been used to 
adulterate pate as a cheap substitute for true truffles (see p. 244). 
It is not wise, however, to eat earth-balls as there arc cases of 
poisoning known. Although truffle-like, they should be avoided 
except under the guidance of an expert, as with agarics. 
Illustrations: Geastruni triplex — Ilvass 307; LH 221; XB 155^- 
Scleroderma citrinum — I lvass 320; LI I 223; XB 155’’’; D iii^. 

Plate 64. Earth-balls and Earth-stars 
All fruit-bodies at same magnification 
Boletus parasiticus 
on Scleroderma 
citrinum 
Geastrum rufescens 

194 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Stinkhorns 
Phallus impudicus Persoon Common stinkhorn 
Fruit-body: Egg: 30-60 mm in diameter — then Cap: 25-40 mm and 
Stem: width 18-25 length 100- 150 mm. 
Description : 
Fruit-body: commencing as a white, silky egg-like structure full of 
jelly in which is embedded a conical cap attached only at its apex 
to a cylindrical white, spongy, hollow stem. 
Cap : covered in a slimy mass of dark olive-coloured spores at maturity. 
Stem: cylindrical, rapidly elongating, white, spongy and hollow. 
Spore-mass : dark olive-green, smelling strongly, foetid. 
Spores: small, pale olive, oblong and 3-5 X 2 pm in size. 
Habitat & Distribution: Common from summer to autumn on the 
ground in woods and in gardens. 
General Information: Easily recognised by its shape and evil smell 
which can be detected at some distance. The unburst eggs are 
called ‘witches eggs’. Under favourable conditions the egg bursts 
and the stem elongates carrying the cap and spore-mass with it. 
The spore-mass is attractive to flies and they feed upon it; spores 
stick to their feet and so are transported from one place to another. 
The very similar P. hadriani Persoon is frequently found in sand- 
dunes; it differs in having a filaceous colour to the egg. An interesting 
variety of the common stinkhorn is uncommonly found and differs 
in having a skirt-like frill beneath the cap. The jelly in the egg is 
a water-store and is used by the fungus to expand rapidly. 
Mutinus caninus (Persoon) Fries, the ‘Dog’s stinkhorn’, is found 
around old stumps or on piles of leaves. It has the spore-mass cover- 
ing an orange-red pear-shaped cap which is itself fused to the stem. 
The stinkhorns and their allies appear to be commoner in warmer 
countries where they take on many bizarre shapes. Other than the 
three species noted above stinkhorns are rarely found in this country, 
but when they are it would appear they have been introduced with 
foreign imports such as timber, ornamental plants, vegetables etc. 
Eggs of phalloids brought into the laboratory can be surrounded 
by wet tissues or blotting paper and then allowed to develop further 
in a dish or box. Provided the skin covering the spores is not broken 
or injured the fungus will not smell and therefore before it becomes 
unpleasant, the whole mechanism of expansion can be studied. 
Illustrations: Hvass 323; LH 215; NB 153^; WD io8h 

Plate 65. Stinkhorns 
Egg of Phallus impudicus 
Section of egg of 
Phallus impudicus 
Adult fruit-body of 
Mutinus caninus 

I 
196 IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
I ' 
Bird’s nest fungi 
Crucibulum laeve (de Candolle) Kambly 
Fruit-body : diameter 8-12 mm. 
Description : 
Fruit-body: ochraceous brown or sand-colour, downy and then smooth, 
truncate, cup-shaped with the cup at first closed by a yellowish 
membrane which finally splits to expose a group of pale brown or 
dingy whitish, circular, lens-shaped ‘eggs’ (peridioles), scattered on 
a shiny pale ochraceous interior. 
Spores: medium-sized, in packets within ‘eggs’, ellipsoid, hyaline, 
smooth and 8-10 X 4-6 um in size. 
Habitat Sc Distribution : Common in crowded groups on dead twigs, 
fern stems, straw and wheat stubble. 
General Information : Cyathus differs from Crucibulum in the more 
complex fruit-body which consists of three layers, and the peri- 
dioles forming on distinct stalks. Two species are frequently seen: 
Cyathus striatus Persoon has a grey, fluted inner surface to the cup 
and strongly hairy red-brown outer surface; the spores measure 
16-22 X 9-10 pm. Cyathus olla Persoon has a smooth, shiny, grey 
surface and minutely silky, yellowish grey outer surface. C. striatus 
is found on twigs, and about dead stumps; C. olla is more frequent 
in gardens on herbaceous debris and dead pieces of perennial 
flowers — or even in plant pots. 
Sphaevobolus stellatiis Persoon is more distantly related and grows 
on decaying leaves, bracken fronds, partially buried twigs and dung. 
It is an intriguing fungus because it possesses a remarkable spore- 
dispersal mechanism. The inner layer of the fruit-body when ripe 
suddenly turns inside out catapulting the inner spore-mass to 
distances of anything up to 4,200 mm, that is a distance of 1,000 
times the size of the fruit-body. The fruit-body is externally whitish 
or pale yellow, but this layer splits into lobes like a stai exposing 
the bright orange inner surface and pale spore-mass. 
Illustrations: Crucibulum laeve — LH 223; WD iiC. Cyathus striatus — 
LH 223; WD III®. Sphaerobolus stellatus — LH 223; WD iii^. 
ii 
i 1 
% 
\ 

Plate 66. Bird’s nest fungi 
Microscopic structures at various magnifications 
10 urn 

198 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
E. CUP FUNGI AND ALLIES 
General Notes. 1 
The Ascomycetes differ from all the other fungi so far dealt with in • 
that the spores develop enclosed in a microscopic envelope or sac — 
called the ascus. Usually eight spores are produced in each ascus and 
they are often dispersed violently into the air. Elf-cups and morels are 
typical Ascomycetes, but the group also includes innumerable minute 
forms of the microscopic fungi, small discs, minute flask-like structures, 
some of which are parasitic on leaves and stems of higher plants. In 
number the large species of Ascomycetes are few when compared 
with the others and therefore can only be given but a mention in the 
present account. When collected the Ascomycetes can be distinguished 
from the Basidiomycetes by simply examining a slice of the spore- 
producing tissue where the tell-tale asci will be seen (see p. 21). 
If the fruit-body is placed in a tin when collected and opened in a 
warm room all the mature asci explode at once producing a cloud of 
spores visible in the air immediately over the fruit-body. 
Aleuria aurantia (Fries) Fuckel 
Orange-peel fungus or Scarlet elf-cup 
Fruit-body: diameter 25-50 mm. 
Description : 
Fruit-body: cup-shaped then undulating and becoming flattened, 
irregular, sometimes split and lacking a stem. 
Inner surface: bright orange. 
Outer surface: whitish and minutely downy. 
Flesh : thin and white. 
Spores: very long, ellipsoid, ornamented with a coarse network which 
projects at each end, and 17-24 X 9-1 1 [Lin in size; eight contained 
in an elongate, cylindric ascus. 
Habitat & Distribution : Common on bare soil in woods and open 
spaces, on road verges, between stone sets and on lawns. 

Plate 67. Cup-fungi 
Adult fruit-body of Aleuria aurantia 
Pexiza badia 

200 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
f 
Peziza repanda Persoon Elf-cup 
Fruit-body: diameter 20-50 mm. 
Description: Plate 67. 
Fruit-body: cup-shaped with white, crenulate margin, beeoming 
expanded and undulating, and lacking a stem. 
Inner surface: light chestnut brown. 
Outer surface: whitish or pale fawn and finely scurfy. ; 
Flesh: whitish or fawn, and appearing as if layered. 
Spores: very long, ellipsoid, smooth and X 9-10 am in size; 
eight contained in an elongate, cylindrical ascus. 
Habitat & Distribution: On bare soil in woods, farm-yards, hedgerows, 
etc. 
General Information: There are many different species of Peziza 
classified on the shape and ornamentation of the spores and colour of 
the fruit-body — see pp. 216 and 220. P. badia is darker, although 
similar in other ways; it is found on pathsides in woods and has 
roughened spores. 
Morchella esculenta St Amans Common morel 
Cap: width 30-40 mm; length 35-60 mm. Stem: width 15-25 mm; < 
length 50-80 mm. 
Description : 
Fruit-body: consisting of a head with a honeycomb-like arrangement 
of narrow ridges surrounding angular and often slightly elongated, 
shallow pits, on a cylindric or swollen stem. 
Cap : brownish grey then reddish brown or ochraceous brown. 
Stem: cylindrical or slightly enlarged at the base, brittle, hollow, 
minutely scurfy and/or furrowed. , 
Flesh: ochraceous. 
Spore-print: cream. 
Spores: very long, broadly ellipsoid, pale honey, smooth but for some 
small granules at each end, and 16-23 X 11-14 pm in size; eight 
contained in an elongate cylindrical ascus. 
Habitat & Distribution: Infrequent in gardens, on river-banks, sites 
of bonfires, etc., in spring. 
Illustrations : Fy^^; LH 41; NB 41^. ' 

Plate 68. Morels and related fungi 
All fruit-bodies at same magnification 
Gyromitra esculenta 

202 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Gyromitm esculenta (Persoon) Fries Turban-fungus 
Cap: width 30-40 mm; length 35-45 mm. Stem: width 15-25 mm; 
length 50-80 mm. 
Description: Plate 68. 
Fruit-body: consisting of a subglobose, more ‘or less lobed, wrinkled 
and convoluted head on a short stem. 
Cap: yellow-brown to reddish brown and becoming hollow or cham- 
bered. 
Stem: flesh-coloured or creamy grey and powdery. 
Flesh: yellow-buff, darker in the cap. 
Spores: very long, ellipsoid, usually containing two or more yellowish 
oil drops and 18-22 X 9-12 pm in size; eight contained in an elon- 
gate cylindrical ascus. 
Habitat & Distribution: This fungus is found in the spring, under 
conifers, but also on railway embankments, river banks, etc. This 
fungus is also known as the ‘Lorel’ or ‘Elephant’s ears’. 
General Information: Mitromorpha semilibera (Fries) Leveille differs 
from species of Morchella in that the head is for its greater length 
free from the stalk. It is frequently found in the spring in gardens, 
tennis courts, etc. 
i-:': 
!' 
1 /i 
Illustrations: G. esculenta — F 6^^; Hvass 327; LH 39. 
Helvella crispa Fries Common white helvella j?l 
Cap: width 18-28 mm. Stem: width 8-12 mm; length 40-65 mm. f; 
Description: i D, 
Fruit-body: consisting of a saddle-shaped cap on a short stem. F- 
Cap: convoluted towards the centre, two lobed, wavy at the margin, 
white or cream-coloured. ’ 
Stem: cylindric and hollow, white or cream-coloured and unevenly ^ 
and deeply longitudinally furrowed. j 
Flesh: thin and pale. i ] 
Spores: very long, broadly ellipsoid, with a large central oil drop 
and 18-20 X 10-13 size; eight contained in an elongate 
cylindrical ascus. | 
Habitat & Distribution: Frequent in damp woods with deciduous 
trees, from early summer until autumn. J 

CUP FUNGI AND ALLIES 
203 
General biformation: Plate 68. 
Helvella laciinosa Fries, ‘Slate grey Helvella’ is similar in stature but 
differs in being ash-grey or dark grey. 
Leptopodia elastica (St Amans) Boudier is better placed in the 
genus Helvella. It differs in having a slender, smooth, cylindric 
stem and irregularly 2—3 lobed, yellow or tan-coloured cap. 
Cyathipodia macvopus (Fries) Dennis is sometimes placed in Helvella. 
It differs in having a grey cup-shaped cap on a long, slender stem. 
The spore-bearing tissue in the last species is the inner surface of 
the cup whilst in Helvella and Leptopodia it is on the outer surface 
of the saddle-like cap. 
Mitnila paludosa Fries, the ‘Bog beacon’, is a similar fungus growing 
in spring to early autumn on old leaves and detritus in swamps. 
It is widespread and has a bright orange head on a white stem 
as the common name might suggest. It grows to a height of about 
20 mm. 
Illustrations: H. crispa^Y 6"; Hvass 331; LH 41. H. lacunosa—¥ 6^ 
Hvass 330; LH 39; XB 153b L. elastica— 332; LH 39. 
C. macropus — F 6^; LH 39. 
Rhizina undulata fungus 
Fruit-body: width 20-60 mm, or several coalescing. 
Description: Plate 69. 
Fruit-body: chestnut-brown to rust colour with a distinct white or 
cream margin, fleshy, smooth, concave and thrown up into irregular 
humps. 
Stem: lacking, but undersurface pale, ochraceous, and bearing numer- 
ous cylindrical branched, whitish root-like structures, 1-2 mm thick. 
Flesh: reddish brown, tough and flbrous. 
Spores : very, very long, spindle-shaped with two or more internal 
droplets, with hyaline extensions at each end, and 22-40 X 8-1 1 pm 
in size; eight contained in an elongate cylindrical ascus. 
Habitat & Distribution: Infrequent in pine woods but common at 
the sites of bonflres in pine woodlands. 

204 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Daldinia concentnca (Fries) Cesati & de Notaris Cramp-balls 
Fruit -body: diameter 20-40 mm X 20-60 mm. 
Description : 
Fruit-body: date-brown at first finally black or dark brownish black, 
tough, minutely pimply over entire surface although at first covered 
in a powdery dust of asexual spores (conidia). 
Stem: lacking. 
Flesh: pale grey or buff, concentrically zoned with darker purplish 
black layers below which are small, black dots. 
Spores: very long, black, ellipsoid with one flattened side and 12-17 X 
6-9 pm in size; eight contained in an elongate cylindrical ascus. 
Habitat & Distribution: Common on old deciduous wood, particularly 
of ash and beech. 
General Information: These two fungi are unrelated; the first is related 
to the disc-fungi, like species of Peziza, whilst Daldinia is related ^ 
to the Dead man’s finger fungus. Rhizina undulata has been shown to ' 
be able to attack roots of pine or larch trees and cause death. Dal- 
dinia is a pure saprophyte rotting down wood into more simple 
compounds later to be incorporated into the soil-system. The common 
name ‘Cramp-balls’ refers to the old belief that if one of the fruit- 
bodies is carried in the pocket it saves the possessor from cramp 
and rheumatism. The other common name for the same fungus is 
‘King Alfred’s cakes’. The black colour of the fruit-body is like that 
of charred cakes — resembling the cakes in the legend which King 
Alfred allowed to burn. 
Illustrations: R. undulata — LH 37; NB iii®. D. concentrica — F 
LH 47; NB 147b 
2: 
Xylosphaera polyniorpha (Merat) Dumortier Dead man’s fingers 
Fruit-body : width 10-20 mm; length 30-60 mm. 
Description : 
Fruit-body: more or less club-shaped, irregidarlv or evenly lobed at 
apex, at first light brown due to development of ascxually produced 
spores (conidia) but finally almost black. 
Stem: black and short. 
Flesh: white, fibrous and tough. 

Plate 69. Cup-fungi allies 
20 
Xylosphaera hypoxylon 
20 mm 
Xylosphaera polymorpha 
20 (im 
Cordyceps capitata 

2o6 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Crust: black, thin, pimply with the protruding tips of the perithecia, 
and sometimes irregularly furrowed. 
Spores: very long, fusiform with one flattened side, black and 20-32 X 
5-9 [j.m in size; eight contained in an elongate cylindrical ascus. 
Habitat & Distribution : Common either solitary or in clusters on dead 
stumps or on buried wood, especially that of beech. This fungus 
may be found throughout the year. 
Xylosphaera hypoxylon Dumortier Stag’s horn fungus 
Fruit-body : width 4-8 mm; length 25-60 mm. 
Description : Plate 69. 
Fruit-body: slender, subcylindrical to strap-shaped and usually forked 
repeatedly near the tip, white at first due to production of conidia 
and then black or dark brown and covered in pimples. 
Stem: black and hairy. 
Spores: very long, bean-shaped, black and 11-14 X 5-6 [am in size; 
eight in an elongate ascus. 
General Information : Another name for X. hypoxylon is ‘Candle-snuff 
fungus’. Other club-shaped ascomycetes include members of the 
genus Geoglossum (already mentioned p. 172) and members of the 
genus Cordyceps. Plate 69. 
Coi'dyceps militaris (St Amans) Link, the ‘Scarlet caterpillar fungus’, 
produces orange-red or orange, minutely roughened fruit-bodies up 
to 50 mm high, which grow’^ on larvae and pupae of moths buried 
in the soil. It is not infrequent late in the autumn in pasture land. 
C. ophioglossoides (Fries) Link produces long (up to 100 mm high) 
yellow stemmed, dark and rough headed fruit-bodies growing on 
the subterranean fungus Elaphomyces — see p. 244. 
C. capitata (Fries) Link also grows on fungi beneath the soil surface 
but has a rounded head. Leotia lubrica Persoon the ‘Gum-drop 
fungus’ is similarly coloured but grows on soil under trees and is 
gelatinous. It grows in autumn and is quite common and in fact 
more related to the Discomycetes than to Cordyceps. 
Illustrations : X. polymorpha — F LH 47; NB 147®. X. hypoxylon — 
F 7^; LH 47; NB 147^. C. militaris — LH 48. 

207 
F. SPECIALISED HABITATS 
Fungi of dung and straw heaps 
Bolbitius vitellinus (Fries) Fries Yellow cow-pat toadstool 
Cap: width 20-40 mm. Stem: width 2-5 mm; length 30-60 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: chrome-yellow or lemon-yellow when young, paling with age 
at margin to become cinnamon-buff, bell-shaped but rapidly ex- 
panding to become plane or slightly umbonate, smooth, viscid but 
soon drying; margin striate then radially grooved, often split and 
the whole cap soon collapsing. 
Stem: slender, whitish, cream colour to pale yellow, at apex covered 
in small, white ffoccose scales but downy at the base, fragile and 
soon collapsing. 
Gills: adnexed or free, cinnamon-buff, thin and crowded. 
Flesh: yellowish, very thin and lacking distinct smell. 
Spore print: rust-brown. 
Spores: long, yellow-brown under the microscope, ellipsoid with a 
very distinct germ-pore about 13 X 8 pm in size (11-15 X 6-9 pm). 
Facial cystidia: rare, balloon-shaped. 
Marginal cystidia: swollen, flask-shaped with a variable, elongate neck. 
General Information: This fungus is common on horse droppings or 
other manures, but it may also be found amongst grass in pastures 
and in sand-dunes, and gardens on piles of rotting grass stems or 
straw. It is easily recognised by the colour and rapid expansion of 
the cap and the sudden collapse of the whole fruit-body. ‘Vitellinus 
means yolk of an egg and refers to the persistently bright yellow 
cap-centre, so obvious even when the fruit-body collapses. This 
collapsing is not one of autodigestion as described for members 
of the genus Coprinns. It is variable both in size and habitat, and I 
even have records of the fungus growing within herbaceous stems. 
Illustrations: LH 153; WD 80^. 

2o8 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Stvopharia semiglobata (Fries) Quelet Dung-roundhead ( 
Cap: width 10-35 Stern: width 4-7 mm; length 25-50 mm. 
Description: | 
Cap: hemispherical or slightly umbonate, sometimes flattened and I 
hardly expanding even with age, very viscid, smooth, pale yellow- I 
ochre or yellowish tan. I 
Stem: slender, straight, white then yellowish, smooth, viscid, but then ' 
dry and shiny below an imperfectly formed, thin ring. [ 
Gills: adnate, almost triangular in shape, crowded, dark brown to 
purplish black, but with ochraceous areas at maturity. {5 
Flesh: pale ochre. 
Spore-print: purplish brown. ' 
Spores: very long, dark brown under the microscope, smooth, ellipsoid 
with large germ-pore and about 18 X 10 pm in size (17-20 X 9-10 
pm). 
Facial cystidia: spindle-shaped, thin-walled and filled with amorphous 
contents which become yellow in solutions containing ammonia. / 
Marginal cystidia: spindle-shaped or flask-shaped, numerous, thin- I 
walled and typically yellowing as above. 
General Information : ‘Semiglobata’ means hemispherical and refers to 
the shape of the cap of S. semiglobata; it is a very variable fungus 
in both size of the cap and the prominence of the ring. The Dung- 
roundhead grows only on dung which is acidic in its soil status, 
whilst Panaeolus semiovatus (Fries) Lundell next described (p. 210) 
grows on slightly to distinctly base-rich dung. This may explain ^ 
why in Britain the Dung-roundhead is the commoner of the two I 
species. HowTver, P. semiovatus was formerly placed in the genus 1 
Stropharia because of its blackish spores and distinct ring. The ! 
spores of Stropharia in the mass are violaceous black whilst those of 1 
P. semiovatus are brownish black. Under the microscope they are I 
also differently coloured and have different chemical compositions 1 
as their reaction with dilute solutions of ammonia shows; the spores 
of the first species turn purplish olive in ammonia and those of the j. 
second species become very dark browm. | 
Illustrations: F 33^’; Hvass 171; LH 153; NB 3U; WD 75^. 

dh( 
Plate 70. Dung-fungi 
Bolbitius vitellinus 
Stropharia semiglobata 
C Panaeolus semiovatus 

210 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Mottle-gills — on dung from Spring until Autumn. 
Panaeolus semiovatus (Fries) Lundell 
Cap: width 20-70 mm. Stem: width 5-10 mm", length 80-160 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: oval or bell-shaped, not expanding, dingy whitish or pale clay 
colour, smooth, slimy when moist, but soon drying and then becoming 
shiny, often wrinkled and cracked, and ornamented with fragments 
of veil at the margin. 
Stem: dull, straight, rather rigid, tapering upwards, white, and striate 
at apex above a whitish erect and membranous, often collapsing, ring; 
yellowish below the ring and whitish and cottony at the slightly 
swollen base. 
Gills: adnate, greyish then black, mottled and crowded. 
Flesh: whitish or pale ochre. 
Spore-print: black. 
Spores: very long, very dark brown under the microscope with large 
obvious germ-pore and 18 X 10 pm (16-20 X 9-1 1 pm) in size. 
Facial cystidia: flask-shaped and with amorphous contents. 
Marginal cystidia: numerous, flask-shaped. 
Panaeolus sphinctrinus (Fries) Quelet 
Cap: width 15-35 Stem: width 3-6 mm; length 60-95 
Description : 
Cap: bell-shaped, hardly expanding, expallent, dark grey to olivaceous 
black, much paler when dry and zoned when half dry; margin 
ornamented with a white fringe of veil fragments. 
Stem: long, slender, straight, rather rigid but fragile, grey and com- 
pletely powdered with white. 
Gills: adnate, crowded and grey then blackened, mottled throughout 
except at the white fringed edge. 
Flesh: reddish brown. 
Spore-print: black. 
Spores: long, very dark brown under the microscope, broadly lemon- 
shaped with large germ-pore, smooth and 14-15 X 9-10 pm in size 
(14-19 X 8-10 X 10-12 pm). 
Facial cystidia: absent. 
Marginal cystidia: numerous, cylindrical, flexuous and hyaline. 
General Injormation : P. sphinctrinus is recognised by the overall grey 
colouration and very distinct white fringe to the cap-margin. 
P. campanulatus (Fries) Quelet whieh is said to be common is in 

SPECIALISED HABITAT 
2II 
fact infrequent and many records really refer to P. sphinctrinus. 
The word semiovatus means half ovate and refers to the shape of 
the cap in P. semiovatus. Sphinctrinus means banded, referring to 
the zoned cap of the fungus when it is partially dry. 
Illustrations: P. semiovatus — LH 145; WD 77^. P. sphinctrinus — 
NB 41^; WD 78b 
Coprinus cinereus (Fries) S. F. Gray Dung-heap ink-cap 
Cap: width 20-40 mm. Stem: width 4-8 mm; length 50-100 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: oval then rapidly expanding, covered at first in a mass of dense, 
white or greyish woolly scales which break up into patches and 
finally leave the cap shiny, brownish grey at centre and striate and 
dark grey at the margin. 
Stem: white, covered particularly towards the base with white, woolly 
scales, long, fragile, tapering upwards and at the base often elongated 
into a ‘tap root’ buried in the dung. 
Gills: free, white but then rapidly dissolving into a black liquid. 
Flesh: thin and whitish. 
Spore-print: violaceous black. 
Spores: medium sized, ellipsoid, smooth with a distinct germ-pore 
and 10-12 X 5-6 pm in size. 
Facial cystidia: absent. 
Marginal cystidia: inflated and large. 
General Information : It is found on manure heaps, on straw dung and 
on silage heaps: very common throughout the year. 
C. macrocephalus (Berkeley) Berkeley is very closely related to C. 
cinereus, but differs in having much larger spores over 12-15 X 7-9 
pm, a long cap and a stem which lacks a rooting base. 
Coprinus radiatus (Fries) S. F. Gray is smaller in stature and also 
differs in spore-size (11-14 X 6-7 pm). C. pseudoradiatus Kiihner & 
Josserand is minute and has even smaller spores (7-9 X 4-5 pm). 
The dung-heap ink-cap has long been used by scientists in genetic 
studies, usually under the name of C. lagopus (Fries) Fries. However, 
this latter species, although similar, grows only on woodland detritus; 
it has narrower spores. The dung-heap ink-cap may be referred to in 
other books as C. fimetarius Fries or C. macrorhizus (Fries) Rea and 
whilst cinereus means grey referring to the colour, fimetarius means 
dung — from the habitat, and macrorhizus refers to the long rooting 
base found in some specimens. 
Illustrations: LH 137; NB 41^®; WD 81^. 

212 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
The genus Coprinus — or Ink-caps 
The genus Coprinus is easily recognised from all other agarics by the 
structure and development of the fruit-body. In the field, most species 
of the genus can be recognised by the gradual conversion of the gills, 
and often the cap tissue into a black liquid resembling ink — hence the 
name inky-caps. The conversion of the gills to an inky mass is called 
autodigestion and the process is complete within a few hours; this 
mechanism enables spores to be dispersed immediately they have 
ripened. Unlike other agarics the spores are not shot off into the spaces 
between the gills, but directly into the air. The gills are parallel-sided 
in Coprinus and not wedge-shaped as in more normal agarics, and in 
order to achieve spore dispersal the gills must disintegrate; Coprini 
are very specialised. 
Coprinus is a large genus with over seventy members in the British 
Isles, many of which are strictly dung-loving. It is impossible to give 
more than one example in full here, for although many of the large 
species can be recognised on sight the smaller ones require the aid of 
a microscope. The interested student must therefore refer to more 
advanced texts, but in order to demonstrate the diversity of the Coprini 
and how they are classified the following key to the sections of Coprinus 
will be found useful. 
1. Cap naked of any veil fragments, either smooth or covered in 
minute hairs . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2 
Cap covered when young by powdery or hairy veil, particles 
of which either may persist on the cap until maturity or may 
disappear quickly . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3 
2. Cap completely naked — group Nudi, e.g. C. miser (Karsten) 
Karsten 
Cap with hairs giving it a frosted appearance — group Setulosi, 
e.g. C. ephemerus (Fries) Fries, C. pellucidus Karsten and C. 
bisporus J. Lange 
3. Veil on the cap composed under the microscope of rounded 
cells giving the cap a floccose powdery appearance — group 
Vestiti, e.g. C. patouUardii Quelet, C. niveus (Fries) Fries and 
C. ephenieroides (Fries) Fries 
Veil on the cap composed under the microscope of elongate 
cells, either like thin-hairs or strings of sausages 
4 

Plate 71 . Dung-fungi — The genus Coprinus 
Microscopic characters variously magnified 
Smooth capped species 

214 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
4. Veil on the cap composed under the microscope of strings of 
sausage-shaped cells — group Lanatuli, e.g. C. cinereus, C. 
pseudoradiatus, C. radiatus (see p. 21 1) 
Veil on the cap composed under the microscope of thick- or 
thin-walled, flexuous or straight, filamentous, hardly inflated 
cells — group Impexi, e.g. C. filamentifer Kiihner, C. vermi- 
culifer Dennis. 
General notes on dung-loving fungi and their habitats 
Dung fungi are highly satisfactory for demonstrating the diversity 
and morphology of a group of related organisms within a single eco- 
logical system, as representatives of most of the major groups of fungi 
usually grow on dung after a period of incubation. Dung will always 
produce characteristic fungi whatever time of year it is collected. 
Dung is best incubated in a light place, for example on a window 
sill, in a warm room on layers of blotting paper or other absorbent 
material. For rabbit-pellets and samples of similar size petri-dishes 
are ideal, but for cow, horse and similar types of dung large covered 
dishes such as casseroles or sandwich containers are very good. Samples 
should not be kept in airtight containers for long periods of time as 
under such conditions animal life present rapidly breaks down the 
dung and induces anaerobic conditions. Instead larvae and earthworms 
should be excluded from the sample as they decompose the dung and 
inhibit fungal growth but their activity can be reduced, if causing a 
problem, by spraying the sample lightly with a proprietary fly-kill 
aerosol. 
By keeping the dung under constant observation during incubation 
a whole succession of fungi can be seen. Thus the first fungi to appear 
are the moulds which although numerous need a microscope for their 
identification. The moulds are followed by a series of Ascomycetes 
[Sporormia & Sordaria with flask-shaped fruit-bodies and lodophanus, 
Coprobia and Cheilymenia with disc-shaped fruit-bodies), which are 
best sought with the use of a powerful hand-lens or a stereoscopic 
binocular miscroscope when their full beauty will be revealed. However, 
because they need the aid of instruments even to see them they cannot 
be considered larger fungi. The fruit-bodies of the Basidiomycetes 
are readily seen with the naked eye, but a hand-lens is still very useful 

Plate 72. Dung-fungi: Cup fungi and allies 
Magnification various; Fruit-bodies as seen under a dissecting microscope; Microscopic 
characters under dry high power microscope 
scatigena 

2i6 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
for observing features of the cap and stem, particularly the veil charac- 
ters. The Basidiomycetes usually conclude the succession of fungi 
found on dung and soon after this state the dung is colonised by mosses 
and higher plants and later it is fully incorporated into the soil. 
Dung is a very useful substrate for studying succession. However, 
equally interesting results can be obtained from observing the fungi 
which appear on a stump, colonise a newly laid lawn, or indeed those 
growing on refuse such as a cast-out rug; microscopic and larger fungi 
are all to be found. 
If the dung cannot be incubated immediately it should be dried 
quickly, for most dung-fungi will survive such treatment and grow 
when the sample is remoistened. The blotting-paper on which the 
dung is placed should be kept moist throughout the incubation period. 
One large discomycete (up to 8o mm across) occurring on manure- 
heaps must, however, be mentioned, this is Peziza vesiculosa St Amans 
(see p. 200); the inner surface of this cup-fungus becomes detached 
from the flesh at maturity and forms blisters. 
(ii) Fungi of bonfire-sites 
Pholiota highlandensis (Peck) A. H. Smith Charcoal pholiota 
Cap: width 20-50 mm. Ste?n: width 4-8 mm; length 25-60 mm. 
Description : Plate 73. 
Cap: convex then flattened and slightly umbonate, smooth, very 
sticky at first, but becoming shiny when drv, orange-yellow to sand- 
colour; the margin is first incurved and ornamented with filaments 
from the veil, but these are soon lost. 
Stem: dirty yellow, darker towards the base, cylindric or narrowed 
downwards and covered in small fibrillose scales. 
Gills: clay-coloured then dull brown, adnate and crowded. 
Flesh : yellowish. 
Spore-print: dull rust-brown. 
Spores: medium-sized, ellipsoid, smooth, dull brown under the micro- 
scope and 7-8 N 3-4 [^m in size. 
Facial cystidia: sjnndle-shaped with obtuse apex. 
Marginal cystidia: similar to facial cystidia but usuallv smaller. 
General Injonnation : This fungus which occurs from spring to autumn 
is recognised by the habitat, colour of the fruit-body and the spore- 

SPECIALISED HABITAT 
217 
size. It is known in many books as Flammula carboiiaria (Fries) 
Kummer, but the genus Flammula is no longer used for it refers to a 
flowering plant in the buttercup family. 
P. highlandensis is the same fungus as that referred to as Pliohota 
carbonaria by European Mycologists, but this name cannot be used 
for it refers to an entirely different N. American species. ‘High- 
landensis’, in fact, refers to the locality where the present fungus was 
first found in the United States of America. The true P. carbonaria 
A. H. Smith has only been found once in Europe and this only 
recently in the south of England. It differs in the reddish orange 
scales on the stem; indeed it is a much brighter fungus than the 
common charcoal Pholiota. 
Tephrocyhe anthracophila (Lasch) P. D. Orton 
Cap: width 1-4 mm. Stem: width i mm; length 2-5 mm. 
Description : Plate 73. 
Cap: blackish when wet, drying sooty brown, slightly depressed in 
the centre, smooth, and viscid. 
Stem: sooty brown, tough and smooth. 
Flesh: sooty brown. 
Gills: whitish then grey, adnate and not very crowded. 
Spores: medium sized, subglobose, 4-6 X 4-5 diameter and 
minutely roughened. 
Spore-print: white, not blueing in solutions of iodine. 
General Information: T. atrata also grows on burnt soil and is very 
closely related, but differs in its spores being broadly ellipsoid and 
smooth. Mycena leucogala also grows on burnt soil (see p. 88). 
Illustrations : T. anthracophila — LH 83. T. atrata — WD 4^. 

2i8 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Psathyrella pennata (Fries) Pearson & Dennis Bonfire brittle-cap 
Cap: width 10-30 mm. Stem: width 1-3 mm; length 30-40 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: conical or bell-shaped then expanding and slightly umbonate, 
whitish because of a coating of dense fibrils, but soon becoming 
brownish as these are lost. 
Stem: short, stout, white and densely floccose. 
Gills: slightly adnate, pale brownish grey with pink tinge, then dark- 
brown. 
Spore-print: purplish brown. 
Spores: medium sized, oval, ellipsoid with an obvious germ-pore, 
purplish brown under the microscope and 8-9 X 4-5 [jim in size. 
Marginal & facial cystidia: flask-shaped, hyaline with either a short or 
long neck. 
The brown-spored Hebeloma anthracophila Maire is similar. 
Coprinus angulatus Peck Bonfire ink-cap 
Cap: width 4-25 mm. Stern: 1-3 mm; length 15-30 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: dark red-brown at first, then orange-brown, especially at the 
margin and appearing as if frosted all over, conical at first but 
rapidly expanding at the margin and becoming grey-brown, strongly 
striate and deliquescent, leaving finally only a central red-brown 
umbo. 
Stem: white and minutely hairy. 
Gills: free, dirty whitish then black. 
Spore-print: black-brown. 
Spores: medium sized, dark brown under the microscope, lobed like 
the hat of a bishop and 8-1 1 X 6-8 X 5-7 [J.m in size. 
Marginal cystidia: bottle-shaped, very variable. 
Facial cystidia: similar to marginal cystidia. 
General Information: It must be noted that this fungus has spores 
which require three quite different measurements to describe the 
dimension. Another species of Coprinus found on burnt soil is 
C. lagopides Karsten which resembles C. cinereus (Fries) S. F. Gray 
(p. 21 1); it is typified, however, by the rounded spores. 

Plate 73. Fungi of bonfire-sites 
Pholiota highlandensis Coprinus angulatus Psathyrella pennata Hebeloma anthracophila 
Tephrocybe anthracophila 
20 (im 
10 »im 
*0J/ Smooth spores of 
Tephrocybe atrata 
Minutely spiny spores 
of Tephrocybe anthracophila 
E. Tephrocybe anthracophila 

220 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
General notes on fungi of burnt sites 
Several common fungi found at the sites of bonfires have their closest 
relatives amongst various groups of microscopic fungi more than 
amongst the large forms already discussed. Keeping a close watch at 
the site of a former bonfire day by day, week by week and month by 
month is very rewarding and shows a further example, like the dung 
habitat, of a tightly knit communitv of various groups of fungi. 
Peziza repanda Persoon has been discussed in detail above (p. 200); 
its close relatives P. petersii Berkelev & Curtis (brown with grey tints 
and with spores finely warted and measuring 10-12 • 5-6 um), P. 
praeterz'isa Bresadola (violet or mauve and with spores finely warted 
and measuring 11-13 X 6-8 ym), P. violacea Persoon (dark violet 
with smooth spores measuring 13-15 7-9 ym) and P. echinospora 
Karsten (dark chocolate brown with spores denselv warted and 14-18 
X 7-10 ym in size) all grow on the sites of old bonfires or around 
charred root stumps. Rhizina undulata also found by charred stumps 
has been described on p. 203. 'Phese are large to medium sized disc- 
fungi, but there are many much smaller species which cannot be dealt 
with here, such as species of Anthracobia and Trichophaea. Pyreno- 
mycetes are also found on charred wood and soil. Probably the com- 
monest species of fungus met with is a pale reddish orange to rose-pink 
disc-fungus seated on a white mycelial mat ; this is Pyronema omphalodes 
(St Amans) Fuckel. Morchella esculent a St Amans and M. elata Fries 
(see p. 200) appear to grow on the sites of garden bonfires or where 
cinders have been spread on the soil surface. The stimulus for fruiting 
appears to be due to the release of mineral nutrients during the process 
of burning. Competition from other fungi appears to be reduced so 
rapid colonisation by the bonfire fungi (carbonicoles) after the period 
of sterilisation ensures their development. Many similar fungi were 
found about bomb- and shell-craters on the continent during the two 
World Wars. 
One microscope fungus, however, must be mentioned when con- 
sidering bonfires and that is Neurospora sitophila Shear & Dodge so 
much used in genetical studies. It can be found as the conidial state on 
burnt soil and is called ‘Baker’s mould’ because it is frequently found 
growing on refuse in the hot moist conditions of bakers’ kitchens. 

Plate 74. Fungi of bonfire-sites 
Magnification various; Fruit-bodies as seen under a dissecting microscope 
Microscopic characters under dry high power of microscope 
Cup fungi and allies 
Ascobolus carbonarius 
Spore 
Lamprospora astroidea 
Geopyxis carbonaria 
Trichophaea woolhopeia 

222 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
(iii) Fungi of bogs and marshes 
Sphagnum bogs 
Hypholoma elongatum (Fries) Ricken 
Cap: width 12-20 mm. Stem: width 3-5 mm; length 50-80 mm. 
Description: Plate 75. 
Cap: bell-shaped but rapidly expanding to become plane, honey 
yellow with a greyish green tint, slightly striate at the margin and 
also with a few remnants of a fibrillose veil when very young, bul 
these are soon lost. 
Stem: slender, smooth, whitish at the apex and yellow-brown or honey 
yellow below. 
Gills: adnate and distant, pale ochraceous honey-yellow then lilaceous 
grey and finally sepia. 
Flesh: yellowish in the cap, red-brown in the stem and lacking a 
distinct smell. 
Spore-print: purplish brown. 
Spores: long, ellipsoid, fairly thick-walled, olivaceous brown under the 
microscope and with a small germ-pore, smooth and 10-12 X 6-7 
pm in size. 
Marginal cystidia: flask-shaped and hyaline. 
Facial cystidia: flask-shaped with contents which turn yellowish in 
solutions containing ammonia. 
General Information: This fungus which appears from early summer to 
late autumn is recognised by the almost uniform ochraceous colour 
with hint of olive and its habit of growing in troops. The word 
elongatum means elongated and refers to the shape of the stem which 
pushes up through the Sphagnum and in order to disperse its spores 
it must elongate so that it just pushes up above the bog-surface. 
H. polytrichi is closely related to H. elongatum but has a paler cap 
and stem and it grows in moss, particularly Polytrichum in wood- 
lands; the spores of H. polytrichi are paler, slightly narrower and 
slightly thinner, but they have a much more distinct germ-pore. 
Both the above species have been formerly placed in Psilocybe, 
but they are more correctly classified in Hypholoma along with the 
sulphur-tuft fungus (see p. 64) because of the cortina-like veil and 
specialised facial cystidia. 
Illustrations: WD 78^. 

SPECIALISED HABITAT 
223 
Tephrocybe palustris (Peck) Donk 
Cap: width 12-30 mm. Stem: width 3-5 mm; length 50-75 mm. 
Description : Plate 75. 
Cap: bell-shaped then plano-convex, but finally depressed at centre, 
watery buff to greyish with flush of ochre or smoky grey, striate to 
centre when moist, but drying out non-striate and uniformly ochra- 
ceous buff. 
f Stem: thin, rather long, smooth, similarly coloured to the cap or paler, 
'd fragile and whitish woolly at the base. 
lit Gills: dirty whitish, adnate with a tooth and not very crowded. 
Flesh: thin, watery buff, drying out ochraceous and with a strong 
f smell of new meal. 
Spore-print: white. 
IS Spores: medium sized, hyaline under the microscope, oval, not turning 
blue-grey in solutions of iodine, and 6-7 X 4-5 pm in size. 
J Marginal and facial cystidia: absent. 
General hiformation: This fungus which grows from late spring to 
j autumn is usually associated with a greying and finally a killing of 
le the SphagJium, noticeable from a distance even in the absence of the 
■7 fruiting-bodies as paler patches in the rich green bog. Another agaric 
found only in Sphagnum bogs is Omphalina sphagmcola (Berkeley) 
Moser with decurrent gills and long, elongate, hyaline spores, 
n At the margin of Sphagnum bogs, the fungus Mycena bulbosa can 
I be found attached to the base of tufts of rushes. 
:o| Potting up a sward of Sphagnum and retaining it in a warm 
ii I greenhouse during winter favours the bog agarics to fruit when 
other larger fungi are not available. 
8 Mycena bulbosa (Cejp) Kiihner 
!• I Cap: width 3-6 mm. Stem: width i mm; length 10-15 mm. 
p I Description : 
1 - i Cap : dirty white, greyish and very gelatinous, 
d Stem: very thin, hyaline with a very distinct hairy, basal disc. 
Gills: crowded, adnexed, very short and whitish. 
i, Spore-print: white, but because it is so small it is often difficult to see. 
It Spores: medium sized, hyaline under the microscope, ellipsoid, not 
d blueing in solutions of iodine, and 8-10 X 4 pm in size. 
Marginal cystidia: clavate or ventricose, hyaline and smooth. 
Facial cystidia: absent. 
Illustrations : T. palustris LH 83. 

224 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Galevina paludosa (Fries) Kiihner 
Cap: width 10-20 mm. Stem: width 3-5 mm; length 50-90 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: conico-convex expanding slightly but retaining the central umbo, a 
striate to half-way, sand-colour to red-brown, hygrophanous, 
minutely floccose because of remnants of veil distributed over its 
surface, but soon becoming smooth. 
Stem: long, buried amongst the Sphagnum, red-brown and flecked 
with white fibrils, except at the finely hairy apex, the fibrils typically 
form a distinct but easily lost ring. 
Gills: almost horizontal, adnate to subdecurrent, pale at first and then 
rust-brown. 
Spore-print: rust-brown. mr 
Spores: medium-sized, ovate to slightly lemon-shaped, minutely 
warty, honey-brown under the microscope and about 10 X 6 pm 
in size, (9-1 1 X 6-7 pm). 
Facial cystidia: absent. 
Marginal cystidia: hyaline, almost cylindrical or bottle-shaped with 
an inflated base. di 
General hiformation: This species grows from spring to early autumn 
in Sphagnum bogs; several other species of Galerina are also found 
in the same localities:- — 
(i) G. sphagnorum (Fries) Kiihner has a convex cap, fibrillose 
silky and ochraceous brown stem, but it lacks the ring-zone so typical 
of G. paludosa. The smell is like that of meal when crushed and the 
gills are emarginate. 
(ii) G. tibiicystis (Atkinson) Kiihner has a rapidly expanding cap 
which becomes plano-convex or depressed at maturity; it also lacks 
a ring-zone, but the stem in this species is finely hairy because of the 
presence of numerous pin-shaped cells which can be seen only with 
the aid of a lens. The gills are broadly adnate. 
Illustrations : G. paludosa — LH 175. 
I 

Plate 75. Fungi of marshes 
A. Tephrocybe palustris 
Omphalina sphagnicola 
Spores 
j 10 (im 
Marginal cystidia 
Marginal 
cystidia 
20 mm 
iy G. Galerina 
^ ^ j sphagnorum 
Section 
10 jtm 
Adult and young fruit-bodies 
E. Galerina ppludosa 
20 Jim 

226 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
(b) Alder-carrs | 
( 
Naucoria eschar aides (Fries) Kummer ' d 
Cap: width 12-30 mm. Stem: width 1-3 mm; lengtli 25-45 mm. | 1 
Description : Plate 76. I' 
Cap: pale yellowish ochre, but becoming darker ochraceous with age, | j 
scurfy, convex but then flattened, or with its edge upturned; the ( n 
margin is slightly striate when moist. i 
Stem: slender, pale to dirty yellowish ochre but darker brown at base, | d 
slightly fibrillose, particularly at first because of filaments from a , r 
veil, but these are soon lost. | 
Gills: pale tan to brownish ochre with a paler, floccose margin, adnate | 
and crowded. ' ^ 
Flesh : yellowish ochre but lacking a distinct smell. | ^ 
Spore-print : clay-colour. ( 
Spores: medium sized, almond-shaped, pale brown under the micro- ' 
scope, warted and lo-ii X 5-6 p.m in size. | 
Marginal cystidia: swollen below, but drawn out into a hair-like apex. 
Facial cystidia: absent. 
General Information : Although this is a common species growing in ® 
damp places under alder it is difficult except with an expert eye to ® 
separate it from several closely related species which are also found | 
in similar places. At present it is not known whether these fungi are 
favoured by the water-logged base-rich, reducing soils found no- | 
where else except under alder, or if they have a special relationship j 
with the tree. There is ample evidence that soil conditions in alder I 
woods are rather different from those found in other woodlands, but 
whatever the reason Naucoria escharoides is only found under alder- — - 
in fact this species has been placed in the genus Alnicola because of [ 
this character — cola meaning inhabitant and Alnus the tree of that 1 
name. Willow-carrs have not been as extensively studied as alder- 
carrs but there is evidence that a store of mycological information | 
is still to be obtained from these places. Several species of Naucoria > 
have been described from only willow-carrs, while others are to be [ 
found under both alder and willows; about eight species are known 
to grow under alder. The word escharoides means scab-like and refers 
to the cap which when freshly collected is minutely scaly and 
appears scabby. 
Illustrations : LH 163; WD 67b 

SPECIALISED HABITAT 
227 
(iv) Fungi of beds of herbaceous plants 
Beds of herbaceous plants provide protection for many small agarics 
and collecting can be conducted in these situations from spring to 
early winter. The buffered environments under the herbs is humid 
and relatively still, and this allows the development of the small often 
delicate fruit-bodies of certain species to continue unimpeded. Nettle- 
beds or mixtures of nettle and dog’s mercury have very rich floras 
under the shelter of their leaves and stems, either on the bare soil or 
2 plant debris. 
On herbaceous stems 
Copnnus urticicola (Berkeley & Broome) Buller 
Cap: width 4-7 mm. Stem: width i mm; length 10-15 
Description: Plate 76. 
Cap: white then greyish, globose at first and then expanding to become 
plane with upturned margin covered, at first, with scales from a 
^ veil which at the centre are white-tipped with ochre. 
Stem: white and slightly downy. 
^ Spore-print: brownish black. 
Q Spores: elliptic-ovoid, only slightly compressed with distinct germ- 
j pore, dark brown under the microscope and 6-8 X 5 pm in size, 
g Marginal cystidia : ellipsoid to pyriform and hyaline. 
Facial cystidia: elongate cylindric larger than marginal cystidia. 
P On bare soil 
r Leplonia hahingtonii (Bloxam) P. D. Orton 
^ Cfl/).- 5-15 mm. Stem: width i mm; length 20-50 mm. 
- Description: Plate 76. 
Cap: grey to sepia or greyish brown entirely scaly-hairy, at first, but 
^ then fibrillose. 
Stem: silvery grey to grey-sepia and silky fibrillose. 
^ Gills: greyish pink. 
Spore-print: greyish pink. 
£ Spores, very long, wavy angular in outline, very pale honey under 
^ the microscope and 14-20 X 7-9 pm. 
s Marginal cystidia: club-shaped or balloon-shaped and hyaline. 
1 Facial cystidia: absent. 
So very different to other species of Leptonia is it that it should be 
, classified in Dr. Pilat’s genus Poiizaromyces, 

228 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Conocybe mairei Watling 
Cap: width 5-10 mm. Stem: width i mm; length 10-40 mm. 
Description : 
Cap : pale to deep ochraceous or buff, minutely tomentose. 
Stem : ffexuous, whitish or very pale ochraceous. 
Gills: pale buff then ochraceous. 
Spore-print: ochraceous. 
Spores: medium sized, ellipsoid or slightly almond-shaped with small 
germ-pore and 6-8 X 3-4 um in size. 
Flamnmlastev granulosa (J. Lange) Watling 
Cap: 4-15 mm. Stem: width i mm; length 10-25 
Description : 
Cap: ochraceous to date-brown, darker at the centre and granular 
scaly throughout. 
Stem: similarly coloured to the cap and similarly roughened, except 
for the slightly smoother paler apex. 
Spores: ellipsoid to almond-shaped, very pale brown under the micro- 
scope and 8-10 X 4-5 [xm in size. 
Marginal cystidia: cylindric-wavy, hyaline. 
Facial cystidia: absent. 
Depending on the herbaceous constituents the fungus-ffora will 
vary. Certain species are found on all sorts of herbaceous debris, 
but others are much more specific to their substrate preferences. 
Beds of Butterbur, Coltsfoot or Impatiens are also good hunting 
places, as are beds of sedges in fenland. In many of these localities 
agarics with reduced fruit-bodies looking like disc-fungi are fre- 
quently seen. We have already discussed the specific requirements 
of certain species of Marasmius (see p. 92). 

Plate 76. Fungi of alder-carrs and from under herbaceous plants 
A. Naucoria escharoides 
15 
Adult and young 
fruit-bodies and section 
n 
Roughened, 
lemon-shaped spores 
20 (tm 
Marginal 
cystidia 
30 (im 
E. Leptonia babingtonii 

230 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
(v) Fungi of moss-cushions 
Gfi 
c 
Many small species grow amongst moss cushions on tree trunks, / 
tucked in crevices in walls or on the tops of old buildings. However, / 
there is one genus of agarics, i.e. Galerina which is probably more ( 
typical than any other of such situations. There are many members of ( 
this genus whose small caps are found in the autumn pushing up through , 
the moss plants. Plate 78. ( 
Galerina hypnorutn (Fries) Kiihner 
Cap: width 4-6 mm. Stem: width i mm; length 20-40 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: hemispherical or bell-shaped, hygrophanous, orange-yellow, 
sand-colour, smooth and striate almost to the cap-centre. 
Stem: smooth and similarly coloured to the cap. 
Gills: yellow-tawny then rust-coloured, adnate emarginate, rather 
broad and somewhat distant. 
Flesh: thin, yellow-tawny and with a smell of new meal. 
Spore-print: rust-colour. 
Spores: medium-sized, almond-shaped, golden yellow under the 
microscope, slightly roughened and lo-ii x 6-7 pm in size. 
Marginal cystidia: flask-shaped or cylindrical with slight swelling at 
the apex. 
Facial cystidia: absent. 
1 
M( 
a 
Oi 
Cs 
St 
Gi 
B 
Sf 
8f 
Galerina mycenopsis (Fries) Kiihner 
Cap: width 6-15 mm. Stem: width i mm; length 30-60 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: similarly coloured to G. hypnorum, but with a few white silky p, 
fibrils. 
Stem: coloured as the cap, but with white silky fibrils when young. 
Gills and flesh: as in G. hypnorum, but it has no smell. 
Spore-print: rust-colour. 
Spores: medium-sized, ellipsoid, pale golden yellow under the micro- 
scope, smooth and 9-1 1 X 5-6 pm in size. 
Marginal cystidia: club-shaped, cylindrical and with distinct rounded 
heads. 
Facial cystidia: absent. 

SPECIALISED HABITAT 
23 
General Information: G. mniophila (Lasch) Kuhner is similar to or 
slightly larger than G. mycenopsis, but differs in its dull honey- 
coloured cap and stem, and distinctly roughened spores. G. calyp- 
trata P. D. Orton is small and has been long confused with G. 
hypnorum\ it, however, is of a much brighter orange-colour, with 
distinct white fibrils on the cap and has spores which have a distinct 
envelope, sometimes separating as a loose covering. G. vittaeformis 
' (Fries) Moser is a red-brown fungus with 2-spored basidia, facial 
cystidia, minutely hairy stem, and very rough spores; it grows in 
moss in pastures as well as on moss-cushions. 
(vi) Heath and mountain fungi 
Moorland fungi 
Marasmius androsaceus (Fries) Fries Horse-hair toadstool 
Cap: width 5-15 mm. Stem: width i mm; length 30-60 mm. 
Description: Plate 77. 
Cap : whitish to pale smoke-brown with a distinct wine-coloured tinge, 
membranous, flattened, or umbilicate and radially wrinkled. 
Stem: thread-like, black or very dark brown, horny and usually 
springing from a black horse-hair-like mycelium. 
Gills: whitish or dirty flesh-colour, adnate and crowded. 
Flesh: white in the pileus and black in the stem. 
Spore-print: white. 
Spores: medium-sized, pip-shaped, not blueing in solutions containing 
I iodine and measuring 7-9 X 3-4 pm in size. 
Marginal cystidia: oval or ellipsoid, covered on the upper half with 
small pimple-like projections. 
^ Facial cystidia: absent. 
General Information: This fungus is common in troops from late 
! summer until winter on dead and dying heather. It is also found in 
I woods on leaves and twigs, particularly in plantations on conifer 
I needles. It is easily recognised by the dark horse-hair-like stem 
' which becomes bent and twisted on drying and the small, pinkish 
flesh-coloured cap. The word androsaceus means, and refers to, the 
: stem which resembles the tough and wiry fronds of some of the 
red algae, such as Ahnfeldtia which is found around our sea-shores. 
Illustrations: LH 115; NB 47^; WD 24^. 

232 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Otnphalina ericetorum (Fries) M. Lange 
Cap: width 5-20 mm. Stem: width 2 mm; length 10-20 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: variable in colour, straw-colour, cream-colour, bistre or grey, 
convex then flat or slightly depressed, radially grooved to the centre 1 
when moist; the margin is scalloped. j 
Stem: slender, similarly coloured to the cap, except for a brownish! 
wine-coloured zone at the very apex, thickened upwards and smooth 
with a white and woolly base. 
Gills: adnate to decurrent, white then cream-colour or yellowish, ‘ 
triangular in shape, very distant and often connected by veins. 
Flesh: pale cream-colour. 
Spore-print: white. | 
Spores: medium sized, hyaline under the microscope, broadly ellip- 
soid, or pip-shaped, not becoming bluish grey in solutions of iodine, j 
8-10 X 5 pm in size. ■ 
Marginal and facial cystidia: absent. 
General Information: This fungus is common and often in large troops ‘ 
on peaty ground in woods as well as in moorland and mountain 
regions. In mountains O. ericetorum must be carefully distinguished ' 
from some of the truly mountain species of Omphalina dealt with 
on p. 236. O. wynniae (Berkeley & Broome) P. D. Orton is similar j 
but pale lemon-yellow and is found on stumps of conifers. The p 
word ericetorum refers to the habit of growing on heaths — Erica is ( 
the Latin name for heath. In many books this same fungus is called | 
O. umbellifera which reflects the shape of the cap — umbrella shaped. | 
Illustrations: Hvass 116; LH 99; NB 85^; WD 29®. j 
Entoloma helodes (Fries) Rummer 
Cap: width 25-75 mm. Stem: width 2-6 mm; length 25-55 | 
Description : 
Cap : finely or minutely velvety at centre, fibrillose or white silky as if i 
frosted towards the margin, sepia or bistre, or mouse-grey, dull- I 
coloured but with a hint of violaceous brown. 
Stem: equal or slightly thickened at the apex, sometimes club-shaped, I 
thickened at the base, greyish brown and pale cream-colour at the | 
base. j 
Flesh: dark sepia in the cap, whitish in the stem and smelling strongly j 
of meal. ' 

Plate 77. Moorland fungi 
20 mm 
Section of fruit-body 
Marginal cystidia 
C. Entoloma helodes 

234 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Gills: white or whitish at first then dirty pinkish brown, adnate and 
emarginate. 
Spore-print: dull salmon-pink. 
Spores: medium to long, angular, ellipsoid-oblong, slightly cinnamon- 
colour under the microscope and 9-12 X 7-8 pm in size. 
Marginal cystidia: conspicuous, spindle or bottle-shaped and with 
subcapitate apex. 
Facial cystidia: absent. 
HypJwloma ericaeum (Fries) Kiihner 
Cap: width 15-30 mm. Stem: width 4-7 mm; length 50-100 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: fleshy, convex, later becoming flattened but remaining slighty 
umbonate at the centre, viscid at first, smooth and shining when 
dry, bright reddish to sand-colour or brown. 
Stem: slender, yellow above, brown below, smooth and tough. 
Gills: adnate or adnexed, purplish black with a whitish margin and 
fairly crowded. 
Flesh : yellowish or red-brown in the stem. 
Spore-print: purple-brown. 
Spores: long, dark purple-brown, broadly ellipsoid and 12-15 X 7-9 
pm in size. 
Marginal cystidia: cylindrical or flask-shaped. 
Facial cystidia: flask-shaped and filled with contents which become 
yellowish in solutions containing ammonia. 
Clavavia avgillacea (Persoon) Fries 
Fruit -body : height 20-60 mm. 
Description : 
Fruit-body: club-shaped, blunt or rounded at the apex, cylindrical or 
compressed and often grooved, yellow ochraceous or buflF. 
Stem: distinct but short and yellowish. 
Flesh: yellowish. 
Spore-print: white. 
Spores: medium-sized, hyaline under the microscope, smooth and 
lo-ii X 5-6 pm in size. 
All these three species are typical of bare peaty soil, or moss 
covered peat amongst or around Heather or Ling {Calluna vulgaris) 
bushes. 

Plate 78. Moorland, moss-cushion and mountain fungi 
10 jtm 
Spores 

236 IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Mountain fungi and the so-called Basidiolichens 
I 
‘Basidiolichens.’ Plate 78. | 
Omphalina ericetorum (Fries) M. Lange has already been described 
(p. 232); it grows on acidic soils and ascends into mountain areas 
where it frequently grows on algal scum which accumulates around 
Sphagnum plants. 
Under these conditions the algal cells enter the base of the fungus 
and grow in the cavity of the stem and amongst those hyphae which 
constitute the base. This association, however, appears to be much '7 
closer in the two lichens Coriscium viride (Acharius) Vain and ' 
Botrydina vulgaris Meneghini which have long been classified as 1 
species of lichen of unknown affinity because no perfect state was 
known. Coriscium viride consists of blue-green overlapping plates { 
or scales with narrow rounded often paler margins and which dry 1 
out greenish brownish grey. Botrydina vulgaris, in contrast, consists ■ 
of dark green, gelatinous blobs drying out greenish brown. j 
Coriscium is now considered to be an association of an algae and a 
Basidiomycete, the latter being the agaric, Omphalina hudsoniana 
(Jennings) Bigelow, which resembles O. ericetorum but for the 
pinkish coloured stem. Botrydina may be a complex of several 
separate associations of an algae with different species of Omphalina. 
In the high mountains the association is with O. luteovitellina ' 
(Pilat & Nannfeldt) M. Lange a small uniformly bright yellow | 
agaric, whilst in Sphagnum bogs it is with O. sphagnicola (Berkeley) 1 
Moser. Myxomphalia maura (Fries) Hora, a fungus typical of burnt 1 
ground, is also reported to take up this association in lowland woods I 
and O. velutina (Quelet) Quelet appears to be capable of forming ' 
a loose relationship with algal cells also. This is a most interesting 1 
association and research work is still at an early stage. In the tropics 1 
and subtropical regions of the world, similar associations are found ' 
on rotten and decomposing trunks and stumps. In these examples | 
the Basidiomycetes are frequently fairy-clubs, particularly species of 
Multiclavula (‘many small clubs’). A few species of this genus may | 
be found also in North temperate woodlands. Botrydina also pows in ^ 
Europe with Stereum fasciatum (Schw.) Fries and Athelia viride 
(Bres.) Parm. (see p. 176), and Odontia bicolor (Fries) Quelet is rarely *( 
collected without green algal cells buried in the thallus. Perhaps 
associations like this are much commoner than at first supposed. ' 

SPECIALISED HABITAT 
237 
Probably the most remarkable of this group of poorly known 
organisms is Cora pavonia (Sw.) Fries which produces masses of 
interlocking fans; it is tropical and found in Brazil. 
Mountain fungi: general remarks 
There are several groups of mountain fungi, some mycorrhizal formers, 
some which prefer peaty soil and some which are associated with 
algae forming a loose relationship — the Basidiolichens. When the 
mountain top is covered with such dwarf willows as Salix herbacea 
or S. reticulata the leaves are cast each year, woody tissue develops 
above and below the ground; in fact all the processes taking place in 
our familiar woodlands are also taking place in these communities, 
the only difference being that the trees are dwarf. Indeed it looks quite 
odd to see normal sized agarics growing amongst the woody stalks of 
dwarf trees, the leaves of which are often one-tenth the size of the 
fruit-bodies, but this is what happens. 
The mycorrhizal formers in these conditions include species of 
Russula (e.g. Russula alpina Moller & Schaeffer, R. xerampelina var. 
pascua Favre (see p. 45), Lactarius (e.g. Lactarius lacunarum Hora 
see p. 50), Cortinarius (e.g. C. anomalus (Fries) Fries see p. 42) and 
Amanita (e.g. Amanita nivalis Greville see p. 56). Subterranean fungi 
are also found, e.g. Elaphomyces see p. 244, and, just as woodlands, 
valley bottoms have a saprophytic ground flora of toadstools so do 
the high mountain ‘woods’, and many familiar fungi of the lowerland 
areas are to be found there also, e.g. Mycena epipterygia (Fries) S. F. 
Gray, Mycena olivaceo-marginata (Massee) Massee (see p. 88.) 
The barer tops of the mountains, where large areas of moss are only 
to be found, support species of Hygrocybe, e.g. H. lilacina (Laestadius) 
Moser and H. subviolacea (Peck) P. D. Orton & Watling (see p. 97). 
In the moist atmosphere on the hills in western Scotland, woodland- 
like floras containing familiar flowering plants are found on the 
mountain sides often much higher than in central Scotland. It is 
in such communities that typical woodland fungi are also to be found, 
e.g. Nolanea cetrata (Fries) Kummer (see p. loi). 

IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
238 
(vii) Sand-dune fungi 
Inocyhe dunensis P. D. Orton 
Cap: width 27-75 i^^n. Stem: width 4-10 mm; length 35-80 mm. 
Description : 
Cap: convex then expanded, usually broadly umbonate, pale or dirty 
ochraceous paler at the margin, reddish brown at the centre, smooth, 
radially fibrillose towards the margin and sometimes showing the 
remains of a pale greyish buff veil. 
Stem: equal with marginate or rounded bulb at the base, white or 
whitish, then becoming discoloured pinkish or brownish, powdered 
with white, at first, but finally silky. 
Gills: free or narrowly adnate, subcrowded, whitish then clay-buff, 
finally snuff-brown with whitish edge. 
Flesh: white or whitish, tinted ochraceous or dirty pinkish and with 
strong smell of rancid oil. 
Spore-print: snuff-brown. 
Spores: medium to long, ellipsoid-oblong, indistinctly nodulose or 
wavy-angular and 9-12 X 6-7 [i.m in size. 
Facial cystidia: swollen, spindle-shaped with short, broad neck, thick- 
walled and crested with crystals. 
Marginal cystidia: spindle-shaped and crested with crystals. 
General Information : This fungus is often buried to half-way in the 
sand of slacks near dwarf willows {Salix spp.). Three other species 
of Inocybe grow in dune-slacks /. halophila Heim, I. serotina Peck 
and I. devoniensis P. D. Orton, but all differ in their spores being 
smooth and elongate-cylindric. Astrosporina, a name referring to the 
shape of the spore, has been considered a genus of agarics in its own 
right and to this group /. dunensis would belong. However, as the 
members show the same range of characters as those species with 
the smooth spores it seems unnecessary to split Inocybe into two. 
The cystidia in many species are unusual, being crested with a 
bundle of crystals which have been reported as being calcium oxa- 
late, although even the simplest school-laboratory tests have been 
rarely applied to them (see p. 84). 

Plate 79. Sand-dune fungi 
A. /nocybe dunensis 
Marginal cystidia of 
Psathyrella ammophila 
15 urn 

240 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Psathyrella ammophila (Durieu & Leville) P. D. Orton 
Sand-dune brittle-cap 
Cap: width 20-40 mm. Stem: width 4-8 mm; length 40-80 mm. 
Description: Plate 79. 
Cap: semiglobate to convex, pale dingy clay-colour or dark tan to dirty 
brownish, non-striate, rather fleshy and usually sand covered. 
Stem: deeply rooting in sand and club-shaped towards the base, 
similarly coloured to the cap except for the whitish apex. 
Gills: adnate, subfuscous or dark dirt-brown. 
Flesh: dirty buff and with no distinct smell. 
Spore-print: pale snuff-brown with purplish flush. 
Spores: long, ovoid, yellowish-grey brown under the microscope with 
a distinct germ-pore and 10-12 X 7 pm in size. 
Marginal cystidia: balloon-shaped, obtuse or somewhat bottle-shaped 
and hyaline. 
Facial cystidia: sparse, similar to the marginal cystidia, voluminous. 
General Inforrtiation: This is a very distinct fungus found amongst 
stems of Marram grass in sand-dune systems. At first sight it appears 
as if it is growing in the bare sand, but by careful excavation it usually 
is found attached to pieces of Marram grass, indeed the hyphae enter 
the roots of the grass, but apparently do not kill them. 
This fungus was first described in the genus Psilocybe (see p. 114) 
because of its brownish purple spore-print, but the cap-surface is 
composed of rounded cells and so is related to all the other species 
of Psathyrella, 
Psathyrella flexispora Wallace & P. D. Orton grows in similar 
habitats amongst Ammophila and other seashore grasses. It is easily 
recognised by the chocolate, umber or date-brown cap and the 
peculiar shaped spores, which look as if they have been slightly 
twisted during their development. 
Stropharia coronilla (Fries) Quelet, resembling a little mushroom 
(i.e. Agaricus) is also found in sand-dune systems and, just as species 
of Psathyrella, it possesses purplish black spores. However, the cap 
is ochraceous yellow with a whitish margin formed of veil fragments. 
The stem is white becoming yellow with age and possesses a narrow, 
white striate ring. The spores are ellipsoid and measure 8-9 X 4-5 
pm and it has filamentous cells in the cap. Unlike P, ammophila 
it is not confined to sand-dune systems but it is also to be found in 
pastures and on heaths. 

Plate 80. Sand-dune fungi 
C. Hygrocybe conicoides 

242 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Conocyhe dunensis P. D. Orton Sand-dune brown cone cap. 
Cap: width 10-30 mm. Stem: width 2-4 mm; length 40-100 mm. 
Description: Plate 80. 
Cap: conical then conico-expanded, date-brown, dull sand-colour or 
dark liver-colour, drying buff or ochraceous, expallent, not or in- 
distinctly striate when moist. 
Stem . whitish or pale ochraceous then darker ochraceous or dirty 
brownish from the base up, lower part whitish and buried in the sand. 
Flesh: thin and pale ochraceous. 
Gills : adnate, whitish but soon pale honey and finally rusty honey. 
Spore-print: rust-brown. 
Spores : long, ellipsoid or slightly amygdaliform, golden brown under the 
microscope with large germ-pore and 12-14 X 7-8 pm in size. 
Facial cystidia: absent. 
Marginal cystidia: capitate. 
General Information: C. dunensis differs from C. tenera in its dull 
colours (see p. 116) and habitat preferences. Conocybe dunensis, 
Stropharia coronilla, the two species of Psathyrella are all dull- 
coloured. However, in the sand-dunes colourful agarics are also 
found. The most common is Hygrocybe conicoides (P. D. Orton) 
Orton & Watling; Laccaria maritima (Theodowicz) Moser is indeed 
an unusual but rewarding find. ‘Lac’ as in Laccaria is a red-brown 
resinous substrate produced by the lac-insect and resembles the 
cap colour of many species of the genus, including L. maritima, 
L. laccata and L. proxima (see p. 86). All these fungi were formerly 
placed in Clitocybe, but they differ in the warted or spiny spores 
which at maturity give the rather thick gills the appearance of 
being heavily talced. L. maritima can be distinguished from all 
other species of Laccaria by the elongated spores which are minutely 
spiny and not strongly warted as in L. laccata. Hygrocybe conicoides 
(P. D. Orton) Orton & Watling has a conical to conico-convex, 
acutely umbonate cap with wavy-lobed margin; it is scarlet or 
cherry-red, discolouring blackish with age or on bruising. The gills 
are at first chrome-yellow then become flushed red and the stem 
IS yellow or greenish lemon becoming streaky blackish after handling. 
The spores are 10-13 X 4-5 pm in size and slightly French bean- 
shaped. It can be readily distinguished from close relatives, e.g. 
H. conica (Fries) Rummer by the gills soon turning reddish, the 
reddish cap and the narrow spores. 

SPECIALISED HABITAT 
243 
(viii) Subterranean fungi 
General notes 
The adaptive habit of growing completely submerged beneath the 
surface of the ground has developed in all the major groups of fungi. 
Thus the simplest form related to the common bread-mould have taken 
up the character just as certain relatives of the disc-fungi (discomycetes) 
and of the flask-fungi (pyrenomycetes). In the higher fungi in several 
foreign countries even agarics, polypores and stinkhorns have become 
hypogeous, but in this country we have a very depauparate flora com- 
posed of some twenty-eight species of false (Basidiomycete) truffle. 
The following key may assist in identifying the different groups of 
hypogeous fungi for some of these species are of commercial value and 
includes the French or Perigord truffle, Tuber melanospermum Vittadini 
which is used as a constituent of Pate de Foie Gras, and many of the 
fungi used as poor quality substitutes. There is a long folk-history 
surrounding truffles and they have been utilised in the production of 
aphrodisiacs for centuries. Seeking them out was a difficulty and has 
been overcome in different countries in different ways. Thus in con- 
tinental Europe, pigs have been used to sniff them out but on finding 
them the pigs cannot eat the truffles because of a ring placed through 
their nose. In Dorset a particular breed of dog was developed to do 
the same job — the Dorset hounds. 
A simple key would read as follows : — 
1. Spores produced on basidia . . • • • • • • • • 2 
Spores produced in asci . . . . • • • • • • • • 4 
2. Chambers throughout the inner tissue containing spores of 
approximately the same age . . • • • • • • • • 3 
Chambers in the inner tissues containing spores found at 
different stages of development . . . • • • Hymenogaster 
3. Basidiospores brown or greenish brown under the microscope, 
and black in mass . . . • • • • • Melanogaster 
Basidiospores colourless or pale honey colour under the 
microscope and ochraceous in mass . . • • • • Rhizopogon 
4. Asci globose, irregularly arranged within the fruit-body and 
quickly breaking down to shed the spores . . Elaphomyces 
Asci globose or club-shaped and arranged in fertile areas which 
do not rapidly break down to shed the spores . . Tuber & relatives 

244 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Basidiomycetes 
Rhizopogon roseolas (Corda) Fries Red truffle 
Description : 
Fruit-body: globular to tubiform and up to 6o mm broad, partly 
covered in mycelial cords, dirty white, later reddish-tawny gradually 
reddish and finally olive-brown, it soon becomes tawny on bruising i 
when fresh and young. 
Spores: medium sized, narrowly ellipsoid, smooth at first, hyaline I 
then pale olive under the microscope and measuring 8-ii x 4 pm. i 
Habitat & Distribution: This fungus is not uncommon on the edges of 
paths, in pine woods just pushing up through the soil surface. I 
Ascomycetes ^ 
Elaphomyces granulatus Fries Harts’ truffle 
Description: * 
Fruit-body: globose to ovoid, 20-40 mm broad, pale ochraceous, , 
covered in small pyramidal warts, and when it is cut it shows three 
layers, an outer thin yellowish zone, an inner thicker compact white 
zone and within this a purplish black area full of spores separated 
into chambers by bands of sterile white tissue; the first two zones 
make up the ‘rind’. 
Spores, spherical, blackish brown, warty, 24—32 pm in diameter; eight 
contained in globose asci. 
Habitat & Distribution: This fungus is not uncommon in the surface 
layers of pine woods at the junction of needle debris and mineral 
soil. E. muricatus Fries is similar, but differs in the marbled flecked 
interior. 
Tuber aestivum Vittadini English truffle 
Description : 
Fruit-body: subglobose except for basal flattening, up to 80 mm 
broad, covered in 5-6-sided pyramidal scales, dark brown to viola- 
ceous, white then greyish brown within, separated by a network of 
veins radiating from the basal cavity. 
Spores, very large, ellipsoid, light or yellowish brown and ornamented 
with a prominent network, borne in two’s and sixes in subglobose 
asci and variable in size, 20-40 x 15-30 pm. 
1 

Plate 81. Subterranean fungi and fungus-parasites 
All fruit-bodies at same magnification; Microscopic characters at various magnifications 
A. Rhizopogon roseolas 
B. Elaphomyces granulatus and Elaphomyces muricatus 

246 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Habitat & Distribution: This fungus is to be found buried in the 
surface layers of soil in beech woods. T. riifum is smaller and smoother 
and the spores are not crested but simply minutely spiny. 
Illustrations: R. luteolus—Hvass 322; LH 215. EL granu latus— Hvass 
325; LH 49. T. aestivuni — LH 43. Melanogaster variegatus — LH 
215 (see p. 243). Hymenogaster tener—\A\ 215 (see p. 243). 
(ix) Fungal parasites 
Nyctalis parasitica (Fries) Fries Pick-a-back-toadstool 
Description: Plate 81. 
Cap: bell-shaped then becoming expanded, silky dirty white, but 
gradually grey with a flush of lilac with age. 
Stem: slender, white and smooth except for the base. 
Gills: pallid but soon becoming brownish, adnate or adnate with tooth, 
thick and distant alternately long and short and contorted or united 
with age. 
Flesh: dark brown. 
Spore-print: buff. 
Spores: small, hyaline under the microscope, oyoid, 5-6 X 3-4 urn 
but usually replaced completely or in part by oyoid, smooth, thick- 
walled and pale brownish asexually produced spores (chlamydo- 
spores) measuring about 15 X 10 um in size. 
Habitat &: Distribution : This fungus grows in clusters on old decaying 
specimens of yarious species of Russula and Lactarius (Russulaceae) — 
see p. 45. 
General Information : N. asteropliora Fries is closely related and also 
grows on decaying specimens of yarious species of Russula, parti- 
cularly R. nigricans (Fries) Fries. It difiFers, howeyer, in the cap 
being fawn-coloured and yery mealy when touched; it is recognised 
by the poorly formed often deyelopmentally hindered gills on which 
chlamydospores are formed. Unlike the smooth asexual spores in 
iV. parasitica this species has chlamydospores with conical, blunt 
humps i.e. star-shaped; asteropliora in fact means T bear stars’. 
These fungi haye been associated by some mycologists with the 
common chanterelle {Cantharellus cibarius Fries, see p. 162) in virtue 
of them possessing reduced fold-like gills. However, the fold-like 
gills are secondary in nature, correlated with the active production 

SPECIALISED HABITAT 
247 
of chlamydospores and the supression of the formation of basidio- 
spores. The gills are not therefore of a primitive type. The genus 
Nyctalis is related to fungi such as Tephrocybe palustris (Peck) 
Donk (see p. 223). 
There are several rather uncommon ‘agaric-parasites’ of agarics 
or other higher fungi, e.g. Volvariella surrecta (Knapp) Singer, but 
their formal description must be left to other more advanced texts. 
However, the intriguing bolete. Boletus parasiticus Fries, which grows 
on Scleroderma (earth-balls) in this country has been mentioned and 
figured previously (p. 35 & Plate 64). It is of interest to note that 
a close relative of B. parasiticus in Japan lives on another group of 
Gasteromycetes. 
Illustrations: N. parasitica — F ii^ LH 81; WD 25b N. asterophora — 
LH 81; WD 258. 
General notes on Fungicoles 
Many beginners are confused on finding specimens which, although 
appearing agaric-like, are covered in long hairs or irregularly shaped 
bumps. Indeed many of these abnormalities are true agarics attacked 
by microscopic fungi, and I know of one textbook on mushrooms and 
toadstools which includes such an abnormality amongst the discussion 
on the normal fruit-bodies. Thus Sporodinia grandis Link, which is a 
primitive fungus, attacks many fungi reducing them to a grey velvety 
mass of fungal filaments. Specimens of several species of Mycena 
(p. 88) are common in autumn, covered in whiskers with small nobbles 
on the top. These whiskers are produced by the parasitic Spinellus 
megalocarpus (Corda) Karsten, another primitive fungus— a phyco- 
mycete. 
In some wet seasons the orange and green coloured Lactarius 
deliciosus (Fries) S. F. Gray is to be found contorted and covered in 
small pinkish to lilac pimples of the ascomycete Byssonectria lactaria 
(Fries) Fetch, and other species of Lactarius are attacked by Byssonectria 
viridis (Berkeley & Broome) Fetch which converts the fruit-bodies into 
a hardened mass of green tissue. In North America, species of Lactarius 
are frequently attacked by Hypomyces lactifluorum (Schweintz) Tulasne 
and the whole fungus is reduced to a contorted acidic-smelling mass 
of fungal tissue with vivid orange pimples or warts on the outer surface. 
These parasitic fruit-bodies are eaten as a delicacy in their own right 

248 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
whereas the same consumer will be less enthusiastic about eating the ^ ( 
same agaric before it is so deformed. I 
Bolctes particularly B. subtomentosus Fries, B. chrysenteron St Amans ||l 
and B. edidis Fries are frequently converted into yellow powdery masses U 
due to the production of asexual spores of the fungus Sepedonium H 
chrysospennum Fries; the sexual stage occurs on the remains after they | 
have collapsed into the soil surface — this stage is called Apiocrea 0 
chrysosperma (Tulasne) Sydow. Several closely related fungi in the p 
genus Hypomyces also attack agarics. 
The yellow pustules found on the spore-bearing surface of the birch 
polypore Piptoporus (p. 142) is Hypocrea pulvinata Fuckel; it is only 
one of several lower fungi which grow on bracket fungi. The genus 
Cordyceps has been mentioned previously (p. 206) and in the discussion 
it was indicated that certain hypogeous fungi are attacked by members 
of this genus. 
White gelatinous pustules found amongst the fruit-bodies of Stereum 
sanguinolentum (p. 176) have a hard white centre. On examination these j 
nuclei’ are aborted structures of the stereum covered in the jelly- I 
fungus Tremella encephala Persoon. This fungus is apparently parasitic; 
it is closely related to Tremella foliacea and T. mesenterica described on 
page 184. 

G. APPENDIX 
(i) Species list of specialised habitats 
INTRODUCTION 
Although some fungi prefer one type of woodland more than another 
many fungi are less specialised and may be found in all kinds of woods. 
Indeed many fungi which we usually associate with a woodland 
fungus flora can also be commonly seen in pastures and gardens, e.g. 
Laccaria laccata (Fries) Cooke, Hygrophoropsis aurantiaca (Fries) Maire. 
It is useful to consider the fungi of different woodland types separ- 
ately, but this in some cases is very difficult because some species are 
not exclusive; indeed some species may grow in completely contrasting 
habitats, e.g. Amanita muscaria (Fries) Hooker in both birch and conifer 
woods, or on contrasting substrates, e.g. Fames fomentarius (Fries) 
Kickx on birch in Scotland and beech on the continent of Europe. 
The picture becomes even more complex because frequently woods, 
in fact, often include several tree species growing in close proximity 
and it is then difficult to draw connections between a fungus and the 
tree with which it is truly growing — we know little or nothing except 
for mycorrhizal fungi, why certain fungi prefer certain habitats. 
A parallel example is that phenomenon seen in certain polypores 
which only attack twigs or branches and not stumps or trunks, whilst 
others grow exclusively on stumps. We know little of the reasons for 
these demarcations, even when they occur within the same host. 
Mycology, therefore, offers to the beginner and the professional many 
opportunities in physiology and ecology. 
In grassland areas it is difficult to know where to draw the line 
between one plant-community and another when listing species, for 
although ecologically distinct both would come under the name grass- 
land. In the field, however, this is often very obvious and there is 
little doubt that fungi can give just as accurate an indication as to the 
soil-type, as many mosses or vascular plants. In sand-dune systems, 
the mobile dunes offer a different ecological niche to that of the fixed 
dunes which in many ways resemble grasslands. Thus although the 
lists below are split into easily manageable units, some flexibility must 
still be allowed. It is meant only as a guide — and will differ in some 
cases from one place to another, even within the British Isles. 

250 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
General Woodland 
Agan'cus silvicola (Vitt.) Peck 
Amanita citrina S. F. Gray 
A. excelsa (Fries) Kummer 
A. rnbescens (Fries) S. F. Gray 
A. vaginata (Fries) Vittadini 
Boletus calopus Fries 
B. erythropus (Fries) Secretan 
B. piper atus PTies 
Cantharellus infiindibuliformis Fries 
Clitocybe clavipes (Fries) Kummer 
C. fragrans (Fries) Kummer 
C. nebularis (Fries) Kummer 
C. odora (Fries) Kummer 
CoUybia butyracea (Paries) Kummer 
C. confluens (Fries) Kummer 
C. dryophila (Fries) Kummer 
Hebeloma crustuliniforme (St Amans) 
Quelet 
Hygrocybe strangulatus (Orton) Moser 
Hygrophoropsis aurantiaca (Fries) 
Maire 
Inocybe eutheles (Berkeley & Broome) 
Quelet 
I.fastigiata (Fries) Quelet 
7. geophylla (Fries) Kummer 
Laccaria laccata (Fries) Cooke 
Lactarius mitissimus (PAies) Fries 
L. piper atus (Fries) S. P". Gray 
L. subdulcis (Fries) S. F. Gray 
Limacella glioderma (P'ries) Alaire 
Mycena filopes (Fries) Kummer 
M. galopus (Fries) Kummer 
M. pura (Fries) Kummer 
717. sangumolenta (Fries) Kummer 
717. vitilis (Fries) Quelet 
Paxillus involutus (Fries) Fries 
Ripartites tricholoma (Fries) Karsten 
Russula adusta (Fries) Fries 
R. atrnpurpurea (Krombholz) Britz. 
R. delica P'ries 
R. foetens (Fries) PAies 
R. nigricans (Merat) Fries 
R. ochroleuca (Secretan) Fries 
R. xeranipelina (Secretan) Fries 
Tricholoma argyraceum (St Amans) 
Gillet 
T. orirubens Quelet 
T. saponaceum (Fries) Kummer 
T. sciodes (Secretan) Martin 
T. terreum (Fries) Kummer 
T. virgatum (Fries) Kummer 
Tylopilus felleus (Fries) Karsten 
Hydnum repandum Fries 
Phallus impudicus Persoon 
Scleroderma citrinum Persoon 
A. verrucosum Persoon 
Leotia lubrica Persoon 
Microglossum viride (Fries) Gillet 
On wood 
Armillaria mellea (Fries) Kummer 
Crepidotus variabilis (Fries) Kummer 
Hypholoma fascicular e (Fries) Kum- 
mer 
77. sublateritium (Fries) Quelet 
Pluteus cervinus (Fries) Kummer 
Calocera cornea (Fries) Fries 
Coriolus versicolor (Fries) Quelet 
Merulius tremellosus Fries 
Schizophyllum commune Fries 
Steremn hirsutum (Fries) Fries 
S. rugosum (Fries) Fries 
Lycoperdon pyriforme Persoon 
Coryne sarcoides (S. F. Gray) Tulasne 
Cudoniella acicularis (Fries) Schroeter 
Nectria cinnabarina (Fries) Fries 
Xylosphaera hypoxylon Dumortier 
X. polymorpha (Merat) Dumortier 

APPENDIX 
251 
Conifer Woods 
characterised by species of Suillus, Chroo^nmphus, Gomphidius, several Lactarius 
sl|and Russula spp. 
S Aparicus sylvatica Secretan 
Amanita porphyria (Fries) Secretan 
Boletus hadius Fries 
B. pinicola Venturi 
Chroog07nphus rutilus (Fries) O. K. 
Miller 
Clitocybe flaccida (Fries) Kummer 
H C. langei Hora 
11 Collyhia distorta (Fries) Quelet 
' Cortinarius cal listens (Fries) Fries 
! C. gentilis (Fries) Fries 
: C. rnucosus (Fries) Kickx 
i C. pinicola P. D. Orton 
1 C. sanguineus (Fries) Fries 
C. setnisatiguineus (P'ries) Gillet 
; Cystodertna amianthinum (F'ries) 
Fayod 
; Gomphidius glutinosus (Fries) Fries 
' G. macidatus Fries 
' G. roseus (Fries) Karsten 
I Hygrophorus hypothejus (Fries) I'ries 
Hypholoma marginatum (Fries) 
Schroeter 
Inocyhe calamistrata (Fries) Gillet 
i Lactarius caniphoratus (Fries) Fries 
L. deliciosus (Fries) S. F. Gray 
L. helms (Fries) Fries 
L. rufus (Fries) Fries 
Leccinion vulpinum Watling 
Marasmius androsaceus (Fries) Fries 
Mycena adonis (Fries) S. F. Gray 
( = Hemimycena) 
M. amicta (Fries) Quelet 
M. capillaripes Peck 
M. coccinea Quelet 
M . ruhromarginata (Fries) Kummer 
M. vulgaris (Fries) Kummer 
Nolanea cetrata (Fries) Kummer 
N . cimeata Bresadola 
Rozites caperata (Fries) Karsten 
Russula caerulea Fries 
R. decolorans (Fries) Fries 
R. emetica (Fries) S. F'. Gray 
R. erythropus Peltereau 
R. nauseosa (Secretan) Fries 
R. obscura Romell 
R. paludosa Britz. 
R. quelet a Fries 
R. sardonia Fries 
Tricholoyna albobrunneum 
T. flavovirens (Fries) Lundell 
T. focal e (Fries) Ricken 
T. iynbricatum (Fries) Kummer 
T. z'accinum (Fries) Kummer 
Ramaria ochraceo-virens (Jungh.) 
Donk 
R. invallii (Cotton & Wakef.) Donk 
Sarcodon unbricatiun (Fries) Karsten 
Sparassis crispa (Wulfen) Fries 
Thelephora palmata (Bulliard) Patouil- 
lard 
T. terrestris Fries 
Geastrum pectination Persoon 
Hypogeous 
Rhizopogon luteolus Fries 
Elaphomyces granulatus Fries 
E. muricatus Fries 
On cones 
Baeospora myosura (Fries) S nger 
Strobilurus esculentus (Wulf. ex Fr.) 
Singer 
5. stephanocystis (Hora) Singer 
S. tenacellus (Fries) Singer 
Aiodscalpiton vulgar e S. F. Gray 
On conifer wood 
Gymnopilus penetrans (Fries) Murrill 
Hypholoma capnoides (Fries) Kummer 
Mycena alcalina (Fries) Kummer 
Lentinus tigrinus (Fries) Fries 
Paxillus atrotomentosus (Fries) Fries 

252 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
T 
P. panuoides (Fries) Fries 
Pholiota flamwans (Fries) Kummer 
Pleurotellus porrigens (Fries) Singer 
( = Pleurocybella) 
Pluteus atrotnarginatus Kiihner 
Tricholompsis rutilans (Fries) Singer 
Xeromphalina campanella (Fries) 
Mai re 
Calocera viscosa (Fries) Fries 
Dacrymyces st Hiatus Nees ex Fries 
Pseudohydniim gelatinosum (Fries) 
Karsten 
Gloeophyllu?ti sepiarium (Fries) Kar- 
sten 
Heterobasidion annosum (Fries) Brefeld 
Hirschioporus abietinus (Fries) Donk 
Laetiporus sulphur eus (Fries) Murrill 
Phaeolus schzveinitzii (Fries) Patouil- 
lard 
Stereum sanguinolentum (Fries) Fries 
Tremella encephala Persoon 
T. foliacea (Persoon) Persoon 
Tyromyces stipticus (Fries) Kotlaba & 
Pouzar 
Deciduous Woods General 
Amanita fulva Secretan 
A. inaurata Secretan 
A. virosa Secretan 
Boletus edulis Fries 
B. chrysenteron St Amans 
B. luridus Fries 
B. subtomentosus Fries 
Collybia peronata (Fries) Kummer 
Lactarius vellereus (Fries) Fries 
Russula cyanoxantha (Secretan) Fries 
R. grisea (Secretan) Fries 
R. heterophylla (Fries) Fries 
R. lutea (Fries) Fries 
R. ochroleuca (Secretan) Fries 
Tricholoma album (Fries) Kummer 
T. columbetta (Fries) Kummer 
T. saponaceum (Fries) Kummer 
T. sulphureum (Fries) Kummer 
Cantharellus cibarius Fries 
Clavulina cinerea (Fries) Schroeter 
C. cristata (Fries) Schroeter 
Hydnum repandum Fries 
Geastrum rufescens Persoon 
Lycoperdon perlatum Persoon 
Helvella crispa Fries 
H. elastica (St Amans) Boudier 
H. lacunosa Fries 
Disciotis venosa (Persoon) Boudier 
Paxina acetabulum (St Amans) 
Kuntze 
Peziza badia Merat 
P. succosa Berkeley 
On wood 
Coprinus disseminatus (Fries) S. F. 
Gray 
C. micaceus (Fries) Fries 
Crepidotus mollis (Fries) Kummer 
Galerina rnutabilis (Fries) P. D. Orton 
Gymnopilus junonius (Fries) P. D. 
Orton 
Mycena galericulata (Fries) S. F. 
Gray 
Oudemansiella radicata (Fries) Singer 
Pholiota squarrosa (Fries) Kummer 
Pleurotoid fungi (see p. 74) 
Psathyrella candolleana (Fries) R. 
Maire 
P. hydrophilum (Merat) Maire 
Coniophora puteana (Fries) Karsten 
Meripilus giganteus (Fries) Karsten 
Tremella mesenterica Hooker 
Beech Woods 
Afnanita citrina var alba Gillet 
Boletus edulis Fries 
B. satanus Lenz 
Collybia fuscopurpurea (Fries) 
Kummer 
Coprinus picaceus (Fries) S. F. Gray 
Cortinarius pseudosalor J. Lange 
C. bolaris (Fries) Fries 

APPENDIX 
253 
Hygrophorus chrysaspis Metrod 
Laccaria amethystea (Merat) Murrill 
Lactanus hlennius (Fries) Fries 
L. pallidus (Fries) Fries 
L. tabidus Fries 
Marasniius cohaerens (Fries) Cooke & 
Quelet 
. M. tvynnei Berkeley & Broome 
Mycena capillar is (Fries) Kummer 
» (on leaves) 
M. pelianthina (Fries) Quelet 
^ Russula alutacea (Fries) Fries 
R.fellea (Fries) Fries 
R. lepida Fries 
R. mairei Singer 
R. vireScens (Zantedschi) Fries 
Tricholoma ustale (Fries) Kummer 
'• Clavariadelphus pistillaris (Fries) 
Donk 
Geaster triplex Jungh 
G . fimbriatum Fries 
ir| 
Hypogeous 
Melanogaster variegatus Vittadini 
Tuber aestivum Vittadini 
? 
r I On wood 
Oudemansiella mucida (Fries) Hohnel 
O. radicata (Fries) Singer 
Panus torulosus (Fries) Fries 
Pholiota adiposa (Fries) Kummer 
Stropharia squamosa (Fries) Quelet 
Bjerkandera adusta (Fries) Karsten 
Datronia mollis (Fries) Donk 
Hiericium coralloides (Fries) S. F. 
Gray 
Lentinellus cochleatus (Fries) Karsten 
Pseudotrametes gibbosa (Fries) Bond. 
& Singer 
Bulgaria inqumans Fries (a large dark 
brown, gelatinous discomycete) 
Several pyrenomycetes are recorded 
and dealt with by J. Webster in a 
popular account published in The 
Naturalist, London 1953. PP- 1-16. 
Birch Woods 
Amanita crocea (Qu 61 et) Kiihner & 
Romagnesi 
Boletus edulis Fries 
Cortinarius armillatus (Fries) Fries 
C. crocolitus Quelet 
C. hemitrichus (Fries) Fries 
Lactarius glaiicescens Crossland 
L. glyciosmus (Fries) Fries 
L. lacunarum Hora 
L. torminosus (Fries) S. F. Gray 
L. turpis (Weinm.) Fries 
L. uvidus (Fries) Fries 
L. vietus (Fries) Fries 
Leccimwi holopus (Rostkovius) Watling 
L. roseofractum Watling 
L. scabrum (Fries) S. F, Gray 
L. variicolor Watling 
L. versipellis (Fries & Hok) Snell 
Russula aeruginea Lindblad ex Fries 
R. betularum Hora 
R. claroflava Grove 
R. gracillinia J. Schaeffer 
R. nitida (Fries) Fries 
R. pulchella Borszczow 
R. versicolor J. Schaeffer 
Tricholoma fidvum (Fries) Saccardo 
On wood 
Fo?nes fomentarius (Fries) Kickx 
Lenzites betulina (Fries) Fries 
Piptoporus betulinus (Fries) Karsten 
Oak Woods 
Amanita phalloides (Fries) Secretan 
Boletus albidus Rocques 
B. appendiculatus Fries 
B. pulverulentus Opatowski 
B. reticidatus Boudier 
B. versicolor Rostkovius 
Gyroporus castaneus (Fries) Qu 61 et 
Hygrophorus eburneus (Fries) Fries 

254 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Lactorius chrysorheus Fries 
L. quietus (Fries) Fries 
Leccinum quercinum (Pilat) Green & 
Watling 
Russula vesca Fries 
Tricholoma acerbiwi (Fries) Quelet 
Hypogeous 
Hymenogaster tener Berkeley & 
Broome 
On wood 
Mycena inclinata (Fries) Quelet 
Psathyrella obtusata (Fries) A. H. 
Smith 
Daedalea quercina Persoon 
Fistulina hepatica Fries 
Hynienochaete rubiginosa (Fries) 
Leville 
Peniophora quercina (Fries) Cooke 
Inonotus dryadeus (Fries) Murrill 
Stereum gausapatum (Fries) Fries 
Specific Tree Species 
Alder 
Lactarius obscuratus (Lasch) Fries 
Naucoria eschar aides (Fries) Kummer 
N. scolecina (Fries) Quelet 
On wood 
Clavartade/phus fistulosus var. contorta 
(Fries) Corner 
Exidia glandulosa (St Amans) Fries 
Inonotus radiatus (Fries) Karsten 
Plicaturiopsis crispa (Fries) Reid 
Ash 
On wood 
Inonotus hispidus (Fries) Karsten 
Daldinia concentrica (Fries) Cesati & 
de Notaris 
Elder ; 
On wood 
Hirneola auricula-judae (St Amans) 
Berkeley 
Hyphodontia sambuci (Fries) J. Eriks- i 
son 
Elm 
On wood 
Lyophyllum ulmarius (Fries) Kiihner 
Rhodotus palmatus (Fries) Maire " 
Volvariella bombycina (Fries) Singer “ 
Rigidoporus ulmarius (Fries) Imaz " 
Hazel 
( 
Lactarius pyrogalus (Fries) Fries 
Leccinwn carpini (R. Schulzer) Reid 
On wood 
Hymenochaete corrugata (Fries) Leville 
Sarcoscypha coccinea (Fries) Lambotte 
(red discomycete occurring in 
early spring) 
Hawthorn 
Entoloma clypeatum (Fries) Kummer i 
On wood j 
Pholiota squarrosa (Fries) Kummer 
Phellinus pomaceus (Persoon) Maire j 
Stereum purpureum (Fries) Fries ; 
Hornbeam ' 
Lactarius circellatus Fries I 
Leccinum carpini (R. Schulzer) Reid 1 
Poplar I 
Lactarius controversus (Fries) Fries | 
Leccinum aurantiacum (Fries) S, F. 
Gray 

APPENDIX 
255 
L. duriusculum (Schulzer) Singer 
Mitromorpha hybrida (Fries) Leville 
>s) j On wood 
:s- Agrocybe cylindracea (Fries) Maire 
Pholiota destruens (Brondeau) Gillet 
Bjerkandera fumosa (Fries) Karsten 
Oxyporus popidinus (Fries) Donk 
Willow 
Hebeloma leucosarx P. D. Orton 
’ H. mesophaeum (Persoon) Quelet 
H. testaceum (Fries) Quelet 
Lactarius lacunarum Hora 
’ On wood 
Daedaleopsis rubescens (Fries) 
I Schroeter 
I Pluteus salicinus (Fries) Kummer 
Phellinus igniarius (Fries) Quelet 
^ Trametes suaveolens (Fries) Fries 
' Grasslands 
1 
Agaricus arvensis Secretan 
A. campestris Fries 
A. macrosporus (Moeller & Schaeffer) 
Pilat 
Agrocybe seniiorbicularis (St Amans) 
Fayod 
I Calocybe gambosum (Fries) Singer 
C. carneum (Fries) Kummer 
Cantharelhda umbonata (Fries) Singer 
Clitocybe dealbata (Fries) Kummer 
C. ericetorum Quelet 
C. rivulosa (Fries) Kummer 
Clitopdus prunulus (Fries) Kummer 
Dermoloma atrocinereum (Fries) P. D. 
Orton 
D. cuneifolium (Fries) Singer 
Entoloma porphyrophaeum (Fries) Kar- 
sten 
Hygrocybe aurantiosplendens R. Haller 
H. berkeleyi (P. D. Orton) Orton & 
Watling 
H. chlorophana (Fries) Karsten 
H. coccinea (Fries) Kummer 
H. conica (Fries) Kummer 
H. calyptraeformis (Berkeley & 
Broome) Fayod 
H. flavescens (Kauffman) Singer 
H. marchii (Bresadola) Singer 
H. nivea (Fries) Orton & Watling 
H. nitrata (Pers.) Wunsche 
H. obrussea (Fries) Fries 
H. pratensis (Fries) Donk 
H. psittacina (Fries) Wunsche 
H. punicea (Fries) Kummer 
H. reai (Maire) J. Lange 
H. russocoriacea (Berkeley & Miller) 
Orton & Watling 
H. splendidissima (P. D. Orton) Moser 
H. unguinosa (Fries) Karsten 
H. virginea (Fries) Orton & Watling 
Lepiota procera (Fries) S. F. Gray 
Lepista luscina (Fries) Singer 
L. saeva (Fries) P. D. Orton 
Leptonia griseocyanea (Fries) P. D. 
Orton 
L. incana (Fries) Gillet 
L. sericella (Fries) Barbier 
L. serrulata (Fries) Kummer 
Leucoagaricus naucina (Fries) Singer 
Melanoleuca strictipes (Karsten) J. 
Schaeffer 
Mycena flavoalba (Fries) Quelet 
M. leptocephala (Fries) Gillet 
M. fibula (Fries) Kiihner 
M. swartzii (Fries) A. H. Smith 
Nolanea papillata Bresadola 
N. sericea (Merat) P. D. Orton 
N . staurospora Bresadola 
Psathyrella atomata (Fries) Quelet 
Rhodocybe popinalis (Fries) Singer 
Clavaria fumosa Fries 
C. vermicidaris Fries 
Clavidinopsis corniculata (Fries) 
Corner 
C.fusiformis (Fries) Corner 
C. helvola (Fries) Corner 
Bovista nigrescens Persoon 
B. plumbea Persoon 
i 

256 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Calvatia utriformis (Fries) Jaap 
C. excipuliformis (Fries) Perdeck 
Corynetes atropurpureus (Fries) 
Durand 
Geoglossum cookeianum Nannfeldt 
G. glutinosum Fries 
G. nigritun Cooke 
Trichoglossmn hirsutum (Fries) Boudier 
Lawns: Wasteland: Hedgerows 
Agaricus hortensis (Cooke) Pilat 
A. bisporus (J. Lange) Pilat 
A. xanthodermus Genevier 
Agrocybe dura (Fries) Singer 
A. erebia (Fries) Kiihner 
A. praecox (Fries) Fayod 
Coprinus comatus (Fries) S. F. Gray 
C. acurninatus (Romagnesi) P. D. 
Orton 
C. atramentarius (Fries) Fries 
C. micaceus (Fries) Fries 
C. plicatilis (Fries) Fries 
Flammulaster granulosa (J. Lange) 
Watling 
Lacrymaria velutina (Fries) Konrad & 
Maublanc 
Lepiota cristata (Fries) Kummer 
L.friesii (Lasch) Quelet 
L. rhacodes (Vittadini) Quelet 
Lepista nuda (Fries) Cooke 
L. sordida (Fries) Singer 
Lyophyllum connatum (Fries) Singer 
L. decastes (Fries) Singer 
Marasmius oreades (Fries) Fries 
Melanophyllum echinatum (Fries) 
Singer 
Mycena olivaceomarginata (Massee) 
Massee 
M. fibula (Fries) Kiihner 
M. suartzii (Fries) A. H. Smith 
Panaeolus fimicola (Fries) Quelet 
P. foenisecii (Fries) Schroeter 
Psathyrella gracilis (Fries) Quelet 
P. squamosa (Kars'ten) Moser 
Tubaria furfuracea (Fries) Gillet 
T. pellucida (Fries) Gillet 
Volvariella speciosa (Fries) Singer 
Langermannia gigantea (Persoon) 
Lloyd 
Aleuria aurantia (Fries) Fuckel 
Morchella esculenta St Amans 
Verpa conica Persoon 
On herbaceous material 
Coprinus urticicola (Berkeley & 
Broome) Buller 
Panaeolus subbalteatus (Berkeley & 
Broome) Saccardo (in middens) 
Crucibulum laeve (de Candolle) 
Kambly 
Cyathus olla Persoon 
Helicobasidium brebissonii (Des- 
mazieres) Donk 
Pistillaria micans (Persoon) Fries 
P. quisquilliaris Fries (on bracken 
stems) 
In greenhouses 
Lepiota rhacodes var. hortensis Pilat 
Leucocoprinus cepaestipes (Fries) 
Patouillard 
L. birnbaummii (Corda) Singer 
L. brebissonii (Godey) Locquin 
L. denudatus (Rabenhorst) Singer 
L. lilacinogranulosus (Henning) Loc- 
quin 
Psilocybe cyanescens Wakefield 
Near out-buildings, stables, etc. 
Anthurus archeri (Berkeley) E. Fischer 
Asteroe ruber La Billardiere 
Clathrus ruber Persoon 
Lysurus australiensis Cooke & Massee 
Queletia mirabilis Fries 

APPENDIX 
257 
Specialised habitats 
(a) Dung 
Bolbitius vitellinus (Fries) Fries 
Conocybe coprophila (Kiihner) Kiihner 
C. pubescens (Gillet) Kiihner 
C. rickenii (J. Schaeffer) Kiihner 
Coprinus cinereus (Fries) S. F. Gray 
C. ephemeroides (Fries) Fries 
C. macrocephalus (Berkeley) Berkeley 
C. patouillardii Quelet 
C. narcoticus (Fries) Fries 
C. niveus (Fries) Fries 
C. pellucidus Karsten 
C . pseudoradiatus Kiihner & Josserand 
C. radiatus (Fries) S. F. Gray 
Panaeolus semiovatus (Fries) Lundell 
P. sphinctrinns (Fries) Quelet 
Psathyrella coprobia (J. Lange) A. H. 
Smith 
Psilocybe coprophila (Fries) Kummer 
P. merdaria (Fries) Quelet 
Stropharia semiglobata (Fries) Quelet 
Pyrenomycetes : Genera — Sordaria; 
Podospora; Sporormia ; Delitschia. 
Discomycetes : Genera — Cheilymenia; 
Ascobolus; Coprobia. 
A key to the common dung fungi is 
given in Bull. British Myc. Society, 
1968 by Watling & Richardson. 
(b) Burnt patches 
Aureoboletus cramesinus (Secretan) 
Watling 
Coprinus angulatus Peck 
C. lipophilus Romagnesi & Heim 
Hebeolojna anthracophilum Maire 
Mycena leucogala (Cooke) Saccardo 
Myxomphalina maura (Fries) Hora 
Pholiota highlandensis (Peck) A. H. 
Smith 
Psathyrella pennata (Fries) Pearson & 
Dennis 
Tephrocybe arthracophila (Lasch) P. 
D. Orton 
T. ambusta (Fries) Donk 
T. atrata (Fries) Donk 
Coltricia perennis (Fries) Murrill 
Anthracobia macrocystis (Cooke) 
Boudier 
A. maurilabra (Cooke) Boudier 
A. melaloma (Fries) Boudier 
Ascobolus carbonarius Karsten 
Geopyxis carbonaria (Fries) Saccardo 
Lamprospora astroidea (Hazslinzky) 
Boudier 
Peziza echinospora Karsten 
P. petersii Berkeley & Curtis 
P. praetervisa Bresadola 
P. violacea Persoon 
Pyronema omphalodes (St Amans) 
Fuckel 
Tricharia gilva Boudier 
Trichophaea woolhopeia (Cooke & 
Phillips) Boudier 
(c) Sand-dunes 
Agaricus bernardii Qu 61 et 
A. devoniensis P. D. Orton 
Conocybe dunensis P. D. Orton 
Eccilia nigella Quelet 
Hygrocybe conicoides P. D. Orton 
Inocybe devoniensis P. D. Orton 
I. dulcamara (Persoon) Kummer 
I. dunensis P. D. Orton 
I. halophila Heim 
I. serotina Peck 
Laccaria maritima (Theodowicz) 
Singer 
Psathyrella ammophila (Durieu & 
Leville) P. D. Orton 
Stropharia albocyanea (Desmariezes) 
Quelet 
Geaster striatum de Candolle 
Tulostoma brumale Persoon 
Vascellum depression (Bonorden) 
Smarda 
Phallus hadriani Persoon 

IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
258 
Corynetes orenarius (Rostrup) Durand 
Peziza ammophila Durieu & Mon- 
tagne 
(d) Heathland 
Cystoderma amianthimon (Fries) 
Fayod 
Entoloma helodes (Fries) Kummer 
E. madidiim (Fries) Gillet 
Galerina mniophila (Lasch) Kiihner 
G. praticola (Moeller) P. D. Orton 
G vittaeformis (Fries) Moser 
Hygrophoropsis aurantiaca (Fries) 
Mai re 
Hygrocyhe cantharella (Schweintz) 
Murrill 
H. lacma (Fries) Orton & Watling 
H. laeta (Fries) Kummer 
H. ovina (Fries) Kiihner 
El. subradiata (Secretan) Orton & 
Watling 
H. turunda (Fries) Karsten 
Hypholoma ericaeuni (Fries) Kiihner 
H. subericaeum (Fries) Kiihner 
Mycena epipterygia (Fries) S. F. 
Gray 
M. olivaceomarginata (Massee) Massee 
Omphalina velutina (Quelet) Qu61et 
Clavaria argillacea (Persoon) Fries 
Lycoperdon foetidum Bonorden 
(e) Marshes 
Cortinarius uliginosus Berkeley 
Coprinus friesii Quelet (on grass- 
stems) 
C. martinii P. D. Orton (on Juncus) 
Entoloma sericatum (Britz.) Saccardo 
(under birches) 
Galerina jaapii Smith & Singer 
G. paludosa (Fries) Kiihner 
G. sphagnorum (Fries) Kiihner 
G. tibiicystis (Atkinson) Kiihner 
Hygrocybe cantharella (Schweinitz) 
Murrill 
H. coccineocrenata (P. D, Orton) > 
Aioser 
H. turunda (Fries) Karsten (. 
Hypholoma elongatum (Fries) Ricken 'f 
H. uduni (Fries) Kiihner | 
Laccaria proxima (Boudier) Patouil- T *''' 
lard ^ 
Marasmius menieri Boudier on Typha ;;,ll 
Mycena belliae (Johnston) P. D. ^ 
Orton on Phragmites 
M. bulbosa (Cejp) Kiihner on Juncus ^ ■'? 
M. integrella (Fries) S. F. Gray on ^ 
Cladium i ' 
Omphalina ericetorum (Fries) M. 
Lange ‘f : 
O. oniscus (Fries) Quelet 
O. philonotis (Lasch) Quelet h Jin 
O. sphagnicola (Berkeley) Moser 
Pholiota myosotis (Fries) Singer ij 
Psathyrella sphagnicola (Maire) Favre h 
Tephrocybe palustris (Peck) Donk I] 
'P 
Cudoniella clavus (Fries) Dennis 
Mitrula paludosa Fries |;i 
Scutellinia scutellata (St Amans) Lam- ^ 
botte (with bright red disc and p 
conspicuous brown hairs at the | 
margin) 
Vibrissea tr uncorum Fries (an orange- f| 
capped fungus with a black stem) | 
(f) Mountain tops S 
Amanita nivalis Greville | 
Cortinarius anomalus (Fries) Fries 1 
C. cinnamomeus (Fries) Fries | 
C. tabularis (Fries) Fries , 
Russula alpina (Blytt) Moeller & 
Schaeffer 
R. xerampelina var. pascua Favre 
(g) Mossy areas on the ground, rocks | 
or stumps i 
Galerina hypnorum (Fries) Kiihner | 
G. mniophila (Lasch) Kiihner 7 
G. mycenopsis (Fries) Kiihner | 
G. praticola Moeller | 

APPENDIX 
259 
f G. unicolor (Sommerf.) Singer (often 
on wood) 
Leptoglossum lobatus (Fries) Ricken 
L. retirugis (Fries) Kiihner & Romag- 
nesi 
Mycena corticola (Fries) Ricken (on 
wood) 
M. hiemalis (Fries) Quelet (on wood) 
M. olida Bresadola (on wood) 
Omphalina rickenii Hora 
Cyphella muscigena (Pers.) Fries 
Cyphellostereum levis (Fries) Reid 
! Neottiella rutilans (Fries) Dennis 
(h) Hypogeous fungi 
j Melanogaster variegatus Vittadini 
Rhizopogon luteolus Fries 
R. Tulasne 
Elaphomyces gramilatus Fries 
E. muricatiis Fries 
Gyrocratera ploettneriana Hennings 
Hydnotrya tiilasnei Berkeley & Broome 
Melanogaster variegatus Vittadini 
Tuber aestivum Vittadini 
T. rufum Fries 
(i) On rotten fungi 
Nyctalis asterophora Fries 
N. parasitica (Fries) Fries 
Collybia cirrhata (Fries) Kummer 
C. cookei (Bresadola) J. D. Arnold 
C. tuber osa (Fries) Kummer 

26 o 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
(ii) Glossary of technical terms 
Specialised colours are placed in capitals 
Adnate (of the gills or tubes), broadly attached to the stem at least 
for one quarter of their length. See p. 267. 
Adnexed (of the gills or tubes), narrowly attached to the stem by less 
than one quarter of their length. See p. 267. 
Amygdaliform (of the spore), almond-shaped. 
Amyloid (of the spore-walls, spore-ornamentation or hyphal walls), 
greyish or bluish or blackish violet in solutions containing iodine. 
Apiculus (of the spore), the short peg-like structure at the basal end 
of the spore by which it is attached to the basidium. See Fig. 5, p. 15. 
Arcuate-decurrent (of the gills or tubes), curved and extending down the 
stem. See p. 267. 
Ascus, a clavate to cylindrical or subglobose cell in which the (asco-) 
spores are borne, usually in eights. 
Basidium, a clavate or subcylindrical cell on which the (basidio-) 
spores are borne, externally on stalks. See Fig. 5, p. 15. 
Cap (of the fruit-body), that structure which bears the spore-bearing 
layers beneath it {= pileus). 
Caespitose (of the fruit-body), aggregated into tufts. 
C 1 NI\ AMO N- BROW N, the colour of cinnamon powder obtainable 
from the grocer. 
Clavate (of the stem, or cystidia), club-shaped. 
Convex (of the cap), curving outwards. See Plate 9, p. 55. 
Cortex (of the cap or stem), outer layers of the tissue. 
Cortina, a cobweb-like veil at first connecting the margin of the cap 
and stem, but at maturity often only present as remnants on the 
stem and or cap-margin. See p. 267. 
Cystidium, a differentiated terminal cell usually on the surface and 
edges of the cap, gill and stem: facial cystidia occurring on the gill- 
face; marginal cystidia occurring on the gill-margin. See Fig. 4, p. 15. 
l)ATE-BRO]\ N, the colour of packed dates. 
Decurrent (of the gills and tubes), with a part attached to and descen- 
ding down the stem. See p. 267. 

GLOSSARY OF TECHNICAL TERMS 
261 
Deliquescent (of the gills, cap or entire fruit-body), changing into a 
liquid at maturity. 
Depauperate poorly developed. 
Depressed (of the cap), having the central portion sunken, and (of the 
tubes) sunken about the apex of the stem. See Plate i, p. 29. 
Dentate see toothed. 
Distant (of the gills), greater than their own thickness apart. 
Divergent (of the gill-trama in transverse longitudinal section), with 
the hyphae curving downwards and outwards on both sides of a 
central zone as if combed. See Fig. 9A, p. 17. 
Ellipsoid (of the spores), elliptic in outline in all planes. 
Emarginate (of the gills), notched near the stem. See Sinuate, p. 263. 
Excentric (of the cap), laterally placed on the stem. 
Expallent (of the cap), becoming paler when drying. 
Expanded (of the cap), opened out when mature. See Plate 10, p. 61. 
F'ibrillose (of the cap and stem-surfaces), almost smooth but for distinct 
parallel longitudinal filaments (fibrils). 
Eleshy (of the fruit-body), of a rather soft consistency: readily decaying. 
Floccose, with loose, cottony surface; diminutive — flocculose. 
Eree (of the gills and tubes), not attached to the stem. See p. 267. 
Erondose trees, broad-leaved trees. 
Fruit-body, the whole agaric (toadstool or mushroom, polypore, etc.), 
as usually understood. 
Germ-pore, a differentiated apical, usually thin-walled portion of the 
spore. See Fig. 5, p. 15. 
Gill, the structure on which the reproductive tissue is borne in agarics, 
resembling plates. 
Globose (of the spore), round in outline in all planes. 
Glutinous (of the cap or stem), provided with a sticky jelly-like coating. 
Heterornerous (of the cap and stem-flesh), with discrete nests of rounded 
cells in a background of filamentous cells: characterises members of 
the Russulaceae. See Fig. loB, p. 17. 
Homoiomeroiis (of the cap and stem-flesh), not sharply differentiated 
into two types of cells, although some may be swollen: characterises 
agarics other than members of the Russulaceae. See Fig. loA, p. 17. 
Hygrophanous (of the cap), translucent when wet, opaque and often 
paler on drying. 
Hymenium, the superficial layer of cells in which basidia occur. See 
Fig. 9A-D, p. 17. 

262 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Hyaline, appearing as if clear glass. 
Hypogeous, growing under ground. 
Hypha, a fungus filament composed of a chain of several cells; plural— 
hyphae; adjective — hyphal. 
Inverse, (of the gill-trama in transverse longitudinal section), with the 
hyphae curving upwards and outwards on both sides of a central 
zone. See Fig. 9B, p. 17. 
Irregular (of the gill-trama in transverse longitudinal section), lacking 
any clear pattern as to hyphal arrangement. See Fig. 9D, p. 17. 
Mealy, covered in powdery granules, resembling meal. 
Mycelium, a mass of fungus-filaments (hyphae). 
Mycorrhiza, a symbiotic association of a fungus and the roots of a 
higher plant. 
Non-amyloid (of the spore-wall, spore-ornamentation and hyphal walls), 
remaining uncoloured or becoming yellowish in solutions containing 
iodine. 
OCHRACEOUS, bright clay-colour: colour of ochre (yellow-brown). 
OLIVACEOUS BROWN, a dull clay-brown with an additional but 
distinct hint of dirty green. 
Plano-convex (of the cap), regularly rounded although almost flat. See 
Plate 13, p. 67^ — adult fruit-body. 
Pruinose (of the cap and stem-surfaces), finely powdered. 
Pubescent (of the cap and stem-surfaces), with short, soft hairs. 
Putrescent (of the fruit-body), soft and very easily decaying. 
Pyriform (of the spore), pear-shaped. 
Regular (of the gill-trama in transverse longitudinal section), with 
hyphae showing no distinct curvature and practically parallel to the 
gill-surfaces. See Fig. 9C, p. 17. 
Remote (of the gills or tubes), separate from the stem by a zone of cap- 
flesh. See p. 267. 
Resupmate (of the fruit-body, spore-bearing tissue facing outward and 
attached to support by what would have been the cap had the fungus 
been a normal agaric. 
Ring, a girdling veil on the stem. See p. 267. 
Rugulose (of a surface), covered in small wrinkles. 
RU ST-BROWN , the colour of rusty iron. 
Saprophyte (of an organism), using dead material for active growth. 
Scurfy (of the cap and stem surfaces), with small irregular loosely 
attached scales. 

GLOSSARY OF TECHNICAL TERMS 
263 
Sessile (of the fruit-bodies), lacking a stem. 
Septate (of the structural units of the fruit-body), with cross-walls; 
septum — cross-wall. 
Sinuate (of the gills), having a concave indentation of that part of the 
edge nearest the stem. See Plate 32, p. iii. 
SNUFF-BROWN, a dull dark clay-brown said to resemble the colour 
of snuff. 
Spore-print (or deposit), the mass of spores obtained by allowing the 
fruit-body to discharge its spores at maturity. 
Stem (of the fruit-body), that structure which supports the cap ( = 
stipe). 
Sterile, a tissue or structure not involved in the reproductive process, 
or failing to take part. 
Sterigma, the point-like structure at the apex of the basidium actually 
bearing the spores. 
Striate (of a surface), having minute furrows or lines. 
Subdecurrent (of the gills or the tubes), having the gill-attachment 
extending slightly down the stem. See p. 267. 
TAWNY, sand-coloured. 
Tomentose (of the cap and stem surfaces), densely matted and woolly. 
Toothed (of the gills or cap-margin), as if with teeth (= dentate). 
Trama (of the gills), the tissue between the layers bearing basidia 
(hymenia). 
Umbilicate (of the cap), having a central, small depression. See p. 267. 
Umbonate (of the cap), provided with a broad, flattened, raised centre 
(the umbo). 
Uncinate (of the gills), emarginate, but with a long descending decurrent 
tooth because the cap does not expand. See Plate 14, p. 69. 
Veil, a general term for the tissues which protect the whole or part of 
the developing fruit-body. 
Viscid (of the cap or stem), very slippery to the touch. 
Volva, a persistent cup-like structure at the base of the stem. See p. 267. 
Waxy (of the gills), lustrous because they are thick and watery. 

264 
Illustrations 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Text-figures and line-drawings of the greater number of the fungi 
mentioned in the text have been included in the book. It is impossible 
to supply colour pictures of a high quality in a book such as this 
without raising the price of the publication astronomically. The plates 
in six easily obtainable popular books have been used to represent 
whenever possible the fungus described in the text, as accurate colour 
illustrations are very useful in identification. The titles of these books 
have been abbreviated for clarity. 
Abbreviations for illustrations used throughout the text 
F Findlay, W. P. K. (1967), Wayside and Woodland Fungi, London. 
Hvass — Hvass, E. & H. (1961), Mushrooms and Toadstools in Colour, 
London. 
LH— Lange, M. & Hora, F. B. (1963), Collins Guide to Mushrooms 
and Toadstools, London. 
NB— Nicholson, B. E. & Brightman, F. H. (1966), Oxford Book of 
Flowerless Plants, Oxford. 
WD— Wakefield, E. & Dennis, R. W. G. (1950), Common British 
Fungi, London. 
Z — Zeitlmayr, L. (1968), Wild Mushrooms, London. 
(iii) Fairy rings 
Object: To assess the annual radial growth of fairy-rings and to cor- 
relate this with any obvious environmental change. 
Materials: Graph and tracing papers, tape-measures, note-book, 
pencil and rule, small pieces of cane about four inches long and 
coloured dye (e.g. Eosin solution, Janus Green). 
Method : Select a fairy-ring on the school cricket pitch or hockey 
pitch, school lawn, local golf course or park at a time when the 
fruit-bodies are first visible. Carefully mark the centre of the ring 
by driving into the soil a piece of cane until the top is only just 
visible. Plot this point on graph paper and relate it to any prominent 
feature nearby, e.g. post, tree or hedge. 
Carry out weekly observations throughout the fruiting season 

FAIRY RINGS 
265 
plotting the individual fruit-bodies on tracing paper, which is trimmed 
so as to make a replica of the original graph-sheet. A small dab of 
coloured dye placed on a fruit-body will assist one in recognising 
fruit-bodies from previous observations. During the fruiting season 
observe and plot the zones of diflferently coloured vegetation 
devise some method of describing (and measuring) these colours 
perhaps by comparison with a colour-chart, printed or hand pre- 
pared. Continue observations on the ring at monthly or fortnightly 
intervals after the disappearance of the fruit-bodies, and record 
subsequent changes in the vegetation for twelve months. 
This project can be continued for several years and for different 
species of fungus. Weather conditions may be noted simultaneously 
with the growth observations, or obtained from a reliable source of 
similar information close by. In this way not only is the increase 
in ring size measured but the results can be considered in the light 
of climatic data; fungal growth appears to be dependent on favour- 
able weather conditions. 
Further experiments: 
(i) Compare the effect that different species of agaric have on the 
same type of vegetation. 
(ii) Observe selected fairy-rings for several seasons then either 
apply fertilisers, particularly calcium-based fertilisers to the 
ring-area, or mow the vegetation. Note increase in fruit-body 
production, if any, changes in period of fructification or incresae 
in rate of ring development. 
(iii) Prepare transects across the fairy-ring and observe the species 
of flowering plants and mosses present, the differences between 
species in the two stimulated zones, and the colonisation of the 
dead zone by annuals and later perennial grasses and herbs. 
(iv) To the soil from each zone apply simple soil-dilution plate- 
methods for the culture and isolation of soil fungi and bacteria. 
Compare the results with those obtained by similar methods 
from soil without the fairy-ring. 

266 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
[t 
(iv) Development of the agaric fruit-body 
In the soil or substrate the hyphae of agarics frequently grow in close 
contact with each other, indeed the intertwining of such hyphae to 
form small knots is common in many fungi. In these intertwining 
hyphae, those close together divide and branch, later branching again 
to form a heap of tissue. The fruit-body develops from, or within, this '* 
knot and at its earliest stage is usually covered by loosely branched and , 
irregularly arranged hyphae. To the unaided eye the primordium, for * 
this is what such a structure or early beginning is called, appears to 
be enveloped in a mass of pale hyphal strands, often giving the fruit- 
body a woolly appearance when seated on the soil, wood, herbaceous * 
debris, etc. If more than one primordium develops in close proximity, 
usually all but one abort early in development, or they remain checked 
in formation at this stage until those closeby have matured. Some 
species which grow on wood are caespitose, that is clustered together, 
and in these cases all or many more of the primordia develop fully 
and simultaneously. 
Often it is possible to search and find these primordia in the fields 
and woods, and if they are examined under the low-power of a micro- 
scope it is possible to study how the fruit-body subsequently develops 
from its small beginnings and the part played by the ring and volva ^ 
in the development determined. Thus the origin of the veil can be 
located, its development followed as well as its disintegration. When 
the fungus is grown in pure culture on sterile dung, or soil, or wood, 
or simply on artificial media prepared in the laboratory the full sequence 
of events can be more easily followed. This is how the professional 
mycologist conducts his observations. By very careful studies it has 
been found in recent years that the development of the fruit-body, 
the origin of the gills, etc. can assist in the classification of the higher 
fungi. Thus some species have no protective tissue around the deve- 
loping gills (gymnocarpic) whilst others have one or even two, simple i 
or complex, tissues around the developing gills or pores (hemiangio- 
carpic). It is these tissues which give rise to the ring, volva, cortina, 
etc. This most exciting part of the study of the higher fungi is illus- t 
trated in the accompanying figures (Figs. 12 & 13) along with the various 

Depressed (umbilicate) 
H Subdecurrent 
Gill attachment 

268 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
types of gill-attachment mentioned in the text (Fig. ii A-H). If the 
agaric has two tissues surrounding it as the cap expands and matures, 
first the outer tissue or skin breaks leaving pieces on the stem and/or 
cap and then the second skin breaks as the cap expands still further. 
The last skin leaves remnants on the stem and sometimes bits and 
pieces at the cap margin. Only now can the agaric shed its spores from 
the fully exposed gills. 

REFERENCES 
269 
(v) References 
A. Reference Texts 
Some references have already been given on p. 264. Findlay, Hvass 
& Hvass, Lange & Hora, Nicholson & Brightman, Wakefield and 
Dennis and Zeitlmayr. 
In addition to these the following texts are suggested : 
Henderson, D. M., Orton, P. D. & Watling, R. (1969). British Fungus 
Flora: Agarics and Boleti: Introduction, H.M.S.O., Edinburgh. 
Hennig, E. (1958-60). Handbuch fiir Pilzfreunde, Jena (in German). 
Haas, H. (1969). The Young Specialist looks at Fungi, London. 
Pilat, A. & Usak, O. (1951). Mushrooms, London. 
Pilat, A. & Usak, O. (1961). Mushrooms and other fungi, London. 
Ramsbottom, J. (1951). Handbook of Larger fungi, London. 
Ramsbottom, J. (1953). Mushrooms and Toadstools, New Naturalist, 
London. 
Romagnesi, H. (1963). Petit Atlas des Champignons, Bordas (in French). 
Smith, A. H. (1963). Mushroom Hunters' Field-guide, Michigan. 
Wakefield, E. M. (1954). Observer's book of Common fungi, London. 
Watling, R. (1970). British Fungus Flora: Agarics & Boleti, Part /, 
H.M.S.O., Edinburgh. 
B. General Texts 
Talbot, P. M. B. (1971). Principles of Fungal Taxonomy, London. 
Webster, J. (1970). Introduction to Fungi, Cambridge. 
C. Journals 
Bulletin Trimestriel de la Societe Mycologique de France, Paris. 
(Official organ of the Erench Mycological Society.) 
Coolia, Leiden. (Official organ of the Dutch Mycological Society.) 
Mycologia, New York. (Official organ of the American Mycological 
Society.) 
Schweizerische Zeitschrift fur Pilzkunde. (Official organ of the Swiss 
Mycological Society.) 

270 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Transaciio 7 is of the British Mycological Society, (Official organ of the 
British Society: Hon. Sec. Dr B. E. Wheeler, Imperial College of 
Science and Technology Field Station, Silwood Park, Sunninghill, 
Ascot, Berks, also publishes a Bulletin intended for the amateur.) 
D. Advanced Texts 
Dennis, R. \^ . G., Orton, P. D. & Hora, F. B. (i960). New Check 
List of British Agarics and Boleti, suppl. Trans. British Mycological 
Soc. 
Moser, M. (1967). in Gams Kleine Kryptogamenflora, Band Ilb Stutt- 
gart (in German). 
Kiihner, R. & Romagnesi, H. (1953). Flore Analytique des Champignons 
Superieurs de France, Paris (in French). 
Rea, C. (1922). British Basidiomycetae, Cambridge. 
Revue de Mycologie (journal) Paris (in French). 

INDEX 
271 
INDEX 
Numbers in bold italics refer to pages with illustrations. 
Latin Names 
Agaricales 21 
Agaricus 23, 240 
Agaricus arvensis 108, Plate 31 
(109) 
bisporus 133, Plate 43 (134) 
carnpestris 108, Plate 31 (109) 
hortensis 133, Plate 43 (134) 
xanthodermus 108 
Agrocybe 23 
Aleurodiscus amorphus Plate 59 (177) 
Aleuria aurantia 198, Plate 67 (199) 
Alnicola 226 
Amanita 24, 56, 57, 100, 237 
A?nanita caesarea 56 
citrina 56, 57 
citrina var. alba 56 
excelsa 57 
fulva 56, 57, 58 
tnuscaria 54, Plate 9 (55), 56, 
57, 249 
nivalis 237 
pantharina 58 
phalloides 56, 57, 58 
porphyria 56 
rubescens 56, 57, 58 
vaginata 57, 58 
virosa 56 
Amanitopsis 57 
Amyloporia xantha 156 
Anthracobia 220 
Anthracobia macrocystis Plate 74 
( 221 ) 
Apiocrea chrysosperma 248 
Aphyllophorales 21, 135 
Armillaria 25 
Ar77iillaria 7nellea 59, 60, Plate 10 
(61) 
Astrosporina 84, 238 
Auricularia 179 
Auricularia judae 182 
77iesenterica 182, Plate 60 (183) 
Auriculariales 21, 179 
Auriscalpiaceae 158 
Auriscalpiivn 76, 137, 158, 160 
Auriscalpium vulgare 158, Plate 52 
(159) 
Ascobolus carbonarius Plate 74 (221) 
furfuraceus Plate 72 (215) 
Ascopha7ius 7nicrosporus Plate 72 
(215) 
Asterostro77ia laxu7n Plate 59 (177) 
Athelia viride 236 
Baespora 77iyosura 94 
Banker a 160 
Bankera fuligi7ioalbu7n 1 60 
Bjerkandera 138 
Bjerkandera adjusta 146 
Bolbitius 23 
Bolbitius vitellinus 207, Plate 70 
(209) 
Boletus 26, 28, 31, 32, 34, 35, 100 
Boletus badius 31, 32, Plate 3 (33), 
34 
chrysenteron 248 
edulis 32, 34, 35, 248 
erythropus 32 
parasiticus 35, Plate 64 (193), 
247 
purpureus 35 
sphaerocephalus 35 
subto77ie7itosus 248 
Botrydina vulgaris Plate 78 (235), 
236 
Botryobasidiimi conspersum Plate 59 
(177) 
Botryohypocluius isabellinus Plate 59 
(177) 
Bovista nigresce7is 190 
Byssonectria lateritia 247 
viridis 247 
Calocera 170, 180 
Calocera coruiea Plate 57 (169), 181 
viscosa Plate 57 (169), 170, 181 
Calocybe 101 

272 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Calocybe gambosum 110, Plate 32 
( 111 ) 
Calvatia caelata 190 
excipuliforrnis 190, Plate 63 
(191) 
saccata 190 
utriformis 190, Plate 63 (191) 
Camarophyllus 98 
Cantharellus 24, 106, 136 
Cantharellus cibarius 106, 162, 
Plate 54 (163), 246 
friesii 162 
Cantharellula 25 
Chaetorniiim globosmfi Plate 72 (215) 
Cheilyynenia 214 
Cheilymenia stercorea Plate 72 (215) 
Chondrostereum purpureum 176 
Chroogomphus 23, 36, 100 
Chroogomphus corallinus 36 
rutilus 36, Plate 4 (37) 
Claudopus 22, 77, 102 
Claudopus depluens 102 
parasiticus 77, 102 
Clavariadelphus 136 
Clavariadelphus pistillaris 172, 
Plate 58 (175) 
Clavaria 136, 173 
Clavaria argillacea 234, Plate 78 
(235) 
fiwwsa 168, Plate 56, (167) 
vermicidaris Plate 56 (167), 168 
Clavulina 136, 172 
Clavulina cinerea 166 
cristata 166, Plate 56 (167) 
rugosa 166, Plate 56 (167) 
Clavidinopsis 136, 168, 173 
Clavulinopsis corniculata Plate 57 
(169), 170, 173 
fusiformis Plate 56 (167), 168 
helvoJa Plate 56 (167), 168 
Clitocybe 25, 242 
Clitocybe clavipes 80, 81 
fragrans 80 
infundibuliforniis 80, Plate 19 
(81) 
langei 80 
nebularis 80 
Clitopilus 22, 77 
Clitopilus passackerianus 77 
prunulus 77, 101 
Collybia 26, 66, 86, 90, 92, 102, 120 
Collybia maculata 90, Plate 24 (91) 
peronata 92 
Coltricia 138 
Coniochaeta scatigena Plate 72 (215) 
Coniophora 136 
Coniophora puteana 156, Plate 51 
(157) 
Conocybe 23, 126 
Conocybe dunensis 242, Plate 80 (241) 
lactea 116 
niairei 228, Plate 76 (229) 
tenera 116, Plate 35 (117), 242 
Coprinus 23, 128, 207, 212, 218, 
Plate 71 (213) 
Coprinus angulatus 218, Plate 73 
(219) 
bisporus 212 
cinereus 211, 214, 218, Plate 71 
(213) 
coynatus 126, Plate 40 (127) 
ephemerus 212 
ephemer aides 212 
filamentifer 214 
fimetarius 211 
lagopides 218 
lagopus 211 
macrocephalus 211 
macrorhizus 211 
miser 212 
niveus 212 
patouillardii 212 
pellucidus 212 
pseudoradiatus 211, 214 
radiatus 211, 214 
urticicola 227, Plate 76 (229) 
vermiculifer 214 
Coprobia 214 
Coprobia granulata Plate 72 (215) 
Cora pavonia 237 
Cordyceps 206, 248 
Cordyceps capitata Plate 69 (205), 
206 
militaris Plate 69 (205), 206 
ophioglossoides Plate 69 (205), 
206 

INDEX 
273 
Coriolus 139 
Coriolus versicolor 145, Plate 46 
(147) 
Coriscium viride Plate 78 (235), 236 
Corticium fiiciforme 178 
Corticiaceae 136 
Cortinarius 23, 40, 42, 43, 44, 74, 
237 
Cortinarius sp. Cortinarius 43 
hydrocybe 43 
phlegmacium 43 
serioceocyhe 43 
telamonia 43 
Cortinarius anomalus 237 
armillatus 43 
elatior 40 
pinicola 40 
pseudosalor 40, Plate 6 (41), 
42 
violaceus 44 
Craterellus 24, 136 
Craterellus cornucopoides 164, Plate 
55 (165) 
sinuosus 164, Plate 55 (165) 
Crepidotus 22, 74, 102 
Crepidotus mollis Plate 17 (75), 
77, Plate 49 (153) 
Cristella farinacea Plate 59 (177) 
sulphurea Plate 59 (177) 
Crucihulum 186, 196 
Crucibidum laeve 196, Plate 66 (197) 
Cryptoderma 137 
Cryptoderma pini 150, Plate 48 
(151) 
Cyathipodia macropus Plate 68 
(201), 203 
Cyathus 186, 196 
Cyathus olla 196, Plate 66 (197) 
striatus 196, Plate 66 (197) 
Cystoderma amiantliinum 104, 
Plate 29 (105) 
carcharias 104 
cinnabarinum 104 
gramdosum 104 
Dacrymyces 180, 181 
Dacrymyces deliquescens 180 
stillatus 180, Plate 61 (185) 
Dacrymycetales 21, 180 
Daedalea 137 
Daedal ea quercina Plate 46 (145) 
Daedal eopsis 137 
Daldinia 204 
Daldinia concentrica 204, Plate 69 
(205) 
Datronia 138 
Datronia mollis 145, Plate 46 (147) 
Deconica 114 
Eccilia 22, 102, Plate 28 (103) 
Eccilia sericeonitida 102 
Elaphomyces Plate 69 (205), 206, 
237, Plate 81 (243) 
Elaphomyces granulatus 244, Plate 
81 (243) 
muricatiis 244, Plate 81 (243) 
Entoloma 22, 100, 101, Plate 28 
(103), 124 
Entoloma clypeatum 101 
Entoloma helodes 232, Plate 77 (233) 
Exidia 158, 179 
Exidia glandidosa 184, Plate 61 
(185) 
Femsjonia 180 
Fibuloporia 138, 156 
Fibidoporia vaillantii 156, Plate 51 
(157) 
Fistulina 137 
Fistulina hepatica 152 
Flammula 72, 217 
Plammida carbonaria 217 
Flammulaster granulosa 228, Plate 
76 (229) 
Flammulina 25 
Blammulina velutipes 66, Plate 13 
(67) 
Fomcs 137 
Fomes fomentarius 148, Plate 48 
(151), 249 
Fomitopsis 137 
Galerina 23, 224, 230 
Galerina calyptrata 231 
hypnorum 230, 231, Plate 78 
(235) 

274 
IDEXTII ICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
mniophila 231 
mycetjopsis 230, 231 
paludosa 224, Plate 75 (225) 
sp/iaifnoruiti 224, Plate 75 (225) 
tibiicystis 224, Plate 75 (225) 
vittaeforuiis 231, Plate 78 (235) 
Ganodcnna 137, 146 
Ganoderma applanatum 146 
Ganodcniia europaeum 146, 148, 
Plate 47 (147) 
Gasteromycetes 21, 186, 187 
Gcastrum 186, 192 
Geastnim rufcsceus 192, Plate 64 
(193) 
triplex 192 
Geoplossaceae 168 
Geoplossian 172, 206 
Geoglossiim cookciauum Plate 57 
(169) 
Geopyxis carhonoria Plate 74 (221) 
Gloeocvstidium porosum Plate 59 
(177) 
Gloeophyllum 137 
Gloeoporus 138 
Gompliidius 23, 34, 36 
Gomphidius gliitinosus 36 
macidatiis 36 
roseus 35, 36 
Grifola 139 
Gymnopiliis 23 
Gvtnnopilus penetrans 72, Plate 16 
(73) 
Gymnopiliis sapineus 72 
Gxroniitra escidenta Plate 68 (201), 
202 
Gyroporiis 26 
Hapalopilus 138 
Hebei onia 23, 82 
Hebelonia antliracopliila 218, Plate 
73 (219) 
crustnlinifonne 82, Plate 20 
(83: 
Helicobasidinni 179 
Helniintliosphaeria clai oriae 166 
Helvella 203 
Helvella crispa 202, Plate 68 (201 ) 
lacunosa 203, Plate 68 (201) 
Heterobasidion 137 
Heterobasidion annosiini 150, Plate 
46 (147), Plate 48 (151) 
Hirneola 179 
Hirneola aiiriciila-jiidae 182, Plate 
60 (183) 
Hirschioporiis 138 
Hygrocybe 25, 93, 100, 237 
Hygrocybe calyptraeforniis 98 
cliloropliana 98 
cinerea 95 
cocci nea 98 
conica 98, Plate 27 (99), 242 
conicoides 242, Plate 80 (241) 
flavescens 98 
I anna 95 
laeta 97 
lilacina 237 
nietapodia 100 
nit rat a 98 
nivea 95 
orina 98 
pratensis 95, Plate 26 (96), 100 
Hvgrocvbe psittacina 97, Plate 27 
'(99) ‘ 
piinicea 98, Plate 27 (99) 
riissocoriacea 95 
subradiata 95 
subviolacea 237 
unguinosa 98 
virginea 95 
Hydnelliwi 137, 160 
Hxdnellum scrobicidatuni 160, Plate 
'53 (161) 
Hydnnni 137, 160 
Hxdnuni repandiim 158, 160, Plate 
'53 (161) 
rufescens 160 
Hygrophoropsis 25 
Hxgroplwropsis aurantiaca 106, 
Plate 30 (109), 162, 249 
Hygropliorns 25, 97, 98 
Hygroplioriis agathosnnis 100 
bresadolae 100 
clirxsaspis 98, Plate 27 (99), 
100 
liedrychii 100 
liypothejus 100 

INDEX 
275 
pustulatus 100 
Hygrophoraceae 101, Plate 80 (241) 
Hymenochaete 136 
Hymenogaster 186, 243 
Hymenomycetes 21 
Hymenomycetous heterobasidiae 179 
Hyphoderma setigera Plate 59 (177) 
Hyphodontia 136 
Hyphodontia arguta Plate 59 (177) 
sambiicii Plate 59 (177), 178 
Hypholonm 24, 130, 222 
Hypholoma capnoides 64 
elongatum 222, Plate 75 (225) 
ericaeuni 234, Plate 78 (235) 
fasciciilare 64, Plate 12 (65) 
130 
lacrymabunda 130 
polytrichi 222 
sublateritium 64 
velntina 130 
Hypocrea pidvinata 248 
Hypocopra equorum Plate 72 (215) 
Hypomyces 248 
Hypomyces lactifluorum 247 
Inocybe 23, 84, 238 
Inocybe asterospora 84, Plate 21 (85) 
devoniensis 238, Plate 79 (239) 
dunensis 238, Plate 79 (239) 
geophylla 84 
var. geophylla 84, Plate 21 (85) 
var. lilacina 84 
halophila 238, Plate 79 (239) 
serotina 238, Plate 79 (239) 
lodophanus 214 
lodophamis carneus Plate 72 (215) 
Inonotus 138 
Inonotus hispidus 142, Plate 45 
(143) 
Laccaria 24, 242 
Laccaria amethystea 86 
bicolor 86 
laccata 86, Plate 22 (87), 242, 
249 
maritima 242 
proxiwa 86, Plate 22 (87), 242 
Lacrymaria 130 
Lacryoiaria pyrotricha 130 
velutina 128, Plate 41 (129), 
130 
Lactarius 46, 50, 52, 86, 237, 246, 
247 
Lactarius caniphoratus 52 
chrysorhacus 52 
deliciosiis 52, 247 
glyciosmus 53 
lacunarum 237 
quietus 52, 53 
rufus 52, 53 
torminosus 52, 53 
turpis 50, Plate 8 (51) 
uvidus 52 
Laetiporus 138 
Laetiporus sulphureus 140, Plate 44 
(141), Plate 46 (147) 
Lamprospora astroidea Plate 74 
(221) 
Langermannia gigantea 190, Plate 
63 (191) 
Lasiobolus ciliatus Plate 72 (215) 
Lasiosordaria coprophila Plate 72 
(215) 
Leccinum 26, 28, 34, 100 
Leccinum aurantiacum 34 
quercinum 34 
scabriwi 27, Plate 1 (29), 34 
Lentinellus 26, 74, 76, 137, 158 
Lentinellus cochleatus Plate 17 (75), 
76, 158 
Lentinus 26, 74 
Lentinus lepideus 76 
Lenzites 137 
Leotia lubrica 206 
Lepiota 24, 104 
Lepiota procera 112, Plate 33 (113) 
rachodes 112 
Lepista ?nida 131, Plate 42 (132) 
Leptonia 22, 102, Plate 28 (103), 
111 
Leptojxia babingtonii 227, Plate 76 
(229) 
serrulata 102 
Leptopodia elastica 203 
Leucopaxillus 25 
Limacium 98 

276 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Lycoperdou 186, 188 
Lycoperdon perlatum 180, Plate 62 
(189) 
foetidum 188 
pyriforme 188, Plate 62 (189) 
Lyophylluni connatiwi 128 
decastes 128 
Marasmius 26, 92, 120, 228 
Marasynius androsaceus 92, 120, 
231, Plate 77 (233) 
buxi 92, Plate 25 (93) 
epiphylloides 92, Plate 25 (93) 
graminujn 92, Plate 25 (93) 
hudsonii 92, Plate 25 (93) 
oreades 118, Plate 36 (119), 
120, Plate 37 (121) 
perforans 92 
peronatus 92 
undatus 92 
Melanogaster 243 
Melanoleuca 25, 78 
Melanoleuca melaleuca 78, Plate 18 
(79) 
Melanotus 77 
Melanotus bambusinus 77 
musae 77 
Meripilus 139 
Meripilus giganteus 144 
Meridius 136, 154 
Meridius treyuellosus 154, Plate 50 
(155) 
Micromphale 92 
Mitromorpha sennlibera Plate 68 
( 201 ), 202 
Mitrida paludosa 203 
Monilia sp. Plate 74 (215) 
Morchella 202 
Morchella elata 220 
esculenta 200, Plate 68 (201), 
202 
Multiclavula 236 
Mutinus 186 
Mutinus caninus 194, Plate 65 (195) 
Mycena 25, 68, 74, 88, 102, 104, 
247 
Mycena bidbosa 223, Plate 75 (225) 
epipterygia 237 
galericidata 68, Plate 14 (69), 88 
galopus 88 
haematopus 88, Plate 23 (89) 
leucogala 88, 217 
olivaceo-ynargmata 237 
sayiguinoleyita 88, Plate 23 (89) 
Mycoacia 137 
Myxoynphaliyia ynaura 236 
Naucoria 23, 226 
Naucoria escharoides 226, Plate 76 
(229) 
Nectria ciyinabarina 180 
Nenrospora sitophda 220, Plate 74 
(215) 
Nolayiea 22, 102, Plate 28 (103), 
124 
Nolayiea cetrata 102, 237 
sericea 122, Plate 38 (123), 124 
staurospora 101, 102, 122, 
Plate 38 (123) 
Nyctalis 24, 247 
Nyctalis asterophora Plate 81 (245), 
246 
parasitica Plate 81 (245), 246 
Odontia bicolor 236 
Oedocephahiyn Plate 74 (215) 
Oidiiwi conspersnm Plate 59 (119) 
Oyyiphalina 25, 100, 102, 232 
Oynphaliyia ericetorum 232, Plate 77 
(233), 236 
Oyyiphalina hudsoniana Plate 78 
(235), 236 
luteovitellina Plate 78 (235), 236 
sphagnicola 223, Plate 75 
(225), 236 
iinibellifera 232 
velutina 236 
icynyiiae 232 
Oudeniansiella 26 
Oxyporus 137 
Oxyporus popidinus 150, Plate 48 
(151) 
Panaeolma 126 
Panaeolina foenisecii 124, Plate 39 
(125), 126 

INDEX 
277 
Panaeolus 23, 126 
Panaeolus caynpamdatus 210 
rickenii 126 
semiovatus 208, Plate 70 (209), 
210 , 211 
sphinctrinus 126, Plate 70 (209), 
210, 211 
Panelliis 26, 74 
Panellus stipticus Plate 17 (75), 
76 
Panus 26, 74 
Panus torulosus 76 
Paxillus 23, 100 
Paxillus atrotoinentosus 38 
involutus 38, Plate 5 (39), 106 
panuoides 38 
rubicundulus 38 
Peniophora 136 
Peniophora lycii Plate 59 (177) 
polygonii Plate 59 (177) 
quercina Plate 59 (177) 
Peziza 200, 204 
Peziza hadia Plate 67 (199), 200 
echinospora 220 
peter sii 220 
praetervisa 220, Plate 74 (215) 
repanda Plate 67 (199), 200, 
220 
vesciculosa 216, Plate 67 (199) 
violacea 220 
Phaeolus 138 
Phaeolus schzveinitzii Plate 45 
(143), 144 
Phallus 186 
Phallus hadriani 194 
impudiciis 194, Plate 65 (195) 
Phellinus 137 
Phellinus igniarius 148, Plate 48 
(151) 
Phellodon 160 
Phellodon niger 160, Plate 53 (161) 
Phlebia 136 
Phlebia gigantea Plate 59 (177) 
Pholiota 23, 217 
Pholiota adiposa 62 
aurivella 62 
carbonaria 216, 217, Plate 73 
(219) 
highlandensis 216, 217, Plate 
73 (219) 
squarrosa 60, 62, Plate 11 (63) 
Piptoporus 138, 248 
Piptoporus betulinus 142, Plate 45 
(143), Plate 46 (147) 
Pistillaria 135 
Pistillaria micans 171 
Pleurotellus 74, 102 
Pleurotaceae 25, 74 
Pleurotus 74 
Pleurotus ostreatus 74, Plate 17 (75) 
ostreatus var. columbinus lb 
Pluteus 22 
Pluteus atromarginatus 70 
cervinus 70, Plate 15 (71) 
Podospora Plate 72 (215) 
Podospora curvula Plate 72 (215) 
Polyporus 138, 139, 140 156 
Polyporus squamosus 77, 140, Plate 
44 (141), 145 
Poria 156 
Porphyrellus 26 
Pouzaromyces 227 
Psathyrella 24, 130, 240 242 
Psathyrella ammophila Plate 79 
(239), 240 
flextspora Plate 79 (239), 240 
pennata 218, Plate 73 (219) 
Pseudohydnum gelatinosum 158, 
Plate 52 (159), 179 
Pseudotrametes 139 
Psilocybe 24, 126, 222, 240 
Psilocybe semilanceata 114, Plate 
34 (115) 
Pyronema omphalodes 220, Plate 74 
(221) 
Pycnoporus 138 
Radulomyces confluens Plate 59 (177) 
Raynaria 136, 172 
Ramaria ochraceo-virens Plate 57 
(169), 170, 172 
Rhizina undulata 203, 204, Plate 
69 (205), 220 
Rhizopogoyi 186, 243 
Rhizopogoyi roseolus 244, Plate 81 
(245) 

278 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
Rhodopaxilhis 131 
Rhodophyllaceae 101 
Rhodophyllaceae-spores Plate 28 
(103) 
Rhodophyllus 101 
Russula 24, 45, 46, 50, 237, 246, 
Plate 81 (245) 
Russula alpina 237 
atropurpurea 46 
betularum 46 
claroflava 45, 46 
cyanoxantha 48 
enietica 46, 48 
fellea 48 
foetens 48 
lutea 45 
mairei 49 
nigrescens 49 
ochroleuca 45, Plate 7 (47) 
sardonia 46 
xeranipeJina 49 
xera?upelina var. pascua 237 
Saccobolus versicolor Plate 72 (215) 
Sar codon 160 
Sarcodon imbricatum 160, Plate 53 
(161) 
Schizophyllwn 26, 152 
Schizophyllum commune 152, Plate 
49 (153) 
Scleroderma 35, 186, 247 
Scleroderma aurantium 192, 247 
citrinum 192, Plate 64 (193) 
verrucosum 192, Plate 64 (193) 
Sebacina 179 
Sebacina incrustans 182 
Sepedoniurn chrysospermum 248 
Serpula 136 
Serpula lacrymans 154, Plate 50 
(155) 
Sistotrema commune Plate 59 (177) 
Sordaria 214 
Spar as sis 135 
Sphaerobolus stellatus 196, Plate 
66 (197) 
Spinellus megalocarpus 247 
Sporodina grandis 247 
Sporormia 214, Plate 72 (215) 
Stereuni 136, 176 
Stereum fasciatum 236 
gausapatum 176 
hirsutum Plate 59 (177), 178 
purpureum 176 
rugosum 176 
sanguinolentum 176, 248 
Strobilomyces 26, 35 
Strobilomyces floccopus 35 
Strobilurus 94 
Strobilurus esculentus 94 
stephanocystis Plate 25 (93), 94 
tenacellus Plate 25 (93), 94 
Stropharia 23, 208 
Stropharia coronilla 240, Plate 80 
(241), 242 
se??nglobata 208, Plate 70 (209) 
Suillus 26, 31, 34, 100 
Suillus aeruginascens 34 
bovinus 34 
grevillei 28, Plate 2 (30), 31, 34 
luteus 31, 34 
Tephrocybe anthracophila 217, 
Plate 73 (219) 
atrata 217, Plate 73 (219) 
palustris 223, Plate 75 (225), 
247 
Thelephora 136 
Thelephora palmata 174, Plate 58 
(175) 
terrestris 174, Plate 58 (175) 
Thelephoraceae 174 
Tomentella 174 
Tomentella fusca Plate 58 (175) 
Trametes 139 
Tremella 158, 179 
Treynella encephala 248 
foliacea 184, Plate 61 (185), 248 
ynesenterica 184, Plate 61 (185), 
248 
Tremellales 21, 179 
Tremellodon gelatinosum 158 
Trichophaea 220 
Trichophaea zvoolhopeia Plate 74 
(221) 
Trichodelitschia bisporula Plate 72 
(215) 

INDEX 
279 
Tricholoma 25, 74, 78, 110, 131 
Tricholoma georgii 110 
personatum 131 
Tricholomataceae 104 
Tubaria autochthona Plate 25 (93), 
94 
dispersa 94 
Tuber 243 
Tuber aestivum 244, Plate 81 (245) 
melanospermum 243 
rufuyn Plate 81 (245), 246 
Tubulicrinis glebosus Plate 59 (177) 
Tyromyces 139, 146 
Tylopilus 26 
Tylosperma asterophorum Plate 59 
(177) 
Typhula 135, 173 
Typhula erythropus 171 
Volvariella 22 
Volvariella surrecta 80, 247 
Vuilleminia comedens Plate 59 (177) 
Xylosphaera 172 
Xylosphaera hypoxylon Plate 69 
(205), 206 
polyniorpha 204, Plate 69 (205) 
Common Names 
Agaric, fly 54 
Amanita 56 
Basidiolichens 237 
Blewits, common 131 
wood 104, 131 
Blusher 56 
Bog-beacon 203 
Boot-laces 59 
Boletes 32 
bay-coloured 31 
brown birch 27 
larch 28 
Brittle-cap, bonfire 218 
sand-dune 240 
Candle snuff 76, 206 
Cap brown cone 116 
common funnel 80 
death 56 
false death 56 
hay brown 56 
ink, see Inky cap 
liberty 114 
milk, see Milk cap 
shaggy 128 
Chanterelle, common 106, 162, 246 
false 106, 162 
Clubs, fairy 76, 135, 166, 172 
wrinkled 166 
Cone cap, sand dune brown 242 
Cortinarii 42 
Cramp balls 204 
Cup, elf 200 
scarlet elf 198 
Deceiver 86 
Destroying angel 56 
Earth-ball 186, 192 
common 192 
Earth fan 174 
Earth star 186, 192 
Earth tongue 168, 172 
Elephant’s ear 202 
Fairy ring 118, Plate 36 (119), 264 
champignon 120 
P'ingers, dead man’s 204 
Fomes, root 150 
willow 148 
Fungus 
beef steak 152 
bird’s nest 186, 187, 196 
bracket 135 
candle snuff 76, 206 
cellar 156 
cup 198 
dry rot 154 
ear pick 158 
gum drop 206 
hedgehog 135, 158 
honey 59 
jelly 179 
orange peel 198 
pine fire 203 
resupinate 176 
scarlet caterpillar 206 
silver leaf (disease) 176 
stomach 186, 187 
split gills 152 

28 o 
IDENTIFICATION OF THE LARGER FUNGI 
subterranean 243 
tinder 148 
tripe 182 
turban 202 
wet rot 156 
white wash 178 
yellow brain 184 
Ganoderma, common 146 
Grisette, common 57 
tawny 56 
Hedgehog, wood 160 
Helvella, slate grey 203 
Herald of the Winter 98 
Horn of Plenty 164 
Hygrophoriis, parrot 97 
Hygrophori 97 
Inocybe, common white 84 
Inky caps 212 
bonfire 218 
dung 21 1 
shaggy 128 
Jew’s ear 182 
Judge’s wig 128 
King Alfred’s Cakes 204 
Lactarii 50 
Lawyer’s wig 126 
Lorel 202 
Alarasmius 92 
Miller, The 77 
Milk-caps 50 
coconut-scented 53 
curry-scented 52 
oak 53 
rufous 53 
saffron 52 
ugly 50 
woolly 53 
Morel, common 200 
Mushroom 
butter 95 
Caesar’s 56 
common field 133 
cultivated 133 
fairy cake 82 
field 108 
horse 108 
oyster 74 
parasol 104, 112 
St. George’s 110 
soft slii>per 77 
yellow staining 108 
Mycena, bonnet 68 
small bleeding 88 
Nolanea, silky 122 
Old Man of the Woods 35 
Panther 58 
Pate de PTi Gras 243 
Pholiota, charcoal 216 
shaggy 60 
Pluteus, fawn 70 
Polypore 
birch 142 
giant 144 
many-zoned 145 
scaly 32, 140 
shaggy 142 
Puff ball 186 
giant 190 
stump 188 
Roll-rim, brown 38 
Rough Stalk 28 
birch 27 
Round head, dung 208 
Russula 45 
blackening 49 
common yellow 45 
emetic 48 
foetid 48 
geranium scented 48 
Shank, spotted tough 90 
velvet 66 
Slippery Jack 31 
Spike cap, pine 36 
Spindles 
golden 168 
white 168 
Toadstool 
horse-hair 231 
pick-a-back 246 
yellow cow pat 207 
Stag’s horn 76, 172, 206 
Stinkhorn 186, 187, 194 
common 194 
dog’s 194 
Truffle 243 
English 244 

INDEX 
281 
false 186, 243 
French 243 
Hart’s 244 
perigord 243 
red 244 
Tuft, sulphur 64 
Weeping widow 128 
Witch’s butter 184 


\r 
-H, , • y ^ 
&.:..iiiSkl^ 





I 
(zJfane 
Bookbin^iine Co., Inc. 
300 Summer Street 
Boston, Mass. 02210 



Historic, Archive Document 
Do not assume content reflects current 
scientific knowledge, policies, or practices. 


c 
■ fr2>uS 
United States 
Department of 
Agriculture 
Animal and 
Plant Health 
Inspection 
Service 
Plant 
protection and 
Quarantine 
APHIS 81-47 
January 1986 
KEYS FOR THE IDENTIFICATION OF SOME FREQUENTLY INTERCEPTED 
LEPIDOPTEROUS LARVAE 
o 
crz 
3T 
HTi _ 
. 
— 
i 2> 
/ — - 
• cdz 
go 
iz. ' 
. 5 CD 
. — 
r'O 
___ J> 
n 
CD 
o 
i 
O " 
zo 
03 
DO 
„J ;;=► 
e? 
GO 
DO 
oo 
-< 

Document Delivery Sen/ices Branch 
USDA, National Agricultural Library 
Nal Bldg. 
10301 Baltimore Btvd. 
Beltsville, MD 20705-2351 

KEYS FOR THE IDENTIFICATION OF SOME FREQUENTLY INTERCEPTED 
LEPIDOPTEROUS LARVAE 
Prepared by D. M. Weisman, Systematic Entomology Laboratory, 
Biosystematics and Beneficial Insects Institute, Agricultural 
Research Service, USDA, Washington, DC 20560 
Contents Introduction i 
Acknowledgments ii 
Key to Families 1 
Hesperiidae 10 
Pieridae 10 
Lycaenidae 12 
Geometridae 12 
Noctuidae 13 
Carposinidae 17 
Pyralidae 18 
Tortricidae 41 
Cochylidae 45 
Blastobasidae 45 
Cossidae 46 
Argyresthiidae 47 
Cosmopterigidae 47 
Oecophoridae 47 
Gelechiidae 48 
Acrolepiidae 52 
Plutellidae 52 
Tineidae 53 
Selected References 57 
Index 61 
Introduction The following keys are intended to aid in recognizing the 
lepidopterous larvae most frequently intercepted at 
United States ports of entry. This paper is essentially an 
expansion of Capps' keys used by quarantine inspectors since 
1939. It includes the 50 species in Capps (1963) and 40 
additional species, mostly from the Old World. The characters 
have been reworked to accommodate the added species, and 
the Heinrich system of setal nomenclature has been replaced by 
the more generally used Hinton (1946) system. 
These keys are based on mature larvae and may not work for some 
of the earlier instars. The characters used to separate the 
families are not diagnostic for the families but are intended 
only to separate the included species. The host and distri- 
bution should be considered in making a determination. 
Many of the drawings are diagrammatic, particularly the setal 
maps, and are intended only to illustrate characters referred 
to in the text. In examining setal maps showing lateral views, 
the head of the larva is to the left; in dorsal and ventral 
views, the head is toward the top of the figure. In figures 
showing crochets, the meson is to the left and the head is 
toward the top of the figure. 
Keys for Lepidopterous Larvae - i 

Acknowledgments 
I thank G. L. Godfrey, Illinois Natural History Survey; 
R. W. Hodges and J. M. Kingsolver, Systematic Entomology 
Laboratory, U.S. Department of Agriculture; and members of the 
Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service, Plant Protection 
and Quarantine Training Center, USDA, for suggestions and 
corrections . 
I am indebted to Molly K. Ryan for inking the line drawings. 
ii 

KEY TO FAMILIES 
1. Body with numerous short secondary setae , primary 
setae not evident (fig.l) 2 
1' Body without numerous short secondary setae, primary 
setae evident (fig* 2) 4 
1 2 
2(1). Head much larger than prothorax (fig. 3); prothorax 
shorter than succeeding segments (fig. 3); crochets blordinal 
or triordinal In a laterally elongated circle (fig. 4); body 
widest at middle HESPERIIDAE p. 10 
2'. Head equal to the diameter of body or much smaller; 
prothorax not shorter than succeeding segments; crochets in a 
mesoserles (fig. 5); body depressed or cylindrical 3 
Keys for Lepidopterous Larvae - 1 

3(2'). Body cylindrical, not depressed; abdominal segments 
divided Into 6 or fewer annulets (fig. 6); head about size of 
prothorax (fig. 7); crochets in continuous mesoserles (extra 
short series of crochets may be present) (fig. 8) 
PIERIDAE p. 10 
3'. Body depressed, spindle shaped; abdominal segments 
not divided into annulets; head about one- third size of 
prothorax, retractile (fig. 9); crochets in mesoserles inter- 
rupted at center by spatulate lobe (fig. 10) 
LYCAENIDAE p. 12 
9 10 
4(1'). Prolegs present only on abdominal segments 6 and 10 
GEOMETRIDAE p. 12 
4’ 
Prolegs present on more abdominal segments . . 
5 

5(4'). Two setae in the prespiracular group of the prothorax 
(fig. 11) 6 
5 ' . Three setae in the prespiracular group of the 
prothorax (fig. 12) 8 
6(5). Abdominal segments 1 to 8 with seta LI behind and 
seta L2 below the spiracle (fig. 13); subdorsal setae below the 
prothoracic shield (fig. 14); crochets in a mesoserles (fig. 
15) NOCTUIDAE p. 13 
Keys for Lepldopterous Larvae - 3 

6'. Abdominal segments 1 to 8 with setae LI and L2 close 
together below the spiracle (fig. 16); subdorsal setae on the 
prothoraclc shield (fig. 11); crochets in a complete circle 
(fig. 17) or a penellipse (fig. 18) 7 
' 0 ^ 
18 
7(6'). Four subventral setae present on abdominal segments 
3 to 6 (fig. 19); spiracles on abdominal segment 8 well above 
level of those on preceding segments (fig. 20) 
CARPOSINIDAE p. 17 
20 
7 ' . Three subventral setae present on abdominal segments 
3 to 6 (fig. 21); spiracles on abdominal segment 8 on a level 
with those of preceding segments (fig. 22) 
PYRALXDAE p. 18 
4 

8(5'). Setae LI and L2 of abdominal segments 3 to 6 close 
together below the spiracle, often on the same pinaculum (fig. 
23) 9 
8'. Setae LI and L2 of abdominal segments 3 to 6 widely 
separated below the spiracle or below and behind the spiracle 
(fig. 24) 16 
9(8). Paired setae D2 of abdominal segment 9 on a single 
pinaculum (fig. 25) 10 
9 ' . Paired setae D2 of abdominal segment 9 not on a 
single pinaculum (fig. 26) 11 
- - - D2 
26 
Keys for Lepidopterous Larvae - 5 

( 
10(9). Three lateral setae present on abdominal segment 9 
(fig. 27) TORTRICIDAE p. 41 
10'. Two lateral setae present on abdominal segment 9 
(fig. 28) COCHYLIDAE p. 45 
11(9'). Submentum with a large oval pit (fig. 29); seta SD1 
of abdominal segment 8 above and slightly behind the spiracle 
(fig. 30); abdominal segments 1 to 7 often with sclerotized 
ring around seta SD1 BLASTOBASXDAE p. 46 
11'. Submentum without an oval pit; or, if pit is present, 
seta SD1 of abdominal segment 8 above and in front of spiracle 
(fig. 31) 12 
SD1 
29 
30 
31 
6 

12(11'). Proleg-bearing segments (3 to 6) of abdomen with an 
extra unnamed seta behind the spiracle (fig. 32) 
COSSIDAE p. 46 
12'. Proleg- bearing segments of abdomen without an extra 
seta behind the spiracle (fig. 33) 13 
32 33 
13(12'). Prothoraclc shield with seta SD2 slightly behind line 
of seta SD1 and XD2, D2 behind seta D1 and much closer to 
midline than to lateral margin (fig. 34); abdominal segment 9 
with setae Dl, D2, and SD1 on common plnaculum (fig. 35) . . . 
ARGYRESTHIIBAE p. 47 
13'. Prothoraclc shield with seta SD2 well behind line of 
setae SD1 and XD2, seta D2 below seta Dl and approximately 
midway between midline and lateral margin (fig. 36); abdominal 
segment 9 with setae Dl, D2, and SD1 on 2 or 3 separate 
plnacula (figs. 37, 38, 39) 14 
34 
35 
36 
Keys for Lepldopterous Larvae - 7 

14(13'). Abdominal segment 9 with setae D1 and SD1 on common 
plnaculum , setae LI and L2 on separate common plnaculum, seta 
L3 on Its own plnaculum (fig. 37) .... COSMOPTERIGIDAE p. 47 
14'. Abdominal segment 9 with setae D1 and SD1 not closely 
associated, not on same plnaculum (figs. 38, 39) 15 
37 38 39 
15(14'). Abdominal segment 9 with seta D1 closely associated 
with and forward of seta D2 (fig. 38); abdominal segment 1 may 
have 2 or 3 setae in subventral group . . . OECOPHORIDAE p. 48 
15'. Abdominal segment 9 with seta D1 equidistant from 
setae D2 and SD1, usually the three setae In line (fig. 39); 
abdominal segment 1 always with 2 setae in subventral group 
(fig. 40) GELECHIIDAE p. 49 
40 
8 

16(8'). Pinaculum of seta SD1 enclosing spiracle on abdominal 
segments 1 to 8 (fig. 41); crochets of abdominal prolegs in a 
uniordinal circle enclosing a short longitudinal series of 
crochets (fig. 42) ACROLEPIIDAE p. 52 
16'. Pinaculum of seta SD1 on abdominal segments 1 to 8 
not enclosing spiracle; crochets in circle or ellipse without 
enclosed series (figs. 43, 44, 45) 17 
V Vs tf 
<f 
42 
41 
17(16'). Crochets of abdominal prolegs in a biserial circle 
(fig. 43); seta L3 missing on abdominal segment 9 (fig. 201) 
PLUTELLIDAE p. 52 
17'. Crochets of abdominal prolegs in a unlserial circle 
or ellipse, rows of very small spinules may be present on the 
prolegs anterior or posterior to the crochets (figs. 44, 45); 
seta L3 usually present on abdominal segment 9 (missing in 
Tineola) (figs. 218, 220) TINEIDAE p. 53 
vD vj 
w 
$ 
$ 
43 
44 
45 
Keys for Lepidopterous Larvae - 9 

KEYS TO GENERA AND SPECIES 
HESPERIIDAE 
PIERIDAE 
Most species have an anal fork present; abdominal segments 
indistinctly annulated Species of Hesperiidae 
Distribution: Worldwide 
Hosts: citrus, canna, palm spp., and many other plants 
1. Body with soft vestiture of very fine white setae 
borne on small to very small chalazae (fig. 46); body green . . 
2 
1'. Body with a few very large, broad-based, seta-bearing 
chalazae interspersed among numerous small setae (fig. 47); 
body yellow and brown 3 
2(1). Body with yellow middorsal stripe and a broken stripe 
through the spiracles (fig. 48) .... Pieris rapae (Linnaeus) 
Distribution: Europe and North America 
Hosts: cabbage, cauliflower, and other crucifers 
2'. Body without middorsal stripe, with yellowish area 
around abdominal spiracles (fig. 49) . . Pieris nagi (Linnaeus) 
Distribution: Europe and North America 
Hosts: mustard and turnip 
10 

49 
3(1'). Head black, except for gray front and light patch on 
each side; body with yellow middorsal and spiracular stripes, 
area between with patches of dark color (fig* 50); anal shield 
black with median yellow stripe . . Plerls brasslcae (Linnaeus) 
Distribution: Europe, Middle East, North Africa, and Chile 
Hosts: cabbage, cauliflower, and other crucifers 
3'. Head yellow except for black chalazae; body with 
yellow dorsal, subdorsal and spiracular stripes, area between 
latter two with longitudinal fuscous stripe (fig. 51); anal 
shield yellow except for black chalazae 
Ascla monuste (Linnaeus) 
Distribution: Mexico, West Indies, and United States 
Hosts: cabbage and other crucifers 
Keys for Lepidopterous Larvae - 11 

LYCAENIDAE 
GEOMETRIDAE 
1. Secondary setae long, stout, and of variable length, 
borne on short, cylindrical chalazae (fig. 52) 
Strymon melinus (Hubner' 
Distribution: Mexico and United States 
Hosts: beans and cotton 
1'. Secondary setae of moderate, more uniform length, 
borne on short star-shaped chalazae (fig. 53) 
Lampides boeticus (Linnaeus) 
Distribution: Old World and Hawaii 
Hosts: beans, peas, and other legumes 
Skin granulose; setae spatulate (fig. 54) Idaea spp. 
Distribution: Mexico and Europe 
Hosts: cut flowers, heather, and chamomile 
54 
12 

NOCTUIDAE 
1. Prolegs absent on abdominal segments 3 and 4, present 
on segments 5 and 6 2 
1 ' . Prolegs present on abdominal segments 3 to 6 ... 3 
2(1). Vestigial prolegs present on abdominal segments 3 and 
4; setae SV1, SV2, and VI grouped closely about vestigial 
proleg (fig. 55); pinacula of setae SVl and SV2 well separated 
on abdominal segment 2 (fig. 55) . . . Trlchoplusia ni (Hiibner) 
Distribution: North, Central, and South America and 
West Indies 
Hosts: general feeder 
2'. Vestigial prolegs absent on abdominal segments 3 and 
4; seta VI separated from setae SVl and SV2 on all abdominal 
segments (fig. 56); pinacula of setae SVl and SV2 fused on 
abdominal segments 2 to 4 (fig. 56) 
. Autographs gamma (Linnaeus) 
Distribution: Europe, Asia, and North Africa 
Hosts: general feeder 
55 
56 
Keys for Lepidopterous Larvae - 13 

3(1') 
3'. 
Integument with short, sharp spines (fig* 57) . . 
Integument smooth or with flat granules (fig* 58) 
4 
5 
57 
58 
4(3). Chalazae D1 and D2 of abdominal segments with hair- 
llke splnules (fig. 59); mandible with a broad basal process on 
the oral surface (fig. 60) . . Hellothls vlrescens (Fabriclus) 
Distribution: Mexico, West Indies, and United States 
Hosts: cotton, tobacco, tomatoes, peppers, and many others 
4 ' . Chalazae D1 and D2 of abdominal segments without 
splnules (fig. 61); mandible without basal process on the oral 
surface (fig. 62) Hellcoverpa zea (Boddle) 
Distribution: North, Central, and South America, and 
West Indies 
Hosts: corn, beans, cotton, tomatoes, and many others 
14 

5(3'). Meso- and metathorax with dark bar connecting seta 
SDl with adjacent ventral muscle attachment, no dark bar 
associated with seta SD2 on these segments (fig. 63) . . . 
6 
5'. Meso- and metathorax with dark bars connecting both 
setae SD2 and SDl with their adjacent ventral muscle attach- 
ments (fig. 64) 7 
63 
64 
6(5). Integument with evident flat granules (fig. 65); 
setal plnacula of body large and brown (fig. 66); abdominal 
segments patterned as illustrated (fig. 66) 
Spodoptera fruglperda (J. E. Smith) 
Distribution: North, Central, and South America, West Indies 
Hosts: wide range of crop plants and vegetables 
6' Integument smooth; setal plnacula of body minute 
(fig. 67); abdominal segments patterned as illustrated (fig. 
67) Spodoptera exlgua (Hlibner) 
Distribution: Old World, Mexico, and United States 
Hosts: wide range of vegetables 
66 
67 
Keys for Lepidopterous Larvae - 15 

(I 
7(5') • Mandible with large molar-bearing basal process on 
oral surface (fig* 68) Mamestra brasslcae (Linnaeus) 
Distribution: Europe and Asia 
Hosts: crucifers and other leafy vegetables 
7'* Mandible without large basal process (fig* 69) 
(a small tooth may be present at base of oral surface In 
Xestla) 8 
8(7'). Spinneret with apical spinules (fig* 70); spiracles 
black; yellow middorsal spots on metathorax and abdominal 
segments 1 to A Perldroma saucla (Subnet) 
Distribution: Europe, North, Central, and South America, and 
West Indies 
Hosts: general feeder 
8’. Spinneret without spinules; spiracles white or yellowish; 
no yellow middorsal spots 9 
l\AAJ 
70 
16 

CARPOSINIDAE 
9(8'). Combined length of 2nd and 3rd segments of labial 
palpus one-half or more length of 1st segment (fig. 71); 
spinneret with 2 denticles on apical margin (fig. 71); head 
reticulated brown usually with black submedian arcs present 
Xestia spp. 
Distribution: Europe and North America 
Hosts: general feeder 
9' Combined length of 2nd and 3rd segments of labial 
palpus one-third or less length of 1st segment (fig. 72); 
spinneret without denticles, apical margin lobed (fig. 72); 
later Instar head reticulated with light brown, no darker 
submedian arcs, head flecked with brown in early instars; 
Copltarsla spp. 
Distribution: Mexico, Central and South America 
Hosts: cut flowers, potatoes, and other vegetables 
This family never has more than one lateral seta on abdominal 
segment 9 Carposlna nlponensls niponensls Walslngham 
Distribution: Japan, Korea, and China 
Hosts: apple, pear, plum, and peach 
Keys for Lepidopterous Larvae - 17 

PYRALIDAE 
1. Sclerotized ring around seta SD1 on abdominal segment 
8 (missing in Etlella zinckenella ) (fig. 73); 3 setae in the 
lateral group on abdominal segment 9 (fig. 74) 2 
1'. No sclerotized ring 
segment 8 (fig. 75); one seta 
abdominal segment 9 (fig. 76) 
75 
around seta SD1 on abdominal 
in the lateral group on 
20 (p. 30) 
18 

2(1). Sclerotized ring around seta SD1 on mesothorax 
(fig. 77) Phycitinae ... 3 
2’ . No sclerotized ring around seta SD1 on mesothorax 
15 
77 
3(2). Prespiracular shield of prothorax extending below and 
behind the spiracle, posterior portion weakly pigmented (fig. 
78); body pink with whitish discontinuous longitudinal bands on 
most segments (fig. 79) . . . Elasmopalpus lignosellus (Zeller) 
Distribution: Mexico, West Indies, and United States 
Hosts: corn, sugarcane, peas, and many others 
3'. Prespiracular shield of prothorax never extending 
below and behind spiracle (fig. 80); body white or if pinkish 
without white bands 4 
Keys for Lepldopterous Larvae - 19 

4(3'). Integument granulose under low magnification (30X) 
(fig. 81) 5 
4'. Integument not granulose under low magnification 
,7 
5(4). Prothoraclc shield with black areas on lateral 
margins and longitudinal black areas on either side midway 
between center line and lateral margins (fig. 82) 
Ancylostomla stereorea (Zeller) 
Distribution: West Indies 
Hosts: pigeon peas 
5'. Prothoraclc shield not with the above color pattern 
6 
82 
20 

6(5'). Plnacula of body setae large and dark (fig* 83); seta 
D2 of abdominal segments 1 to 7 below level of seta Dl (fig* 
83) Hypsipyla grandella (Zeller) 
Distribution: Central and South America, West Indies, and 
southern Florida 
Hosts: mahogany and Spanish cedar logs 
6'. Pinacula of body setae very small and pale (fig. 84); 
seta D2 of abdominal segments 1 to 7 at level of seta Dl (fig* 
84) Moodna blsinuella Hampson 
Distribution: Mexico 
Host: corn 
83 84 
7(4'). Prothoracic shield yellow with pattern of dark marks 
as illustrated (fig. 85) Fund el la pellucens Zeller 
Distribution: Mexico and West Indies 
Hosts: beans and peas 
7'. Prothoracic shield yellowish without the pattern as 
above 8 
Keys for Lepidopterous Larvae - 21 

8(7'). Coronal suture absent (fig. 86); abdominal segments 
1 to 7 with a crescent- shaped patch above seta SD1 (usually 
reduced to a small smudge or missing in Amyelois transitella) 
(fig. 87) 9 
87 
86 
8'. Coronal suture present (fig. 88); abdominal segments 
1 to 7 without crescent-shaped patch above seta SD1 (fig. 89) 
10 
22 

9(8). Anal plate with seta SD1 closer to seta D1 than to 
seta LI (fig. 90); seta SD2 of abdominal segment 8 usually 
separated from the spiracle by 2 or more times the diameter of 
the spiracle (fig. 91); ring around seta SD1 on abdominal 
segment 8 usually complete (fig. 91) 
Ectomyelols ceratoniae (Zeller) 
Distribution: Mediterranean, Africa, Argentina, West Indies, 
and Florida 
Hosts: legumes, nuts, dates, tamarinds, carobs, and others 
9'. Anal plate with seta SD1 equidistant from setae D1 
and LI (fig. 92); seta SD2 of abdominal segment 8 usually 
separated from the spiracle by one to 1.5 times the diameter of 
the spiracle (fig. 93); ring around seta SD1 on abdominal 
segment 8 Incomplete (fig. 93) 
Amyelois transitella (Walker) 
Distribution: North and South America, and West Indies 
Hosts: oranges, walnuts, and other fruits and pods 
Keys for Lepidopterous Larvae - 23 

10(8'). Abdominal segments 1 to 8 apparently without 
pinacula (pinacula concolorous with body and not evident) 
(fig. 94) Plodia interpunctella (Htibner) 
Distribution: Cosmopolitan 
Hosts: stored grain, vegetable and fruit products 
10'. Abdominal segments 1 to 8 with small pigmented 
pinacula (fig. 95) 11 
11(10'). Abdominal segment 8 with seta SD2 separated from 
spiracle by 2 to 3 times the horizontal diameter of the 
spiracle (fig. 96) 12 
11'. Abdominal segment 8 with seta SD2 separated from 
spiracle by a distance equal to the horizontal diameter of the 
spiracle (fig. 97) 13 
24 

12(11). Spiracle of abdominal segment 8 as large as the area 
enclosed by the sclerotized ring around seta SD1 (fig. 98) . . 
Anagasta kuehniella (Zeller) 
Distribution: Nearly cosmopolitan 
Hosts: grain and other stored and dried vegetable products 
12'. Spiracle of abdominal segment 8 two-thirds or less 
as broad as the area enclosed by the sclerotized ring around 
seta SD1 (fig. 99) Ephestia elutella (Hubner) 
Distribution: Nearly cosmopolitan 
Hosts: stored and dried vegetable products 
13(11*). Seta D2 of abdominal segments 1 to 8, two to two and 
one-half times the length of seta D1 (fig* 100) 
Cadra cautella (Walker) 
Distribution: Cosmopolitan 
Hosts: stored and dried vegetable products 
13*. Seta D2 of abdominal segments 1 to 8 
times the length of seta Dl (fig* 101) . . . . 
three to five 
14 
Keys for Lepidopterous Larvae - 25 

14(13'). Metathorax with the distance between setae VI 2 times 
or less than the distance between seta VI and the coxa (fig. 
102) Cadra flgulllella (Gregson) 
I 
Distribution: Nearly cosmopolitan 
Hosts: dried fruits, nuts, seeds, and beans 
14'. Metathorax with the distance between setae VI 3 to 
5 times the distance between seta VI and the coxa (fig. 103) 
. Cadra calldella (Guenee) 
Distribution: Mediterranean 
Hosts: carobs, dried fruits, and nuts 
i - - 
Oi Q- 
102 
103 
15(2'). Prothoracic shield with pattern of dark markings as 
illustrated (fig. 104) Phycitinae . . 
Btlella zinckenella (Treitschke) 
Distribution: Nearly cosmopolitan 
Hosts: lima beans, pigeon peas, and other legumes 
15'. Prothoracic shield not patterned as above .... 16 
104 
26 

16(15'). Sclerotized ring around seta SD1 on abdominal segment 
1 (fig. 105) Galleriinae ... 17 
16'* No sclerotized ring around seta SD1 on abdominal 
segment 1 Pyralinae ... 19 
SD1 
105 
17(16). Prespiracular and prothoracic shields fused, setae LI 
and L2 on lateral margin (fig. 106); dorsal and subdorsal setae 
of mesothorax on a single sclerotized plate (fig. 107) .... 
Alphelas consplrata Heinrich 
Distribution: Mexico 
Hosts: pineapple 
Keys for Lepidopterous Larvae - 27 

17'. Prespiracular and prothoracic shields not fused 
(fig. 108); dorsal and subdorsal setae of mesothorax on 
separate pinacula (fig. 109) 
t 
18 
18(17’). Sclerotized rings around seta SD1 on abdominal 
segments 1 and 8 not complete (fig. 110); spiracular peritremes 
thicker on caudal margin (fig. 110); pinacula of setae D1 and 
D2 on abdominal segments not pigmented (fig. 110) 
Corcyra cephalonlca (Stainton) 
Distribution: Cosmopolitan 
Hosts: stored vegetable products 
18'. Sclerotized rings around seta SD1 on abdominal 
segments 1 and 8 complete (fig. Ill); spiracular peritremes of 
uniform thickness (fig. Ill); pinacula of setae D1 and D2 on 
abdominal segments pigmented (fig. Ill) 
Paralipsa gularis (Zeller) 
Distribution: Nearly cosmopolitan 
Hosts: stored vegetable products 
28 

19(16'). Head with only 4 distinct ocelli present (ocelli I 
and II fused and ocellus VI usually missing) (fig. 112); 
abdominal segment 9 with one subventral seta (fig. 113) . . . 
Pyralis farinalis Linnaeus 
Distribution: Cosmopolitan 
Hosts: dried vegetable products 
113 
19'. Head with 6 ocelli present (fig. 114); abdominal 
segment 9 with two subventral setae (fig. 115) 
Aglossa caprealis (Hubner) 
Distribution: Nearly cosmopolitan 
Hosts: damp grain and rotting vegetable matter (feeds on 
fungus) 
Keys for Lepidopterous Larvae - 29 

20(1* )• A single transverse plate without setae posterior to 
dorsal pinacula on meso thorax (fig* 116); crochets in complete 
circle (fig. 117) Crambinae ... 21 
116 
117 
20* . A pair of plates without setae posterior to dorsal 
pinacula on mesothorax (fig. 118) or such plates absent; 
crochets in a mesal penellipse (fig. 119) (or may be a circle 
weaker on lateral edge in Lineodes Integra and Udea rublgalis) 
(figs. 144, 146) . . Pyraustinae ... 23 
Dorsal 
pinaculum 
- Extra 
plate 
118 
30 

21(20). One subventral seta on meso- and metathorax (fig. 
120); body with 2 pink longitudinal stripes on each side 
(fig. 121); pink-plgmented area around lateral setae on 
proleg-bearing segments Eoreuma loftlnl (Dyar) 
Distribution: Mexico and United States 
Hosts: corn and sugarcane 
21'. Two subventral setae on meso- and metathorax (fig. 
122); body with or without pigmented stripes; no pigmented 
area around lateral setae on proleg-bearing segments ... 22 
120 
121 
22(21'). Body with pinkish middorsal stripe and two lateral 
stripes on each side (fig. 123); setal plnacula concolorous 
with body Chllo suppressalls (Walker) 
Distribution: Japan, China, Southeast Asia to India 
Host: rice straw 
123 
Keys for Lepidopterous Larvae - 31 

€ 
22'. Body without pinkish middorsal stripe; setal plnacula 
concolorous with body (winter form) or darkly pigmented (summer 
form) Dlatraea spp. 
Distribution: North, Central, and South America, and 
West Indies 
Hosts: corn, sugarcane, and sorghum 
23(20'). Meso- and metathorax with a pair of nonsetal bearing 
plates posterior to dorsal plnacula, also small plnacula 
anterior to dorsal and subdorsal plnacula bearing microscopic 
setae (fig. 124) 24 
23'. Meso- and metathorax without nonsetal bearing plates 
posterior to dorsal plnacula, no small plnacula anterior to 
dorsal and subdorsal plnacula (fig. 125) 25 
♦ 
24(23). Prespiracular shield of prothorax extending below and 
beyond spiracle (fig. 126); an extra nonsetal bearing plate 
below seta L3 on meso- and metathorax (fig. 127) and behind LI 
and L2 on abdominal segments 1 to 7 (fig. 128) 
Dlchocrocls punctlferalls (Guenee) 
Distribution: Japan, Korea, Taiwan, and India 
Hosts: pine, chestnut, peach, and others 
32 

24'. Prespiracular shield of prothorax crescent shaped 
extending below spiracle (fig. 129); no extra nonsetal bearing 
plate below seta L3 on meso- and metathorax (fig. 130) and 
behind LI and L2 on abdominal segments 1 to 7 (fig. 131) . . . 
Maruca testulalis (Geyer) 
Distribution: Africa, Asia, Australia, Mexico, Central and 
South America, and Hawaii 
Hosts: beans, pigeon peas, and other legumes 
129 
130 
131 
-LI 
-L2 
25(23'). Head capsule with a shieldlike extension over base of 
antenna (fig. 132) Ostrinia nubilalis (Hlibner) 
Distribution: Europe and United States 
Hosts: corn, beans, peas, and many others 
25'. Head capsule without a shieldlike extension over base 
of antenna (fig. 133) 26 
132 
Keys for Lepidopterous Larvae - 33 

26(25'). Body with pinkish longitudinal stripes (fig. 134) 
26'. Body without pinkish longitudinal stripes .... 28 
134 
27(26). Head blackish or brownish with whitish areas along 
adfrontal sutures extending to vertex, seta 03 anterior to a 
line joining setae LI and 02 (fig. 135) 
Hellula rogatalls (Hulst) 
Distribution: Europe, North Africa, Asia, Pacific Islands, 
Mexico, West Indies, and United States 
Hosts: cabbage, mustard, radish, and turnip 
135 
34 

27'. Head pale, mottled, area along adfrontal sutures pale 
but not white, seta 03 posterior to a line joining setae LI and 
02 (fig* 136) Hellula phldilealis (Walker) 
Distribution: Mexico, Central and South America, 
West Indies, and United States 
Hosts: cabbage, cauliflower, mustard, and other crucifers 
136 
28(26'). Prothorax with sclerotization extending from 
posterolateral margin of prothoracic shield behind and below 
spiracle to prespiracular shield (fig. 137) 
Achyra rantalis (Guenee) 
Distribution: Mexico, West Indies, and United States 
Hosts: alfalfa, beets, cotton, soybeans, and many others 
28'. Prothorax without sclerotization extending from 
posterolateral margin of prothoracic shield to prespiracular 
shield 29 
Keys for Lepidopterous Larvae - 35 

29(28'). Prothoracic shield broadly shaded laterally (figs. 
139, 141); head yellow with dark pattern (fig. 138) .... 30 
29'. Prothoracic shield without dark shading laterally, 
head not patterned 31 
30(29). Prothoracic shield with dark lateral shading 
extending to seta B2 (fig. 139); prespiracular shield enclosing 
the spiracle (fig. 139); dorsal and subdorsal pinacula of 
mesothorax fused (fig. 140) 
Herpetogramma bipunctalis (Fabricius) 
Distribution: West Indies and United States 
Hosts: alfalfa, beets, cotton, soybeans, and many others 
139 
140 
36 

30'. Prothoracic shield with dark lateral shading 
extending to seta D1 (fig. 141); prespiracular shield not 
enclosing the spiracle (fig. 141); dorsal and subdorsal 
pinacula of mesothorax not fused (fig. 142) 
Pilemia periusalis (Walker) 
Distribution: West Indies and United States 
Hosts: eggplant, potatoes, and tomatoes 
31(29'). Prothoracic shield with a dark reniform spot 
posterior to seta XD2 (figs. 143, 145) 32 
31'. Prothoracic shield without dark reniform spot 
posterior to seta XD2 33 
32(31). Prespiracular shield ovate (fig. 143); crochets 
triordinal on mesal aspect (fig. 144) 
• Udea rubigalls (Guenee) 
Distribution: Mexico, West Indies, United States, and 
Canada 
Hosts: celery, lettuce, spinach, and others 
Keys for Lepidopterous Larvae - 37 

32'. Prespiracular shield crescent shaped extending below 
spiracle (fig. 145); crochets biordinal on mesal aspect 
(fig. 146) Lineodes Integra (Zeller) 
Distribution: Mexico and West Indies 
Hosts: eggplant and tomatoes 
146 
33(31'). Abdominal segment 1 with three subventral setae 
(fig. 147); prothorax with seta XD2 equidistant from setae 
SD1 and XDl (fig. 148); crochets biordinal (fig. 149) 
Hendecasis dupll fascial is Hampson 
Distribution: Philippines and Southeast Asia 
Host: jasmine 
4 ^ * 
% 
* 
149 
38 

33* • Abdominal segment 1 with less than three subventral 
setae (figs. 152, 154); prothorax with seta XD2 closer to seta 
SD1 than to seta XD1 (fig* 150); crochets triordinal (fig. 151) 
34 
151 
34(33’). Abdominal segment 1 with two subventral setae (fig. 
152); prespiracular shield oblong (fig. 153) 35 
34'. Abdominal segment 1 with one subventral seta 
154); prespiracular shield crescent shaped, may extend 
spiracle (fig. 155) 
(fig. 
under 
. . 36 
Keys for Lepidopterous Larvae - 39 

35(34). Head with a pigmented spot at genal angle (fig. 156); 
mandible without a projection on lateral margin (fig. 157); 
pinacula dark on early instars, pale in later instars .... 
Diaphanla nitidalis (Stoll) 
Distribution: Mexico, Central and South America, 
West Indies, United States, and Canada 
Hosts: squash, cantaloupe, cucumbers, and gourds 
35'. Head without pigmented spot at genal angle; mandible 
with a projection on lateral margin (fig. 158); pinacula 
concolorous with body in all instars 
Diaphanla hyallnata (Linnaeus) 
Distribution: Mexico, Central America, Northern South 
America, West Indies, and Eastern United States 
Hosts: squash, cucumbers, cantaloupe, gourds, and pumpkins 
36(34'). Head, prothoracic shield, and body pinacula brownish 
yellow; pinaculum of seta D1 on abdominal segments 2 to 8 with 
dark spot on anterior margin (fig. 159) 
Leucinodes orbonalis (Guen^e) 
Distribution: Africa and Southeast Asia 
Hosts: eggplant, tomatoes, potatoes, and other solanaceous 
plants 
159 
40 

36'. Head and prothoracic shield pale yellow, pinacula 
concolorous with body; pinaculum of seta D1 on abdominal 
segments 2 to 8 without spots 
Neoleucinodes elegantalis (Guen^e) 
Distribution: Mexico, Central and South America, and 
West Indies 
Hosts: eggplant, tomatoes, and other solanaceous plants 
TORTRICIDAE 
1. Seta D1 of abdominal segment 9 cephalad of and 
equidistant from setae D2 and SD1, setae D1 and SD1 on 
separate pinacula (fig. 160) Tortricinae ... 2 
1*. Seta D1 of abdominal segment 9 closely associated 
with seta SD1 on a single pinaculum (fig. 161), 
Olethreutinae ... 3 
160 
161 
2(1). Head, prothoracic shield, and prothoracic pinacula 
yellowish, shield may be edged laterally and posteriorly with 
brown Platynota stultana (Wals Ingham) 
Distribution: Mexico and United States 
Hosts: tomatoes, peppers, and many others 
2*. Head, prothoracic shield, and prothoracic pinacula 
brown or blackish, shield and head may show faint pattern . . 
Platynota rostrana (Walker) 
Distribution: Mexico, Central America, West Indies, and 
United States 
Hosts: cotton, banana, and many others 
Keys for Lepidopterous Larvae - 41 

3(1*). Anal fork present (fig* 162); three lateral setae 
of abdominal segment 9 on one pinaculum (fig* 163) 4 
3'. Anal fork absent; seta L3 of abdominal segment 9 
usually on Its own pinaculum separate from that of setae LI 
and L2 (fig. 164) 7 
163 164 
4(3). Prespiracular shield of prothorax elongated extending 
below and beyond spiracle (fig. 165) 
Cryptophlebia leucotreta (Meyrick) 
Distribution: Central and South Africa 
Hosts: okra, orange. Capsicum sp. , and many others 
4'. Prespiracular shield of prothorax not extending 
below spiracle (fig. 166) 5 
42 

5(4'). Body pinacula large and brown (fig. 167); prothoracic 
shield (fig. 168) and anal shield (fig. 169) patterned as 
Illustrated Pammene fasclana (Linnaeus) 
Distribution: Europe 
Hosts: acorns and chestnuts 
5'. Body pinacula smaller and pale; prothoraclc and anal 
shields not patterned as above 6 
167 
6(5'). Head with black band extending from postgenal 
juncture to seta 02 (fig. 170); prothorax with seta SD2 
dorsocaudad of SD1 , lateral setae almost in horizontal line 
(fig. 171) Epinotla aporema (Walslngham) 
Distribution: Mexico, Central and South America, 
West Indies, and United States 
Hosts: string beans and other legumes 
170 
171 
Keys for Lepidopterous Larvae - 43 

V 
6’. Head with some dark color at postgenal juncture but 
not extending to seta 02 (fig. 172); prothorax with seta SD2 
directly caudad of SD1, lateral setae in more triangular 
arrangement (fig* 173) Grapholita spp. 
Distribution: Europe, East Asia, Australia, Mexico, 
South America, and United States 
Hosts: apple and other pomes, plums and other drupes, and 
berries 
7(3'). Head yellowish brown, usually distinctly patterned 
with dark color (fig. 174), prothoracic shield (fig. 175) and 
anal shield (fig. 176) yellowish brown with dark patterns as 
illustrated Cydia pomonella (Linnaeus) 
Distribution: Nearly cosmopolitan 
Hosts: apples, pears, quince, and walnut 
7*. Head yellow, possibly faintly patterned; prothoracic 
and anal shields yellow 8 
44 

COCHYLIDAE 
BLASTOBASIDAE 
8(7'). Head clear yellow; body always white 
Cydla splendana (Hubner) 
Distribution: Southern Europe 
Host: chestnuts 
8'. Head yellow with some indication of faint pattern or 
some dark color at postgenal juncture; body with pink pigment 
in fresh specimens Cydia spp. 
Distribution: Europe and East Asia 
Host: chestnuts 
This family never has more than two lateral setae on abdominal 
segment 9. The ventral setae are always farther apart on the 
9th abdominal segment than on the 8th 
Lorita abornana chatka Busck 
Distribution: Mexico 
Host: peppers 
Many species in this family have rings around seta SD1 on 
abdominal segments 1 to 7 . The subfamily Blastobasinae always 
has the submental pit (fig* 29) and always has three subventral 
setae on abdominal segment 1 Species of Blastobasidae 
Distribution: Worldwide 
Hosts: garlic, coffee, acorns, and many others 
Keys for Lepldopterous Larvae - 45 

COSSIDAE 
1. Proleg-bearing segments of abdomen (3-6) usually with 
three (number variable) extra unnamed setae between the dorsal 
and subdorsal setae (fig* 177) 
crossbands (fig. 178) . . . . 
Distribution: Europe 
Host: garlic 
crochets in two uniordinal 
. Dyspessa ulula (Borkhausen) 
. ^ 1 & 
177 
1'. Proleg-bearing segments of abdomen without three 
extra setae between the dorsal and subdorsal setae (fig. 
179); crochets in a biordinal laterally elongated circle 
(fig. 180) Cossus CQ8SUS (Linnaeus) 
Distribution: Europe 
Hosts: wood products 
179 
46 

ARGYRE S TH 1 1 DAE 
COSMOPTERIGIDAE 
OECOPHORI DAE 
The character of setae SD2 being almost in line with setae XD2 
and SD1 appears to be consistent for this family 
Argyresthla conjugella (Zeller) 
Distribution: Europe 
Hosts: apples and sorbus berries 
Setae LI and L2 on one pinaculum, and seta L3 separate on 
abdominal segment 9; three subventral setae on abdominal 
segment 1 Pyroderces spp. 
Distribution: Mexico, West Indies, and United States 
Hosts: corn, cotton, and many rotting and dried fruits 
1. Abdominal segment 8 with seta L3 above the level of 
setae LI and L2, spiracle toward back of segment (fig. 181); 
prothorax with large presplracular shield extending below the 
spiracle (fig. 182) Stenoma catenlfer Walslngham 
Distribution: Mexico, Central and South America 
Host: avocado 
1'. Abdominal segment 8 with seta L3 below the level of 
setae LI and L2, spiracle in usual position (fig. 183); 
prothorax without presplracular shield extending below the 
spiracle 2 
Keys for Lepldopterous Larvae - 47 

GELECHIIDAE 
2(1’). Head with 2 ocelli present (fig. 184); submentum with 
large oval pit (fig. 185) . . . Endrosis sarcitrella (Linnaeus) 
Distribution: Nearly cosmopolitan 
Hosts: bulbs and decaying fruits 
2'. Head with 4 ocelli apparent (ocelli I and II fused 
and ocelli III and IV fused) (fig. 186); submentum without 
large oval pit . . . Hofmannophila pseudospretella (Stainton) 
Distribution: Nearly cosmopolitan 
Hosts: bulbs, stored vegetable products, and many others 
185 
1. Abdominal prolegs rudimentary, with only 2 to 4 
crochets (fig. 187) Sitotroga cerealella (Olivier) 
Distribution: Nearly cosmopolitan 
Hosts: stored grain 
1’. Abdominal prolegs normal, each proleg with more than 
4 crochets 2 
187 
48 

2(1'). Prothorax with prespiracular shield enclosing the 
spiracle, lateral setae In a linear arrangement (fig. 188); 
crochets of anal prolegs interrupted at center (fig. 189); anal 
fork present (fig. 189) Anarsia lineatella Zeller 
Distribution: Europe, Mexico, Central and South America, 
and United States 
Hosts: peach, pear, almond, cherry, and other stone fruits 
2’. Prothorax with prespiracular shield not enclosing the 
spiracle, lateral setae in a triangular arrangement (fig. 190); 
crochets of anal prolegs not interrupted at center (fig. 191); 
anal fork absent (fig. 191) 3 
190 
Keys for Lepidopterous Larvae - 49 

I 
3(2'). Head with adfrontal setae widely separated, seta 
Adf2 at level of apex of front (fig* 192); abdominal prolegs 
with crochets In a uniordinal penellipse (fig. 193) 
Pectlnophora gossypiella (Saunders) 
Distribution: India, Egypt, Mexico, Central and 
South America, West Indies, and United States 
Hosts: cotton, okra, and other malvaceous plants 
3'. Head with adfrontal setae close together, seta Adf2 
well below apex of front (fig. 194); abdominal crochets in a 
complete circle 4 
192 
193 
194 
4(3’). Prothoracic shield pale, with dark shading along 
posterior margin (fig. 195) 
Kelferla lycoperslcella (Walsingham) 
Distribution: Mexico, Central and South America, 
West Indies, Hawaii, and United States 
Hosts: tomato, eggplant, potato, and other solanaceous 
plants 
4'. Prothoracic shield uniformly brown or blackish . . 5 
50 

5(4’). Line joining setae LI and 02 tangent to or passing 
through ocellus I (fig. 196); lateral setae of abdominal 
segment 9 in a nearly vertical line (fig. 197); legs pale 
Symmetrlschema capsicum (Bradley & Povolny) 
Distribution: Mexico, Central and South America, 
West Indies, and United States 
Hosts: pepper and tomato 
196 
197 
5’. Line joining setae LI and 02 posterior to ocellus I 
(fig. 198); lateral setae of abdominal segment 9 in a 
triangular arrangement (fig. 199); legs dark 
Phthorlmaea operculella (Zeller) 
Distribution: Nearly cosmopolitan 
Hosts: potatoes, tomatoes, stored tobacco, and other 
solanaceous plants 
_L2 
-LI 
L3 
199 
198 
Keys for Lepidopterous Larvae - 51 

ACROLEPIIDAE 
PLUTELLIDAE 
The pupae in this family are always enclosed in loose net; 
Europe and Hawaii; leeks .... Acrolepia assectella (Zeller) 
1. Anal prolegs longer than broad, few crochets (fig. 
200); abdominal segment 9 with dorsal, subdorsal, and lateral 
setae all widely separated, seta SD1 distinctly thin and 
hairlike (fig. 201) Plutella xylostella (Linnaeus) 
Distribution: Nearly cosmopolitan 
Hosts: cabbage and other crucifers 
200 
201 
1'. Anal prolegs short, many crochets (fig. 202); 
abdominal segment 9 with dorsal and subdorsal setae on one 
continuous pinaculum and the lateral setae on another, seta 
SD1 not hairlike (fig. 203) Prays spp. 
Distribution: Europe, East Asia, and Hawaii 
Hosts: citrus, olives, and pelea berries 
203 
52 

TINEIDAE 
1. Abdominal prolegs with rows of minute recurved 
spinules anterior and posterior to the crochets (fig. 204) or 
on anterior aspect only (fig. 205); abdominal segment 1 with 
three subventral setae (fig. 206) 2 
1'. Abdominal prolegs without minute spinules adjacent to 
the crochets (fig. 207); abdominal segment 1 with two sub- 
ventral setae (fig. 208) 4 
% & 
207 
208 
2(1). Abdominal prolegs with rows of spinules anterior to 
the crochets (fig. 209); head with only one ocellus (fig. 210) 
Setomorpha rutella Zeller 
Distribution: Nearly cosmopolitan 
Hosts: dried tobacco, cottonseed, and many stored plant 
products 
Keys for Lepidopterous Larvae - 53 

V 
2*. Abdominal prolegs with rows of spinules both anterior 
and posterior to the crochets (figs. 213, 216); head with 
either two or six ocelli (figs. 211, 214) 3 
3(2’). Head with 6 ocelli (fig. 211); prespiracular shield 
surrounds spiracle and is fused to prothoracic shield (fig. 
212); abdominal prolegs with space between the spinules and 
crochets (fig. 213) Acrolophus spp. 
Distribution: Mexico, Central and South America 
Hosts: bromeliads, orchids, and others 
3'. Head with 2 ocelli (fig. 214); prespiracular shield 
surrounds spiracle but is not fused to prothoracic shield 
(fig. 215); abdominal prolegs without space between the 
spinules and crochets (fig. 216) . . . Opogona sacchari (Bojer) 
Distribution: Southern Europe, Africa, Brazil, and 
West Indies 
Hosts: sugarcane, banana, bulbs, and many others 
54 

4(1*). Me so- and metathorax with two subventral setae 
(fig. 217); abdominal segment 9 with two lateral setae and one 
subventral seta (fig. 218); head with no ocelli present . . . 
Tlneola bisselliella (Hummel) 
Distribution: Cosmopolitan 
Hosts: wool, hair, feathers, and other animal products 
4'. Meso- and metathorax with one subventral seta 
(fig. 219); abdominal segment 9 with three lateral setae and 
two subventral setae (fig. 220); head with 5 or 6 ocelli 
present 5 
Keys for Lepidopterous Larvae - 55 

5(4'). Head with 5 ocelli (fig. 221); prespiracular shield 
extends behind spiracle (fig. 222) 
Lepldobregma mlnuscula (Walsingham) 
Distribution: West Indies, Hawaii, and United States 
Hosts: pineapple, banana, and many others (scavenger) 
222 
5’. Head with 6 ocelli (fig. 223); prespiracular shield 
does not extend behind spiracle 
Nemapogon granella (Linnaeus) 
Distribution: Nearly cosmopolitan 
Hosts: mushrooms, stored grain, and dried fruits 
56 

Selected 
References 
Altken, A. D. A key to the larvae of some species of Phycitinae 
(Lepidoptera , Pyralidae) associated with stored products, and 
of some related species. Bull. Entomol. Res. 54(2) : 175-188; 
1963. 
Allyson, S. North American larvae of the genus Loxostege Hubner 
(Lepidoptera: Pyralidae: Pyraustinae) . Can. Entomol. 108(1): 
89-104; 1976. 
. Last instar larvae of Pyraustini of America north of 
Mexico (Lepidoptera: Pyralidae). Can. Entomol. 113(6) :463- 
518; 1981. 
Baker, C. R. B. Notes on the larvae and pupae of two fruit 
moths, Grapholita funebrana Treitschke and molesta Busck 
(Lepidoptera: Olethreutidae) . Proc. R. Entomol. Soc. London 
Ser. A, 38:212-222; 1963. 
Beck, H. Die Larvalsystematik der Eulen (Noctuidae). Abh. 
Larvalsys. Insekten 4; 1960. 
Bollmann, H. G. Die Raupen mitteleuropaischer Pyraustinae 
(Lepidoptera: Pyralidae). Beitr. Entomol. 5:521-639; 1955. 
Busck, A. The pink bollworm, Pectinophora gossypiella. 
J. Agric. Res. 9(10) :333-370; 1917. 
Capps, H. W. Description of the larva of Keif eria peniculo 
Heinrich, with a key to the larvae of related species 
attacking eggplant, pepper, potato and tomato in the 
United States (Lepidoptera: Gelechiidae) . Ann. Entomol. Soc. 
Am. 39:561-563; 1946. 
. An illustrated key for identification of larvae of the 
cotton-pest species of Pectinophora Busck and Platyedra Mey- 
rick (Lepidoptera, Gelechiidae). Bull. Entomol. Res. 49(4): 
631-632; 1958. 
. Keys for the identification of some lepidopterous 
larvae frequently intercepted at quarantine. ARS 30-20-1. 
Washington, DC: Agricultural Research Service, U.S. Depart- 
ment of Agriculture; 1963. 
Chu, H. F.; Fang, C. L.; Wang, L. Y. Fauna of Chinese economic 
insects. Fasc. 7. Noctuidae (immature stages). Peking: 
Science Press; 1963 (In Chinese). 
Keys for Lepidopterous Larvae - 57 

I 
Crumb, S. E. The nearctic budworms of the lepidopterous genus 
Heliothis. U.S. Natl. Mus. Proc. 68(No. 2617, art. 16); 1926. 
. The armyworms. Brooklyn Entomol. Soc. Bull. 22:41-45; 
1927. 
. Tobacco cutworms. U.S. Dep. Agric. Tech. Bull. 88; 
1929. 
. The more important climbing cutworms. Brooklyn Entomol. 
Soc. Bull. 27:73-100; 1932. 
. The larvae of the Phalaenidae. U.S. Dep. Agric. Tech. 
Bull. 1135; 1956. 
Davis, E. G.; Horton, J. R. ; Gable, C. H.; Blanchard, R. A.; 
and Heinrich, C. The southwestern corn borer. U.S. Dep. 
Agric. Tech. Bull. 388; 1933. 
Eichlin, T. D. Guide to the adult and larval Plusiinae of 
California (Lepidoptera: Noctuidae) . Occas. Pap. Entomol., 
State Calif. Dep. Food Agric. No. 21; 1975. 
Eichlin, T. B.; Cunningham, H. B. The Plusiinae (Lepidoptera: 
Noctuidae) of America north of Mexico emphasizing genitalic 
and larval morphology. U.S. Dep. Agric. Tech. Bull. 1567; 
1978. 
Forbes, W. T. M. The Lepidoptera of New York and neighboring 
states. Cornell Univ. Agric. Exp. Stn. Mem. 68; 1923. 
Fracker, S. B. The classification of lepidopterous larvae. 
111. Biol. Monogr. 2(1); 1915. 
Godfrey, G. L. A review and reclassification of larvae of the 
subfamily Hadeninae (Lepidoptera, Noctuidae) of America north 
of Mexico. U.S. Dep. Agric. Tech. Bull. 1450; 1972. 
Hasenfuss, I. Die Larval systematik der Zunsler (Pyralidae) . 
Abh. Larvalsys. Insekten 5; 1960. 
Heinrich, C. Note on the European corn borer (Pyrausta 
nubilalls Hiibner) and its nearest American allies, with 
description of larvae, pupae, and one new species. J. Agric. 
Res. 18(3) : 171-178; 1919. 
. Some Lepidoptera likely to be confused with the pink 
bollworm. J. Agric. Res. 20(11) :807-836; 1921. 
58 

/ 
1 ) 
Hinton, H. E. The larvae of the Lepidoptera associated with 
stored products. Bull. Entomol. Res. 34:163-212; 1943. 
. On the homology and nomenclature of the setae of 
lepidopterous larvae with some notes on the phylogeny of the 
Lepidoptera. Trans. R. Entomol. Soc. London 97:1-37; 1946. 
. The larvae of the species of Tineidae of economic 
importance. Bull. Entomol. Res. 47(2) :251-346; 1956. 
Holloway, T. E.; Haley, W. E.; Loftin, U. C.; Heinrich, C. 
The sugarcane moth borer in the United States. U.S. Dep. 
Agric. Tech. Bull. 41; 1928. 
Issiki, S. Early stages of Japanese moths in colour. Rev. ed. 
Osaka, Japan: Hoikusha Publishing Co., Ltd. Vol. 1; 1973. 
Vol. 2; 1975. 
Levy, R.; Habeck, D. H. Descriptions of the larvae of 
Spodoptera sunla and S^. latlfascia with a key to the mature 
Spodoptera larvae of the eastern United States (Lepidoptera: 
Noctuidae) . Ann. Entomol. Soc. Am. 69(4) :585-588; 1976. 
MacKay, M. R. Larvae of the North American Olethreutidae 
(Lepidoptera). Can. Entomol. Suppl. 10; 1959. 
. Larvae of the North American Tortricinae (Lepidoptera: 
Tortricidae) . Can. Entomol. Suppl. 28; 1962. 
Larval sketches of some Microlepidoptera, chiefly North 
American. Mem. Entomol. Soc. Can. 88:1-83; 1972. 
Merzheyevskaya, 0. I. The larvae of Noctuidae, their biology 
and morphology (with keys). Minsk, Byelorussia, USSR: Academy 
of Science, Byelorussia (Department of Zoology and 
Parasitology), Science and Technology; 1967 (In Russian). 
Mosher, E. A classification of the Lepidoptera based on 
characters of the pupa. Bull. 111. State Lab. Nat. Hist. 
12(2) : 17-159; 1916. 
Neunzig, H. H. Systematics of immature phycitines (Lepidoptera: 
Pyralidae) associated with leguminous plants in the southern 
United States. U.S. Dep. Agric. Tech. Bull. 1589; 1979. 
Okumura, G. T. Identifications of lepidopterous larvae 
attacking cotton. Calif. Dep. Agric., Bur. Entomol. Spec. 
Publ. 282; 1961. 
Keys for Lepidopterous Larvae - 59 

V 
Peterson, A. Larvae of insects. Part 1. Lepidoptera and plant 
infesting Hymenoptera. Columbus, OH: Alvah Peterson; 1956. 
Swatschek, B. Die Larvalsystematik der Wickler (Tortricidae 
und Carposinidae) . Abh. Larvalsys. Insekten 3; 1958. 
Werner, K. Die Larvalsystematik einiger Kleinschmetterling- 
familien (Hyponomeutidae , Orthoteliidae , Acrolepiidae, 
Tineidae, Incurvariidae und Adelidae) . Abh. Larvalsys. 
Insekten 2; 1958. 
Zimmerman, E. C. Insects of Hawaii. Vol. 9. Microlepidoptera. 
Parts 1 and 2. Honolulu: The Univ. Press of Hawaii; 1978. 
1 
\ 
60 
'^V 

Index abornana chatka, Lorita 45 
Achyra T ~ i T~ . ~ ! ~ 35 
Acrolepia 52 
Acrolepiidae 9, 52 
Acrolophus 54 
Aglossa 29 
Alpheias 27 
Amyelols 22, 23 
Anagasta 25 
Anarsla 49 
Ancylostomia 20 
aporema, Epinotia 43 
Argyresthla 47 
Argyresthiidae 7, 47 
Ascla 11 
assectella , Acrolepia 52 
Autographa 13 
bipunctalis , Herpetogramma 36 
blsinuella , Moodna 21 
bisselllella , Tineola 55 
Blastobasidae 6 , 45 
boeticus, Lampides 12 
brassicae, Mamestra 16 
brassicae, Pieris 11 
Cadra 25, 26 
calldella , Cadra 26 
caprealis, Aglossa 29 
capsicum , Symme trischema 51 
Carposlna 17 
Carposinidae 17 
catenifer, Stenoma 47 
cautella , Cadra 25 
cephalonica , Corcyra 28 
ceratoniae, Ectomyelois 23 
cerealella, Sitotroga 48 
Chilo TT 31 
Cochylidae 6 , 45 
conjugella , Argyresthla 47 
conspirata, Alpheias 27 
Copitarsla 17 
Corcyra T 28 
Cosmopterigidae 8 , 47 
Cossidae 7, 46 
Cossus 46 
cossus , Cossus 46 
Cryptophlebla 42 
Cydia . . 44, 45 
Keys for Lepidopterous Larvae - 61 

Dlaphanla 40 
Diatraea 32 
Dichocrocls 32 
dupllfasclalls , Hendecasls 38 
Dyspessa 46 
Ectomyelois 23 
Elasmopalpus 19 
elegantalls , Neoleuclnodes 41 
elutella , Ephestla 25 
Eoreuma 31 
Endrosis 48 
Ephestla 25 
Epinotla 43 
Etiella 18, 26 
exlgua , Spodoptera 15 
farinalis, Pyralls 29 
fasclana , Pammene 43 
flgulllella , Cadra 26 
fruglperda , Spodoptera 15 
Fundella 21 
gamma , Autographa 13 
Gelechlidae 8, 48 
Geometrldae 2, 12 
gos8yplella , Pectlnophora 50 
grandella , Hypslpyla 21 
granella , Nemapogon 56 
Graphollta 44 
gularis , Parallpsa . . 28 
Helicoverpa 14 
Hellothls 14 
Hellula 34, 35 
Hendecasls 38 
Herpetogramma 36 
Hesperlldae 1, 10 
Hofmannophlla 48 
hyallnata , Dlaphanla 40 
Hypslpyla 21 
Idaea 12 
Integra , Llneodes 30, 38 
lnterpunctella , Plodla 24 
Keif erla 50 
kuehnlella, Anagasta .... 25 
62 

NATIONAL AGRICULTURAL LIBRARY 
022573776 
l. 
* 
Lampldes 
Lepldobregma 
Leuclnodes 
leucotreta , Cryptophlebla 
lignosellus , Elasmopalpus 
llneatella, Anars la . . 
Llneodes 
loftini, Eoreuma . . . . 
Lorlta 
Lycaenldae 
lycoperslcella , Keiferla 
30, 
2 , 
12 
56 
40 
42 
19 
49 
38 
31 
45 
12 
50 
Mamestra 16 
Maruca 33 
mellnus , Strymon 12 
mlnuscula , Lepldobregma . 56 
monuste , Ascla 11 
Moodna 21 
napl , Plerls 10 
Nemapogon 56 
Neoleucinodes 41 
nlponensls nlponensls , Carposlna 17 
nltldalls , Dlaphanla 40 
nl , Trlchoplusla 13 
Noctuldae 13 
nubilalis, Ostrlnla 33 
Oecophorldae 8, 47 
operculella , Phthorlmaea 51 
Opogona 54 
orbonalls , Leuclnodes 40 
Ostrlnla 33 
Pammene 43 
Parallpsa 28, 50 
Pectlnophora 50 
pellucens , Fundella 21 
Perldroma 16 
perlusalls , Pllemla 37 
phldllealls , Hellula 35 
Phthorlmaea 51 
Plerldae 2, 10 
Plerls 10, 11 
Pllemla . 37 
Platynota 41 
Plodla 24 
Plutella 52 
Plutellldae 9, 52 
Keys for Lepldopterous Larvae - 63 

NATIONAL AGRICULTURAL LIBRARY 
III III II (III III 
{I 
1022573 
776 
pomonella , Cydia 
Prays 
pseudospretella , Hofmannophlla 
punctiferalis , Dichocrocls . . 
Pyralidae 
Pyralls 
Pyroderces 
rantalis , Achyra 
rapae, Pierls 
rogatalls , Hellula 
rostrana , Platynota 
rubigalis , Udea 
rutella, Setomorpha 
saecharl , Opogona . . . 
sarcltrella , Endrosls 
saucla , Perldroma . . . 
Setomorpha 
Sitotroga 
splendana , Cydia . . . , 
Spodoptera 
Stenoma 
stercorea , Ancylostomla 
Strymon 
stultana, Platynota . . 
suppressalls , Chllo . . 
Symmetrlschema 
te8tulalls , Maruca . 
Tlneldae 
Tlneola 
Tortrlcldae .... 
transltella , Amyelols 
Trlchoplusla .... 
Udea 
ulula, Dyspessa . . 
virescens, Hellothls 
Xestla 
xylostella , Plutella 
zea , Hellcoverpa . . 
zlnckenella , Etlella 
44 
52 
48 
32 
4, 
18 
29 
47 
35 
10 
34 
41 
30, 
37 
53 
54 
48 
16 
53 
48 
45 
15 
47 
20 
12 
41 
31 
51 
33 
9, 
53 
55 
6, 
41 
22, 
23 
13 
30, 
37 
46 
14 
16, 
17 
52 
14 
A 
00 
H 
26 
64 
☆U.S. Government Printing Office : 1986 -490-918/40176 







